 

OLD

 

TESTAMENT

LEVITICUS
Leviticus 1

Leviticus 2

Leviticus 3

Leviticus 4

Leviticus 5

Leviticus 6

Leviticus 7

Leviticus 8

Leviticus 9

Leviticus 10

Leviticus 11

Leviticus 12

Leviticus 13

Leviticus 14

Leviticus 15

Leviticus 16

Leviticus 17

Leviticus 18

Leviticus 19

Leviticus 20

Leviticus 21

Leviticus 22

Leviticus 23

Leviticus 24

Leviticus 25

Leviticus 26

Leviticus 27



FACING OUR SIN SQUARELY
It is not for me to decide whether you should confess your sins to a priest or not . . . but if you do not, you should at least make a list on a piece of paper, and make a serious act of penance about each one of them. There is something about the mere words, you know, provided you avoid two dangers, either of sensational exaggeration—trying to work things up and make melodramatic sins out of small matters—or the opposite danger of slurring things over. It is essential to use the plain simple, old-fashioned words that you would use about anyone else. I mean words like theft, or fornication, or hatred instead of “I did not mean to be dishonest,” or “I was only a boy then,” or “I lost my temper.” I think that this steady facing of what one does know and bringing it before God, without excuses, and seriously asking for Forgiveness and Grace, and resolving as far as in one lies to do better, is the only way in which we can ever begin to know the fatal thing which is always there, and preventing us from becoming perfectly just to our wife or husband, or being a better employer or employee. If this process is gone through, I do not doubt that most of us will come to understand and to share these old words like “contrite,” “miserable” and “intolerable.”

—from “‘Miserable Offenders,’” God in the Dock

For reflection  Leviticus 4:27–31



HE REVEALS HIMSELF WHEN WE WORSHIP
God does not only “demand” praise as the supremely beautiful and all-satisfying Object. He does apparently command it as lawgiver. The Jews were told to sacrifice. We are under an obligation to go to church. But this was a difficulty only because . . . I did not see that it is in the process of being worshipped that God communicates His presence to men. It is not of course the only way. But for many people at many times the “fair beauty of the LORD” is revealed chiefly or only while they worship Him together. Even in Judaism the essence of the sacrifice was not really that men gave bulls and goats to God, but that by their so doing God gave Himself to men; in the central act of our own worship of course this is far clearer—there it is manifestly, even physically, God who gives and we who receive. The miserable idea that God should in any sense need, or crave for, our worship like a vain woman wanting compliments, or a vain author presenting his new books to people who never met or heard of him, is implicitly answered by the words “If I be hungry I will not tell thee” (Psalm 50, 12). Even if such an absurd Deity could be conceived, He would hardly come to us, the lowest of rational creatures, to gratify His appetite. I don’t want my dog to bark approval of my books. Now that I come to think of it, there are some humans whose enthusiastically favourable criticism would not much gratify me.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Leviticus 9:1–6


For reflection: Leviticus 11:44–45

We actually are, at present, creatures whose character must be, in some respects, a horror to God, as it is, when we really see it, a horror to ourselves. This I believe to be a fact: and I notice that the holier a man is, the more fully he is aware of that fact.

—from The Problem of Pain



THE ROAD BACK TO GOD
Now we cannot . . . discover our failure to keep God’s law except by trying our very hardest (and then failing). Unless we really try, whatever we say there will always be at the back of our minds the idea that if we try harder next time we shall succeed in being completely good. Thus, in one sense, the road back to God is a road of moral effort, of trying harder and harder. But in another sense it is not trying that is ever going to bring us home. All this trying leads up to the vital moment at which you turn to God and say, “You must do this. I can’t.”

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Leviticus 12–16



DUTY EXISTS FOR DELIGHT
The Jewish sacrifices, and even our own most sacred rites, as they actually occur in human experience, are, like the tuning, promise, not performance. Hence, like the tuning, they may have in them much duty and little delight; or none. But the duty exists for the delight. When we carry out our “religious duties” we are like people digging channels in a waterless land, in order that when at last the water comes, it may find them ready. I mean, for the most part. There are happy moments, even now, when a trickle creeps along the dry beds; and happy souls to whom this happens often.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Leviticus 17:1–16



OLD MORALITIES
The first thing to get clear about Christian morality between man and man is that in this department Christ did not come to preach any brand new morality. The Golden Rule of the New Testament (Do as you would be done by) is a summing up of what every one, at bottom, had always known to be right. Really great moral teachers never do introduce new moralities: it is quacks and cranks who do that. As Dr. Johnson said, “People need to be reminded more often than they need to be instructed.” The real job of every moral teacher is to keep on bringing us back, time after time, to the old simple principles which we are all so anxious not to see; like bringing a horse back and back to the fence it has refused to jump or bringing a child back and back to the bit in its lesson that it wants to shirk.

—from Mere Christianity



LOVE ONE ANOTHER
Certainly I cannot love my neighbour properly till I love God. . . . On the other hand we have no power to make ourselves love God. The only way is absolute obedience to Him, total surrender. He will give us the “feeling” if He pleases. But both when He does and when He does not, we shall gradually learn that feeling is not the important thing. There is something in us deeper than feeling, deeper even than conscious will. It is rather being. When we are quite empty of self we shall be filled with Him, for nature abhors a vacuum. Of course it is good, as you say, to “realise” that the source of all our good feelings is God. (That is the right way to deal with pride: not to depreciate the good thing we are tempted to be proud of but to remember where it comes from). But “realisation” depends on faculties that fail us when we are tired or when we try to use them too often, so we can’t depend on it. It is the self you really are and not its reflections in consciousness that matters most.

May I take what is really the closest parallel? No child is begotten without pleasure. But the pleasure is not the cause of life—it is a symptom, something that happens when life is in fact being transmitted. In the same way “feeling love” is only the echo in consciousness of the real thing wh. lies deeper.

—from a letter to Edith Gates, May 23, 1944

For reflection  Leviticus 19:33–34



YOU SHALL NOT PROFANE MY HOLY NAME
Every sin is the distortion of an energy breathed into us—an energy which, if not thus distorted, would have blossomed into one of those holy acts whereof “God did it” and “I did it” are both true descriptions. We poison the wine as He decants it into us; murder a melody He would play with us as the instrument. We caricature the self-portrait He would paint. Hence all sin, whatever else it is, is sacrilege.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Leviticus 22:31–33



For reflection: Leviticus 25:1–7

It is well to have specifically holy places, and things, and days, for, without these focal points or reminders, the belief that all is holy and “big with God” will soon dwindle into a mere sentiment.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer




MAKING AMENDS
Every man, not very holy or very arrogant, has to “live up to” the outward appearance of other men: he knows there is that within him which falls far below even his most careless public behaviour, even his loosest talk. In an instant of time—while your friend hesitates for a word—what things pass through your mind? We have never told the whole truth. We may confess ugly facts—the meanest cowardice or the shabbiest and most prosaic impurity—but the tone is false. The very act of confessing—an infinitesimally hypocritical glance—a dash of humour—all this contrives to dissociate the facts from your very self. No one could guess how familiar and, in a sense, congenial to your soul these things were, how much of a piece with all the rest: down there, in the dreaming inner warmth, they struck no such discordant note, were not nearly so odd and detachable from the rest of you, as they seem when they are turned into words. We imply, and often believe, that habitual vices are exceptional single acts, and make the opposite mistake about our virtues—like the bad tennis player who calls his normal form his “bad days” and mistakes his rare successes for his normal. I do not think it is our fault that we cannot tell the real truth about ourselves; the persistent, life-long, inner murmur of spite, jealousy, prurience, greed and self-complacence, simply will not go into words. But the important thing is that we should not mistake our inevitably limited utterances for a full account of the worst that is inside.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Leviticus 26:40–45


Joshua

BE STRONG AND COURAGEOUS
When a thing has to be attempted, one must never think about possibility or impossibility. Faced with an optional question in an examination paper, one considers whether one can do it or not: faced with a compulsory question, one must do the best one can. You may get some marks for a very imperfect answer: you will certainly get none for leaving the question alone. Not only in examinations but in war, in mountain climbing, in learning to skate, or swim, or ride a bicycle, even in fastening a stiff collar with cold fingers, people quite often do what seemed impossible before they did it. It is wonderful what you can do when you have to.

We may, indeed, be sure that perfect chastity—like perfect charity—will not be attained by any merely human efforts. You must ask for God’s help. Even when you have done so, it may seem to you for a long time that no help, or less help than you need, is being given. Never mind. After each failure, ask forgiveness, pick yourself up, and try again. Very often what God first helps us towards is not the virtue itself but just this power of always trying again. For however important chastity (or courage, or truthfulness, or any other virtue) may be, this process trains us in habits of the soul which are more important still. It cures our illusions about ourselves and teaches us to depend on God. We learn, on the one hand, that we cannot trust ourselves even in our best moments, and, on the other, that we need not despair even in our worst, for our failures are forgiven. The only fatal thing is to sit down content with anything less than perfection.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Joshua 1:6–9



COMPARING OUR SINS
If, then, you are ever tempted to think that we modern Western Europeans cannot really be so very bad because we are, comparatively speaking, humane—if, in other words, you think God might be content with us on that ground—ask yourself whether you think God ought to have been content with the cruelty of cruel ages because they excelled in courage or chastity. You will see at once that this is an impossibility. From considering how the cruelty of our ancestors looks to us, you may get some inkling how our softness, worldliness, and timidity would have looked to them, and hence how both must look to God.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Joshua 7:1–26




For reflection: Joshua 8:1–29

If war is ever lawful, then peace is sometimes sinful.

—from a letter to the editor of the journal Theology, January 1939, God in the Dock


PERPLEXING PASSAGES
The two things one must not do are (a) to believe on the strength of Scripture or on any other evidence that God is in any way evil (in Him there is no darkness at all) (b) to wipe off the slate any passage which seems to show that He is. Behind the shocking passage be sure lurks some great truth which you don’t understand. If one ever does come to understand it, one sees that it is good and just and gracious in some ways we never dreamed of. Till then it must just be left on one side.

But why are baffling passages left in at all? Oh, because God speaks not only for us little ones but for the great sages and mystics who experience what we can only read about, and to whom all the words have therefore different (richer) contents. Would not a revelation that contained nothing that you or I did not understand, be for that very reason rather suspect?

—from a letter to Mrs. Emily McLay, August 8, 1953

For reflection  Joshua 11:1–23


THE RICHES OF GOD’S GOODNESS
God has no needs. Human love, as Plato teaches us, is the child of Poverty—of a want or lack; it is caused by a real or supposed good in its beloved which the lover needs and desires. But God’s love, far from being caused by goodness in the object, causes all the goodness which the object has, loving it first into existence and then into real, though derivative, lovability. God is Goodness. He can give good, but cannot need or get it. In that sense all His love is, as it were, bottomlessly selfless by very definition; it has everything to give and nothing to receive.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Joshua 21:45




For reflection: Joshua 22:5

God will look to every soul like its first love because He is its first love.

—from The Problem of Pain





CHOOSE THIS DAY WHOM YOU WILL SERVE
There are only two kinds of people in the end: those who say to God, “Thy will be done,” and those to whom God says, in the end, “Thy will be done.” All that are in Hell, choose it. Without that self-choice there could be no Hell. No soul that seriously and constantly desires joy will ever miss it. Those who seek find. To those who knock it is opened.

—from The Great Divorce

For reflection  Joshua 24:14–15



THE TRANSMISSION OF CHRISTIANITY
This very obvious fact—that each generation is taught by an earlier generation—must be kept very firmly in mind. . . . None can give to another what he does not possess himself. No generation can bequeath to its successor what it has not got. You may frame the syllabus as you please. But when you have planned and reported ad nauseam, if we are skeptical we shall teach only skepticism to our pupils, if fools only folly, if vulgar only vulgarity, if saints sanctity, if heroes heroism. Education is only the most fully conscious of the channels whereby each generation influences the next. It is not a closed system. Nothing which was not in the teachers can flow from them into the pupils. We shall all admit that a man who knows no Greek himself cannot teach Greek to his form; but it is equally certain that a man whose mind was formed in a period of cynicism and disillusion, cannot teach hope or fortitude.

A society which is predominantly Christian will propagate Christianity through its schools: one which is not, will not.

—from “On the Transmission of Christianity,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Judges 2:10


IN THE PRESENCE OF GOD
To believe that God—at least this God—exists is to believe that you as a person now stand in the presence of God as a Person. What would, a moment before, have been variations in opinion, now become variations in your personal attitude to a Person. You are no longer faced with an argument which demands your assent, but with a Person who demands your confidence.

—from “On Obstinacy in Belief,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Judges 6:11–24



IF GOD WERE PROUD
It is a poor thing to strike our colours to God when the ship is going down under us; a poor thing to come to Him as a last resort, to offer up “our own” when it is no longer worth keeping. If God were proud He would hardly have us on such terms: but He is not proud, He stoops to conquer, He will have us even though we have shown that we prefer everything else to Him, and come to Him because there is “nothing better” now to be had. The same humility is shown by all those Divine appeals to our fears which trouble high-minded readers of Scripture. It is hardly complimentary to God that we should choose Him as an alternative to Hell: yet even this He accepts. The creature’s illusion of self-sufficiency must, for the creature’s sake, be shattered; and by trouble or fear of trouble on earth, by crude fear of the eternal flames, God shatters it “unmindful of His glory’s diminution.”

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Judges 10:6–16



HEROES AND AVENGERS
The “Judges” who give their name to a most interesting historical book in the Old Testament were not, I gather, so called only because they sometimes exercised what we should [would] consider judicial functions. Indeed the book has very little to say about “judging” in that sense. Its “judges” are primarily heroes, fighting men, who deliver Israel from foreign tyrants: giant-killers. The name which we translate as “judges” is apparently connected with a verb which means to vindicate, to avenge, to right the wrongs of. They might equally well be called champions, avengers. The knight errant of medieval romance who spends his days liberating, and securing justice for, distressed damsels, would almost have been, for the Hebrews, a “judge.”

—from “The Psalms,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Judges 15:1–20




For reflection: Judges 16:15–18

Virtue—even attempted virtue—brings light; indulgence brings fog.

—from Mere Christianity





THE PEOPLE DID WHAT WAS RIGHT IN THEIR OWN EYES
There can be no moral motive for entering a new morality unless that motive is borrowed from the traditional morality. . . . All the specifically modern attempts at new moralities are contractions. They proceed by retaining some traditional precepts and rejecting others: but the only real authority behind those which they retain is the very same authority which they flout in rejecting others. . . . You can attack the concept of justice because it interferes with the feeding of the masses, but you have taken the duty of feeding the masses from the worldwide code. You may exalt patriotism at the expense of mercy; but it was the old code that told you to love your country. You may vivisect your grandfather in order to deliver your grandchildren from cancer: but, take away traditional morality, and why should you bother about your grandchildren?

—from “On Ethics,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Judges 17:6





For reflection: Judges 21:25

Evil comes from the abuse of free will.

—from The Problem of Pain




1 CHRONICLES
1 Chronicles 1

1 Chronicles 2

1 Chronicles 3

1 Chronicles 4

1 Chronicles 5

1 Chronicles 6

1 Chronicles 7

1 Chronicles 8

1 Chronicles 9

1 Chronicles 10

1 Chronicles 11

1 Chronicles 12

1 Chronicles 13

1 Chronicles 14

1 Chronicles 15

1 Chronicles 16

1 Chronicles 17

1 Chronicles 18

1 Chronicles 19

1 Chronicles 20

1 Chronicles 21

1 Chronicles 22

1 Chronicles 23

1 Chronicles 24

1 Chronicles 25

1 Chronicles 26

1 Chronicles 27

1 Chronicles 28

1 Chronicles 29



GENERATION AFTER GENERATION
To be quite frank, we do not at all like the idea of a “chosen people.” Democrats by birth and education, we should prefer to think that all nations and individuals start level in the search for God, or even that all religions are equally true. It must be admitted at once that Christianity makes no concessions to this point of view. It does not tell of a human search for God at all, but of something done by God for, to, and about, Man. And the way in which it is done is selective, undemocratic, to the highest degree. After the knowledge of God had been universally lost or obscured, one man from the whole earth (Abraham) is picked out. He is separated (miserably enough, we may suppose) from his natural surroundings, sent into a strange country, and made the ancestor of a nation who are to carry the knowledge of the true God. Within this nation there is further selection: some die in the desert, some remain behind in Babylon. There is further selection still. The process grows narrower and narrower, sharpens at last into one small bright point like the head of a spear. It is a Jewish girl at her prayers. All humanity (so far as concerns its redemption) has narrowed to that.

—from Miracles

For reflection  1 Chronicles 1:1–9:1


WHY WE PRAISE
I think we delight to praise what we enjoy because the praise not merely expresses but completes the enjoyment; it is its appointed consummation. It is not out of compliment that lovers keep on telling one another how beautiful they are; the delight is incomplete till it is expressed. It is frustrating to have discovered a new author and not to be able to tell anyone how good he is; to come suddenly, at the turn of the road, upon some mountain valley of unexpected grandeur and then to have to keep silent because the people with you care for it no more than for a tin can in the ditch; to hear a good joke and find no one to share it with (the perfect hearer died a year ago). This is so even when our expressions are inadequate, as of course they usually are. But how if one could really and fully praise even such things to perfection—utterly “get out” in poetry or music or paint the upsurge of appreciation which almost bursts you? Then indeed the object would be fully appreciated and our delight would have attained perfect development. The worthier the object, the more intense this delight would be. If it were possible for a created soul fully (I mean, up to the full measure conceivable in a finite being) to “appreciate,” that is to love and delight in, the worthiest object of all, and simultaneously at every moment to give this delight perfect expression, then that soul would be in supreme beatitude. It is along these lines that I find it easiest to understand the Christian doctrine that “Heaven” is a state in which angels now, and men hereafter, are perpetually employed in praising God. This does not mean, as it can so dismally suggest, that it is like “being in Church.” For our “services” both in their conduct and in our power to participate, are merely attempts at worship; never fully successful, often 99.9 percent failures, sometimes total failures. We are not riders but pupils in the riding school; for most of us the falls and bruises, the aching muscles and the severity of the exercise, far outweigh those few moments in which we were, to our own astonishment, actually galloping without terror and without disaster. To see what the doctrine really means, we must suppose ourselves to be in perfect love with God—drunk with, drowned in, dissolved by, that delight which, far from remaining pent up within ourselves as incommunicable, hence hardly tolerable, bliss, flows out from us incessantly again in effortless and perfect expression, our joy no more separable from the praise in which it liberates and utters itself than the brightness a mirror receives is separable from the brightness it sheds. The Scotch catechism says that man’s chief end is “to glorify God and enjoy Him forever.” But we shall then know that these are the same thing. Fully to enjoy is to glorify. In commanding us to glorify Him, God is inviting us to enjoy Him.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  1 Chronicles 16:23–24



For reflection: 1 Chronicles 19:13

God is not merely good, but goodness; goodness is not merely divine, but God.

—from “The Poison of Subjectivism,” Christian Reflections



TRUTH HURTS
Humility, after the first shock, is a cheerful virtue: it is the high-minded unbeliever, desperately trying in the teeth of repeated disillusions to retain his “faith in human nature,” who is really sad. I have been aiming at an intellectual, not an emotional, effect: I have been trying to make the reader believe that we actually are, at present, creatures whose character must be, in some respects, a horror to God, as it is, when we really see it, a horror to ourselves. This I believe to be a fact: and I notice that the holier a man is, the more fully he is aware of that fact. Perhaps you have imagined that this humility in the saints is a pious illusion at which God smiles. That is a most dangerous error. It is theoretically dangerous, because it makes you identify a virtue (i.e., a perfection) with an illusion (i.e., an imperfection), which must be nonsense. It is practically dangerous because it encourages a man to mistake his first insights into his own corruption for the first beginnings of a halo round his own silly head. No; depend upon it, when the saints say that they—even they—are vile, they are recording truth with scientific accuracy.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  1 Chronicles 21:1–19

WHY SHOULD WE OBEY GOD?
God was to be obeyed simply because he was God. . . . That is why, though it was a terror, it was no surprise to learn that God is to be obeyed because of what He is in Himself. If you ask why we should obey God, in the last resort the answer is, “I am.” To know God is to know that our obedience is due to Him. In his nature His sovereignty de jure [in fact] is revealed.

—from Surprised by Joy

For reflection  1 Chronicles 28:9


BEYOND HISTORY
It is really, I suggest, a timeless truth about God that human nature, and the human experience of weakness and sleep and ignorance, are somehow included in His whole divine life. This human life in God is from our point of view a particular period in the history of our world (from the year A.D. one till the Crucifixion). We therefore imagine it is also a period in the history of God’s own existence. But God has no history. He is too completely and utterly real to have one. For, of course, to have a history means losing part of your reality (because it has already slipped away into the past) and not yet having another part (because it is still in the future): in fact having nothing but the tiny little present, which has gone before you can speak about it. God forbid we should think God was like that.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Chronicles 29:10–11


NEHEMIAH
Nehemiah 1

Nehemiah 2

Nehemiah 3

Nehemiah 4

Nehemiah 5

Nehemiah 6

Nehemiah 7

Nehemiah 8

Nehemiah 9

Nehemiah 10

Nehemiah 11

Nehemiah 12

Nehemiah 13




For reflection: Nehemiah 1:4–11

Divine punishments are also mercies, and particular good is worked out of particular evil.

—from Surprised by Joy




TAKING INTEREST
There is one bit of advice given to us by the ancient heathen Greeks, and by the Jews in the Old Testament, and by the great Christian teachers of the Middle Ages, which the modern economic system has completely disobeyed. All these people told us not to lend money at interest; and lending money at interest—what we call investment—is the basis of our whole system. Now it may not absolutely follow that we are wrong. Some people say that when Moses and Aristotle and the Christians agreed in forbidding interest (or “usury” as they called it), they could not foresee the joint stock company, and were only thinking of the private moneylender, and that, therefore, we need not bother about what they said. That is a question I cannot decide on. I am not an economist and I simply do not know whether the investment system is responsible for the state we are in or not. This is where we want the Christian economist. But I should not have been honest if I had not told you that three great civilisations had agreed (or so it seems at first sight) in condemning the very thing on which we have based our whole life.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Nehemiah 5:1–13



For reflection: Nehemiah 9:6

God gives His gifts where He finds the vessel empty enough to receive them.

—from “Williams and the Arthuriad,” Arthurian Torso




LESSONS FROM HISTORY
We need intimate knowledge of the past. Not that the past has any magic about it, but because we cannot study the future, and yet need something to set against the present, to remind us that the basic assumptions have been quite different in different periods and that much which seems certain to the uneducated is merely temporary fashion. A man who has lived in many places is not likely to be deceived by the local errors of his native village; the scholar has lived in many times and is therefore in some degree immune from the great cataract of nonsense that pours from the press and the microphone of his own age.

—from “Learning in War-Time,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Nehemiah 12:44–13:22


Psalm 36



DO NOT FRET
The great thing, if one can, is to stop regarding all the unpleasant things as interruptions of one’s “own,” or “real” life. The truth is of course that what one calls the interruptions are precisely one’s real life—the life God is sending one day by day: what one calls one’s “real life” is a phantom of one’s own imagination.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, December 20, 1943

For reflection  Psalm 37:8


NOTICING THE DIRT
Iknow all about the despair of overcoming chronic temptations. It is not serious provided self-offended petulance, annoyance at breaking records, impatience etc doesn’t get the upper hand. No amount of falls will really undo us if we keep on picking ourselves up each time. We shall of course be v. muddy and tattered children by the time we reach home. But the bathrooms are all ready, the towels put out, & the clean clothes are in the airing cupboard. The only fatal thing is to lose one’s temper and give it up. It is when we notice the dirt that God is most present to us: it is the v. sign of His presence.

—from a letter to Mary Neylan, January 20, 1942

For reflection  Psalm 40:1–3

I DELIGHT TO DO YOUR WILL
Every faculty you have, your power of thinking or of moving your limbs from moment to moment, is given you by God. If you devoted every moment of your whole life exclusively to His service you could not give Him anything that was not in a sense His own already. So that when we talk of a man doing anything for God or giving anything to God, I will tell you what it is really like. It is like a small child going to its father and saying, “Daddy, give me sixpence to buy you a birthday present.”

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Psalm 40:6–8




For reflection: Psalm 42:1–11

The soul that has once been waked, or stung, or uplifted by the desire of God, will inevitably (I think) awake to the fear of losing Him.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer




RANSOM MY SOUL
It is surely, therefore, very possible that when God began to reveal Himself to men, to show them that He and nothing else is their true goal and the satisfaction of their needs, and that He has a claim upon them simply by being what He is, quite apart from anything He can bestow or deny, it may have been absolutely necessary that this revelation should not begin with any hint of future Beatitude or Perdition. These are not the right point to begin at. An effective belief in them, coming too soon, may even render almost impossible the development of (so to call it) the appetite for God; personal hopes and fears, too obviously exciting, have got in first. Later, when, after centuries of spiritual training, men have learned to desire and adore God, to pant after Him “as pants the hart,” it is another matter. For then those who love God will desire not only to enjoy Him but “to enjoy Him forever,” and will fear to lose Him. And it is by that door that a truly religious hope of Heaven and fear of Hell can enter; as corollaries to a faith already centred upon God, not as things of any independent or intrinsic weight. It is even arguable that the moment “Heaven” ceases to mean union with God and “Hell” to mean separation from him, the belief in either is a mischievous superstition; for then we have, on the one hand, a merely “compensatory” belief (a “sequel” to life’s sad story, in which everything will “come all right”) and, on the other, a nightmare which drives men into asylums or makes them persecutors.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 49:7–9, 15


YOU THOUGHT I WAS ONE JUST LIKE YOURSELF
Ihave often, on my knees, been shocked to find what sort of thoughts I have for a moment, been addressing to God; what infantile placations I was really offering, what claims I have really made, even what absurd adjustments or compromises I was, half-consciously, proposing. There is a Pagan, savage heart in me somewhere. For unfortunately the folly and idiot-cunning of Paganism seem to have far more power of surviving than its innocent or even beautiful elements. It is easy, once you have power, to silence the pipes, still the dances, disfigure the statues, and forget the stories; but not easy to kill the savage, the greedy, frightened creature now cringing, now blustering, in one’s soul—the creature to whom God may well say, “thou thoughtest I am even such a one as thyself” (50, 21).

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 50:19–23


MY SIN IS EVER BEFORE ME
Real forgiveness means looking steadily at the sin, the sin that is left over without any excuse, after all allowances have been made, and seeing it in all its horror, dirt, meanness, and malice, and nevertheless being wholly reconciled to the man who has done it. That, and only that, is forgiveness, and that we can always have from God if we ask for it.

—from “On Forgiveness,” The Weight of Glory



A VICTIM’S RESPONSE
It is monstrously simple-minded to read the cursings in the Psalms with no feeling except one of horror at the uncharity of the poets. They are indeed devilish. But we must also think of those who made them so. Their hatreds are the reaction to something. Such hatreds are the kind of thing that cruelty and injustice, by a sort of natural law, produce. This, among other things, is what wrongdoing means. Take from a man his freedom or his goods and you may have taken his innocence, almost his humanity, as well. Not all the victims go and hang themselves like Mr. Pilgrim; they may live and hate.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 52:1–9


THE CROWN IS NOT PROMISED WITHOUT THE CROSS
My memories of the last war haunted my dreams for years. Military service, to be plain, includes the threat of every temporal evil: pain and death wh. is what we fear from sickness: isolation from those we love wh. is what we fear from exile: toil under arbitrary masters, injustice and humiliation, wh. is what we fear from slavery: hunger, thirst, cold and exposure wh. is what we fear from poverty. I’m not a pacifist. If its got to be, its got to be. But the flesh is weak and selfish and I think death wd. be much better than to live through another war.

Thank God, He has not allowed my faith to be greatly tempted by the present horrors. I do not doubt that whatever misery He permits will be for our ultimate good unless, by rebellious will, we convert it to evil. But I get no further than Gethsemane: and am daily thankful that that scene, of all others in Our Lord’s life, did not go unrecorded. But what state of affairs in this world can we view with satisfaction? If we are unhappy, then we are unhappy. If we are happy, then we remember that the crown is not promised without the cross and tremble. In fact, one comes to realise, what one always admitted theoretically, that there is nothing here that will do us good: the sooner we are safely out of this world the better. But “would it were evening, Hal, and all well.” I have even, I’m afraid, caught myself wishing that I had never been born, wh. is sinful. Also, meaningless if you try to think it out.

The process of living seems to consist in coming to realise truths so ancient and simple that, if stated, they sound like barren platitudes. They cannot sound otherwise to those who have not had the relevant experience: that is why there is no real teaching of such truths possible and every generation starts from scratch.

—from a letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, May 8, 1939

For reflection  Psalm 55:1–8


FEAR OF GOD BUT NOTHING ELSE
Remember one is given strength to bear what happens to one, but not the 100 and 1 different things that might happen. And don’t say God has proved that He can make you fear poverty, illness, etc. I am sure God never teaches us the fear of anything but Himself. As the only two good lines in one of our bad hymns says “Fear Him ye saints and you will then have nothing else to fear.” . . . Not all the things you fear can happen to you: the one (if any) that does will perhaps turn out v. different from what you think. Of course I know this is easier to say to another than to realise oneself. And always remember that poverty & every other ill, lovingly accepted, has all the spiritual value of voluntary poverty or penance.

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, August 3, 1956

For reflection  Psalm 56:3–4


MY REFUGE IS IN GOD
Ihave been in considerable trouble over the present danger of war. Twice in one life—and then to find how little I have grown in fortitude despite my conversion. It has done me a lot of good by making me realise how much of my happiness secretly depended on the tacit assumption of at least tolerable conditions for the body: and I see more clearly, I think, the necessity (if one may so put it) which God is under of allowing us to be afflicted—so few of us will really rest all on Him if He leaves us any other support.

—from a letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 29, 1938

For reflection  Psalm 62:1–8


THE FEAR OF GOD
Much of our backwardness in prayer is no doubt due to our sins, as every teacher will tell us; to our avoidable immersion in the things of this world, to our neglect of mental discipline. And also to the very worst kind of “fear of God.” We shrink from too naked a contact, because we are afraid of the divine demands upon us which it might make too audible. As some old writer says, many a Christian prays faintly “lest God might really hear him, which he, poor man, never intended.”

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Psalm 66:16–20


UNITED TO GOD
If you want to get warm you must stand near the fire: if you want to be wet you must get into the water. If you want joy, power, peace, eternal life, you must get close to, or even into, the thing that has them. They are not a sort of prize which God could, if He chose, just hand out to anyone. They are a great fountain of energy and beauty spurting up at the very centre of reality. If you are close to it, the spray will wet you: if you are not, you will remain dry. Once a man is united to God, how could he not live forever? Once a man is separated from God, what can he do but wither and die?

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Psalm 73:27–28



For reflection: Psalm 78:40

One road leads home and a thousand roads lead into the wilderness.

—from The Pilgrim’s Regress




JUSTICE TO THE WEAK
It will not bother me in the hour of death to reflect that I have been “had for a sucker” by any number of impostors: but it would be a torment to know that one had refused even one person in need. After all, the parable of the sheep & goats makes our duty perfectly plain, doesn’t it. Another thing that annoys me is when people say “Why did you give that man money? He’ll probably go and drink it.” My reply is “But if I’d kept [it] I should probably have drunk it.”

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, October 26, 1962

For reflection  Psalm 82:3–4


ONE DAY IN YOUR COURTS
Don’t bother about the idea that God “has known for millions of years exactly what you are about to pray.” That isn’t what it’s like. God is hearing you now, just as simply as a mother hears a child. The difference His timelessness makes is that this now (which slips away from you even as you say the word now) is for Him infinite. If you must think of His timelessness at all, don’t think of Him having looked forward to this moment for millions of years: think that to Him you are always praying this prayer. But there’s really no need to bring it in. You have gone into the Temple (“one day in Thy court is better than a thousand”) and found Him, as always, there. That is all you need to bother about.

—from a letter to Miss Breckenridge, August 1, 1949

For reflection  Psalm 84:10


SEARCHING FOR ANSWERS
That the over-all operation of Scripture is to convey God’s Word to the reader (he also needs His inspiration) who reads it in the right spirit, I fully believe. That it also gives true answers to all the questions (often religiously irrelevant) which he might ask, I don’t. The very kind of truth we are often demanding was, in my opinion, never even envisaged by the Ancients.

—from a letter to Professor Clyde S. Kilby, May 7, 1959

For reflection  Psalm 86:11


FROM EVERLASTING TO EVERLASTING
SCREWTAPE OFFERS A SHORT LESSON ON TIME AND ETERNITY:
But you must remember that he takes Time for an ultimate reality. He supposes that the Enemy, like himself, sees some things as present, remembers others as past, and anticipates others as future; or even if he believes that the Enemy does not see things that way, yet, in his heart of hearts, he regards this as a peculiarity of the Enemy’s mode of perception—he doesn’t really think (though he would say he did) that things as the Enemy sees them are things as they are! If you tried to explain to him that men’s prayers today are one of the innumerable co-ordinates with which the Enemy harmonises the weather of tomorrow, he would reply that then the Enemy always knew men were going to make those prayers and, if so, they did not pray freely but were predestined to do so. And he would add that the weather on a given day can be traced back through its causes to the original creation of matter itself—so that the whole thing, both on the human and on the material side, is given “from the word go.” What he ought to say, of course, is obvious to us; that the problem of adapting the particular weather to the particular prayers is merely the appearance, at two points in his temporal mode of perception, of the total problem of adapting the whole spiritual universe to the whole corporeal universe; that creation in its entirety operates at every point of space and time, or rather that their kind of consciousness forces them to encounter the whole, self-consistent creative act as a series of successive events. Why that creative act leaves room for their free will is the problem of problems, the secret behind the Enemy’s nonsense about “Love.” How it does so is no problem at all; for the Enemy does not foresee the humans making their free contributions in a future, but sees them doing so in His unbounded Now. And obviously to watch a man doing something is not to make him do it.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Psalm 90:2–4



For reflection: Psalm 96:1–13

Beauty descends from God into nature: but there it would perish and does except when a Man appreciates it with worship and thus as it were sends it back to God: so that through his consciousness what descended ascends again and the perfect circle is made.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, August 28, 1930





For reflection: Psalm 97:1–12

It is most really and truly in Abraham that all people shall be blessed, for it was the Jews who fully and unambiguously identified the awful Presence haunting black mountain-tops and thunderclouds with “the righteous Lord” who “loveth righteousness.”

—from The Problem of Pain





For reflection: Psalm 103:17–22

I was not born to be free—I was born to adore and obey.

—from C. S. Lewis at the Breakfast Table and Other Reminiscences



THEY ASKED, AND HE BROUGHT
Petitionary prayer is, nonetheless, both allowed and commanded to us: “Give us our daily bread.” And no doubt it raises a theoretical problem. Can we believe that God ever really modifies His action in response to the suggestions of men? For infinite wisdom does not need telling what is best, and infinite goodness needs no urging to do it. But neither does God need any of those things that are done by finite agents, whether living or inanimate. He could, if He chose, repair our bodies miraculously without food; or give us food without the aid of farmers, bakers, and butchers; or knowledge without the aid of learned men; or convert the heathen without missionaries. Instead, He allows soils and weather and animals and the muscles, minds, and wills of men to co-operate in the execution of His will.

—from “The Efficacy of Prayer,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Psalm 105:40–42


IMPLACABLE HOSTILITY TOWARDS SIN
For we can still see, in the worst of their maledictions, how these old poets were, in a sense, near to God. Though hideously distorted by the human instrument, something of the Divine voice can be heard in these passages. Not, of course, that God looks upon their enemies as they do: He “desireth not the death of a sinner.” But doubtless He has for the sin of those enemies just the implacable hostility which the poets express. Implacable? Yes, not to the sinner but to the sin. It will not be tolerated nor condoned, no treaty will be made with it. That tooth must come out, that right hand must be amputated, if the man is to be saved. In that way the relentlessness of the Psalmists is far nearer to one side of the truth than many modern attitudes which can be mistaken, by those who hold them, for Christian charity.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 106:1–48


UNDISGUISED HATRED
At the outset I felt sure, and I feel sure still, that we must not either try to explain them away or to yield for one moment to the idea that, because it comes in the Bible, all this vindictive hatred must somehow be good and pious. We must face both facts squarely. The hatred is there—festering, gloating, undisguised—and also we should be wicked if we in any way condoned or approved it, or (worse still) used it to justify similar passions in ourselves.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 109:1–20


PRAYER—A DUTY OR A DELIGHT?
Well, let’s now at any rate come clean. Prayer is irksome. An excuse to omit it is never unwelcome. When it is over, this casts a feeling of relief and holiday over the rest of the day. We are reluctant to begin. We are delighted to finish. While we are at prayer, but not while we are reading a novel or solving a cross-word puzzle, any trifle is enough to distract us. . . .

Now the disquieting thing is not simply that we skimp and begrudge the duty of prayer. The really disquieting thing is it should have to be numbered among duties at all. For we believe that we were created “to glorify God and enjoy Him forever.” And if the few, the very few, minutes we now spend on intercourse with God are a burden to us rather than a delight, what then? . . .

The painful effort which prayer involves is no proof that we are doing something we were not created to do.

If we were perfected, prayer would not be a duty, it would be delight. Some day, please God, it will be.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Psalm 119:33–40


THE PRACTICE OF FAITH
Iwouldn’t quite say that “religious Practices help the search for truth” for that might imply that they have no further use when the Truth has been found. I think about the practices what a wise old priest said to me about a “rule of life” in general—“It is not a stair but a bannister” (or rail or balustrade—I don’t know what you call it in America), i.e. it is, not the thing you ascend by but it is a protective against falling off and a help-up. I think thus we ascend. The stair is God’s grace. One’s climb from step to step is obedience. Many different kinds of bannisters exist, all legitimate. It is possible to get up without any bannisters, if need be: but no one wd. willingly build a staircase without them because it would be less safe, more laborious, and a little lacking in beauty.

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, June [2]9, 1953

For reflection  Psalm 119:57–64


YOUR WORD IS A LAMP TO MY FEET
Ithink we all see pretty well what the Psalmists mean. They mean that in the Law you find the “real” or “correct” or stable, well-grounded, directions for living. The law answers the question “Wherewithal shall a young man cleanse his way?” (119, 9). It is like a lamp, a guide (105). There are many rival directions for living, as the Pagan cultures all round us show. When the poets call the directions or “rulings” of Jahweh “true” they are expressing the assurance that these, and not those others, are the “real” or “valid” or unassailable ones; that they are based on the very nature of things and the very nature of God.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 119:97–112


THE MASTER BUILDER
Imagine yourself as a living house. God comes in to rebuild that house. At first, perhaps, you can understand what He is doing. He is getting the drains right and stopping the leaks in the roof and so on: you knew that those jobs needed doing and so you are not surprised. But presently he starts knocking the house about in a way that hurts abominably and does not seem to make sense. What on earth is He up to? The explanation is that He is building quite a different house from the one you thought of—throwing out a new wing here, putting on an extra floor there, running up towers, making courtyards. You thought you were going to be made into a decent little cottage: but He is building a palace. He intends to come and live in it Himself.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Psalm 127:1


LIVING TOGETHER IN UNITY
We are all rightly distressed, and ashamed also, at the divisions of Christendom. But those who have always lived within the Christian fold may be too easily dispirited by them. They are bad, but such people do not know what it looks like from without. Seen from there, what is left intact despite all the divisions, still appears (as it truly is) an immensely formidable unity. I know, for I saw it; and well our enemies know it. That unity any of us can find by going out of his own age. It is not enough, but it is more than you had thought till then. Once you are well soaked in it, if you then venture to speak, you will have an amusing experience. You will be thought a Papist when you are actually reproducing Bunyan, a Pantheist when you are quoting Aquinas, and so forth. For you have now got on to the great level viaduct which crosses the ages and which looks so high from the valleys, so low from the mountains, so narrow compared with the swamps, and so broad compared with the sheep-tracks.

—from the introduction to On the Incarnation by St. Athanasius

For reflection  Psalm 133:1


REVERING THE LORD
Because God created the Natural—invented it out of His love and artistry—it demands our reverence; because it is only a creature and not He, it is, from another point of view, of little account. And still more, because Nature, and especially human nature, is fallen it must be corrected and the evil within it must be mortified. But its essence is good; correction is something quite different from Manichaean repudiation or Stoic superiority. Hence, in all true Christian asceticism, that respect for the thing rejected which, I think, we never find in pagan asceticism. Marriage is good, though not for me; wine is good, though I must not drink it; feasts are good, though today we fast.

—from “Some Thoughts,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Psalm 136:1–26

OUR OWN INFANTILE WHIMPERINGS
Of the cursing Psalms I suppose most of us make our own moral allegories—well aware that these are personal and on a quite different level from the high matters I have been trying to handle. We know the proper object of utter hostility—wickedness, especially our own. Thus in 36, “My heart showeth me the wickedness of the ungodly,” each can reflect that his own heart is the specimen of that wickedness best known to him. After that, the upward plunge at verse 5 into the mercy high as heaven and the righteousness solid as the mountains takes on even more force and beauty. From this point of view I can use even the horrible passage in 137 about dashing the Babylonian babies against the stones. I know things in the inner world which are like babies; the infantile beginnings of small indulgences, small resentments, which may one day become dipsomania or settled hatred, but which woo us and wheedle us with special pleadings and seem so tiny, so helpless that in resisting them we feel we are being cruel to animals. They begin whimpering to us “I don’t ask much, but,” or “I had at least hoped,” or “you owe yourself some consideration.” Against all such pretty infants (the dears have such winning ways) the advice of the Psalm is the best. Knock the little bastards’ brains out. And “blessed” he who can, for it’s easier said than done.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 137:1–9


BEING KNOWN
We begin to notice, besides our particular sinful acts, our sinfulness; begin to be alarmed not only about what we do, but about what we are. This may sound rather difficult, so I will try to make it clear from my own case. When I come to my evening prayers and try to reckon up the sins of the day, nine times out of ten the most obvious one is some sin against charity; I have sulked or snapped or sneered or snubbed or stormed. And the excuse that immediately springs to my mind is that the provocation was so sudden and unexpected; I was caught off my guard, I had not time to collect myself. Now that may be an extenuating circumstance as regards those particular acts: they would obviously be worse if they had been deliberate and premeditated. On the other hand, surely what a man does when he is taken off his guard is the best evidence for what sort of a man he is? Surely what pops out before the man has time to put on a disguise is the truth? If there are rats in a cellar you are most likely to see them if you go in very suddenly. But the suddenness does not create the rats: it only prevents them from hiding. In the same way the suddenness of the provocation does not make me an ill-tempered man; it only shows me what an ill-tempered man I am. The rats are always there in the cellar, but if you go in shouting and noisily they will have taken cover before you switch on the light.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Psalm 139:1–24


PRACTICING PRAYER
Iv. much doubt if I’m good enough at prayer myself to advise others. First thing in the morning and last thing at night are good times but I don’t find that they are the best times for one’s main prayer. I prefer sometime in the early evening, before one has got sleepy—but of course it depends on how your day is mapped out.

“Grudging” tho’ a nuisance need not depress us too much. It is the act of will (perhaps strongest where there is some disinclination to contend against) that God values, rather than the state of our emotions—the act being what we give Him, the emotions what He gives us (usually, I think, indirectly thro’ the state of our body, health etc., tho’ there are direct kindlings from Him too. There are presents, to be given thanks for but never counted on).

Of course it is very difficult to keep God only before one for more than a few seconds. Our minds are in ruins before we bring them to Him & the rebuilding is gradual. It may help to practice concentration on other objects twice a week quite apart from ones prayer: i.e. sit down looking at some physical object (say, a flower) and try for a few minutes to attend exclusively to it, quietly (never impatiently) rejecting the train of thought & imagination wh. keep starting up.

—from a letter to Rhona Bodle, January 3, 1948

For reflection  Psalm 143:1


GOD’S INFINITE ATTENTION
Almost certainly God is not in Time. His life does not consist of moments following one another. If a million people are praying to Him at ten-thirty tonight, He need not listen to them all in that one little snippet which we call ten-thirty. Ten-thirty—and every other moment from the beginning of the world—is always the Present for Him. If you like to put it that way, He has all eternity in which to listen to the split second of prayer put up by a pilot as his plane crashes in flames. . . .

God is not hurried along in the Time-stream of this universe any more than an author is hurried along in the imaginary time of his own novel. He has infinite attention to spare for each one of us. He does not have to deal with us in the mass. You are as much alone with Him as if you were the only being He had ever created. When Christ died, He died for you individually just as much as if you had been the only man in the world.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Psalm 145:19


PRAISE FOR GOD’S CREATION
Iwill never laugh at anyone for grieving over a loved beast. I think God wants us to love Him more, not to love creatures (even animals) less. We love everything in one way too much (i.e., at the expense of our love for Him), but in another way we love everything too little.

No person, animal, flower, or even pebble has ever been loved too much—i.e., more than every one of God’s works deserves.

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, August 18, 1956

For reflection  Psalm 148:1–14


For reflection: Psalm 150:1–6

Just as men spontaneously praise whatever they value, so they spontaneously urge us to join them in praising it: “Isn’t she lovely?” “Wasn’t it glorious?” “Don’t you think that magnificent?” The Psalmists in telling everyone to praise God are doing what all men do when they speak of what they care about.

—from Reflections on the Psalms


JEREMIAH
Jeremiah 1

Jeremiah 2

Jeremiah 3

Jeremiah 4

Jeremiah 5

Jeremiah 6

Jeremiah 7

Jeremiah 8

Jeremiah 9

Jeremiah 10

Jeremiah 11

Jeremiah 12

Jeremiah 13

Jeremiah 14

Jeremiah 15

Jeremiah 16

Jeremiah 17

Jeremiah 18

Jeremiah 19

Jeremiah 20

Jeremiah 21

Jeremiah 22

Jeremiah 23

Jeremiah 24

Jeremiah 25

Jeremiah 26

Jeremiah 27

Jeremiah 28

Jeremiah 29

Jeremiah 30

Jeremiah 31

Jeremiah 32

Jeremiah 33

Jeremiah 34

Jeremiah 35

Jeremiah 36

Jeremiah 37

Jeremiah 38

Jeremiah 39

Jeremiah 40

Jeremiah 41

Jeremiah 42

Jeremiah 43

Jeremiah 44

Jeremiah 45

Jeremiah 46

Jeremiah 47

Jeremiah 48

Jeremiah 49

Jeremiah 50

Jeremiah 51

Jeremiah 52




For reflection: Jeremiah 1:4–5

One of the things my conscience tells me is that if there exists an absolutely wise and good Person . . . I owe Him obedience, specially when that Person, as the ground of my existence, has a paternal claim on me, and as a benefactor, has a claim on my gratitude.

—from “Christianity and Culture,” Christian Reflections




For reflection: Jeremiah 2:19

What I like about experience is that it is such an honest thing. You may take any number of wrong turnings; but keep your eyes open and you will not be allowed to go very far before the warning signs appear. You may have deceived yourself, but experience is not trying to deceive you. The universe rings true wherever you fairly test it.

—from Surprised by Joy


OUR OWN CHOICE
Anyone who has been in authority knows how a thing can be in accordance with your will in one way and not in another. It may be quite sensible for a mother to say to the children, “I’m not going to go and make you tidy the schoolroom every night. You’ve got to learn to keep it tidy on your own.” Then she goes up one night and finds the Teddy bear and the ink and the French Grammar all lying in the grate. That is against her will. She would prefer the children to be tidy. But on the other hand, it is her will which has left the children free to be untidy. The same thing arises in any regiment, or trade union, or school. You make a thing voluntary and then half the people do not do it. That is not what you willed, but your will has made it possible.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Jeremiah 3:19–4:2



For reflection: Jeremiah 5:21–25

“There is but one good; that is God. Everything else is good when it looks to Him and bad when it turns from Him.”

—from The Great Divorce




THE RIGHT ROAD
We are not living in a world where all roads are radii of a circle and where all, if followed long enough, will therefore draw gradually nearer and finally meet at the centre: rather in a world where every road, after a few miles, forks into two, and each of those into two again, and at each fork you must make a decision. Even on the biological level life is not like a river but like a tree. It does not move towards unity but away from it and the creatures grow further apart as they increase in perfection. Good, as it ripens, becomes continually more different not only from evil but from other good.

I do not think that all who choose wrong roads perish; but their rescue consists in being put back on the right road. A sum can be put right: but only by going back till you find the error and working it afresh from that point, never by simply going on. Evil can be undone, but it cannot “develop” into good. Time does not heal it. The spell must be unwound, bit by bit, “with backward mutters of dissevering power”—or else not. It is still “either-or.” If we insist on keeping Hell (or even Earth) we shall not see Heaven: if we accept Heaven we shall not be able to retain even the smallest and most intimate souvenirs of Hell.

—from The Great Divorce

For reflection  Jeremiah 6:16–19
1``12`

THEIR GLORY IS THEIR SHAME
The choice of every lost soul can be expressed in the words ‘Better to reign in Hell than serve in Heaven.’ There is always something they insist on keeping even at the price of misery. There is always something they prefer to joy—that is, to reality. Ye see it easily enough in a spoiled child that would sooner miss its play and its supper than say it was sorry and be friends. Ye call it the Sulks. But in adult life it has a hundred fine names—Achilles’ wrath and Coriolanus’ grandeur, Revenge and Injured Merit and Self-Respect and Tragic Greatness and Proper Pride.”

—from The Great Divorce

For reflection  Jeremiah 7:21–26





For reflection: Jeremiah 8:1–22

Those Divine demands which sound to our natural ears most like those of a despot and least like those of a lover, in fact marshal us where we should want to go if we knew what we wanted. He demands our worship, our obedience, our prostration.

—from The Problem of Pain




For reflection: Jeremiah 9:6

Continued disobedience to conscience makes conscience blind.

—from A Preface to “Paradise Lost”



FACING THE TRUTH
Isuddenly remembered that no one can enter heaven except as a child; and nothing is so obvious in a child—not in a conceited child, but in a good child—as its great and undisguised pleasure in being praised. Not only in a child, either, but even in a dog or a horse. Apparently what I had mistaken for humility had, all these years, prevented me from understanding what is in fact the humblest, the most childlike, the most creaturely of pleasures—nay, the specific pleasure of the inferior: the pleasure of a beast before men, a child before its father, a pupil before his teacher, a creature before its Creator. I am not forgetting how horribly this most innocent desire is parodied in our human ambitions, or how very quickly, in my own experience, the lawful pleasure of praise from those whom it was my duty to please turns into the deadly poison of self-admiration. But I thought I could detect a moment—a very, very short moment—before this happened, during which the satisfaction of having pleased those whom I rightly loved and rightly feared was pure. And that is enough to raise our thoughts to what may happen when the redeemed soul, beyond all hope and nearly beyond belief, learns at last that she has pleased Him whom she was created to please. There will be no room for vanity then. She will be free from the miserable illusion that it is her doing. With no taint of what we should now call self-approval she will most innocently rejoice in the thing that God has made her to be, and the moment which heals her old inferiority complex forever will also drown her pride deeper than Prospero’s book. Perfect humility dispenses with modesty. If God is satisfied with the work, the work may be satisfied with itself; “it is not for her to bandy compliments with her Sovereign.”

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Jeremiah 9:23–24


THERE IS NONE LIKE GOD
We are in no position to draw up maps of God’s psychology, and prescribe limits to His interests. We would not do so even for a man whom we knew to be greater than ourselves. The doctrines that God is love and that He delights in men, are positive doctrines, not limiting doctrines. He is not less than this. What more He may be, we do not know; we only know that He must be more than we can conceive. It is to be expected that His creation should be, in the main, unintelligible to us.

—from “Dogma and the Universe,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Jeremiah 10:6–7

 

CONSEQUENCE OF FORSAKING GOD
If God—such a God as any adult religion believes in—exists, mere movement in space will never bring you any nearer to Him or farther from Him than you are at this very moment. You can neither reach Him nor avoid Him by traveling to Alpha Centauri or even to other galaxies. A fish is no more, and no less, in the sea after it has swum a thousand miles than it was when it first set out.

How, then, it may be asked, can we either reach or avoid him?

The avoiding, in many times and places, has proved so difficult that a very large part of the human race failed to achieve it. But in our own time and place it is extremely easy. Avoid silence, avoid solitude, avoid any train of thought that leads off the beaten track. Concentrate on money, sex, status, health and (above all) on your own grievances. Keep the radio on. Live in the crowd. Use plenty of sedation. If you must read books, select them very carefully. But you’d be safer to stick to the papers. You’ll find the advertisements helpful; especially those with a sexy or a snobbish appeal.

—from “The Seeing Eye,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Jeremiah 15:6



THE LORD’S GARDEN
When God planted a garden He set a man over it and set the man under Himself. When He planted the garden of our nature and caused the flowering, fruiting loves to grow there, He set our will to “dress” them. Compared with them it is dry and cold. And unless His grace comes down, like the rain and the sunshine, we shall use this tool to little purpose. But its laborious—and largely negative—services are indispensable. If they were needed when the garden was still Paradisal, how much more now when the soil has gone sour and the worst weeds seem to thrive on it best? But heaven forbid we should work in the spirit of prigs and Stoics. While we hack and prune we know very well that what we are hacking and pruning is big with a splendour and vitality which our rational will could never of itself have supplied. To liberate that splendour, to let it become fully what it is trying to be, to have tall trees instead of scrubby tangles, and sweet apples instead of crabs, is part of our purpose.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  Jeremiah 17:7–8

DO I BELIEVE?
The moment one asks oneself “Do I believe?” all belief seems to go. I think this is because one is trying to turn round and look at something which is there to be used and work from—trying to take out one’s eyes instead of keeping them in the right place and seeing with them. I find that it happens about other matters as well as faith. In my experience only v. robust pleasures will stand the question, “Am I really enjoying this?” Or attention—the moment I begin thinking about my attention (to a book or a lecture) I have ipso facto ceased attending. St. Paul speaks of “Faith actualised in Love.” And “the heart is deceitful”: you know better than I how very unreliable introspection is. I shd. be much more alarmed about your progress if you wrote claiming to be overflowing with Faith, Hope and Charity.

—from a letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September 27, 1949

For reflection  Jeremiah 17:9




For reflection: Jeremiah 18:1–11

It is natural for us to wish that God had designed for us a less glorious and less arduous destiny; but then we are wishing not for more love but for less.

—from The Problem of Pain





For reflection: Jeremiah 19:14–15

The Fall is simply and solely Disobedience—doing what you have been told not to do: and it results from Pride—from being too big for your boots, forgetting your place, thinking that you are God.

—from A Preface to “Paradise Lost”



GOD’S MEGAPHONE
The human spirit will not even begin to try to surrender self-will as long as all seems to be well with it. Now error and sin both have this property, that the deeper they are the less their victim suspects their existence; they are masked evil. Pain is unmasked, unmistakable evil; every man knows that something is wrong when he is being hurt. . . . And pain is not only immediately recognisable evil, but evil impossible to ignore. We can rest contentedly in our sins and in our stupidities; and anyone who has watched gluttons shovelling down the most exquisite foods as if they did not know what they were eating, will admit that we can ignore even pleasure. But pain insists upon being attended to. God whispers to us in our pleasures, speaks in our conscience, but shouts in our pain: it is His megaphone to rouse a deaf world.

—from The Problem of Pain


THE WAY GOD LEADS
Notice here the strange roads by which God leads His people. Century after century, by blows which seems to us merciless, by defeat, deportation, and massacre, it was hammered into the Jews that earthly prosperity is not in fact the certain, or even the probable, reward of seeing God. Every hope was disappointed. The lesson taught in the Book of Job was grimly illustrated in practice. Such experience would surely have destroyed a religion which had no other centre than the hope of peace and plenty with “every man under his own vine and his own fig tree.” And of course many did “fall off.” But the astonishing thing is that the religion is not destroyed. In its best representatives it grows purer, stronger, and more profound. It is being, by this terrible discipline, directed more and more to its real centre.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Jeremiah 29:10–19


THE VERDICT ON OUR LIVES
We have all encountered judgments or verdicts on ourselves in this life. Every now and then we discover what our fellow creatures really think of us. I don’t of course mean what they tell us to our faces: that we usually have to discount. I am thinking what we sometimes overhear by accident or of the opinions about us which our neighbours or employees or subordinates unknowingly reveal in their actions: and of the terrible, or lovely, judgments artlessly betrayed by children or even animals. Such discoveries can be the bitterest or sweetest experiences we have. But of course both the bitter and the sweet are limited by our doubt as to the wisdom of those who judge. We always hope that those who so clearly think us cowards or bullies are ignorant or malicious; we always fear that those who trust us or admire us are misled by partiality. I suppose the experience of Final Judgment (which may break upon us at any moment) will be like these little experiences, but magnified to the Nth.

For it will be infallible judgment. If it is favorable we shall have no fear, if unfavorable, no hope, that it is wrong. We shall not only believe, we shall know, know beyond doubt in every fibre of our appalled or delighted being, that as the Judge has said, so we are: neither more nor less nor other. We shall perhaps even realize that in some dim fashion we could have known it all along.

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Amos 1:3–2:6


THE DAY OF THE LORD
Of two things I am now persuaded. (1) That a real red-hot Christian revival, with iron dogma, stern discipline, and ruthless asceticism, is very much more possible than I had supposed. (2) That if it comes, people like us will not find it nearly so agreeable as we had expected. “Why have they desired the Day of the Lord? It is darkness not light.” . . . We ought to have expected that if the real thing came it would make one sit up (you remember Chesterton “Never invoke gods unless you really want them to appear. It annoys them very much”).

—from a letter to his brother, February 18, 1940

For reflection  Amos 5:18


HE STOPPED AND SHOOK THE EARTH
It is just the recognition of God’s positive and concrete reality which the religious imagery preserves. The crudest Old Testament picture of Jahweh thundering and lightning out of dense smoke, making mountains skip like rams, threatening, promising, pleading, even changing His mind, transmits that sense of living Deity which evaporates in abstract thought. . . . Perhaps we may rightly reject much of the Old Testament imagery. But we must be clear why we are doing so: not because the images are too strong but because they are too weak. The ultimate spiritual reality is not vaguer, more inert, more transparent than the images, but more positive, more dynamic, more opaque.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Amos 9:5–6



For reflection: Acts 1:8

Woe to you if you do not evangelize.

— from “Modern Theology and Biblical Criticism,” Christian Reflections



HE WAS LIFTED UP
It is at this point that awe and trembling fall upon us as we read the records. If the story is false, it is at least a much stranger story than we expected, something for which philosophical “religion,” psychical research, and popular superstition have all alike failed to prepare us. If the story is true, then a wholly new mode of being has arisen in the universe.

The body which lives in that new mode is like, and yet unlike, the body His friends knew before the execution. It is differently related to space and probably to time, but by no means cut off from all relation to them. It can perform the animal act of eating. It is so related to matter, as we know it, that it can be touched, though at first it had better not be touched. It has also a history before it which is in view from the first moment of the Resurrection; it is presently going to become different or go somewhere else. That is why the story of the Ascension cannot be separated from that of the Resurrection. All the accounts suggest that the appearances of the Risen Body came to an end; some describe an abrupt end about six weeks after the death. And they describe this abrupt end in a way which presents greater difficulties to the modern mind than any other part of Scripture. For here, surely, we get the implication of all those primitive crudities to which I have said that Christians are not committed: the vertical ascent like a balloon, the local Heaven, the decorated chair to the right of the Father’s throne. “He was caught up into the sky (ouranos),” says St. Mark’s Gospel “and sat down at the right hand of God.” “He was lifted up,” says the author of Acts “and a cloud cut Him off from their sight.”

—from Miracles

For reflection  Acts 1:6–11


EYEWITNESS
QUALIFICATION
In the earliest days of Christianity an “apostle” was first and foremost a man who claimed to be an eyewitness of the Resurrection. Only a few days after the Crucifixion when two candidates were nominated for the vacancy created by the treachery of Judas, their qualification was that they had known Jesus personally both before and after His death and could offer first-hand evidence of the Resurrection in addressing the outer world (Acts 1:22). A few days later St. Peter, preaching the first Christian sermon, makes the same claim—“God raised Jesus, of which we all (we Christians) are witnesses” (Acts 2:32). In the first Letter to the Corinthians, St. Paul bases his claim to apostleship on the same ground—“Am I not an apostle? Have I not seen the Lord Jesus?” (1:9).

As this qualification suggests, to preach Christianity meant primarily to preach the Resurrection. Thus people who had heard only fragments of St. Paul’s teaching at Athens got the impression that he was talking about two new gods, Jesus and Anastasis (i.e. Resurrection) (Acts 17:18). The Resurrection is the central theme in every Christian sermon reported in the Acts. The Resurrection, and its consequences, were the “gospel” or good news which the Christians brought: what we call the “gospels,” the narratives of Our Lord’s life and death, were composed later for the benefit of those who had already accepted the gospel. They were in no sense the basis of Christianity: they were written for those already converted. The miracle of the Resurrection, and the theology of that miracle, comes first: the biography comes later as a comment on it. Nothing could be more unhistorical than to pick out selected sayings of Christ from the gospels and to regard those as the datum and the rest of the New Testament as a construction upon it. The first fact in the history of Christendom is a number of people who say they have seen the Resurrection. If they had died without making anyone else believe this “gospel” no gospels would ever have been written.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Acts 2:14–36


WE CANNOT KEEP FROM SPEAKING
You can’t lay down any pattern for God. There are many different ways of bringing people into His Kingdom, even some ways that I specially dislike! I have therefore learned to be cautious in my judgment.

But we can block it in many ways. As Christians we are tempted to make unnecessary concessions to those outside the Faith. We give in too much. Now, I don’t mean that we should run the risk of making a nuisance of ourselves by witnessing at improper times, but there comes a time when we must show that we disagree. We must show our Christian colours, if we are to be true to Jesus Christ. We cannot remain silent or concede everything away.

—from “Cross-Examination,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Acts 4:13–20


THE GRAVITY OF SIN
In solitude, and also in confession, I have found (to my regret) that the degrees of shame and disgust which I actually feel at my own sins do not at all correspond to what my reason tells me about their comparative gravity. Just as the degree to which, in daily life, I feel the emotion of fear has very little to do with my rational judgment of the danger. I’d sooner have really nasty seas when I’m in an open boat than look down in perfect (actual) safety from the edge of a cliff. Similarly, I have confessed ghastly uncharities with less reluctance than small unmentionables—or those sins which happen to be ungentlemanly as well as un-Christian. Our emotional reactions to our own behavior are of limited ethical significance.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Acts 5:1–11


NO COMPROMISE
There is no question of a compromise between the claims of God and the claims of culture, or politics, or anything else. God’s claim is infinite and inexorable. You can refuse it, or you can begin to try to grant it. There is no middle way. Yet in spite of this it is clear that Christianity does not exclude any of the ordinary human activities. St. Paul tells people to get on with their jobs. He even assumes that Christians may go to dinner parties, and, what is more, dinner parties given by pagans. Our Lord attends a wedding and provides miraculous wine. Under the aegis of His Church, and in the most Christian ages, learning and the arts flourish. The solution of this paradox is, of course, well known to you. “Whether ye eat or drink or whatsoever ye do, do all to the glory of God.”

All our merely natural activities will be accepted, if they are offered to God, even the humblest, and all of them, even the noblest, will be sinful if they are not. Christianity does not simply replace our natural life and substitute a new one; it is rather a new organisation which exploits, to its own supernatural ends, these natural materials.

—from “Learning in War-Time,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Acts 5:29



For reflection: Acts 7:60

We must try to feel about the enemy as we feel about ourselves—to wish that he were not bad, to hope that he may, in this world or another, be cured: in fact, to wish his good. That is what is meant in the Bible by loving him: wishing his good, not feeling fond of him nor saying he is nice when he is not.

—from Mere Christianity




For reflection: Acts 8:26–39

No ancient sacred books were intended to be read without a teacher: hence the Ethiopian comment in the Acts says to St. Philip “How can I understand unless someone tells me?”

—from a letter to Rhona Bodle, February 9, 1953



HOW CAN I UNDERSTAND?
The “scriptures” all had a “spiritual” or second sense. Even a gentile “God-fearer” like the Ethiopian eunuch (Acts 8, 27–38) knew that the sacred books of Israel could not be understood without a guide, trained in the Judaic tradition, who could open the hidden meanings probably all instructed Jews in the first century saw references to the Messiah in most of those passages where Our Lord saw them; what was controversial was His identification of the Messianic King with another Old Testament figure and of both with Himself.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Acts 8:27–38


DEVOTED TO GOOD WORKS
I have received no assurance that anything we can do will eradicate suffering. I think the best results are obtained by people who work quietly away at limited objectives, such as abolition of the slave trade, or prison reform, or factory acts, or tuberculosis, not by those who think they can achieve universal justice, or health, or peace. I think the art of life consists in tackling each immediate evil as well as we can. To avert or postpone one particular war by wise policy, or to render one particular campaign shorter by strength and skill or less terrible by mercy to the conquered and the civilians is more useful than all the proposals for universal peace that have ever been made; just as the dentist who can stop one toothache has deserved better of humanity than all the men who think they have some scheme for producing a perfectly healthy race.

—from “Why I Am Not a Pacifist,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Acts 9:36–42


PRAY WITHOUT CEASING
When we are praying about the result, say, of a battle or a medical consultation the thought will often cross our minds that (if only we knew it) the event is already decided one way or the other. I believe this to be no good reason for ceasing our prayers. The event certainly has been decided—in a sense it was decided “before all worlds.” But one of the things taken into account in deciding it, and therefore one of the things that really cause it to happen, may be this very prayer that we are now offering. Thus, shocking as it may sound, I conclude that we can at noon become part causes of an event occurring at ten a.m. (Some scientists would find this easier than popular thought does.) The imagination will, no doubt, try to play all sorts of tricks on us at this point. It will ask, “Then if I stop praying can God go back and alter what has already happened?” No. The event has already happened and one of its causes has been the fact that you are asking such questions instead of praying. It will ask, “Then if I begin to pray can God go back and alter what has already happened?” No. The event has already happened and one of its causes is your present prayer. Thus something does really depend on my choice. My free act contributes to the cosmic shape. That contribution is made in eternity or “before all worlds”; but my consciousness of contributing reaches me at a particular point in the time-series.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Acts 12:1–17


MOVED BY THE HOLY SPIRIT
The main difficulty seems to me not the question whether the Bible is “inspired,” but what exactly we mean by this. Our ancestors, I take it, believed that the Holy Spirit either just replaced the minds of the authors (like the supposed “control” in automatic writing) or at least dictated to them as to secretaries.

Scripture itself refutes these ideas. St. Paul distinguishes between what “the Lord” says and what he says “of himself”—yet both are “Scripture.” Similarly the passages in which the prophets describe Theophonies and their own reactions to them wd. be absurd if they were not writing for themselves. Thus, without any modern scholarship, we are driven a long way from the extreme view of inspiration.

I myself think of it as analogous to the Incarnation—that, as in Christ a human soul-and-body are taken up and made the vehicle of Deity, so in Scripture, a mass of human legend, history, moral teaching etc. are taken up and made the vehicle of God’s Word. Errors of minor fact are permitted to remain. (Was Our Lord Himself incapable, qua Man, of such errors? Wd. it be a real human incarnation if He was?) One must remember of course that our modern & western attention to dates, numbers, etc. simply did not exist in the ancient world. No one was looking for that sort of truth.... As for translations, even if one doesn’t know Greek (and I know no Hebrew myself) we have now so many different translations that by using & comparing them all one can usually see what is happening. The blessed and significant thing is that none of all this has bothered your personal faith in Our Lord. Do you see a clear reason why it need bother anyone else’s?

—from a letter to Lee Turner, July 19, 1958

For reflection  Acts 15:7–9


MOVING CLOSER TO CHRIST
The world does not consist of 100 per cent Christians and 100 per cent non-Christians. There are people (a great many of them) who are slowly ceasing to be Christians but who still call themselves by that name: some of them are clergymen. There are other people who are slowly becoming Christian though they do not yet call themselves so. There are people who do not accept the full Christian doctrine about Christ but who are so strongly attracted by Him that they are His in a much deeper sense than they themselves understand. There are people in other religions who are being led by God’s secret influence to concentrate on those parts of their religion which are in agreement with Christianity, and who thus belong to Christ without knowing it.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Acts 16:9–10

THE RESEMBLANCE
BETWEEN MYTH
AND TRUTH
And what are we to say of those gods in various Pagan mythologies who are killed and rise again and who thereby renew or transform the life of their worshippers or of nature? The odd thing is that here those anthropologists who are most hostile to our faith would agree with many Christians in saying “The resemblance is not accidental.” Of course the two parties would say this for different reasons. The anthropologists would mean: “All these superstitions have a common source in the mind and experience, especially the agricultural experience, of early man. Your myth of Christ is like the myth of Balder because it has the same origin. The likeness is a family likeness.” The Christians would fall into two schools of thought. The early Fathers (or some of them), who believed that Paganism was nothing but the direct work of the Devil, would say: “The Devil has from the beginning tried to mislead humanity with lies. As all accomplished liars do, he makes his lies as like the truth as he can; provided they lead man astray on the main issue, the more closely they imitate truth the more effective they will be. That is why we call him God’s Ape; he is always imitating God. The resemblance of Adonis to Christ is therefore not at all accidental; it is the resemblance we expect to find between a counterfeit and the real thing, between a parody and the original, between imitation pearls and pearls.” Other Christians who think, as I do, that in mythology divine and diabolical and human elements (the desire for a good story), all play a part, would say: “It is not accidental. In the sequence of night and day, in the annual death and rebirth of the crops, in the myths which these processes gave rise to, in the strong, if half-articulate, feeling (embodied in many Pagan “Mysteries”) that man himself must undergo some sort of death if he would truly live, there is already a likeness permitted by God to that truth on which all depends. The resemblance between these myths and the Christian truth is no more accidental than the resemblance between the sun and the sun’s reflection in a pond, or that between a historical fact and the somewhat garbled version of it which lives in popular report, or between the trees and hills of the real world and the trees and hills in our dreams.” Thus all three views alike would regard the “Pagan Christs” and the true Christ as things really related and would find the resemblance significant.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Acts 17:22–23



For reflection: Acts 20:35

For in self-giving, if anywhere, we touch a rhythm not only of all creation but of all being.

—from The Problem of Pain



For reflection: Acts 22:4–19

Every story of conversion is the story of a blessed defeat.

—from C. S. Lewis’s foreword to Smoke on the Mountain





For reflection: Acts 23:1–11

Christianity tells people to repent and promises them forgiveness. It therefore has nothing (as far as I know) to say to people who do not know they have done anything to repent of and who do not feel that they need any forgiveness.

—from Mere Christianity



THE RELUCTANT CONVERT
In the Trinity Term of 1929 I gave in, and admitted that God was God, and knelt and prayed: perhaps, that night, the most dejected and reluctant convert in all of England. I did not then see that what is now the most shining and obvious thing; the Divine humility which will accept a convert even on such terms. The Prodigal Son at least walked home on his own feet. But who can duly adore that Love which will open the high gates to a prodigal who is brought in kicking, struggling, resentful, and darting his eyes in every direction for a chance of escape. The words compelle intrare, compel them to come in, have been so abused by wicked men that we shudder at them; but, properly understood, they plumb the depths of the Divine mercy. The hardness of God is kinder than the softness of men, and His compulsion is our liberation.

—from Surprised by Joy

For reflection  Acts 26:8–10


THE HABIT OF FAITH
Just as the Christian has his moments when the clamour of this visible and audible world is so persistent and the whisper of the spiritual world so faint that faith and reason can hardly stick to their guns, so, as I well remember, the atheist too has his moments of shuddering misgiving, of an all but irresistible suspicion that old tales may after all be true, that something or someone from outside may at any moment break into his neat, explicable, mechanical universe. Believe in God and you will have to face hours when it seems obvious that this material world is the only reality: disbelieve in Him and you must face hours when this material world seems to shout at you that it is not all. No conviction, religious or irreligious, will, of itself, end once and for all this fifth-columnist in the soul. Only the practice of Faith resulting in the habit of Faith will gradually do that.

—from “Religion: Reality or Substitute?” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Acts 28:11–27


THE LAWLESS ONE REVEALED
The doctrine of the Second Coming is deeply uncongenial to the whole evolutionary or developmental character of modern thought. We have been taught to think of the world as something that grows slowly towards perfection, something that “progresses” or “evolves.” Christian Apocalyptic offers us no such hope. It does not even foretell (which would be more tolerable to our habits of thought) a gradual decay. It foretells a sudden, violent end imposed from without; an extinguisher popped onto the candle, a brick flung at the gramophone, a curtain rung down on the play—“Halt!”

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  2 Thessalonians 2:1–12

THE FULLY CHRISTIAN SOCIETY
The New Testament, without going into details, gives us a pretty clear hint of what a fully Christian society would be like. Perhaps it gives us more than we can take. It tells us that there are to be no passengers or parasites: if man does not work, he ought not to eat. Every one is to work with his own hands, and what is more, every one’s work is to produce something good: there will be no manufacture of silly luxuries and then of sillier advertisements to persuade us to buy them. And there is to be no “swank” or “side,” no putting on airs. To that extent a Christian society would be what we now call Leftist. On the other hand, it is always insisting on obedience—obedience (and outward marks of respect) from all of us to properly appointed magistrates, from children to parents, and (I am afraid this is going to be very unpopular) from wives to husbands. Thirdly, it is to be a cheerful society: full of singing and rejoicing, and regarding worry or anxiety as wrong. Courtesy is one of the Christian virtues; and the New Testament hates what it calls “busybodies.”

If there were such a society in existence and you or I visited it, I think we should come away with a curious impression. We should feel that its economic life was very socialistic and, in that sense, “advanced,” but that its family life and its code of manners were rather old fashioned—perhaps even ceremonious and aristocratic. Each of us would like some bits of it, but I am afraid very few of us would like the whole thing. That is just what one would expect if Christianity is the total plan for the human machine. We have all departed from that total plan in different ways, and each of us wants to make out that his own modification of the original plan is the plan itself. You will find this again and again about anything that is really Christian: every one is attracted by bits of it and wants to pick out those bits and leave the rest.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  2 Thessalonians 3:6–13




For reflection: 1 Timothy 1:13–17

I think that if God forgives us we must forgive ourselves. Otherwise it is almost like setting up ourselves as a higher tribunal than Him.

—from a letter to Miss Breckenridge, April 19, 1951


UNAPPROACHABLE LIGHT
As our Earth is to all the stars, so doubtless are we men and our concerns to all creation; as all the stars are to space itself, so are all creatures, all thrones and powers and mightiest of the created gods, to the abyss of the self-existing Being, who is to us Father and Redeemer and indwelling Comforter, but of whom no man nor angel can say nor conceive what He is in and for Himself, or what is the work that he “maketh from the beginning to the end.” For they are all derived and unsubstantial things. Their vision fails them and they cover their eyes from the intolerable light of utter actuality, which was and is and shall be, which never could have been otherwise, which has no opposite.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  1 Timothy 6:16


REJECTING SLAVERY
Mankind is so fallen that no man can be trusted with unchecked power over his fellows. Aristotle said that some people were only fit to be slaves. I do not contradict him. But I reject slavery because I see no men fit to be masters.

This introduces a view of equality rather different from that in which we have been trained. I do not think that equality is one of those things (like wisdom or happiness) which are good simply in themselves and for their own sakes. I think it is in the same class as medicine, which is good because we are ill, or clothes which are good because we are no longer innocent. I don’t think the old authority in kings, priests, husbands, or fathers, and the old obedience in subjects, laymen, wives, and sons was itself a degrading or evil thing at all. I think it was intrinsically as good and beautiful as the nakedness of Adam and Eve. It was rightly taken away because men became bad and abused it. To attempt to restore it now would be the same error as that of the Nudists. Legal and economic equality are absolutely necessary remedies for the Fall, and protection against cruelty.

—from “Equality,” Present Concerns

For reflection  Philemon 8–16


CONTENDING FOR THE FAITH
Man is becoming as narrowly “practical” as the irrational animals. In lecturing to popular audiences I have repeatedly found it almost impossible to make them understand that I recommended Christianity because I thought its affirmations to be objectively true. They are simply not interested in the question of truth or falsehood. They only want to know if it will be comforting, or “inspiring,” or socially useful.

—from “Modern Man and His Categories of Thought,” Present Concerns

For reflection  Jude 3–4

PREFACE
WHY A C. S. LEWIS BIBLE?
by Douglas Gresham



It seems to me that many annotated Bibles are exercises in one man, or one committee of men, presenting their own wisdom and the results of their own biblical studies to the public at large, and while I ascribe to them the very best motives in the world, there still seems to me to be just a touch of arrogance attached to such an endeavour. After all, what is being said is “I/We have studied the Bible for years and I/we have achieved such wisdom therefrom that you need to read my/our comments in order to understand the Bible as deeply and as well as I/we do, which it is of vital importance for you to do.”

However, this annotated Bible is very different. This is a case of the understanding of a man who never thought of himself as a theologian but always regarded himself as a rank amateur in such matters, and yet is now, more than forty-five years after his death, regarded as one of the leading theologians of his day. This is a man who never presented himself as any kind of psychologist and yet now is thought of as a man who understood human thinking and humanity better than any other writer of his time. This is a man who never imagined himself to be a biblical scholar and yet who read and memorised a chapter of the Bible every single day. He is a man who left those of us who have read all his works with one everlasting regret, it is that he did not write more, far more, than he did. And it is not he who has put his thoughts and understandings into this work, but a group of fine scholars, many years after his death, for C. S. Lewis, known as “Jack” by his family and friends, has become one of the most studied and respected writers of the twentieth century.

In all of Jack’s published works, again and again we find great gems of wisdom and knowledge; passages keep appearing that leave us stunned and amazed at the great depth of comprehension that this man exhibited. In the thousands of letters of his enormous correspondence, again and again we find words of warm, compassionate advice to people all over the world who had approached him by mail with a problem. Others, desperate under the thrall of some horrific experience, turned to Jack for solace. He responded not with merely trite and easy utterances glibly borrowed from some self-help book found in a library of such dreary tomes, but with cogent and well-thought-out answers to their problems and difficulties, were they spiritual, emotional, or merely mundane. In the pages of the published volumes of his letters1 we find such wisdom on so many matters that in today’s world of specialisation it is hard to believe that one man could be so knowledgeable and so understanding about so many topics of human striving. The truth is that he wasn’t, or at least he wasn’t all by himself.

As Sir Isaac Newton wisely said: “If I have seen further it is only by standing on the shoulders of giants.” And Jack himself would have been the first to admit that much of his almost unbelievable wealth of knowledge and understanding of so many things of the world came from his voracious reading habits. Since his early childhood, Jack would devour books—books of all kinds, shapes, sizes, and content, and he remembered almost all that he had ever read. Jack knew that the wisdom of the world was all to be found within the pages of books, and he sopped it up like a sponge.

However, there was more than merely worldly wisdom in what Jack read, for the Holy Spirit of God is also present in all great literature. Furthermore, Jack had guidance—guidance that he checked and perused every day, and guidance that he sought and entreated every day. For as well as being a man who relentlessly studied the Bible, Jack was also a man who prayed, continually seeking the wisdom and guidance of the Holy Spirit. He put the problems of others before his maker as often if not more often, and as earnestly if not more earnestly, as he put his own. To seek out the real origins of the godly compassion, understanding, and wisdom with which Jack’s writings are filled would take many years of study and deep thought. We are fortunate indeed that there are scholars today who have been prepared to devote their lives, or at least a goodly portion of them, to just such an endeavour. What you hold in your hands is the assiduous work of many scholars who, with great skill, have brought together hundreds of things that Jack has written from the Narnian chronicles, his scholarly essays, his Christian apologetic works, and even his letters to friends and strangers, to show us how, through the torturous paths of life and literature, they all lead back to the One True Source, the Bible.

Every quote from Jack in this volume can be associated with what he himself learned and took away from certain passages of Scripture, processed within his powerful intellect, and then used in his works, to entertain and always to teach as well the things so vital to human thinking and survival. How often have we read a passage from one of Jack’s books and thought Yes! as the ring of pure truth vibrates with that delightful, familiar chill down our spines and we pause in our reading and gaze sightlessly and unfocused out of the window for a moment to let that truth settle in our minds.

There are two main additions to the knowledge and understanding that we can gain from the study of this Bible. One is just how much of Jack’s thinking was directly and powerfully influenced by his own biblical study—how his mind was challenged and instructed by the Maker of all that is by the texts of His book. And the second is just how an honest mind, working with the guidance of God, along with the benefit of years of careful reading and with the purest of motivation, can make the sometimes seemingly complex and even obscure meanings hidden within the biblical texts suddenly become simple and glaringly obvious to those of us with lesser minds. If you are one whose intellect is greater than Jack’s was, whose education is better than Jack’s was, whose reading is wider than Jack’s was, and whose faith is stronger than Jack’s was, I would very much like to meet you; but don’t bother with this book as you will know already all that it teaches, but for those of us who live on this planet, this is indeed a very valuable work.

1. The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, vols. 1–3 (New York: HarperCollins, 2000, 2004, 2006).

INTRODUCTION
C. S. LEWIS AND THE BIBLE
by Jerry Root



As a liberally educated Oxford don and later Cambridge professor, C. S. Lewis was well aware of the fact that to understand Western culture—let alone culture in general—one ought to know the Bible. He believed that no other book had such a profound influence on the literature of the world as this one book, for even the Quran instructed its followers to know the Gospels and the Psalms. He clearly saw the profound value of the Bible as a religious book and wrote,

Unless the religious claims of the Bible are again acknowledged, its literary claims will, I think, be given only “mouth honour” and that decreasingly. For it is, through and through, a sacred book. . . . It demands incessantly to be taken on its own terms: it will not continue to give literary delight very long except to those who go to it for something quite different.2

Once Lewis became a theist, even before he became a Christian, he began his lifelong practice of daily Bible reading. For Lewis, Bible reading was as natural to his daily routine as eating or sleeping. From the time of his conversion, the atheist turned Christian most often read passages prescribed in the Anglican prayer book, but his method of reading, study, and meditation varied. Sometimes he simply read from cover to cover the King James Version (also known as the Authorized Standard Version) or the Moffat translation; and as a medievalist he was also familiar with the Coverdale Bible. Sometimes, as his published letters indicate, he would focus for a time on a particular book of the Bible such as Romans or the Psalms. Often, as a trained classical scholar he would read frequently from the Greek text of the New Testament. No matter what section of the Bible captured his attention at any given time, this one thing must be said about Lewis: he was a man of the Book. Toward the end of his life Lewis was asked what he thought of the practice of daily devotions. He answered,

We have our New Testament regimental orders upon the subject. I would take it for granted that everyone who becomes a Christian would undertake this practice. It is enjoined upon us by Our Lord; and since they are His commands, I believe in following them. It is always just possible that Jesus Christ meant what He said when He told us to seek the secret place and to close the door.3

Lewis faithfully got into the Bible each day, and it is clear from all he wrote that the Bible got into him. In his writing, Lewis sought to focus on what he called “mere Christianity”—that is, those things most central to Christian faith and teaching, and that which is most central to the Bible. From the Scriptures, all that is essential to faith and practice is drawn. As spiritual questions arise out of the text, Lewis intersected with those questions and developed profound apologetics for the faith, including his well-known commentary on whether Jesus was a “liar, lunatic, or the Son of God.”

C. S. LEWIS AS A GUIDE FOR BIBLE READING
Lewis’s popularity as a writer who transcends all Christian traditions is evidence of how widely he has become a trusted voice and a spiritual guide for those confronted with life’s biggest questions. His years of faithful Bible study as well as his ability to state things clearly and imaginatively reveal that Lewis had the ability to open more than wardrobe doors. His wide background of reading literature of the Western world informed his perspective so that in his one voice we can hear the echo of many voices. Lewis’s uniquely informed knowledge of the terrain of human thought, culture, and experience makes his commentary particularly helpful. He is a valuable guide for any reader who wants to grow in an understanding of Scripture and therefore wants to grow in his or her own life of faith.

Though Lewis wrote only one book that could in any way be construed as something approximating a Bible commentary—Reflections on the Psalms—much of his writing is very much informed by his study of the Bible. It is precisely in this way that Lewis’s own words can become a helpful commentary or guide for Bible reading and study. Someone might ask, “Why is it necessary to have anyone guide a reading of the Bible?” The answer, in part, is that the very history of Jewish-Christian thought has always had respect for biblical guides and teachers. This is as obvious as the record of rabbinical teaching and as proximate as the most recent Sunday-morning sermon given at any church in virtually every country of the world. Certainly anyone who has ever read the Bible more than once knows that a single read through the Scriptures does not leave every question answered. In fact, multiple reads of the text provide enriched and deepening understanding at each new reading. It is a book with layers upon layers of insight. It stands to reason that, if more can be discovered from the text, those who have gone further in the study of the text can benefit those of us who are still learning and teachable. In this way, Lewis is a helpful guide.

In Lewis’s fiction and nonfiction works alike he reminds readers how biblical wisdom is necessary for everyday life. Lewis wrote, “Man approaches God most nearly when he is in one sense least like God. For what can be more unlike than fullness and need, sovereignty and humility, righteousness and penitence, limitless power and cry for help?”4 The world is complex, and none of us, on his or her own, is sufficient for the demands of any given day. We need help. The Scriptures give wisdom for those knowing they need more than their own cleverness to negotiate their way through life’s labyrinth.

As a guide, Lewis points out that there is an arrogance embedded in the belief that one can get a last word about God or, for that matter, a last word about the Bible. How is it possible that finite minds—not to mention fallen minds—could ever gain a final and finished grasp of the Omniscient? Certainly we can have a sure word about God: the Bible leaves no door open to relativism. But we cannot have a last word about God, for the Bible leaves no door open to that kind of absolutism that believes it has God fully figured out. It is at this point that Lewis becomes a particularly good guide to the reader of Scripture. Lewis will not let his readers forget that sure words are obtainable while the last words are not. There is in much of his writing a sense of the wonder of the majesty and glory of God that awakens wonder and awe. Lewis never seems to forget that he is small and God is enormous. Application of this fact can be seen in a number of ways.

Lewis was adamant that the Bible, properly read, opens one up to a wider understanding of the world, full of the wonders and wisdom of God. This is something he sought, and he commented, “I believe in Christianity as I believe that the Sun has risen not only because I see it but because by it I see everything else.”5 Lewis believed that the Bible does not close the minds of its readers. On the contrary, it opens them up to the presence and wonder of God as He has displayed His glory everywhere. For example, in reading other books, one’s own understanding of Scripture is bound to deepen. As Lewis observed, “There is nothing in literature which does not, in some degree, percolate into life.”6 The questions of the human heart, embedded in the literature of the world, allow us to seek answers in the Scriptures and thus be impressed once again by their enduring wisdom.

Here again, as a man of letters, Lewis is valuable as a guide because he reminds his readers that literature can open up the Scriptures to us in fresh ways. When reading Lewis’s fiction work— The Chronicles of Narnia—one cannot help but notice that his heroes are all flawed in some way or another. Edmund yields to temptation. Digory struggles to obey. And when Caspian is made King of Narnia, Aslan—the Christ figure of the Narnian books—speaks to him: “You come from the Lord Adam and the Lady Eve,” says Aslan. “And that is both honour enough to erect the head of the poorest beggar, and shame enough to bow the shoulders of the greatest emperor in earth. Be content.”7

Such insight from Lewis sends the reader back to the biblical text with new eyes to see things he or she might otherwise have missed. For instance, to read Proverbs after reading Lewis, one cannot help but notice the dramatic contrasts within that book. A reader will be struck by the contrasting of the wise man with the fool; the righteous man with the wicked man; the industrious man with the sluggard. Proverbs marks the lines of demarcation that Lewis reminds us run through every human heart. Nobody would take us seriously if we claimed to be wise, or righteous, or industrious, for these qualities still elude us. And yet, certainly, we must be weary of being the fool, and the wicked man, and the sluggard.

Lewis also reminds readers to knock down their images of God. He once wrote: “reality is iconoclastic.”8 It is one of the biggest ideas occurring throughout his published work. What did he mean by the phrase? An iconoclast is an idol breaker. I may have an image of God in my mind shaped by my reading, sermons I’ve heard, or conversations in which I’ve participated. Pieces of the puzzle come together and take a more robust shape. Nevertheless, the image of a given moment, helpful as it may be, begins to compete against my having a growing understanding of God. Lewis reminds us that God wants to knock out the walls of the temples we build for Him because He desires to give us more of Himself. Lewis wrote, more than once, that he wanted God, not his idea of God.9 Lewis will not let his readers forget that good thought is dynamic thought and it must not become stagnant. In this way, he will be a helpful guide for the reading of the Scriptures. And in light of this, it is important to remember that Lewis’s own words are not the last words, either, but they can lead us back to Scripture to seek answers and truth.

How to Read The C. S. Lewis Bible
Imagine if C. S. Lewis were your Oxford tutor or Bible teacher. What would he say, and how would he teach and inspire you? He’d ask the tough questions. He’d make you wrestle with Scripture. He wouldn’t let you get off easy. The C. S. Lewis Bible was developed in order to put his wisdom and insight side-by-side with the Scriptures so that readers might benefit from the years Lewis gave to close personal study of the Bible as it informed his own writing.

In over six hundred readings paired alongside relevant passages in the Bible, C. S. Lewis is offered as a companion and guide to a reader’s daily study of Scripture. As you come across one of these readings within the Bible text, imagine Lewis sitting alongside you, making observations on Scripture. As Lewis did in his daily study, wrestle with the Scriptures, allow his questions to make you dig deeper in the text to look for answers, and set aside time to pause and reflect.

One can deduce from Lewis’s own practices that there are many ways to read The C. S. Lewis Bible—or any other Bible, for that matter. It can, and perhaps ought to be, read cover to cover—as you might read any other book. In fact, the Bible can be read, at a speaking speed, in approximately eighty hours. This means it takes no more than thirteen minutes per day to read through the Bible from start to finish in a year; this is less time than is given over to commercials in one hour of television. Another way is to study one book of the Bible per month, reading that book over and over, each day, in that given month, taking notes on it and exploring its context in greater depth. Furthermore, the Bible could be read thematically. To do this, while reading it through from start to finish, follow a particular theme throughout. Mark down references as you note the frequency of the theme each time it is mentioned. Follow themes like the love of God, the promises of eternal life, our obligation to the poor, the sanctity of life, our responsibility for the environment, and other topics to keep you engaged with the text and to discover what God’s word says on that theme. Each read through the Bible will give you a topical reference tool for studying, in depth, God’s wisdom concerning that particular idea.

The Bible is the most important book ever written. If The C. S. Lewis Bible will encourage you to read it faithfully, then the work of the editors has been worthwhile. It has not been their design to give you more of Lewis any more than a person who puts a frame on a Rembrandt wants to give you more of a frame. The goal of the editors is that the readers of this Bible will become more enamored with the God of the Bible. Lewis is merely a tool to accomplish that end. The editors are convinced that Lewis himself would have had it no other way.

2. C. S. Lewis, “The Literary Impact of the Authorised Version” (1950), in Selected Literary Essays, ed. Walter Hooper (Cambridge: Cambridge Univ. Press, 1969), p. 144.

3. C. S. Lewis, “Cross-Examination” (1963), in God in the Dock: Essays on Theology and Ethics, ed. Walter Hooper (Grand Rapids, MI: Eerdmans, 1970), p. 266.

4. C. S. Lewis, The Four Loves (New York: Harcourt, 1960), p. 14.

5. C. S. Lewis, “Is Theology Poetry?” (1944), in The Weight of Glory: And Other Addresses, ed. Walter Hooper (New York: Touchstone, 1996), p. 106.

6. C. S. Lewis, The Allegory of Love: A Study in Medieval Tradition (Oxford: Oxford Univ. Press, 1936), p. 130.

7. C. S. Lewis, Prince Caspian: The Return to Narnia (New York: Macmillan Publishing Co., 1951), p. 182.

8. C. S. Lewis, A Grief Observed (London: Faber and Faber, 1966), pp. 25, 56, 60.

9. C. S. Lewis, A Grief Observed (London: Faber and Faber, 1966), p. 55.

THE SPIRITUAL JOURNEY OF C. S. LEWIS
by Jerry Root



Clive Staples Lewis was born November 29, 1898, in Belfast, Ireland. His father was a lawyer, and his mother was a university graduate with a degree in mathematics. He was preceded in birth by his brother Warren Hamilton Lewis, who was a constant friend and companion.

When Lewis was a boy his mother became ill. In the days of her sickness Lewis was told that if he prayed for his mother she would recover. She didn’t. He was later told that if he prayed harder and with more sincerity she would get better. Then, when he was nine years old, she died of cancer. In some ways the young Lewis felt responsible for her death because maybe he could have prayed harder. In time, Lewis came to believe that if God did exist it wasn’t very important, and eventually he abandoned his childhood faith altogether.

Lewis had what might be called spiritual experiences in his youth that haunted him throughout his early life. Most of these came through his reading of romantic literature. He was particularly affected by stories of Norse mythology and medieval knights and their acts of chivalry. One gets the impression that God was wooing Lewis to himself by awakening a longing in him that, if properly followed, would lead Lewis back to faith. Still, Lewis seemed to keep these longings separate from his intellectual life and, at that time, called himself an atheist. Nevertheless, he later observed that the first great problem in life is how one could fit romantic longings of the heart together with the robust intellectual quests of reason. This was certainly Lewis’s desire: to find the object of his deepest longing and have it be intellectually coherent and satisfying.

Lewis’s formal school experiences were difficult for him. Although he was an intelligent and successful student, he was often bullied and found himself the object of scorn and ridicule. When he was a teenager he was sent to Surrey, England, to be tutored by the senior Lewis’s old headmaster, William T. Kirkpatrick, affectionately called the Great Knock. Lewis was to study Greek, Latin, and logic in preparation for his university entrance exams. Those days with Kirkpatrick were idyllic for Lewis. It was during that time in his life he discovered a book titled Phantastes, by George MacDonald. The book recounts the adventures of a man named Anodos (Greek for “no way”). Anodos must go on a pilgrim quest through a fairyland, but “No Way” must be given a way or path. As Anodos follows on his pilgrimage, Lewis found his one quest for the object of his deepest longing also rekindled. Lewis would later write that his imagination was baptized by reading MacDonald.

But what was it Lewis most longed for? During this time in his life he went through what he called the dialectic of desire. He would have his longings awakened by some experience, and with raised expectations he would tether his heart to that object, only to be disappointed when it did not fulfill him. He would untether his desire only to retether it to something else and be disappointed once again. In time he wondered if his deepest desire was really for a mere earthly object. Perhaps he wanted something more.

Lewis sat for “responsions”—the entrance exam to Oxford University—and passed all but the mathematics paper. He was accepted to the university provided that he passed the math section at a later date—something that in fact he failed to do. However, his student career was interrupted by the First World War, and his sense of duty to his adopted country drove Lewis into enlistment in the British Army. He trained for the war in the Officer’s Training Corps at Keble College and was made a lieutenant of the Somerset Light Infantry, arriving at the front in the trenches of the valley of the Somme, on his nineteenth birthday. During this time he began to read the works of G. K. Chesterton and discovered a plausible apologetic for the Christian faith. As he wrote in his autobiography, Surprised by Joy, all of his reading began to close in on him. He was discovering that the authors he most enjoyed were Christians. After the war he found to his delight that the university had waived, for returning officers, the requirement for passing responsions, and he returned to Oxford. Lewis received three degrees—in classics, literature, and philosophy. Later, he would win a teaching post at Magdalen College, Oxford. It was during his early years at Oxford that Lewis began the more serious business of reconsidering the claims of Christianity.

Lewis had many intellectual barriers he had to hurdle, and slowly he passed over each one, moving from his atheism and materialism, through a period of agnosticism and idealism, until he finally became a theist. And it was at this time in his life that Lewis felt he could go no further. He believed he could no more know God personally than Hamlet could know Shakespeare. Nearly two years later Lewis did in fact convert to Christianity. One of his friends at Oxford was J. R. R.
Tolkien, author of The Hobbit and The Lord of the Rings. Tolkien was a Christian, and Lewis says he was one of the human causes of his conversion; in essence it was Tolkien who led Lewis to faith in Christ. Lewis revisited the Hamlet-Shakespeare analogy and decided it was a good one. Certainly Hamlet, a character in a play, could never break out of the play and introduce himself to the author. But Shakespeare, the author, could have written himself into the play as Shakespeare the character and thereby made an introduction between author and character possible. And Lewis believed that something like this actually occurred in history when God the Son became a man.

Lewis’s conversion to faith was followed by a life of spiritual discipline. He spent time daily in Bible study and prayer. He committed himself to a community of faith and even went to a spiritual director to be discipled. Furthermore, he gave of his resources—both money and time—in service to Christ. He took what he had, his pen and his brilliant mind, and harnessed the gifts God gave him for service to Christ. All who have read his works are the beneficiaries.

EDITOR’S NOTE
 

  

 

 

On Scripture: C. S. Lewis generally referred to the Authorized Standard Version (King James Version) of the Bible in his writings. He also read regularly and studied from the Greek text.

On grammar: During the time of C. S. Lewis’s writing, English speakers and writers often used the word should where today it is more common to use the word would. In places where the grammar is incorrect, we have placed a bracket next to the word should to provide greater understanding of Lewis’s writings.

On abbreviations: C. S. Lewis had a habitual style of using shorthand or abbreviations in his writings. Following is an explanation of each abbreviation:


cd. = could

v. = very

wd. = would

wh. = which

Xianity = Christianity

TO THE READER
This preface is addressed to you by the Committee of translators, who wish to explain, as briefly as possible, the origin and character of our work. The publication of our revision is yet another step in the long, continual process of making the Bible available in the form of the English language that is most widely current in our day. To summarize in a single sentence: the New Revised Standard Version of the Bible is an authorized revision of the Revised Standard Version, published in 1952, which was a revision of the American Standard Version, published in 1901, which, in turn, embodied earlier revisions of the King James Version, published in 1611.

In the course of time, the King James Version came to be regarded as “the Authorized Version.” With good reason it has been termed “the noblest monument of English prose,” and it has entered, as no other book has, into the making of the personal character and the public institutions of the English-speaking peoples. We owe to it an incalculable debt.

Yet the King James Version has serious defects. By the middle of the nineteenth century, the development of biblical studies and the discovery of many biblical manuscripts more ancient than those on which the King James Version was based made it apparent that these defects were so many as to call for revision. The task was begun, by authority of the Church of England, in 1870. The (British) Revised Version of the Bible was published in 1881–1885; and the American Standard Version, its variant embodying the preferences of the American scholars associated with the work, was published, as was mentioned above, in 1901. In 1928 the copyright of the latter was acquired by the International Council of Religious Education and thus passed into the ownership of the Churches of the United States and Canada that were associated in this Council through their boards of education and publication.

The Council appointed a committee of scholars to have charge of the text of the American Standard Version and to undertake inquiry concerning the need for further revision. After studying the questions whether or not revision should be undertaken, and if so, what its nature and extent should be, in 1937 the Council authorized a revision. The scholars who served as members of the Committee worked in two sections, one dealing with the Old Testament and one with the New Testament. In 1946 the Revised Standard Version of the New Testament was published. The publication of the Revised Standard Version of the Bible, containing the Old and New Testaments, took place on September 30, 1952. A translation of the Apocryphal/Deuterocanonical Books of the Old Testament followed in 1957. In 1977 this collection was issued in an expanded edition, containing three additional texts received by Eastern Orthodox communions (3 and
4 Maccabees and Psalm 151). Thereafter the Revised Standard Version gained the distinction of being officially authorized for use by all major Christian churches: Protestant, Anglican, Roman Catholic, and Eastern Orthodox.

The Revised Standard Version Bible Committee is a continuing body, comprising about thirty members, both men and women. Ecumenical in representation, it includes scholars affiliated with various Protestant denominations, as well as several Roman Catholic members, an Eastern Orthodox member, and a Jewish member who serves in the Old Testament section. For a period of time, the Committee included several members from Canada and from England.

Because no translation of the Bible is perfect or is acceptable to all groups of readers, and because discoveries of older manuscripts and further investigation of linguistic features of the text continue to become available, renderings of the Bible have proliferated. During the years following the publication of the Revised Standard Version, twenty-six other English translations and revisions of the Bible were produced by committees and by individual scholars—not to mention twenty-five other translations and revisions of the New Testament alone. One of the latter was the second edition of the RSV New Testament, issued in 1971, twenty-five years after its initial publication.

Following the publication of the RSV Old Testament in 1952, significant advances were made in the discovery and interpretation of documents in Semitic languages related to Hebrew. In addition to the information that had become available in the late 1940s from the Dead Sea texts of Isaiah and Habakkuk, subsequent acquisitions from the same area brought to light many other early copies of all the books of the Hebrew Scriptures (except Esther), though most of these copies are fragmentary. During the same period early Greek manuscript copies of books of the New Testament also became available.

In order to take these discoveries into account, along with recent studies of documents in Semitic languages related to Hebrew, in 1974 the Policies Committee of the Revised Standard Version, which is a standing committee of the National Council of the Churches of Christ in the U.S.A., authorized the preparation of a revision of the entire RSV Bible.

For the Old Testament the Committee has made use of the Biblia Hebraica Stuttgartensia (1977; ed. sec. emendata, 1983). This is an edition of the Hebrew and Aramaic text as current early in the Christian era and fixed by Jewish scholars (the “Masoretes”) of the sixth to the ninth centuries. The vowel signs, which were added by the Masoretes, are accepted in the main, but where a more probable and convincing reading can be obtained by assuming different vowels, this has been done. No notes are given in such cases, because the vowel points are less ancient and reliable than the consonants. When an alternative reading given by the Masoretes is translated in a footnote, this is identified by the words “Another reading is.”

Departures from the consonantal text of the best manuscripts have been made only where it seems clear that errors in copying had been made before the text was standardized. Most of the corrections adopted are based on the ancient versions (translations into Greek, Aramaic, Syriac, and Latin), which were made prior to the time of the work of the Masoretes and which therefore may reflect earlier forms of the Hebrew text. In such instances a footnote specifies the version or versions from which the correction has been derived and also gives a translation of the Masoretic Text. Where it was deemed appropriate to do so, information is supplied in footnotes from subsidiary Jewish traditions concerning other textual readings (the Tiqqune Sopherim, “emendations of the scribes”). These are identified in the footnotes as “Ancient Heb tradition.”

Occasionally it is evident that the text has suffered in transmission and that none of the versions provides a satisfactory restoration. Here we can only follow the best judgment of competent scholars as to the most probable reconstruction of the original text. Such reconstructions are indicated in footnotes by the abbreviation Cn (“Correction”), and a translation of the Masoretic Text is added.

For the Apocryphal/Deuterocanonical Books of the Old Testament, the Committee has made use of a number of texts. For most of these books, the basic Greek text from which the present translation was made is the edition of the Septuagint prepared by Alfred Rahlfs and published by the Württemberg Bible Society (Stuttgart, 1935). For several of the books, the more recently published individual volumes of the Göttingen Septuagint project were utilized. For the book of Tobit, it was decided to follow the form of the Greek text found in codex Sinaiticus (supported as it is by evidence from Qumran); where this text is defective, it was supplemented and corrected by other Greek manuscripts. For the three Additions to Daniel (namely, Susanna, the Prayer of Azariah and the Song of the Three Jews, and Bel and the Dragon) the Committee continued to use the Greek version attributed to Theodotion (the so-called “Theodotion-Daniel”). In translating Ecclesiasticus (Sirach), while constant reference was made to the Hebrew fragments of a large portion of this book (those discovered at Qumran and Masada as well as those recovered from the Cairo Geniza), the Committee generally followed the Greek text (including verse numbers) published by Joseph Ziegler in the Göttingen Septuagint (1965). But in many places the Committee has translated the Hebrew text when this provides a reading that is clearly superior to the Greek; the Syriac and Latin versions were also consulted throughout and occasionally adopted. The basic text adopted in rendering 2 Esdras is the Latin version given in Biblia Sacra, edited by Robert Weber (Stuttgart, 1971). This was supplemented by consulting the Latin text as edited by
R. L. Bensly (1895) and by Bruno Violet (1910), as well as by taking into account the several Oriental versions of 2 Esdras, namely, the Syriac, Ethiopic, Arabic (two forms, referred to as Arabic 1 and Arabic 2), Armenian, and Georgian versions. Finally, since the Additions to the Book of Esther are disjointed and quite unintelligible as they stand in most editions of the Apocrypha, we have provided them with their original context by translating the whole of the Greek version of Esther from Robert Hanhart’s Göttingen edition (1983).

For the New Testament the Committee has based its work on the most recent edition of The Greek New Testament, prepared by an interconfessional and international committee and published by the United Bible Societies (1966; 3rd ed. corrected, 1983; information concerning changes to be introduced into the critical apparatus of the forthcoming 4th edition was available to the Committee). As in that edition, double brackets are used to enclose a few passages that are generally regarded to be later additions to the text, but which we have retained because of their evident antiquity and their importance in the textual tradition. Only in very rare instances have we replaced the text or the punctuation of the Bible Societies’ edition by an alternative that seemed to us to be superior. Here and there in the footnotes, the phrase “Other ancient authorities read,” identifies alternative readings preserved by Greek manuscripts and early versions. In both Testaments alternative renderings of the text are indicated by the word “Or.”

As for the style of English adopted for the present revision, among the mandates given to the Committee in 1980 by the Division of Education and Ministry of the National Council of Churches of Christ (which now holds the copyright of the RSV Bible) was the directive to continue in the tradition of the King James Bible, but to introduce such changes as are warranted on the basis of accuracy, clarity, euphony, and current English usage. Within the constraints set by the original texts and by the mandates of the Division, the Committee has followed the maxim, “As literal as possible, as free as necessary.” As a consequence, the New Revised Standard Version (NRSV) remains essentially a literal translation. Paraphrastic renderings have been adopted only sparingly, and then chiefly to compensate for a deficiency in the English language—the lack of a common gender third person singular pronoun.

During the almost half a century since the publication of the RSV, many in the churches have become sensitive to the danger of linguistic sexism arising from the inherent bias of the English language towards the masculine gender, a bias that in the case of the Bible has often restricted or obscured the meaning of the original text. The mandates from the Division specified that, in references to men and women, masculine-oriented language should be eliminated as far as this can be done without altering passages that reflect the historical situation of ancient patriarchal culture. As can be appreciated, more than once the Committee found that the several mandates stood in tension and even in conflict. The various concerns had to be balanced case by case in order to provide a faithful and acceptable rendering without using contrived English. Only very occasionally has the pronoun “he” or “him” been retained in passages where the reference may have been to a woman as well as to a man; for example, in several legal texts in Leviticus and Deuteronomy. In such instances of formal, legal language, the options of either putting the passage in the plural or of introducing additional nouns to avoid masculine pronouns in English seemed to the Committee to obscure the historic structure and literary character of the original. In the vast majority of cases, however, inclusiveness has been attained by simple rephrasing or by introducing plural forms when this does not distort the meaning of the passage. Of course, in narrative and in parable no attempt was made to generalize the sex of individual persons.

Another aspect of style will be detected by readers who compare the more stately English rendering of the Old Testament with the less formal rendering adopted for the New Testament. For example, the traditional distinction between shall and will in English has been retained in the Old Testament as appropriate in rendering a document that embodies what may be termed the classic form of Hebrew, while in the New Testament the abandonment of such distinctions in the usage of the future tense in English reflects the more colloquial nature of the koine Greek used by most New Testament authors except when they are quoting the Old Testament.

Careful readers will notice that here and there in the Old Testament the word LORD (or in certain cases GOD) is printed in capital letters. This represents the traditional manner in English versions of rendering the Divine Name, the “Tetragrammaton” (see the notes on Exodus 3:14, 15), following the precedent of the ancient Greek and Latin translators and the long established practice in the reading of the Hebrew Scriptures in the synagogue. While it is almost if not quite certain that the Name was originally pronounced “Yahweh,” this pronunciation was not indicated when the Masoretes added vowel sounds to the consonantal Hebrew text. To the four consonants YHWH of the Name, which had come to be regarded as too sacred to be pronounced, they attached vowel signs indicating that in its place should be read the Hebrew word Adonai meaning “Lord” (or Elohim meaning “God”). Ancient Greek translators employed the word Kyrios (“Lord”) for the Name. The Vulgate likewise used the Latin word Dominus (“Lord”). The form “Jehovah” is of late medieval origin; it is a combination of the consonants of the Divine Name and the vowels attached to it by the Masoretes but belonging to an entirely different word. Although the American Standard Version (1901) had used “Jehovah” to render the Tetragrammaton (the sound of Y being represented by J and the sound of W by V, as in Latin), for two reasons the Committees that produced the RSV and the NRSV returned to the more familiar usage of the King James Version. (1) The word “Jehovah” does not accurately represent any form of the Name ever used in Hebrew. (2) The use of any proper name for the one and only God, as though there were other gods from whom the true God had to be distinguished, began to be discontinued in Judaism before the Christian era and is inappropriate for the universal faith of the Christian Church.

It will be seen that in the Psalms and in other prayers addressed to God, the archaic second person singular pronouns (thee, thou, thine) and verb forms (art, hast, hadst) are no longer used. Although some readers may regret this change, it should be pointed out that in the original languages neither the Old Testament nor the New makes any linguistic distinction between addressing a human being and addressing the Deity. Furthermore, in the tradition of the King James Version one will not expect to find the use of capital letters for pronouns that refer to the Deity—such capitalization is an unnecessary innovation that has only recently been introduced into a few English translations of the Bible. Finally, we have left to the discretion of the licensed publishers such matters as section headings, cross-references, and clues to the pronunciation of proper names.

This new version seeks to preserve all that is best in the English Bible as it has been known and used through the years. It is intended for use in public reading and congregational worship, as well as in private study, instruction, and meditation. We have resisted the temptation to introduce terms and phrases that merely reflect current moods, and have tried to put the message of the Scriptures in simple, enduring words and expressions that are worthy to stand in the great tradition of the King James Bible and its predecessors.

In traditional Judaism and Christianity, the Bible has been more than a historical document to be preserved or a classic of literature to be cherished and admired; it is recognized as the unique record of God’s dealings with people over the ages. The Old Testament sets forth the call of a special people to enter into covenant relation with the God of justice and steadfast love and to bring God’s law to the nations. The New Testament records the life and work of Jesus Christ, the one in whom “the Word became flesh,” as well as describes the rise and spread of the early Christian Church. The Bible carries its full message, not to those who regard it simply as a noble literary heritage of the past or who wish to use it to enhance political purposes and advance otherwise desirable goals, but to all persons and communities who read it so that they may discern and understand what God is saying to them. That message must not be disguised in phrases that are no longer clear, or hidden under words that have changed or lost their meaning; it must be presented in language that is direct and plain and meaningful to people today. It is the hope and prayer of the translators that this version of the Bible may continue to hold a large place in congregational life and to speak to all readers, young and old alike, helping them to understand and believe and respond to its message.


For the Committee,

BRUCE M. METZGER

GENESIS
Genesis 1

Genesis 2

Genesis 3

Genesis 4

Genesis 5

Genesis 6

Genesis 7

Genesis 8

Genesis 9

Genesis 10

Genesis 11

Genesis 12

Genesis 13

Genesis 14

Genesis 15

Genesis 16

Genesis 17

Genesis 18

Genesis 19

Genesis 20

Genesis 21

Genesis 22

Genesis 23

Genesis 24

Genesis 25

Genesis 26

Genesis 27

Genesis 28

Genesis 29

Genesis 30

Genesis 31

Genesis 32

Genesis 33

Genesis 34

Genesis 35

Genesis 36

Genesis 37

Genesis 38

Genesis 39

Genesis 40

Genesis 41

Genesis 42

Genesis 43

Genesis 44

Genesis 45

Genesis 46

Genesis 47

Genesis 48

Genesis 49

Genesis 50



For reflection: Genesis 1:1

No philosophical theory which I have yet come across is a radical improvement on the words of Genesis, that “In the beginning God made Heaven and Earth.”

—from Miracles


CREATION’S SONG
In the darkness something was happening at last. A voice had begun to sing. It was very far away and Digory found it very hard to decide from what direction it was coming. Sometimes it seemed to come from all directions at once. Sometimes he almost thought it was coming out of the earth beneath them. Its lower notes were deep enough to be the voice of the earth herself. There were no words. There was hardly even a tune. But it was, beyond comparison, the most beautiful noise he had ever heard. It was so beautiful he could hardly bear it. . . .

Then two wonders happened at the same moment. One was that the voice was suddenly joined by other voices; more voices than you could possibly count. They were in harmony with it, but far higher up the scale: cold, tingling, silvery voices. The second wonder was that the blackness overhead, all at once, was blazing with stars. They didn’t come out gently one by one, as they do on a summer evening. One moment there had been nothing but darkness; next moment a thousand, thousand points of light leaped out—single stars, constellations, and planets, brighter and bigger than any in our world. There were no clouds. The new stars and the new voices began at exactly the same time. If you had seen and heard it . . . you would have felt quite certain that it was the stars themselves who were singing, and that it was the First Voice, the deep one, which had made them appear and made them sing. . . .

And as its beams shot across the land the travelers could see for the first time what sort of place they were in. It was a valley through which a broad, swift river wound its way, flowing eastward toward the sun. Southward there were mountains, northward there were lower hills. But it was a valley of mere earth, rock and water; there was not a tree, not a bush, not a blade of grass to be seen. The earth was of many colors; they were fresh, hot and vivid. They made you feel excited; until you saw the Singer himself, and then you forgot everything else.

—from The Magician’s Nephew

For reflection  Genesis 1:1–19




For reflection: Genesis 2:3

I don’t believe that good work is ever done in a hurry.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, July 11, 1916



CREATED IN GOD’S IMAGE
There is hidden or flaunted, a sword between the sexes till an entire marriage reconciles them. It is arrogance in us to call frankness, fairness, and chivalry “masculine” when we see them in a woman; it is arrogance in them to describe a man’s sensitiveness or tact or tenderness as “feminine.” But also what poor, warped fragments of humanity most mere men and mere women must be to make the implications of that arrogance plausible. Marriage heals this. Jointly the two become fully human. “In the image of God created He them.” Thus, by a paradox, this carnival of sexuality leads us out beyond our sexes.

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Genesis 1:27

UNDER NEW MANAGEMENT
Creation seems to be delegation through and through. He will do nothing simply of Himself which can be done by creatures. I suppose this is because He is a giver. And He has nothing to give but Himself. And to give Himself is to do His deeds—in a sense, and on varying levels to be Himself—through the things He has made.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Genesis 2:19


YOU WILL BE LIKE GOD
We do not know how many of these creatures God made, nor how long they continued in the Paradisal state. But sooner or later they fell. Someone or something whispered that they could become as gods—that they could cease directing their lives to their Creator and taking all their delights as uncovenanted mercies, as “accidents” (in the logical sense) which arose in the course of a life directed not to those delights but to the adoration of God. As a young man wants a regular allowance from his father which he can count on as his own, within which he makes his own plans (and rightly, for his father is after all a fellow creature), so they desired to be on their own, to take care for their own future, to plan for pleasure and for security, to have a meum from which, no doubt, they would pay some reasonable tribute to God in the way of time, attention, and love, but which, nevertheless, was theirs not His. They wanted, as we say, to “call their souls their own.” But that means to live a lie, for our souls are not, in fact, our own. They wanted some corner in the universe of which they could say to God, “This is our business, not yours.” But there is no such corner. They wanted to be nouns, but they were, and eternally must be, mere adjectives.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Genesis 3:1–5




For reflection: Genesis 3:1–7

Man is now a horror to God and to himself and a creature ill-adapted to the universe not because God made him so but because he has made himself so by the abuse of his free will.

—from The Problem of Pain


THE COST OF FREEDOM
God has made it a rule for Himself that He won’t alter people’s character by force. He can and will alter them—but only if the people will let Him. In that way He has really and truly limited His power. Sometimes we wonder why He has done so, or even wish that He hadn’t. But apparently He thinks it worth doing. He would rather have a world of free beings, with all its risks, than a world of people who did right like machines because they couldn’t do anything else. The more we succeed in imagining what a world of perfect automatic beings would be like, the more, I think, we shall see His wisdom.

—from “‘The Trouble with “X,”’” God in the Dock

For reflection  Genesis 3:1–13


For reflection: Genesis 4:3–16

All men alike stand condemned, not by alien codes of ethics, but by their own, and all men therefore are conscious of guilt.

—from The Problem of Pain




For reflection: Genesis 4:16

To walk out of His will is to walk into nowhere.

—from Perelandra



NATURE’S CONDITION
We ask how the Nature created by a good God comes to be in this [depraved] condition? By which question we may mean either how she comes to be imperfect—to leave “room for improvement” as the schoolmasters say in their reports—or else, how she comes to be positively depraved. If we ask the question in the first sense, the Christian answer (I think) is that God, from the first, created her such as to reach her perfection by a process in time. He made an Earth at first “without form and void” and brought it by degrees to its perfection. In this, as elsewhere, we see the familiar pattern—descent from God to the formless Earth and reascent from the formless to the finished. In that sense a certain degree of “evolutionism” or “developmentalism” is inherent in Christianity. So much for Nature’s imperfection; her positive depravity calls for a very different explanation. According to the Christians this is all due to sin: the sin both of men and of powerful, non-human beings, supernatural but created. The unpopularity of this doctrine arises from the widespread Naturalism of our age—the belief that nothing but Nature exists and that if anything else did she is protected from it by a Maginot Line—and will disappear as this error is corrected. To be sure, the morbid inquisitiveness about such beings which led our ancestors to a pseudo-science of Demonology, is to be sternly discouraged: our attitude should be that of the sensible citizen in wartime who believes that there are enemy spies in our midst but disbelieves nearly every particular spy story. We must limit ourselves to the general statement that beings in a different, and higher “Nature” which is partially interlocked with ours have, like men, fallen and have tampered with things inside our frontier. The doctrine, besides proving itself fruitful of good in each man’s spiritual life, helps to protect us from shallowly optimistic or pessimistic views of Nature. To call her either “good” or “evil” is boys’ philosophy. We find ourselves in a world of transporting pleasures, ravishing beauties, and tantalising possibilities, but all constantly being destroyed, all coming to nothing. Nature has all the air of a good thing spoiled.

The sin, both of men and of angels, was rendered possible by the fact that God gave them free will: thus surrendering a portion of His omnipotence (it is again a deathlike or descending movement) because He saw that from a world of free creatures, even though they fell, He could work out (and this is the reascent) a deeper happiness and a fuller splendour than any world of automata would admit.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Genesis 6:1–7


NOAH’S DRUNKENNESS
The wine of the Bible was real fermented wine and alcoholic. The repeated references to the sin of drunkenness in the Bible, from Noah’s first discovery of wine down to the warnings in St. Paul’s epistles make this perfectly plain. The other theory cd. be (honestly) held only by a v. ignorant person. One can understand the bitterness of some “temperance” fanatics if one has ever lived with a drunkard: what one finds it harder to excuse is any educated person telling us such lies about history.

—from a letter to Mrs. Johnson, May 14, 1955

For reflection  Genesis 9:20–21


ABRAHAM’S CALL
A vocation is a terrible thing. To be called out of nature into the supernatural life is at first (or perhaps not quite at first—the wrench of the parting may be felt later) a costly honour. Even to be called from one natural level to another is loss as well as gain. Man has difficulties and sorrows which the other primates escape. But to be called up higher still costs still more. “Get thee out of thy country, and from thy kindred, and from thy father’s house,” said God to Abraham (Genesis 12, 1). It is a terrible command; turn your back on all you know. The consolation (if it will at that moment console) is very like that which the Psalmist offers to the bride: “I will make of thee a great nation.” This “turn your back” is of course terribly repeated, one may say aggravated, by Our Lord—“he that hateth not father and mother and his own life.” He speaks, as so often in the proverbial, paradoxical manner; hatred (in cold prose) is not enjoined; only the resolute, the apparently ruthless, rejection of natural claims when, and if, the terrible choice comes to that point. (Even so, this text is, I take it, profitable only to those who read it with horror. The man who finds it easy enough to hate his father, the woman whose life is a long struggle not to hate her mother, had probably best keep clear of it.)

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Genesis 12:1–3


THE RIGHT RELATIONSHIP
What God cares about is not exactly our actions. What he cares about is that we should be creatures of a certain kind or quality—the kind of creatures He intended us to be—creatures related to Himself in a certain way. I do not add “and related to one another in a certain way,” because that is included: if you are right with Him you will inevitably be right with all your fellow-creatures, just as if all the spokes of a wheel are fitted rightly into the hub and the rim they are bound to be in the right positions to one another. And as long as a man is thinking of God as an examiner who has set him a sort of paper to do, or as the opposite party in a sort of bargain—as long as he is thinking of claims and counter-claims between himself and God—he is not yet in the right relation to Him. He is misunderstanding what he is and what God is. And he cannot get into the right relation until he has discovered the fact of our bankruptcy.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Genesis 15:1–21


HE WANTS OUR PARTICIPATION
Praying for particular things,” said I, “always seems to me like advising God how to run the world. Wouldn’t it be wiser to assume that He knows best?” “On the same principle,” said he, “I suppose you never ask a man next to you to pass the salt, because God knows best whether you ought to have salt or not. And I suppose you never take an umbrella, because God knows best whether you ought to be wet or dry.” “That’s quite different,” I protested. “I don’t see why,” said he. “The odd thing is that He should let us influence the course of events at all. But since He lets us do it in one way I don’t see why He shouldn’t let us do it in the other.”

—from “Scraps,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Genesis 18:16–33


WHEN OBEDIENCE IS TESTED

One right act includes all other righteousness, and that the supreme cancelling of Adam’s fall, the movement “full speed astern” by which we retrace our long journey from Paradise, the untying of the old, hard knot, must be when the creature, with no desire to aid it, stripped naked to the bare willing of obedience, embraces what is contrary to its nature, and does that for which only one motive is possible. Such an act may be described as a “test” of the creature’s return to God: hence our fathers said that troubles were “sent to try us.” A familiar example is Abraham’s “trial” when he was ordered to sacrifice Isaac. With the historicity or the morality of that story I am not now concerned, but with the obvious question, “If God is omniscient He must have known what Abraham would do, without any experiment; why, then, this needless torture?” But as St. Augustine points out, whatever God knew, Abraham at any rate did not know that his obedience could endure such a command until the event taught him: and the obedience which he did not know that he would choose, he cannot be said to have chosen. The reality of Abraham’s obedience was the act itself; and what God knew in knowing that Abraham “would obey” was Abraham’s actual obedience on that mountain top at that moment. To say that God “need not have tried the experiment” is to say that because God knows, the thing known by God need not exist.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Genesis 22:1–19


GOD’S UNAVOIDABLE PRESENCE
What can you ever really know of other people’s souls—of their temptations, their opportunities, their struggles? One soul in the whole creation you do know: and it is the only one whose fate is placed in your hands. If there is a God, you are, in a sense alone with Him. You cannot put Him off with speculations about your next door neighbours or memories of what you have read in books. What will all that chatter and hearsay count (will you even be able to remember it?) when the anaesthetic fog which we call “nature” or “the real world” fades away and the Presence in which you have always stood becomes palpable, immediate, and unavoidable?

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Genesis 28:16


SUMMONED BY GOD
In some sense, as dark to the intellect as it is unendurable to the feelings, we can be both banished from the presence of Him who is present everywhere and erased from the knowledge of Him who knows all. We can be left utterly and absolutely outside—repelled, exiled, estranged, finally and unspeakably ignored. On the other hand, we can be called in, welcomed, received, acknowledged. We walk everywhere on the razor edge between these two incredible possibilities. Apparently, then, our lifelong nostalgia, our longing to be reunited with something in the universe from which we now feel cut off, to be on the inside of some door which we have always seen from the outside, is no mere neurotic fancy, but the truest index of our real situation. And to be at last summoned inside would be both glory and honor beyond all our merits and also the healing of that old ache.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Genesis 32:26–30


FORGIVENESS DEFERRED
Last week, while at prayer, I suddenly discovered—or felt as if I did—that I had really forgiven someone I have been trying to forgive for over thirty years. Trying and praying that I might. When the thing actually happened—sudden as the longed-for cessation of one’s neighbor’s radio—my feeling was “But this is so easy. Why didn’t you do it ages ago?”

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Genesis 33:3–4


NO COMFORT
LEWIS, GRIEVING THE DEATH OF HIS WIFE, JOY:
And no one ever told me about the laziness of grief. Except at my job—where the machine seems to run on much as usual—I loathe the slightest effort. Not only writing but even reading a letter is too much. Even shaving. What does it matter now whether my cheek is rough or smooth? They say an unhappy man wants distractions—something to take him out of himself. Only as a dog-tired man wants an extra blanket on a cold night; he’d rather lie there shivering than get up and find one. It’s easy to see why the lonely become untidy, finally, dirty and disgusting.

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Genesis 37:34–35


For reflection: Genesis 39:1–6

Obedience is the key to all doors: feelings come (or don’t come) and go as God pleases. We can’t produce them at will and mustn’t try.

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, December 7, 1950




REFLECTIONS ON POTIPHAR
Reflection on the story raised in my mind a problem I never happened to have thought of before: why was Joseph imprisoned, and not killed, by Potiphar? Surely it seems extraordinarily mild treatment for attempted rape of a great lady by a slave? Or must one assume that Potiphar, tho’ ignorant of the lady’s intention to make him a cuckold, was aware in general . . . that her stories about the servants were to be taken with a grain of salt—that his real view was “I don’t suppose for a moment that Joseph did anything of the sort, but I foresee there’ll be no peace till I get him out of the house”? One is tempted to begin to imagine the whole life of the Potiphar family: e.g. how often had he heard similar stories from her before?

—from a letter to his brother, February 25, 1940

For reflection  Genesis 39:1–20



For reflection: Genesis 45:1–10

Those who will not be God’s sons become His tools.

—from A Preface to “Paradise Lost”



PILGRIM STATUS
About death, I go through different moods, but the times when I can desire it are never, I think, those when this world seems harshest. On the contrary, it is just when there seems to be most of Heaven already here that I come nearest to longing for the patria. It is the bright frontispiece [which] whets one to read the story itself. All joy (as distinct from mere pleasure, still more amusement) emphasises our pilgrim status: always reminds, beckons, awakes desire. Our best havings are wantings.

—from a letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, November 5, 1954

For reflection  Genesis 49:33–50:3



For reflection: Exodus 3:1–6

We can always say we have been the victims of an illusion; if we disbelieve in the supernatural this is what we always shall say.

—from “Miracles,” God in the Dock




SEEING IS NOT ALWAYS BELIEVING
I have known only one person in my life who claimed to have seen a ghost.  
 It was a woman; and the interesting thing is that she disbelieved in the immortality of the soul before seeing the ghost and still disbelieves after having seen it. She thinks it was a hallucination. In other words, seeing is not believing. This is the first thing to get clear in talking about miracles. Whatever experiences we may have, we shall not regard them as miraculous if we already hold a philosophy which excludes the supernatural. Any event which is claimed as a miracle is, in the last resort, an experience received from the senses; and the senses are not infallible. We can always say we have been the victims of an illusion; if we disbelieve in the supernatural this is what we always shall say. Hence, whether miracles have really ceased or not, they would certainly appear to cease in Western Europe as materialism became the popular creed. For let us make no mistake. If the end of the world appeared in all the literal trappings of the Apocalypse, if the modern materialist saw with his own eyes the heavens rolled up and the great white throne appearing, if he had the sensation of being himself hurled into the Lake of Fire, he would continue forever, in that lake itself, to regard his experience as an illusion and to find the explanation of it in psycho-analysis, or cerebral pathology. Experience by itself proves nothing. If a man doubts whether he is dreaming or waking, no experiment can solve his doubt, since every experiment may itself be part of the dream. Experience proves this, or that, or nothing, according to the preconceptions we bring to it.

—from “Miracles,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Exodus 7–13


For reflection: Exodus 11:1

“How could we endure to live and let time pass if we were always crying for one day or one year to come back if we did not know that every day in a life fills the whole life with expectation and memory and these are that day?”

—from Out of the Silent Planet



For reflection: Exodus 14:8

In all discussions of Hell we should keep steadily before our eyes the possible damnation, not of our enemies nor our friends (since both of these disturb the reason) but of ourselves.

—from The Problem of Pain


ENOUGH FOR EACH DAY
The great thing, as you have obviously seen, (both as regards pain and financial worries) is to live from day to day and hour to hour not adding the past or future to the present. As one lived in the Front Line “They’re not shelling us at the moment, and it’s not raining, and the rations have come up, so let’s enjoy ourselves.” In fact, as Our Lord said, “Sufficient unto the day.”

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, October 20, 1957

For reflection  Exodus 16:1–35

MEETING WITH GOD
This talk of “meeting” is, no doubt, anthropomorphic; as if God and I could be face to face, like two fellow-creatures, when in reality He is above me and within me and below me and all about me. That is why it must be balanced by all manner of metaphysical and theological abstractions. But never, here or anywhere else, let us think that while anthropomorphic images are a concession to our weakness, the abstractions are the literal truth. Both are equally concessions; each singly misleading, and the two together mutually corrective. Unless you sit to it very tightly, continually murmuring “Not thus, not thus, neither is this Thou,” the abstraction is fatal. It will make the life of lives inanimate and the love of loves impersonal. The naïf image is mischievous chiefly in so far as it holds unbelievers back from conversion. It does believers, even at its crudest, no harm.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Exodus 19:7–25


For reflection: Exodus 20:18–21

We may ignore, but we can nowhere evade the presence of God. The world is crowded with Him. He walks everywhere incognito. And the incognito is not always hard to penetrate. The real labor is to remember, to attend. In fact, to come awake. Still more, to remain awake.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer



CORRECTING AND HARMONIZING
There are two ways in which the human machine goes wrong. One is when human individuals drift apart from one another, or else collide with one another and do one another damage, by cheating or bullying. The other is when things go wrong inside the individual—when the different parts of him (his different faculties and desires and so on) either drift apart or interfere with one another. You can get the idea plain if you think of us as a fleet of ships sailing in formation. The voyage will be a success only, in the first place, if the ships do not collide and get in one another’s way; and, secondly, if each ship is seaworthy and has her engines in good order. As a matter of fact, you cannot have either of these two things without the other. If the ships keep on having collisions they will not remain seaworthy very long. On the other hand, if their steering gears are out of order they will not be able to avoid collisions. Or, if you like, think of humanity as a band playing a tune. To get a good result, you need two things. Each player’s individual instrument must be in tune and also each must come in at the right moment so as to combine with all the others.

But there is one thing we have not yet taken into account. We have not asked where the fleet is trying to get to, or what piece of music the band is trying to play. The instruments might be all in tune and might all come in at the right moment, but even so the performance would not be a success if they had been engaged to provide dance music and actually played nothing but Dead Marches. And however well the fleet sailed, its voyage would be a failure if it were meant to reach New York and actually arrived at Calcutta.

Morality, then, seems to be concerned with three things. Firstly, with fair play and harmony between individuals. Secondly, with what might be called tidying up or harmonising the things inside each individual. Thirdly, with the general purpose of human life as a whole: what man was made for: what course the whole fleet ought to be on: what tune the conductor of the band wants it to play.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Exodus 20:1–26



For reflection: Exodus 23:1–11

Legal and economic equality are absolutely necessary remedies for the Fall, and protection against cruelty.

—from “Equality,” Present Concerns




For reflection: Exodus 24:3

In the perfect and eternal world the Law will vanish. But the results of having lived faithfully under it will not.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer




For reflection: Exodus 29:42

When our participation in a rite becomes perfect we think no more of ritual, but are engrossed by that about which the rite is performed; but afterwards we recognized that ritual was the sole method by which this concentration could be achieved.

—from A Preface to “Paradise Lost”



THE CLAIMS OF MORAL LAW
The Holiness of God is something more and other than moral perfection: His claim upon us is something more and other than the claim of moral duty. I do not deny it: but this conception, like that of corporate guilt, is very easily used as an evasion of the real issue. God may be more than moral goodness: He is not less. The road to the promised land runs past Sinai. The moral law may exist to be transcended: but there is no transcending it for those who have not first admitted its claims upon them, and then tried with all their strength to meet that claim, and fairly and squarely faced the fact of their failure.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Exodus 32:1–35


OUR DILEMMA
This is the terrible fix we are in. If the universe is not governed by an absolute goodness, then all our efforts are in the long run hopeless. But if it is, then we are making ourselves enemies to that goodness every day, and are not in the least likely to do any better tomorrow, and so our case is hopeless again. We cannot do without it, and we cannot do with it. God is the only comfort, He is also the supreme terror: the thing we most need and the thing we most want to hide from. He is our only possible ally, and we have made ourselves His enemies. Some people talk as if meeting the gaze of absolute goodness would be fun. They need to think again. They are still only playing with religion. Goodness is either the great safety or the great danger—according to the way you react to it. And we have reacted the wrong way.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Exodus 33:17–20


THE BIG REVEAL
We are always completely, and therefore equally, known to God. That is our destiny whether we like it or not. But though knowledge never varies, the quality of our being known can. . . . Ordinarily to be known by God is to be, for this purpose, in the category of things. We are, like earthworms, cabbages, and nebulae, objects of Divine knowledge. But when we (a) became aware of the fact—the present fact, not the generalization—and (b) assent with all our will to be so known, then we treat ourselves, in relation to God, not as things but as persons. We have unveiled. Not that any veil could have baffled His sight. The change is in us. The passive changes to the active. Instead of merely being known, we show, we tell, we offer ourselves to view.

To put ourselves this on a personal footing with God could, in itself and without warrant. be nothing but presumption and illusion. But we are taught that it is not; that it is God who gives us that footing. For it is by the Holy Spirit that we cry “Father.” By unveiling, by confessing our sins and “making known” our requests. we assume the high rank of persons before Him. And He, descending. becomes a Person to us.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Exodus 34:29–35


DEMANDS OF THE LAW HAVE BEEN MET
Christianity tells people to repent and then promises them forgiveness. It therefore has nothing (as far as I know) to say to people who do not know they have done anything to repent of and who do not feel they need any forgiveness. It is after you realize there is a real Moral Law, and a Power behind the law, and that you have broken that law and put yourself wrong with that Power—it is after this, and not a moment sooner, that Christianity begins to talk. When you know you are sick, you will listen to the doctor. When you have realised that our position is nearly desperate you will begin to understand what the Christians are talking about. They offer an explanation of how we got into our present state of both hating goodness and loving it. They offer an explanation of how God can be this impersonal mind at the back of the Moral Law and yet also a Person. They tell you how the demands of this law, which you and I cannot meet, have been met on our behalf, how God Himself becomes a man to save from the disapproval of God. It is an old story.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Numbers 5:1–10


For reflection: Numbers 6:24–26

God cannot give us a happiness and peace apart from Himself, because it is not there. There is no such thing.

—from Mere Christianity



STUCK IN THE PAST
Many religious people lament that the first fervours of their conversion have fled away. They think—sometimes rightly, but not, I believe, always—that their sins account for this. They may even try by pitiful efforts of will to revive what now seem to have been the golden days. But were those fervours—the operative word is those—ever intended to last?

It would be rash to say that there is any prayer which God never grants. But the strongest candidate is the prayer we might express in the single word encore. And how should the Infinite repeat Himself? All space and time are too little for Him to utter Himself in them once.

And the joke, or tragedy, of it all is that these golden moments in the past, which are so tormenting if we erect them into a norm, are entirely nourishing, wholesome, and enchanting if we are content to accept them for what they are, for memories. Properly bedded down in a past which we do not miserably try to conjure back, they will send up exquisite growths. Leave the bulbs alone, and the new flowers will come up. Grub them up and hope, by fondling and sniffing, to get last year’s blooms, and you will get nothing. “Unless a seed die . . .”

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Numbers 11:1–6


BEING THE UNDERDOG
Do you remember the passage . . . where Moses sends the spies into Canaan and they come back and say “We have seen the giants, the sons of Anak; and we were in our own eyes as grasshoppers.” Isn’t that perfect? It brings out the monstrosity of the giants so well, because one thinks of the grasshopper as being not only small, but fragile, light and even flimsy. “Beetles, for example, would not” have done nearly so well.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, October 1, 1934

For reflection  Numbers 13:33


FACE-TO-FACE
SCREWTAPE’S UNHOLY CAUTION:
If ever he consciously directs his prayers “Not to what I think thou art but to what thou knowest thyself to be,” our situation is, for the moment, desperate. Once all his thoughts and images have been flung aside or, if retained, retained with a full recognition of their merely subjective nature, and the man trusts himself to the completely real, external, invisible Presence, there with him in the room and never knowable by him as he is known by it—why, then it is that the incalculable may occur. In avoiding this situation—this real nakedness of the soul in prayer—you will be helped by the fact that the humans themselves do not desire it as much as they suppose. There’s such a thing as getting more than they bargained for!

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Numbers 14:5–24



For reflection: Numbers 16:1–11

A creature revolting against a creator is revolting against the source of his own powers—including even his power to revolt. . . . It is like the scent of a flower trying to destroy the flower. As a consequence the same rebellion which means misery for the feelings and corruption for the will, means Nonsense for the intellect.

—from A Preface to “Paradise Lost”



For reflection: Numbers 21:1–9

Symbolism exists precisely for the purpose of conveying to the imagination what the intellect is not ready for.

—from a letter to Sister Penelope CSMV, March 25, 1943



For reflection: Numbers 22:24–31

One must take comfort in remembering that God used an ass to convert the prophet: perhaps if we do our poor best we shall be allowed a stall near it in the celestial stable . . . !

—from a letter to Sister Penelope CSMV, May 15, 1941



THE NECESSITY AND DANGER OF RELIGION
It is well to have specifically holy places, and things, and days, for, without these focal points or reminders, the belief that all is holy and “big with God” will soon dwindle into a mere sentiment. But if these holy places, things, and days cease to remind us, if they obliterate our awareness that all ground is holy and every bush (could we but perceive it) a Burning Bush, then the hallows begin to do harm. Hence both the necessity, and the perennial danger, of “religion.”

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Numbers 28:26–30



For reflection: Numbers 29:1–40

If you devoted every moment of your whole life exclusively to His service you could not give Him anything that was not in a sense His own already.

—from Mere Christianity


For reflection: Numbers 32:23

A serious attempt to repent and really to know one’s own sins is in the long run a lightening and relieving process.

—from “‘Miserable Offenders,’” God in the Dock


THE VERDICT IS IN
Our ancestors had a habit of using the word “judgment” in this context as if it meant simply “punishment”: hence the popular expression, “It’s a judgment on him.” I believe we can sometimes render the thing more vivid to ourselves by taking judgment in a stricter sense: not as the sentence or award, but as the Verdict. Some day (and “What if this present were the world’s last night?”) an absolutely correct verdict—if you like, a perfect critique—will be passed on what each of us is.

We have all encountered judgments or verdicts on ourselves in this life. Every now and then we discover what our fellow creatures really think of us. I don’t of course mean what they tell us to our faces: that we usually have to discount. I am thinking of what we sometimes overhear by accident or of the opinions about us which our neighbours or employees or subordinates unknowingly reveal in their actions: and of the terrible, or lovely, judgments artlessly betrayed by children or even animals. Such discoveries can be the bitterest or sweetest experiences we have. But of course both the bitter and the sweet are limited by our doubt as to the wisdom of those who judge. We always hope that those who so clearly think us cowards or bullies are ignorant and malicious; we always fear that those who trust us or admire us are misled by partiality. I suppose the experience of the Final Judgment (which may break in upon us at any moment) will be like these little experiences, but magnified to the Nth.

For it will be infallible judgment. If it is favorable we shall have no fear, if unfavorable, no hope, that it is wrong. We shall not only believe, we shall know, know beyond doubt in every fibre of our appalled or delighted being, that as the Judge has said, so we are: neither more nor less nor other. We shall perhaps even realise that in some dim fashion we could have known it all along. We shall know and all creation will know too: our ancestors, our parents, our wives or husbands, our children. The unanswerable and (by then) self-evident truth about each will be known to all.

I do not find that pictures of physical catastrophe —that sign in the clouds, those heavens rolled up like a scroll—help one so much as the naked idea of Judgment. We cannot always be excited. We can, perhaps, train ourselves to ask more and more often how the thing which we are saying or doing (or failing to do) at each moment will look when the irresistible light streams in upon it; that light which is so different from the light of this world—and yet, even now, we know just enough of it to take it into account.

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Deuteronomy 1:16–17


For reflection: Deuteronomy 4:19

All the beauty of nature withers when we try to make it absolute. Put first things first and we get second things thrown in: put second things first & we lose both first and second things.

—from a letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 23, 1951



EMPTY DIVINITY
The difference between believing in God and in many gods is not one of arithmetic. As someone has said “gods” is not really the plural of God; God has no plural. Thus, when you hear in the thunder the voice of a god, you are stopping short, for the voice of a god is not really a voice from beyond the world, from the uncreated. By taking the god’s voice away—or envisaging the god as an angel, a servant of that Other—you go further. The thunder becomes not less divine but more. By emptying Nature of divinity—or, let us say, of divinities—you may fill her with Deity, for she is now the bearer of messages. There is a sense in which Nature-worship silences her—as if a child or a savage were so impressed with the postman’s uniform that he omitted to take in the letters.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Deuteronomy 4:15–20


MORE THAN MERE RULES
Almost all people at all times have agreed (in theory) that human beings ought to be honest and kind and helpful to one another. But though it is natural to begin with all that, if our thinking about morality stops there, we might just as well not have thought at all. Unless we go on to the second thing—the tidying up inside each human being—we are only deceiving ourselves.

What is the good of telling the ships how to steer so as to avoid collisions if, in fact, they are such crazy old tubs that they cannot be steered at all? What is the good of drawing up, on paper, rules for social behaviour, if we know that, in fact, our greed, cowardice, ill temper, and self-conceit are going to prevent us from keeping them? I do not mean for a moment that we ought not to think, and think hard, about improvements in our social and economic system. What I do mean is that all that thinking will be mere moonshine unless we realise that nothing but the courage and unselfishness of individuals is ever going to make any system work properly. It is easy enough to remove the particular kinds of graft or bullying that go on under the present system: but as long as men are twisters or bullies they will find some new way of carrying on the old game under the new system. You cannot make men good by law: and without good men you cannot have a good society.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Deuteronomy 5:7–21


THOUGH FEELINGS COME AND GO . . .
Some writers use the word charity to describe not only Christian love between human beings, but also God’s love for man and man’s love for God. About the second of these two, people are often worried. They are told they ought to love God. They cannot find any such feeling in themselves. What are they to do? The answer is the same as before. Act as if you did. Do not sit trying to manufacture feelings. Ask yourself, “If I were sure that I loved God, what would I do?” When you have found the answer, go and do it.

On the whole, God’s love for us is a much safer subject to think about than our love for Him. Nobody can always have devout feelings: and even if we could, feelings are not what God principally cares about. Christian Love, either towards God or towards man, is an affair of the will. If we are trying to do His will we are obeying the commandment, “Thou shalt love the LORD thy God.” He will give us feelings of love if He pleases. We cannot create them for ourselves, and we must not demand them as a right. But the great thing to remember is that, though our feelings come and go, His love for us does not. It is not wearied by our sins, or our indifference; and, therefore, it is quite relentless in its determination that we shall be cured of those sins, at whatever cost to us, at whatever cost to Him.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Deuteronomy 6:5


EYE WITNESS
The question whether miracles occur can never be answered simply by experience. Every event which might claim to be a miracle is, in the last resort, something presented to our senses, something seen, heard, touched, smelled, or tasted. And our senses are not infallible. If anything extraordinary seems to have happened, we can always say that we have been the victims of an illusion. If we hold a philosophy which excludes the supernatural, this is what we always shall say.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Deuteronomy 7:17–19


REALIZING OUR NEED FOR GOD
Christ said “Blessed are the poor” and “How hard it is for the rich to enter the Kingdom,” and no doubt He primarily meant the economically rich and economically poor. But do not His words also apply to another kind of riches and poverty? One of the dangers of having a lot of money is that you may be quite satisfied with the kinds of happiness money can give and so fail to realise your need for God. If everything seems to come simply by signing cheques, you may forget that you are at every moment totally dependent on God.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Deuteronomy 8:10–20


GOD’S REQUIREMENTS
I don’t think being good always goes with having fun: a martyr being tortured by Nero, or a resistance movement man refusing to give away his friends when tortured by the Germans, were being good but not having fun. And even in ordinary life there are things that wd. be fun to me but I mustn’t do them because they wd. spoil other people’s fun.

But of course you are quite right if you mean that giving up fun for no reason except that you think it’s “good” to give it up, is all nonsense. Don’t the ordinary old rules about telling the truth and doing as you’d be done by tell one pretty well which kinds of fun one may have and which not? But provided the thing is in itself right, the more one likes it and the less one has to “try to be good,” the better. A perfect man wd. never act from sense of duty; he’d always want the right thing more than the wrong one. Duty is only a substitute for love (of God and of other people)—like a crutch, which is a substitute for a leg. Most of us need the crutch at times: but of course it’s idiotic to use the crutch when our own legs (our own loves, tastes, habits etc) can do the journey on their own!

—from a letter to Joan Lancaster, July 18, 1957

For reflection  Deuteronomy 10:12–22


OBEDIENCE TRAINING
About obedience. Nearly everyone will find himself in the course of his life in positions where he ought to command and in positions where he ought to obey. Which he ought to be doing in any given situation, or whether he ought to be doing either, of course will always admit of dispute, but that doesn’t invalidate the principle—any more than the general rule “I oughtn’t to overeat” is invalidated by the difficulty of saying whether one bun here and now constitutes over-eating. Still less is it invalidated by the fact that some people are too fond of ruling and others too fond of obeying: sooner or later each of them may be a duty for everyone.

Now each of them requires a certain training or habituation if it is to be done well: and indeed the habit of command, or of obedience, may often be more necessary than the most enlightened view as to the ultimate moral grounds for doing either; and certainly, where there is no training, the enlightened views will either be ineffective, or effective at the cost of great nervous tension. You can’t begin training a child to command until it has reason and age enough to command someone or something without absurdity. You can at once begin training it to obey: that is, teaching it the act of obedience as such—without prejudice to the views it will later hold as to who should obey whom, or when, or how much. Just as you try to train it in courage, without in the least prejudging the question as to which changes in adult life ought to be faced and which ought to be declined.

—from a letter to Mary Neylan, March 26, 1940

For reflection  Deuteronomy 11:18–21


GUIDELINES, NOT RULEBOOKS
Christianity has not, and does not profess to have, a detailed political programme for applying “Do as you would be done by” to a particular society at a particular moment. It could not have. It is meant for all men at all times and the particular programme which suited one place or time would not suit another. And, anyhow, that is not how Christianity works. When it tells you to feed the hungry it does not give you lessons in cookery. When it tells you to read the Scriptures it does not give you lessons in Hebrew and Greek, or even in English grammar. It was never intended to replace or supersede the ordinary human arts and sciences: it is rather a director which will set them all to the right jobs, and a source of energy which will give them all new life, if only they will put themselves at its disposal.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Deuteronomy 15:11


THE SMALLNESS OF OUR LOVE FOR GOD
It is probably impossible to love any human being simply “too much.” We may love him too much in proportion to our love for God; but it is the smallness of our love for God, not the greatness of our love for the man, that constitutes the inordinacy. . . . But the question whether we are loving God or the earthly Beloved “more” is not, so far as concerns our Christian duty, a question about the comparative intensity of two feelings. The real question is, which (when the alternative comes) do you serve, or choose, or put first. To which claim does your will, in the last resort, yield?

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  Deuteronomy 19:9


SPOILED GOODNESS
Wickedness, when you examine it, turns out to be the pursuit of some good in the wrong way. You can be good for the mere sake of goodness: you cannot be bad for the mere sake of badness. You can do a kind action when you are not feeling kind and when it gives you no pleasure, simply because kindness is right; but no one ever did a cruel action simply because cruelty is wrong—only because cruelty was pleasant or useful to him. In other words badness cannot succeed even in being bad in the same way in which goodness is good. Goodness is, so to speak, itself: badness is only spoiled goodness. . . . Evil is a parasite, not an original thing.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Deuteronomy 22:23–27


FREE TO CHOOSE
God created things which had free will. That means creatures which can go either wrong or right. Some people think they can imagine a creature which was free but had no possibility of going wrong; I cannot. If a thing is free to be good it is also free to be bad. And free will is what has made evil possible. Why, then, did God give them free will? Because free will, though it makes evil possible, is also the only thing that makes possible any love or goodness or joy worth having. A world of automata—of creatures that worked like machines—would hardly be worth creating. The happiness which God designs for His higher creatures is the happiness of being freely, voluntarily united to Him and to each other in an ecstasy of love and delight compared with which the most rapturous love between a man and a woman on this earth is mere milk and water. And for that they must be free.

Of course God knew what would happen if they used their freedom the wrong way: apparently He thought it worth the risk. Perhaps we feel inclined to disagree with Him. But there is a difficulty about disagreeing with God. He is the source from which all your reasoning power comes: you could not be right and He wrong any more than a stream can rise higher than its own source. When you are arguing against Him you are arguing against the very power that makes you able to argue at all: it is like cutting off the branch you are sitting on. If God thinks this state of war in the universe a price worth paying for free will—that is, for making a live world in which creatures can do real good or harm and something of real importance can happen, instead of a toy world which only moves when He pulls the strings—then we may take it it is worth paying.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Deuteronomy 26:16–19


A DISOBEDIENT SPIRIT
To admire Satan, then, is to give one’s vote not only for a world of misery, but also for a world of lies and propaganda, of wishful thinking, of incessant autobiography. Yet the choice is possible. Hardly a day passes without some slight movement towards it in all of us.

—from A Preface to “Paradise Lost”

For reflection  Deuteronomy 28:15


SIN LEAVES ITS MARK
That explains what always used to puzzle me about Christian writers; they seem to be so very strict at one moment and so very free and easy at another. They talk about mere sins of thought as if they were immensely important: and then they talk about the most frightful murders and treacheries as if you had only got to repent and all would be forgiven. But I have come to see that they are right. What they are always thinking of is the mark which the action leaves on that tiny central self which no one sees in this life but which each of us will have to endure—or enjoy—for ever. One man may be so placed that his anger sheds the blood of thousands, and another so placed that however angry he gets he will only be laughed at. But the little mark on the soul may be much the same in both. Each has done something to himself which, unless he repents, will make it harder for him to keep out of the rage next time he is tempted, and will make the rage worse when he does fall into it. Each of them, if he seriously turns to God, can have that twist in the central man straightened out again: each is, in the long run, doomed if he will not. The bigness or smallness of the thing, seen from the outside, is not what really matters.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Deuteronomy 29:19–20


IF YOU LET YOUR HEART TURN AWAY
Law, in his terrible, cool voice, said, . . . “If you have not chosen the Kingdom of God, it will make in the end no difference what you have chosen instead.” Those are hard words to take. Will it really make no difference whether it was women or patriotism, cocaine or art, whisky or a seat in the Cabinet, money or science? Well, surely no difference that matters. We shall have missed the end for which we are formed and rejected the only thing that satisfies. Does it matter to a man dying in a desert by which choice of route he missed the only well?

—from “A Slip of the Tongue,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Deuteronomy 30:15–20


CONSIDER THE YEARS LONG PAST
In order to understand fully what Man’s power over Nature, and therefore the power of some men over other men, really means, we must picture the race extended in time from the date of its emergence to that of its extinction. Each generation exercises power over its successors: and each, in so far as it modifies the environment bequeathed to it and rebels against tradition, resists and limits the power of its predecessors.

—from The Abolition of Man

For reflection  Deuteronomy 32:4–7

IT’S STILL THE WORD OF GOD
To me the curious thing is that neither in my own Bible-reading nor in my religious life as a whole does the question in fact even assume that importance which it always gets in theological controversy. The difference between reading the story of Ruth and that of Antigone—both first class as literature—is to me unmistakable and even overwhelming. But the question “Is Ruth historical?” (I’ve no reason to suppose it is not) doesn’t really seem to arise till afterwards. It wd. still act on me as the Word of God if it weren’t, so far as I can see. All Holy Scripture is written for our learning. But learning of what? I should have thought the value of some things (e.g., the Resurrection) depended on whether they really happened: but the value of others (e.g., the fate of Lot’s wife) hardly at all. And the ones whose historicity matters are, as God’s will, those where it is plain.

—from a letter to Professor Clyde S. Kilby, May 7, 1959

For reflection  Ruth 1:1–4

WHEN SORROW COMES
LEWIS, GRIEVING THE DEATH OF HIS WIFE, JOY:
Ihad been warned—I had warned myself—not to reckon on worldly happiness. We were even promised sufferings. They were part of the programme. We were even told, “Blessed are they that mourn,” and I accepted it. I’ve got nothing that I hadn’t bargained for. Of course it is different when the thing happens to oneself, not to others, and in reality, not in imagination. Yes; but should it, for a sane man, make quite such a difference as this. No. And it wouldn’t for a man whose faith had been real faith and whose concern for other people’s sorrows had been real concern. The case is too plain. If my house has collapsed at one blow, that is because it was a house of cards. The faith which “took these things into account” was not faith but imagination. The taking them into account was not real sympathy. If I had really cared, as I thought I did, about the sorrows of the world, I should not have been so overwhelmed when my own sorrow came.

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Ruth 1:1–4, 20


ALMS FOR THE POOR
Charity” now means simply what used to be called “alms”—that is, giving to the poor. Originally it had a much wider meaning. (You can see how it got the modern sense. If a man has “charity,” giving to the poor is one of the most obvious things he does, and so people came to talk as if that were the whole of charity. In the same way, “rhyme” is the most obvious thing about poetry, and so people come to mean by “poetry” simply rhyme and nothing more.) Charity means “Love, in the Christian sense.” But love, in the Christian sense, does not mean an emotion. It is a state not of the feelings but of the will; that state of the will which we have naturally about ourselves, and must learn to have about other people.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Ruth 2:4–18


TAKING HELP
I am very, very glad that God has sent you good friends who won’t let you sink, and that you have turned the corner about that bad feeling that one must not take help even when one needs it. If it were really true that to receive money or money’s worth degraded the recipient, then every act of alms we have done in our lives wd. be wicked! . . . Or else (which might be even worse) we shd. have to hold that to receive was good enough for those we call “the poor” but not for our precious selves however poor we become!

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, July 5, 1956

For reflection  Ruth 3:1–13


DIRECTING OUR PRAISE
I find it easiest to understand the Christian doctrine that “Heaven” is a state in which angels now, and men hereafter, are perpetually employed in praising God....To see what the doctrine really means, we must suppose ourselves to be in perfect love with God—drunk with, drowned in, dissolved by, the delight which, far from remaining pent up within ourselves as incommunicable, hence hardly tolerable, bliss, flows out from us incessantly again in effortless and perfect expression, our joy no more separable from the praise in which it liberates and utters itself than the brightness a mirror receives is separable from the brightness it sheds.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  1 Samuel 2:1–10


GOD’S VOICE
We all go through periods of dryness in our prayers, don’t we? I doubt (but ask your directeur) whether they are necessarily a bad symptom. I sometimes suspect that what we feel to be our best prayers are really our worst: that what we are enjoying is the satisfaction of apparent success, as in executing a dance or reciting a poem. Do our prayers sometimes go wrong because we insist on trying to talk to God when He wants to talk to us.

Joy tells me that once, years ago, she was haunted one morning by a feeling that God wanted something of her, a persistent pressure like the nag of a neglected duty. And till mid-morning she kept on wondering what it was. But the moment she stopped worrying, the answer came through as plain as a spoken voice. It was “I don’t want you to do anything, I want to give you something”: and immediately her heart was full of peace and delight. St. Augustine says “God gives where He finds empty hands.” A man whose hands are full of parcels can’t receive a gift. Perhaps these parcels are not always sins or earthly cares, but sometimes our own fussy attempts to worship Him in our way. Incidentally, what most often interrupts my own prayers is not great distractions but tiny ones—things one will have to do or avoid in the course of the next hour.

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, March 31, 1958

For reflection  1 Samuel 3:1–21


For reflection: 1 Samuel 7:3–4

You must ask for God’s help. Even when you have done so, it may seem to you for a long time that no help, or less help than you need, is being given. Never mind. After each failure, ask forgiveness, pick yourself up, and try again.

—from Mere Christianity




For reflection: 1 Samuel 12:19–25

The voice of God indeed daily calls to us; calls to the world to abandon sins and seek the Kingdom of God wholeheartedly. O that we may all hear the call of the Father and, sometime, at last be converted to the Lord.

—from a letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, April 17, 1949




For reflection: 1 Samuel 13:1–15

Moral collapse follows upon spiritual collapse.

—from “Cross-Examination,” God in the Dock



ONE MODEL FOR ENGAGING CULTURE
I found the famous saying, attributed to Gregory, that our use of secular culture was comparable to the action of the Israelites in going down to the Philistines to have their knives sharpened. This seems to me a most satisfactory argument as far as it goes, and very relevant to modern conditions. If we are to convert our heathen neighbours, we must understand their culture. We must “beat them at their own game.” But of course, while this would justify Christian culture (at least for some Christians whose vocation lay in that direction), at the moment, it would come very far short of the claims made for culture in our modern tradition. On the Gregorian view culture is a weapon; and a weapon is essentially a thing we lay aside as soon as we safely can.

—from “Christianity and Culture,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  1 Samuel 13:19–20


For reflection: 1 Samuel 15:17–23

Disobedience is not the way to get nearer to the obedient.

—from a letter to Sheldon Vanauken, May 8, 1955



TO OBEY IS BETTER THAN SACRIFICE
But when we have said that God commands things only because they are good, we must add that one of the things intrinsically good is that rational creatures should freely surrender themselves to their Creator in obedience. The content of our obedience—the thing we are commanded to do—will always be something intrinsically good, something we ought to do even if (by an impossible supposition) God had not commanded it. But in addition to the content, the mere obeying is also intrinsically good, for, in obeying, a rational creature consciously enacts its creaturely role, reverses the act by which we fell, treads Adam’s dance backward, and returns.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  1 Samuel 15:22–23


GIANTS AND DRAGONS
Those who say that children must not be frightened may mean two things. They may mean (1) that we must not do anything likely to give the child those haunting, disabling, pathological fears against which ordinary courage is helpless: in fact, phobias. His mind must, if possible, be kept clear of things he can’t bear to think of. Or they may mean (2) that we must try to keep out of his mind the knowledge that he is born into a world of death, violence, wounds, adventure, heroism and cowardice, good and evil. If they mean the first I agree with them: but not if they mean the second. The second would indeed be to give children a false impression and feed them on escapism in the bad sense. There is something ludicrous in the idea of so educating a generation which is born to the OGPU [early security police agency of the Soviet Union, forerunner of the KGB] and the atomic bomb. Since it is so likely that they will meet cruel enemies, let them at least have heard of brave knights and heroic courage. Otherwise you are making their destiny not brighter but darker. Nor do most of us find that violence and bloodshed, in a story, produce any haunting dread in the minds of children. As far as that goes, I side impenitently with the human race against the modern reformer. Let there be wicked kings and beheadings, battles and dungeons, giants and dragons, and let villains be soundly killed at the end of the book. Nothing will persuade me that this causes an ordinary child any kind or degree of fear beyond what it wants, and needs, to feel. For, of course, it wants to be a little frightened.

—from “On Three Ways of Writing for Children,” On Stories

For reflection  1 Samuel 17:1–53


FRIENDSHIP
In each of my friends there is something that only some other friend can fully bring out. By myself I am not large enough to call the whole man into activity; I want other lights than my own to show all his facets. Now that Charles is dead, I shall never again see Ronald’s reaction to a specifically Caroline joke. Far from having more of Ronald, having him “to myself” now that Charles is away, I have less of Ronald. Hence true friendship is the least jealous of loves. Two friends delight to be joined by a third, and three by a fourth, if only the newcomer is qualified to become a real friend. They can then say, as the blessed souls say in Dante, “Here comes one who will augment our loves.” For in this love “to divide is not to take away.” . . . In this, Friendship exhibits a glorious “nearness by resemblance” to Heaven itself where the very multitude of the blessed (which no man can number) increases the fruition which each has of God. For every soul, seeing Him in her own way has of God. For every soul, seeing Him in her own way, doubtless communicates that unique vision to all the rest. That, says an old author, is why the Seraphim in Isaiah’s vision are crying “Holy, Holy, Holy” to one another (Isaiah VI, 3). The more we thus share the Heavenly Bread between us, the more we shall all have.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  1 Samuel 18:1


THE MORE A MAN FEARS
SCREWTAPE WRITES:
Hatred is best combined with Fear. Cowardice, alone of all the vices, is purely painful—horrible to anticipate, horrible to feel, horrible to remember; Hatred has its pleasures. It is therefore often the compensation by which a frightened man reimburses himself for the miseries of Fear. The more he fears, the more he will hate. And Hatred is also a great anodyne for shame. To make a deep wound in his charity, you should therefore first defeat his courage.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  1 Samuel 18:12


IN THE COMPANY OF FRIENDS
In a perfect Friendship . . . each member of the circle feels, in his secret heart, humbled before all the rest. Sometimes he wonders what he is doing there among his betters. He is lucky beyond desert to be in such company. Especially when the whole group is together, each bringing out all that is best, wisest, or funniest in all the others. Those are the golden sessions; when four or five of us after a hard day’s walking have come to our inn; when our slippers are on, our feet spread out towards the blaze and our drinks at our elbows; when the whole world, and something beyond the world, opens itself to our minds as we talk; and no one has any claim on or any responsibility for another, but all are freemen and equals as if we had first met an hour ago, while at the same time an Affection mellowed by the years enfolds us. Life—natural life—has no better gift to give. Who could have deserved it?

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  1 Samuel 20:17


LOVE YOUR ENEMY AS YOURSELF
We must try to feel about the enemy as we feel about ourselves—to wish that he were not bad, to hope that he may, in this world or another, be cured: in fact, to wish his good. That is what is meant in the Bible by loving him: wishing his good, not feeling fond of him nor saying he is nice when he is not.

I admit that this means loving people who have nothing lovable about them. But then, has oneself anything lovable about it? You love it simply because it is yourself. God intends us to love all selves in the same way and for the same reason: but He has given us the sum ready worked out in our own case to show us how it works. We have then to go on and apply the rule to all the other selves. Perhaps it makes it easier if we remember that that is how He loves us. Not for any nice, attractive qualities we think we have, but just because we are the things called selves. For really there is nothing else in us to love: creatures like us who actually find hatred such a pleasure that to give it up is like giving up beer or tobacco.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Samuel 24:5–22




For reflection: 1 Samuel 28:3–20

The descent to hell is easy, and those who begin by worshipping power soon worship evil.

—from The Allegory of Love



ON THE DEATH OF A FRIEND
I also have become much acquainted with grief now through the death of my great friend Charles Williams, my friend of friends, the comforter of all our little set, the most angelic. The odd thing is that his death has made my faith ten times stronger than it was a week ago. And I find all that talk about “feeling he is closer to us than before” isn’t just talk. It’s just what it does feel like—I can’t put it into words. One seems at moments to be living in a new world. Lots, lots of pain but not a particle of depression or resentment.

—from a letter to Mary Neylan, May 20, 1945

For reflection  2 Samuel 1:11–12


DELIGHTING IN GOD
The most valuable thing the Psalms do for me is to express that same delight in God which made David dance. I am not saying that this is so pure or so profound a thing as the love of God reached by the greatest Christian saints and mystics. But I am not comparing it with that, I am comparing it with the merely dutiful “church-going” and laborious “saying our prayers” to which most of us are, thank God not always, but often, reduced. Against that it stands out as something astonishingly robust, virile, and spontaneous; something we may regard with an innocent envy and may hope to be infected by as we read.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  2 Samuel 6:14–16


JUSTICE FOR ALL
Mercy, detached from Justice, grows unmerciful. That is the important paradox. As there are plants which will flourish only in mountain soil, so it appears that Mercy will flower only when it grows in the crannies of the rock of Justice: transplanted to the marshlands of mere Humanitarianism, it becomes a man-eating weed, all the more dangerous because it is still called by the same name as the mountain variety.

—from “The Humanitarian Theory of Punishment,” God in the Dock

For reflection  2 Samuel 8:15



For reflection: 2 Samuel 11:2–5

To love and admire anything outside yourself is to take one step away from utter spiritual ruin; though we shall not be well so long as we love and admire anything more than we love and admire God.

—from Mere Christianity



SIN EXPOSED
There are two respects in which God’s view must be very different from ours. In the first place, He sees (like you) how all the people in your home or your job are in various degrees awkward or difficult; but when He looks into that home or factory or office He sees one more person of the same kind—the one you never do see. I mean, of course, yourself. That is the next great step in wisdom—to realize that you also are just that sort of person. You also have a fatal flaw in your character. All the hopes and plans of others have again and again shipwrecked on your character just as your hopes and plans have shipwrecked on theirs.

It is no good passing this over with some vague, general admission such as “Of course, I know I have my faults.” It is important to realize that there is some really fatal flaw in you: something which gives the others just that same feeling of despair which their flaws give you. And it is almost certainly something you don’t know about—like what the advertisements call “halitosis,” which everyone notices except the person who has it. But why, you ask, don’t the others tell me? Believe me, they have tried to tell you over and over again, and you just couldn’t “take it.” Perhaps a good deal of what you call their “nagging” or “bad temper” or “queerness” are just their attempts to make you see the truth. And even the faults you do know you don’t know fully. You say, “I admit I lost my temper last night”; but the others know that you’re always doing it, that you are a bad-tempered person. You say, “I admit I drank too much last Saturday”; but everyone else knows that you are a habitual drunkard.

—from “‘The Trouble with “X,”’” God in the Dock

For reflection  2 Samuel 12:1–13



For reflection: 2 Samuel 14:25–33

We must forgive all our enemies or be damned.

—from “Dangers of National Repentance,” God in the Dock


A GOOD HONEST HOWL
By the way, don’t “weep inwardly” and get a sore throat. If you must weep, weep: a good honest howl! I suspect we—and especially, my sex—don’t cry enough now-a-days. Aeneas and Hector and Beowulf, Roland and Lancelot blubbered like schoolgirls, so why shouldn’t we?

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, February 22, 1954

For reflection  2 Samuel 18:33


OUR PRAYERS ARE HEARD
We have long since agreed that if our prayers are granted at all they are granted from the foundation of the world. God and His acts are not in time. Intercourse between God and man occurs at particular moments for the man, but not for God. If there is—as the very concept of prayer presupposes—an adaptation between the free actions of men in prayer and the course of events, this adaptation is from the beginning inherent in the great single creative act. Our prayers are heard—don’t say “have been heard” or you are putting God into time—not only before we make them but before we are made ourselves.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  2 Samuel 22:7



For reflection: 1 Kings 3:3–9

The only people who achieve much are those who want knowledge so badly that they seek it while the conditions are still unfavourable. Favourable conditions never come.

—from “Learning in War-Time,” The Weight of Glory




THE CREATIVE ACT
This act, as it is for God, must always remain totally inconceivable to man. For we—even our poets and musicians and inventors—never, in the ultimate sense make. We only build. We always have materials to build from. All we can know about the act of creation must be derived from what we can gather about the relation of the creatures to their Creator.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  1 Kings 6:1–14


PRAYING IN YOUR OWN WORDS
As Solomon said at the dedication of the temple, each man who prays knows “the plague of his own heart.” Also, the comforts of his own heart. No other creature is identical with me; no other situation identical with mine. Indeed, I myself and my situation are in continual change. A ready-made form can’t serve for my intercourse with God any more than it could serve for my intercourse with you.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  1 Kings 8:38–40


FROM INDULGENCE TO SACRILEGE
Our warped natures, the devils who tempt us, and all the contemporary propaganda for lust, combine to make us feel that the desires we are resisting are so “natural,” so “healthy,” and so reasonable, that it is almost perverse and abnormal to resist them. Poster after poster, film after film, novel after novel, associate the idea of sexual indulgence with the ideas of health, normality, youth, frankness, and good humour. Now this association is a lie. Like all powerful lies, it is based on a truth—the truth, acknowledged above, that sex in itself (apart from the excesses and obsessions that have grown round it) is “normal” and “healthy,” and all the rest of it. The lie consists in the suggestion that any sexual act to which you are tempted at the moment is also healthy and normal. Now this, on any conceivable view, and quite apart from Christianity, must be nonsense. Surrender to all our desires obviously leads to impotence, disease, jealousies, lies, concealment, and everything that is the reverse of health, good humour, and frankness.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Kings 11:1–6


THE SIN OF SACRILEGE
A question at once arises. Is it still God speaking when a liar or a blasphemer speaks? In one sense, almost Yes. Apart from God he could not speak at all; there are no words not derived from the Word; no acts not derived from Him who is Actus purus. And indeed the only way in which I can make real to myself what theology teaches about the heinousness of sin is to remember that every sin is the distortion of an energy breathed into us—an energy which, if not thus distorted, would have blossomed into one of those holy acts whereof “God did it” and “I did it” are both true descriptions. We poison the wine as He decants it into us; murder a melody He would play with us as the instrument. We caricature the self-portrait He would paint. Hence all sin, whatever else it is, is a sacrilege.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  1 Kings 13:18–19



For reflection: 1 Kings 14:7–14

I think almost all the crimes which Christians have perpetrated against each other arise from this, that religion is confused with politics. For, above all other spheres of human life, the Devil claims politics for his own, as almost the citadel of his power.

—from a letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, August 10, 1953



THE WORK OF PRAYER
The very question “Does prayer work?” puts us in the wrong frame of mind from the outset. “Work”: as if it were magic, or a machine—something that functions automatically. Prayer is either a sheer illusion or a personal contact between embryonic, incomplete persons (ourselves) and the utterly concrete Person. Prayer in the sense of petition, asking for things, is a small part of it; confession and penitence are its threshold, adoration its sanctuary, the presence and vision and enjoyment of God its bread and wine. In it God shows Himself to us. That He answers prayers is a corollary—not necessarily the most important one—from that revelation. What he does is learned from what He is.

Petitionary prayer is, nonetheless, both allowed and commanded to us: “Give us our daily bread.” And no doubt it raises a theoretical problem. Can we believe that God ever really modifies His action in response to the suggestions of men? For infinite wisdom does not need telling what is best, and infinite goodness needs no urging to do it. But neither does God need any of those things that are done by finite agents, whether living or inanimate. He could, if He chose, repair our bodies miraculously without food; or give us food without the aid of farmers, bakers, and butchers; or knowledge without the aid of learned men; or convert the heathen without missionaries. Instead, He allows soils and weather and animals and the muscles, minds, and wills of men to co-operate in the execution of His will. “God,” said Pascal, “instituted prayer in order to lend to His creatures the dignity of causality.” But not only prayer; whenever we act at all He lends us that dignity. It is not really stranger, nor less strange, that my prayers should affect the course of events than that my other actions should do so. They have not advised or changed God’s mind—that is, His over-all purpose. But that purpose will be realized in different ways according to the actions, including the prayers, of His creatures.

For He seems to do nothing of Himself which He can possibly delegate to His creatures. He commands us to do slowly and blunderingly what He could do perfectly and in the twinkling of an eye. He allows us to neglect what He would have us do, or to fail. Perhaps we do not fully realize the problem, so to call it, of enabling finite free wills to co-exist with Omnipotence. It seems to involve at every moment almost a sort of divine abdication. We are not mere recipients or spectators. We are either privileged to share in the game or compelled to collaborate in the work, “to wield our little tridents.” Is this amazing process simply Creation going on before our eyes? This is how (no light matter) God makes something—indeed, makes gods—out of nothing.

—from “The Efficacy of Prayer,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  1 Kings 17:17–24


THE SUPERIOR GOD
The Christians are right: it is Pride which has been the chief cause of misery in every nation and every family since the world began. Other vices may sometimes bring people together: you may find good fellowship and jokes and friendliness among drunken people or unchaste people. But pride always means enmity—it is enmity. And not only enmity between man and man, but enmity to God.

In God you come up against something which is in every respect immeasurably superior to yourself. Unless you know God as that—and, therefore, know yourself as nothing in comparison—you do not know God at all. As long as you are proud you cannot know God. A proud man is always looking down on things and people: and, of course, as long as you are looking down, you cannot see something that is above you.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Kings 18:17–40


WHEN WE’RE NOT BRAVE
I’m v. glad you’ve seen that Christianity is as hard as nails: i.e. hard and tender at the same time. It’s the blend that does it: neither quality wd. be any good without the other. You needn’t worry about not feeling brave. Our Lord didn’t—see the scene in Gethsemane.

How thankful I am that when God became Man He did not choose to become a man of iron nerves: that wd. not have helped weaklings like you and me nearly so much. Especially don’t worry (you may of course pray) about being brave over merely possible evils in the future. In the old battles it was usually the reserve, who had to watch the carnage, not the troops who were in it, whose nerve broke first. Similarly I think you in America feel much more anxiety about atomic bombs than we do: because you are further from the danger. If and when a horror turns up, you will then be given Grace to help you. I don’t think one is usually given it in advance. “Give us our daily bread” (not an annuity for life) applies to spiritual gifts too: the little daily support for the daily trial. Life has to be taken day by day & hour by hour.

—from a letter to Mrs. Johnson, July 17, 1953

For reflection  1 Kings 19:1–18


THE BIBLE AS A WHOLE
My own view about Elisha and the bears (not that I haven’t known small boys who’d be much improved by the same treatment!) and other episodes is something like this. If you take the Bible as a whole, you see a process in which something which, in its earliest levels (those aren’t necessarily the ones that come first in the Book as now arranged) was hardly moral at all, and was in some ways not unlike the Pagan religions, is gradually purged and enlightened till it becomes the religion of the great prophets and Our Lord Himself. That whole process is the greatest revelation of God’s true nature. At first hardly anything comes through but mere power. Then (v. important) the truth that He is One and there is no other God. Then justice, then mercy, love, wisdom.

—from a letter to Mrs. Johnson, May 14, 1955

For reflection  2 Kings 2:23–24


DRIVEN BY PRIDE
Greed will certainly make a man want money, for the sake of a better house, better holidays, better things to eat and drink. But only up to a point. What is it that makes a man with £10,000 a year anxious to get £20,000 a year? It is not the greed for more pleasure. £10,000 will give all the luxuries that any man can really enjoy. It is Pride—the wish to be richer than some other rich man, and (still more) the wish for power. For, of course, power is what Pride really enjoys: there is nothing makes a man feel so superior to others as being able to move them about like toy soldiers. What makes a pretty girl spread misery wherever she goes by collecting admirers? Certainly not her sexual instinct: that kind of girl is quite often sexually frigid. It is Pride. What is it that makes a political leader or a whole nation go on and on, demanding more and more? Pride again. Pride is competitive by its very nature: that is why it goes on and on. If I am a proud man, then, as long as there is one man in the whole world more powerful, or richer, or cleverer than I, he is my rival and my enemy.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  2 Kings 5:19–27


GOD’S INITIATIVE
When you come to knowing God, the initiative lies on His side. If He does not show Himself, nothing you can do will enable you to find Him. And, in fact, He shows much more of Himself to some people than to others—not because He has favourites, but because it is impossible for Him to show Himself to a man whose whole mind and character are in the wrong condition. Just as sunlight, though it has no favourites, cannot be reflected in a dusty mirror as clearly as in a clean one.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  2 Kings 6:16–17


CARRYING OUT GOD’S PURPOSE
A merciful man aims at his neighbour’s good and so does “God’s will,” consciously co-operating with “the simple good.” A cruel man oppresses his neighbour, and so does simple evil. But in doing such evil, he is used by God, without his own knowledge or consent, to produce the complex good—so that the first man serves God as a son, and the second as a tool. For you will certainly carry out God’s purpose, however you act, but it makes a difference to you whether you serve like Judas or like John. The whole system is, so to speak, calculated for the clash between good men and bad men, and the good fruits of fortitude, patience, pity and forgiveness for which the cruel man is permitted to be cruel, presuppose that the good man ordinarily continues to seek simple good.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  2 Kings 8:7–19


For reflection: 2 Kings 13:22–23

The ferocious parts . . . serve as a reminder that there is in the world such a thing as wickedness and that it (if not its perpetrators) is hateful to God. In that way, however dangerous the human distortion may be, His word sounds through these passages too.

—from Reflections on the Psalms




THE BEAUTY OF GOD’S LAW
The Jews had as their immediate neighbours, close to them in race as well as in position, Pagans of the worst kind. Pagans whose religion was marked by none of that beauty or (sometimes) wisdom which we can find among the Greeks. That background made the “beauty” or “sweetness” of the Law more visible; not least because these neighbouring Paganisms were a constant temptation to the Jew and may in some of their externals have been not unlike his own religion. The temptation was to turn to those terrible rites in times of terror—when, for example, the Assyrians were pressing on. We who not so long ago waited daily for invasion by enemies, like the Assyrians, skilled and constant in systematic cruelty, know how they may have felt. They were tempted, since the Lord seemed deaf, to try those appalling deities who demanded so much more and might therefore perhaps give more in return. But when a Jew in some happier hour, or a better Jew even in that hour, looked at those worships—when he thought of sacred prostitution, sacred sodomy, and the babies thrown into the fire for Moloch—his own “Law” as he turned back to it must have shone with an extraordinary radiance. Sweeter than honey; or if that metaphor does not suit us . . . let us say like mountain water, like fresh air after a dungeon, like sanity after a nightmare.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  2 Kings 17:5–41


OF MICE AND ANGELS
When the Old Testament says that Sennacherib’s invasion was stopped by angels, and Herodotus says it was stopped by a lot of mice who came and ate up all the bowstrings of the army, an open-minded man will be on the side of the angels. Unless you start by begging the question, there is nothing intrinsically unlikely in the existence of angels or in the action ascribed to them. But mice just don’t do these things.

—from “Miracles,” God in the Dock

For reflection  2 Kings 19:35



For reflection: 2 Kings 22:13

What do you suppose you have gained by substituting the image of a live wire for that of angered majesty? You have shut us all up in despair; for the angry can forgive, and electricity can’t.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer


BOOKS OF WISDOM
Every age has its own outlook. It is specially good at seeing certain truths and specially liable to make certain mistakes. We all, therefore, need the books that will correct the characteristic mistakes of our own period. And that means the old books. All contemporary writers share to some extent the contemporary outlook—even those, like myself, who seem most opposed to it. Nothing strikes me more when I read the controversies of past ages than the fact that both sides were usually assuming without question a good deal which we should now absolutely deny. They thought that they were as completely opposed as two sides could be, but in fact they were all the time secretly united—united with each other and against earlier and later ages—by a great mass of common assumptions. We may be sure that the characteristic blindness of the twentieth century—the blindness about which posterity will ask, “But how could they have thought that?”—lies where we have never suspected it, and concerns something about which there is untroubled agreement between Hitler and President Roosevelt or between Mr. H. G. Wells and Karl Barth. None of us can fully escape this blindness, but we shall certainly increase it, and weaken our guard against it, if we read only modern books. Where they are true they will give us truths which we half knew already. Where they are false they will aggravate the error with which we are already dangerously ill. The only palliative is to keep the clean sea breeze of the centuries blowing through our minds, and this can be done only by reading old books.

—from the introduction to On the Incarnation by St. Athanasius

For reflection  2 Kings 22:1–23:4


GOD’S ADDRESS
Thomas Aquinas, in defining the mode of God’s omnipresence, distinguishes three different meanings of the words “to be in a place” (or “in place”). A body is in a place in such a way as to be bounded by it, i.e. it occupies a place circumscriptive. An angel is in a place not circumscriptive, for it is not bounded by it, but definitive, because it is in that one place and not any other. But God is in a place neither circumscriptive nor definitive, because He is everywhere.

—from A Preface to “Paradise Lost”

For reflection 2 Chronicles 2:6



For reflection: 2 Chronicles 7:14

If anyone would like to acquire humility, I can, I think, tell him the first step. The first step is to realise that one is proud. And a biggish step, too. At least, nothing whatever can be done before it. If you think you are not conceited, it means you are very conceited indeed.

—from Mere Christianity


For reflection: 2 Chronicles 10:12–15

One can learn only by seeing one’s mistakes.

—from a letter to Joan Lancaster, August 31, 1958





For reflection: 2 Chronicles 15:8–15

Authority exercised with humility and obedience accepted with delight are the very lines along which our spirits live.

—from ”Membership,” The Weight of Glory


INQUIRE OF THE LORD
If we wish to be rational, not now and then, but constantly, we must pray for the gift of Faith, for the power to go on believing not in the teeth of reason but in the teeth of lust and terror and jealousy and boredom and indifference that which reason, authority, or experience, or all three, have once delivered to us for truth.

—from “Religion: Reality or Substitute?” Christian Reflections

For reflection  2 Chronicles 18:4

SIN AS IT REALLY IS
Sin is the turning away of the will from God. But the experience of sin will differ in different people: e.g. to an uninstructed person it may appear in consciousness merely as disobeying human authority, or taking a legitimate indulgence. That sin-as-it-really-is is ever fully present to human (as opposed to diabolical) consciousness at the moment of commission, I doubt. The rebellion of the will is nearly always accompanied with some fogging of the intelligence.

—from a letter to Edward T. Dell, March 28, 1949

For reflection  2 Chronicles 20:31–34


FOOLS, WHEN WILL YOU BE WISE?
When our ancestors referred to pains and sorrows as God’s “vengeance” upon sin they were not necessarily attributing evil passions to God; they may have been recognising the good element in the idea of retribution. Until the evil man finds evil unmistakably present in his existence, in the form of pain, he is enclosed in illusion. Once pain has roused him, he knows that he is in some way or other “up against” the real universe: he either rebels (with the possibility of a clearer issue and deeper repentance at some later stage) or else makes some attempt at an adjustment, which, if pursued, will lead him to religion.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  2 Chronicles 26:1–20


BOW YOUR HEAD AND WORSHIP
He demands our worship, our obedience, our prostration. Do we suppose that they can do Him any good, or fear . . . that human irreverence can bring about “His glory’s diminution”? A man can no more diminish God’s glory by refusing to worship Him than a lunatic can put out the sun by scribbling the word “darkness” on the walls of his cell. But God wills our good, and our good is to love Him (with that responsive love proper to creatures) and to love Him we must know Him: and if we know Him, we shall in fact fall on our faces. If we do not, that only shows that what we are trying to love is not yet God—though it may be the nearest approximation to God which our thought and fantasy can attain.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  2 Chronicles 29:20–36

STARTING OVER
Would you think I was joking if I said that you can put a clock back, and that if the clock is wrong it is often a very sensible thing to do? . . . We all want progress. But progress means getting nearer to the place where you want to be. And if you have taken a wrong turning, then to go forward does not get you any nearer. If you are on the wrong road, progress means doing an about-turn and walking back to the right road; and in that case the man who turns back soonest is the most progressive man. We have all seen this when doing arithmetic. When I have started a sum the wrong way, the sooner I admit this and go back and start again, the faster I shall get on. There is nothing progressive about being pig headed and refusing to admit a mistake. And I think if you look at the present state of the world, it is pretty plain that humanity has been making some big mistake. We are on the wrong road. And if that is so, we must go back. Going back is the quickest way on.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  2 Chronicles 30:6–9


SONNET
The Bible says Sennacherib’s campaign was foiled

By an angel: in Herodotus it says, by mice—

Innumerably nibbling all one night they toiled

To eat away his bow-strings as warm wind eats ice.


But muscular archangels, I suggest, employed

Seven little jaws to labour at each slender string

And by their aid, weak masters though they be, destroyed

The smiling-lipped Assyrian, cruel-bearded king.


No stranger that Omnipotence should choose to need

Small helps than great—no stranger if His action lingers

Till men have prayed, and suffers our weak prayers indeed

To move as very muscles His delaying fingers,


Who, in His longanimity and love for our

Small dignities, enfeebles for a time, His power.

—from Poems

For reflection  2 Chronicles 32:20–22


FOR SUCH A TIME AS THIS
It is impossible to accept Christianity for the sake of finding comfort: but the Christian tries to lay himself open to the will of God, to do what God wants him to do. You don’t know in advance whether God is going to set you to do something difficult or painful, or something that you will quite like; and some people of heroic mould are disappointed when the job doled out to them turns out to be something quite nice. But you must be prepared for the unpleasant things and the discomforts. I don’t mean fasting, and things like that. They are a different matter. When you are training soldiers in maneuvers, you practise in blank ammunition because you would like them to have practise before meeting the real enemy. So we must practise in abstaining from pleasures which are not in themselves wicked. If you don’t abstain from pleasure, you won’t be good when the time comes along. It is purely a matter of practise.

—from “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Esther 4:4–17


PRIDE VS. PRIDE
If you want to find out how proud you are the easiest way is to ask yourself, “How much do I dislike it when other people snub me, or refuse to take any notice of me, or shove their oar in, or patronise me, or show off?” The point is that each person’s pride is in competition with everyone else’s pride. It is because I wanted to be the big noise at the party that I am so annoyed at someone else being the big noise. Two of a trade never agree. Now what you want to get clear is that Pride is essentially competitive—is competitive by its very nature—while the other vices are competitive only, so to speak, by accident. Pride gets no pleasure out of having something, only out of having more of it than the next man. We say that people are proud of being rich, or clever, or good-looking, but they are not. They are proud of being richer, or cleverer, or better-looking than others. If everyone else became equally rich, or clever, or good-looking there would be nothing to be proud about. It is the comparison that makes you proud: the pleasure of being above the rest. Once the element of competition has gone, pride has gone. That is why I say that Pride is essentially competitive in a way the other vices are not. The sexual impulse may drive two men into competition if they both want the same girl. But that is only by accident; they might just as likely have wanted two different girls. But a proud man will take your girl from you, not because he wants her, but just to prove to himself that he is a better man than you. Greed may drive men into competition if there is not enough to go round; but the proud man, even when he has got more than he can possibly want, will try to get still more just to assert his power. Nearly all those evils in the world which people put down to greed or selfishness are really far more the result of Pride.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Esther 5:11–13


For reflection: Esther 6:6–14

SCREWTAPE OBSERVES:

Whatever men expect they soon come to think they have a right to: the sense of disappointment can, with very little skill on our part, be turned into a sense of injury.

—from The Screwtape Letters



IS THE DEVIL REAL?
The commonest question is whether I really “believe in the Devil.” Now if by “the Devil” you mean a power opposite to God and, like God, self-existent from all eternity, the answer is certainly “No.” There is no uncreated being except God. God has no opposite. No being could attain a “perfect badness” opposite to the perfect goodness of God; for when you have taken away every kind of good thing (intelligence, will, memory, energy, and existence itself) there would be none of him left.

—from the preface, The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Job 1:6–12


For reflection: Job 2:3

Satan is without doubt nothing else than a hammer in the hand of a benevolent and severe God. For all, either willingly or unwillingly, do the will of God: Judas and Satan as tools or instruments, John and Peter as sons.

—from a letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, September 20, 1947



HAUNTED BY SUFFERING
Lewis, grieving the death of his wife, Joy:
Ionce read the sentence “I lay awake all night with toothache, thinking about toothache and about lying awake.” That’s true to life. Part of every misery is, so to speak, the misery’s shadow or reflection: the fact that you don’t merely suffer but have to keep on thinking about the fact that you suffer. I not only live each endless day in grief, but live each day thinking about living each day in grief.

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Job 3:26


GIVE ME PATIENCE
How right you are to see that anger (even when directed against oneself) “worketh not the righteousness of God.” One must never be either content with, or impatient with, oneself. My old confessor (now dead) used to impress on me the need for the 3 Patiences: patience with God, with my neighbour, with oneself.

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, March 31, 1954

For reflection  Job 6:11


GOD’S SILENCE
When I lay these questions before God I get no answer. But a rather special sort of “No answer.” It is not the locked door. It is more like a silent, certainly not uncompassionate, gaze. As though He shook His head not in refusal but waiving the question. Like, “Peace, child; you don’t understand.”

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Job 9:11–24


UNRELENTING PAIN
Lewis, grieving the death of his wife, Joy:
What is grief compared with physical pain? Whatever fools may say, the body can suffer twenty times more than the mind. The mind has always some power of evasion. At worst, the unbearable thought only comes back and back, but the physical pain can be absolutely continuous. Grief is like a bomber circling round and dropping its bomb each time the circle brings it overhead; physical pain is like the steady barrage on a trench in World War One, hours of it with no let-up for a moment. Thought is never static; pain often is.

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Job 10:1–22



For reflection: Job 12:13

God’s will is determined by His wisdom which always perceives, and His goodness which always embraces, the intrinsically good.

—from The Problem of Pain



DEATH HAS
Its Purposes
One can see how it might have happened. The Enemy persuades Man to rebel against God: Man, by doing so, loses power to control that other rebellion which the Enemy now raises in Man’s organism (both psychical and physical) against Man’s spirit: just as that organism, in its turn, loses power to maintain itself against the rebellion of the inorganic. In that way, Satan produced human Death. But when God created Man he gave him such a constitution that, if the highest part of it rebelled against Himself, it would be bound to lose control over the lower parts: i.e. in the long run to suffer Death. This provision may be regarded equally as a punitive sentence (“In the day ye eat of that fruit ye shall die”), as a mercy, and as a safety device. It is punishment because Death—that Death of which Martha says to Christ “But . . . Sir . . . it’ll smell”—is horror and ignominy. (“I am not so much afraid of death as ashamed of it,” said Sir Thomas Browne). It is mercy because by willing and humble surrender to it Man undoes his act of rebellion and makes even this depraved and monstrous mode of Death an instance of that higher and mystical Death which is eternally good and a necessary ingredient in the highest life. “The readiness is all”—not, of course, the merely heroic readiness but that of humility and self-renunciation. Our enemy, so welcomed, becomes our servant: bodily Death, the monster, becomes blessed spiritual Death to self, if the spirit so wills—or rather if it allows the Spirit of the willingly dying God so to will in it. It is a safety-device because, once Man has fallen, natural immortality would be the one utterly hopeless destiny for him. Aided to the surrender that he must make by no external necessity of Death, free (if you call it freedom) to rivet faster and faster about himself through unending centuries the chains of his own pride and lust and of the nightmare civilisations which these build up in ever-increasing power and complication, he would progress from being merely a fallen man to being a fiend, possibly beyond all modes of redemption. This danger was averted.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Job 14:1–22


PRAYING FOR THE DEAD
Of course I pray for the dead. The action is so spontaneous, so all but inevitable, that only the most compulsive theological case against it would deter me. And I hardly know how the rest of my prayers would survive if those for the dead were forbidden. At our age, the majority of those we love best are dead. What sort of intercourse with God could I have if what I love best were unmentionable to him?

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Job 17:13–16


THE POINT OF THE STORY
To attribute calamity to the offended gods and therefore to seek out and punish the offender, is the most natural thing in the world and therefore the world-wide method. Examples such as the plague in Iliad A and the plague at the opening of the Oedipus Tyrannus come at once to mind. The distinctive thing, the precious peculiarity, of Scripture is the series of divine rebuffs which this naïve and spontaneous type of Historicism there receives; in the whole course of Jewish history, in the Book of Job, in Isaiah’s suffering servant (liii), in Our Lord’s answers about the disaster at Siloam (Luke xiii, 4), and the man born blind (John ix, 13). If this sort of Historicism survives, it survives in spite of Christianity.

—from “Historicism,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Job 19:23–27

RELIGION WITHOUT CONSOLATION
LEWIS, GRIEVING THE DEATH OF HIS WIFE, JOY:
Iknow that the thing I want is exactly the thing I can never get. The old life, the jokes, the drinks, the arguments, the lovemaking, the tiny, heartbreaking commonplace. On any view whatever, to say, “H. is dead,” is to say, “All that is gone.” It is a part of the past. And the past is the past and that is what time means, and time itself is one more name for death, and Heaven itself is a state where “the former things have passed away.”

Talk to me about the truth of religion and I’ll listen gladly. Talk to me about the duty of religion and I’ll listen submissively. But don’t come talking about the consolations of religion or I shall suspect that you don’t understand.

Unless, of course, you can literally believe all that stuff about family reunions “on the further shore” pictured in entirely earthly terms. But that is all unscriptural, all out of bad hymns and lithographs. There’s not a word of it in the Bible. And it rings false. We know it couldn’t be like that. Reality never repeats. The exact same thing is never taken away and given back. How well the spiritualists bait their hook! “Things on this side are not so different after all.” There are cigars in Heaven. For that is what we should all like. The happy past restored.

And that, just that, is what I cry out for, with mad, midnight endearments and entreaties spoken into the empty air.

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Job 23:1–9, 16–17


WRESTLING WITH REALITY
LEWIS, GRIEVING THE DEATH OF HIS WIFE, JOY:
It is hard to have patience with people who say “There is no death” or “Death doesn’t matter.” There is death. And whatever is matters. And whatever happens has consequences, and it and they are irrevocable and irreversible. You might as well say that birth doesn’t matter. I look up at the night sky. Is anything more certain than that in all those vast times and spaces, if I were allowed to search them, I should nowhere find her face, her voice, her touch? She died. She is dead. Is the word so difficult to learn?

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Job 28:22–28


SQUARING OFF WITH PAIN
All arguments in justification of suffering provoke bitter resentment against the author. You would like to know how I behave when I am experiencing pain, not writing books about it. You need not guess, for I will tell you; I am a great coward. But what is that to the purpose? When I think of pain—of anxiety that gnaws like fire and loneliness that spreads out like a desert, and the heartbreaking routine ∑of monotonous misery, or again of dull aches that blacken our whole landscape or sudden nauseating pains that knock a man’s heart out at one blow, of pains that seem already intolerable and then are suddenly increased, of infuriating scorpion-stinging pains that startle into maniacal movement, a man who seemed half dead with his previous tortures—it “quite o’ercrows my spirit.” If I knew of any way of escape I would crawl through sewers to find it. But what is the good of telling you about my feelings? You know them already: they are the same as yours. I am not arguing that pain is not painful. Pain hurts. That is what the word means. I am only trying to show that the old Christian doctrine of being made “perfect through suffering” is not incredible. To prove it palatable is beyond my design.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Job 30:17–31


THE IMPORTANCE OF ASKING QUESTIONS
Joy says (do you agree?) that we needn’t be too afraid of questionings and expostulations: it was the impatience of Job not the theodicies of Elihu that were pleasing to God. Does He like us to “stand up to Him” a bit? Certainly He cannot like mere flattery—resentment masquerading as submission thru’ fear.

—from a letter to Peter Bide, June 14, 1960

For reflection  Job 32:1–22


HE SPREAD OUT THE SKIES
The huge dome of the sky is of all things sensuously perceived the most like infinity. And when God made space and worlds that move in space, and clothed our world with air, and gave us such eyes and such imaginations as those we have, He knew what the sky would mean to us.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Job 37:18

THE ETERNAL NOW
It is probable that Nature is not really in Time and almost certain that God is not. Time is probably (like perspective) the mode of our perception. There is therefore in reality no question of God’s at one point in time (the moment of creation) adapting the material history of the universe in advance to free acts which you or I are to perform at a later point in Time. To Him all the physical events and all the human acts are present in an eternal Now. The liberation of finite wills and the creation of the whole material history of the universe (related to the acts of those wills in all the necessary complexity) is to Him a single operation. In this sense God did not create the universe long ago but creates it at this minute—at every minute.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Job 38:1–3


STEPPING INTO AWE
The experience is not only grave but awe-inspiring. We feel it to be numinous. It is as if something of great moment had been communicated to us. The recurrent efforts of the mind to grasp—we mean, chiefly, to conceptualise—this something, are seen in the persistent tendency of humanity to provide myths with allegorical explanations. And after all the allegories have been tried, the myth itself continues to feel more important than they.

—from An Experiment in Criticism

For reflection  Job 38:25–33



For reflection: Job 42:11

When pain is to be borne, a little courage helps more than much knowledge, a little human sympathy more than much courage, and the least tincture of the love of God more than all.

—from The Problem of Pain



READING PSALMS
The dominant impression I get from reading the Psalms is one of antiquity. I seem to be looking into a deep pit of time, but looking through a lens which brings the figures who inhabit that depth up close to my eye. In that momentary proximity they are almost shockingly alien; creatures of unrestrained emotion, wallowing in self-pity, sobbing, cursing, screaming in exultation, clashing uncouth weapons or dancing to the din of strange musical instruments. Yet, side by side with this, there is also a different image in my mind: Anglican choirs, well laundered surplices, soapy boys’ faces, hassocks, an organ, prayer-books, and perhaps the smell of new-mown graveyard grass coming in with the sunlight through an open door. Sometimes the one, sometimes the other, impression grows faint, but neither, perhaps, ever quite disappears.

—from “The Psalms,” Christian Reflections


A CAUTION FOR THE WICKED
What makes this contact with wicked people so difficult is that to handle the situation successfully requires not merely good intentions, even with humility and courage thrown in; it may call for social and even intellectual talents which God has not given us. It is therefore not self-righteousness but mere prudence to avoid it when we can. The Psalmists were not quite wrong when they described the good man as avoiding “the seat of the scornful” and fearing to consort with the ungodly lest he should “eat of” (shall we say, laugh at, admire, approve, justify?) “such things as please them.” As usual in their attitude, with all its dangers, there is a core of very good sense. “Lead us not into temptation” often means, among other things, “Deny me those gratifying invitations, those highly interesting contacts, that participation in the brilliant movements of our age, which I so often, at such risk, desire.”

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 1:1–6


BALANCING DEITY AND HUMANITY
It seems to me that I seldom meet any strong or exultant sense of the continued, never-to-be-abandoned, Humanity of Christ in glory, in eternity. We stress the Humanity too exclusively at Christmas, and the Deity too exclusively after the Resurrection; almost as if Christ once became a man and then presently reverted to being simply God. We think of the Resurrection and Ascension (rightly) as great acts of God; less often as the triumph of Man. The ancient interpretation of the Psalm 8, however arrived at, is a cheering corrective.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 8:1–9


RENOUNCING GOD
Lewis, grieving the death of his wife, Joy:
Not that I am (I think) in much danger of ceasing to believe in God. The real danger is of coming to believe such dreadful things about Him. The conclusion I dread is not “So there’s no God after all,” but “So this is what God’s really like. Deceive yourself no longer.”

Our elders submitted and said, “Thy will be done.” How often had bitter resentment been stifled through sheer terror and an act of love—yes, in every sense, an act—put on to hide the operation?

Of course it’s easy enough to say that God seems absent at our greatest need because He is absent—non-existent. But then why does He seem so present when, to put it quite frankly, we don’t ask for Him?

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Psalm 10:11–14


For reflection: Psalm 14:1

A young man who wishes to remain a sound Atheist cannot be too careful of his reading. There are traps everywhere—“Bibles laid open, millions of surprises,” as Herbert says, “fine nets and stratagems.” God is, if I may say it, very unscrupulous.

—from Surprised by Joy



JOY’S HOME
Dance and game are frivolous, unimportant down here; for “down here” is not their natural place. Here, they are a moment’s rest from the life we were placed here to live. But in this world everything is upside down. That which, if it could be prolonged here, would be a truancy, is likest that which in a better country is the End of ends. Joy is the serious business of Heaven.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Psalm 16:11


CONSIDERING PSALM 19
My other great favourite is xix. First, the mere glory of nature (between the Psalms and Wordsworth—a long gap in history—you get nothing equal to either on this theme). Then the disinfectant, inexorable sun beating down on the desert and “nothing hid from the heat thereof.” There—implied, not stated—the imaginative identification of that heat and light with the “undefiled” law, the “clean” fear of the Lord, searching every cranny. Then the characteristically Jewish feeling that the Law is not only obligatory but beautiful, ravishing: delighting the heart, better than gold, sweeter than honey. Only after that, the (more Christian like) self examination and humble petition. Nearly all that could be said before the Incarnation is said in this Psalm. It is so much better Paganism than the real Pagans ever did! And in one way more glorious, more soaring and triumphant, than Christian poetry. For as God humbled Himself to become Man, so religion humbled itself to become Christianity.

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, February 5, 1956

For reflection  Psalm 19:1–14


HE SHARED OUR SUFFERING
If Christ “tasted death for all men,” became the archetypal sufferer, then the expressions of all who ever suffered in the world are from the very nature of things, related to His. Here (to speak in ludicrously human terms) we feel that it needed no Divine guidance to give the old texts their second meaning but would rather have needed a special miracle to keep it out. In Psalm 22, the terrible poem which Christ quoted in his final torture, it is not “they pierced my hands and my feet (17), striking though this anticipation must always be, that really matters most. It is the union of total privation with total adherence to God, to a God who makes no response, simply because of what God is: “and thou continuest holy” (3). All the sufferings of the righteous speak here; but in 40, 15, all the sufferings of the guilty too—“my sins have taken such hold upon me that I am not able to look up.” But this too is for us the voice of Christ, for we have been taught that He who was without sin became sin for our sakes, plumbed the depth of that worst suffering which comes to evil men who at last know their own evil. Notice how this, in the original or literal sense, is hardly consistent with verses 8, 9, and what counterpoint of truth this apparent contradiction takes on once the speaker is understood to be Christ.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 22:1–31


OUR SHEPHERD
When Christianity says that God loves man, it means that God loves man: not that He has some “disinterested,” because really indifferent, concern for our welfare, but that, in awful and surprising truth, we are the objects of His love. You asked for a loving God: you have one. The great spirit you so lightly invoked, the “lord of terrible aspect,” is present: not a senile benevolence that drowsily wishes you to be happy in your own way, not the cold philanthropy of a conscientious magistrate, nor the care of a host who feels responsible for the comfort of his guests, but the consuming fire Himself, the Love that made the worlds, persistent as the artist’s love for his work and despotic as a man’s love for a dog, provident and venerable as a father’s love for a child, jealous, inexorable, exacting as love between the sexes. How this should be, I do not know: it passes reason to explain why any creatures, not to say creatures such as we, should have a value so prodigious in their Creator’s eyes. It is certainly a burden of glory not only beyond our deserts but also, except in rare moments of grace, beyond our desiring; we are inclined, like the maidens in the old play, to deprecate the love of Zeus. But the fact seems unquestionable.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Psalm 23:1–6

YET WILL I BE CONFIDENT
If we are all going to be destroyed by an atomic bomb, let that bomb when it comes find us doing sensible and human things—praying, working, teaching, reading, listening to music, bathing the children, playing tennis, chatting to our friends over a pint and a game of darts—not huddled together like frightened sheep and thinking about bombs. They may break our bodies (any microbe can do that) but they need not dominate our minds.

—from “On Living in an Atomic Age,” Present Concerns

For reflection  Psalm 27:1–3



For reflection: Psalm 29:1–2

Gratitude exclaims, very properly, “How good of God to give me this.” Adoration says, “What must be the quality of that Being whose far-off and momentary coruscations are like this!” One’s mind runs back up the sunbeam to the sun. . . .

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer



MY TIMES ARE IN YOUR HAND
SCREWTAPE OUTLINES A FUNDAMENTAL DECEPTION:
Men are not angered by mere misfortune but by misfortune conceived as injury. And the sense of injury depends on the feeling that a legitimate claim has been denied. The more claims on life, therefore, that your patient can be induced to make, the more often he will feel injured and, as a result, ill-tempered. Now you will have noticed that nothing throws him into a passion so easily as to find a tract of time which he reckoned on having at his own disposal unexpectedly taken from him. It is the unexpected visitor (when he looked forward to a quiet evening), or the friend’s talkative wife (turning up when he looked forward to a tête-à-tête with the friend), that throw him out of gear. Now he is not yet so uncharitable or slothful that these small demands on his courtesy are in themselves too much for it. They anger him because he regards his time as his own and feels that it is being stolen. You must therefore zealously guard in his mind the curious assumption “My time is my own.” Let him have the feeling that he starts each day as the lawful possessor of twenty-four hours. Let him feel as a grievous tax that portion of this property which he has to make over to his employers, and as a generous donation that further portion which he allows to religious duties. But what he must never be permitted to doubt is that the total from which these deductions have been made was, in some mysterious sense, his own personal birthright.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Psalm 31:15


PRAISE BEFITS THE HUMBLE
But the most obvious fact about praise—whether of God or anything—strangely escaped me. I thought of it in terms of compliment, approval, or the giving of honour. I had never noticed that all enjoyment spontaneously overflows into praise unless (sometimes even if) shyness or the fear of boring others is deliberately brought in to check it. The world rings with praise—lovers praising their mistresses, readers their favourite poet, walkers praising the countryside, players praising their favourite game—praise of weather, wines, dishes, actors, motors, horses, colleges, countries, historical personages, children, flowers, mountains, rare stamps, rare beetles, even sometimes politicians or scholars. I had not noticed how the humblest, and at the same time most balanced and capacious, minds, praised most, while the cranks, misfits and malcontents praised least.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Psalm 33:1–22


TASTE AND SEE
William Law remarks that people are merely “amusing themselves” by asking for the patience which a famine or a persecution would call for if, in the meantime, the weather and every other inconvenience sets them grumbling. One must learn to walk before one can run. So here. We—or at least I—shall not be able to adore God on the highest occasions if we have learned no habit of doing so on the lowest. At best, our faith and reason will tell us that He is adorable, but we shall not have found Him so, not have “tasted and seen.” Any patch of sunlight in a wood will show you something about the sun which you could never get from reading books on astronomy. These pure and spontaneous pleasures are “patches of Godlight” in the woods of our experience.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Psalm 34:8


THE BEGINNING OF KNOWLEDGE
What is more (and I can hardly find words to tell you how important I think this), it is just the people who are ready to submit to the loss of the thrill and settle down to the sober interest, who are then most likely to meet new thrills in some quite different direction. The man who has learned to fly and become a good pilot will suddenly discover music; the man who has settled down to live in the beauty spot will discover gardening.

This is, I think, one little part of what Christ meant by saying that a thing will not really live unless it first dies. It is simply no good trying to keep any thrill: that is the very worst thing you can do. Let the thrill go—let it die away—go on through that period of death into the quieter interest and happiness that follow—and you will find you are living in a world of new thrills all the time. But if you decide to make thrills your regular diet and try to prolong them artificially, they will all get weaker and weaker, and fewer and fewer, and you will be a bored, disillusioned old man for the rest of your life. It is because so few people understand this that you find many middle-aged men and women maundering about their lost youth, at the very age when new horizons ought to be appearing and new doors opening all round them. It is much better fun to learn to swim than to go on endlessly (and hopelessly) trying to get back the feeling you had when you first went paddling as a small boy.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Proverbs 1:7


DO NOT RELY ON YOUR OWN INSIGHT
Iremember once when I had been giving a talk to the R.A.F., an old, hard-bitten officer got up and said, “I’ve no use for all that stuff. But, mind you, I’m a religious man too. I know there’s a God. I’ve felt Him: out alone in the desert at night: the tremendous mystery. And that’s just why I don’t believe all your neat little dogmas and formulas about Him. To anyone who’s met the real thing they all seem so petty and pedantic and unreal!”

Now in a sense I quite agreed with that man. I think he had probably had a real experience of God in the desert. And when he turned from that experience to the Christian creeds, I think he really was turning from something real to something less real. In the same way, if a man has once looked at the Atlantic from the beach, and then goes and looks at a map of the Atlantic, he also will be turning from something real to something less real: turning from real waves to a bit of coloured paper. But here comes the point. The map is admittedly only coloured paper, but there are two things you have to remember about it. In the first place, it is based on what hundreds and thousands of people have found out by sailing the real Atlantic. In that way it has behind it masses of experience just as real as the one you could have from the beach; only, while yours would be a single glimpse, the map fits all those different experiences together. In the second place, if you want to go anywhere, the map is absolutely necessary. As long as you are content with walks on the beach, your own glimpses are far more fun than looking at a map. But the map is going to be more use than walks on the beach if you want to get to America.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Proverbs 3:1–8

TRAINING IN WISDOM
Saint Augustine defines virtue as ordo amaris, the ordinate condition of the affections in which every object is accorded that kind of degree of love which is appropriate to it. Aristotle says that the aim of education is to make the pupil like and dislike what he ought. When the age for reflective thought comes, the pupil who has been thus trained in “ordinate affections” or “just sentiments” will easily find the first principles in Ethics; but to the corrupt man they will never be visible at all and he can make no progress in that science. Plato before him had said the same. The little human animal will not at first have the right responses. It must be trained to feel pleasure, liking, disgust, and hatred at those things which really are pleasant, likeable, disgusting and hateful. In the Republic, the well-nurtured youth is one “who would see most clearly whatever was amiss in ill-made works of man or ill-grown works of nature, and with a just distaste would blame and hate the ugly even from his earliest years and would give delighted praise to beauty, receiving it into his soul and being nourished by it, so that he becomes a man of gentle heart. All this before he is of an age to reason; so that when Reason at length comes to him, then, bred as he has been, he will hold out his hands in welcome and recognize her because of the affinity he bears to her.”

—from The Abolition of Man

For reflection  Proverbs 4:1–6


TURN YOUR FOOT AWAY FROM EVIL
But I am inclined to think a Christian would be wise to avoid, where he decently can, any meeting with people who are bullies, lascivious, cruel, dishonest, spiteful and so forth.

Not because we are “too good” for them. In a sense because we are not good enough. We are not good enough to cope with all the temptations, nor clever enough to cope with all the problems, which an evening spent in such society produces. The temptation is to condone, to connive at; by our words, looks and laughter, to “consent.” The temptation was never greater than now when we are all (and very rightly) so afraid of priggery or “smugness.” And of course, even if we do not seek them out, we shall constantly be in such company whether we wish it or not. This is the real and unavoidable difficulty.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Proverbs 4:23–27


THE LORD EXAMINES ALL OUR PATHS
Morality or duty . . . never yet made a man happy in himself or dear to others. It is shocking, but it is undeniable. We do not wish either to be, or to live among, people who are clean or honest or kind as a matter of duty: we want to be, and to associate with, people who like being clean and honest and kind. The mere suspicion that what seemed an act of spontaneous friendliness or generosity was really done as a duty subtly poisons it. In philosophical language, the ethical category is self-destructive; morality is healthy only when it is trying to abolish itself. In theological language, no man can be saved by works.

—from English Literature in the Sixteenth Century

For reflection  Proverbs 5:21–23


RELYING ON GOD
As you say, the thing is to rely only on God. The time will come when you will regard all this misery as a small price to pay for having been brought to the dependence. Meanwhile (don’t I know) the trouble is that relying on God has to begin all over again every day as if nothing had yet been done . . .

—from a letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September [12,] 1949

For reflection  Proverbs 8:32–35


For reflection: Proverbs 9:10

From the moment a creature becomes aware of God as God and of itself as self, the terrible alternative of choosing God or self for the centre is opened to it.

—from The Problem of Pain



For reflection: Proverbs 12:15–16

If nothing is self-evident, nothing can be proved. Similarly if nothing is obligatory for its own sake, nothing is obligatory at all.

—from The Abolition of Man



For reflection: Proverbs 17:17

We live, in fact, in a world starved for solitude, silence, and privacy, and therefore starved for meditation and true friendship.

—from “Membership,” The Weight of Glory




For reflection: Proverbs 21:1

The freedom of God consists in the fact that no cause other than Himself produces His acts and no external obstacle impedes them—that His own goodness is the root from which they all grow and His own omnipotence the air in which they all flower.

—from The Problem of Pain



WE MUST WISH HIS GOOD
Iimagine somebody will say, “Well, if one is allowed to condemn the enemy’s acts, and punish him, and kill him, what difference is left between Christian morality and the ordinary view?” All the difference in the world. Remember, we Christians think man lives for ever. Therefore, what really matters is those little marks or twists on the central, inside part of the soul which are going to turn it, in the long run, into a heavenly or a hellish creature. We may kill if necessary, but we must not hate and enjoy hating. We may punish if necessary, but we must not enjoy it. In other words, something inside us, the feeling of resentment, the feeling that wants to get one’s own back, must be simply killed. I do not mean that anyone can decide this moment that he will never feel it any more. That is not how things happen. I mean that every time it bobs its head up, day after day, year after year, all our lives long, we must hit it on the head. It is hard work, but the attempt is not impossible. Even while we kill and punish we must try to feel about the enemy as we feel about ourselves—to wish that he were not bad, to hope that he may, in this world or another, be cured: in fact, to wish his good. That is what is meant in the Bible by loving him: wishing his good, not feeling fond of him nor saying he is nice when he is not.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Proverbs 24:17–18


LACKING SELF-CONTROL
A man who makes his golf or his motor-bicycle the centre of his life, or a woman who devotes all her thoughts to clothes or bridge or her dog, is being just as “intemperate” as someone who gets drunk every evening. Of course, it does not show on the outside so easily: bridge-mania or golf-mania do not make you fall down in the middle of the road. But God is not deceived by externals.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Proverbs 25:28

IRON SHARPENS IRON
Friendship is the greatest of worldly goods. Certainly to me it is the chief happiness of life. If I had to give a piece of advice to a young man about a place to live, I think I shd. say, “sacrifice almost everything to live where you can be near your friends.” I know I am v. fortunate in that respect.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, December 29, 1935

For reflection  Proverbs 27:17


A HAPPY HOME
Ithink I can understand that feeling about a housewife’s work being like that of Sisyphus (who was the stone rolling gentleman). But it is surely, in reality, the most important work in the world. What do ships, railways, mines, cars, government etc exist for except that people may be fed, warmed, and safe in their own homes? As Dr. Johnson said, “To be happy at home is the end of all human endeavour.” (1st to be happy to prepare for being happy in our own real Home hereafter: 2nd, in the meantime, to be happy in our houses.) We wage war in order to have peace, we work in order to have leisure, we produce food in order to eat it. So your job is the one for which all others exist.

—from a letter to Mrs. Johnson, March 16, 1955

For reflection  Proverbs 31:10–31

WHAT CANCELS SIN
We have a strange illusion that mere time cancels sin. I have heard others, and I have heard myself, recounting cruelties and falsehoods committed in boyhood as if they were no concern of the present speaker’s, and even with laughter. But mere time does nothing either to the fact or to the guilt of a sin. The guilt is washed out not by time but by repentance and the blood of Christ: if we have repented these early sins we should remember the price of our forgiveness and be humble. As for the fact of a sin, is it probable that anything cancels it? All times are eternally present to God. Is it not at least possible that along some one line of His multi-dimensional eternity He sees you forever in the nursery pulling the wings off a fly, forever toadying, lying, and lusting as a schoolboy, forever in that moment of cowardice or insolence as a subaltern? It may be that salvation consists not in the cancelling of these eternal moments but in the perfected humanity that bears the shame forever, rejoicing in the occasion which it furnished to God’s compassion and glad that it should be common knowledge to the universe. Perhaps in that eternal moment St. Peter—he will forgive me if I am wrong—forever denies his Master. If so, it would indeed be true that the joys of Heaven are for most of us, in our present condition, “an acquired taste”—and certain ways of life may render the taste impossible of acquisition. Perhaps the lost are those who dare not go to such a public place. Of course I do not know that this is true; but I think the possibility is worth keeping in mind. That is the first and greatest commandment.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Isaiah 1:1–31




For reflection: Isaiah 1:18

It costs God nothing, so far as we know, to create nice things: but to convert rebellious wills cost His crucifixion.

—from Mere Christianity




THE MAKING OF A SCOUNDREL
To nine out of ten of you the choice which could lead to scoundrelism will come, when it does come, in no very dramatic colours. Obviously bad men, obviously threatening or bribing, will almost certainly not appear. Over a drink or a cup of coffee, disguised as a triviality and sandwiched between two jokes, from the lips of a man, or woman, whom you have recently been getting to know rather better and whom you hope to know better still—just at the moment when you are most anxious not to appear crude, or naïf or a prig—the hint will come. It will be the hint of something which is not quite in accordance with the technical rules of fair play; something which the public, the ignorant, romantic public, would never understand; something which even the outsiders in your own profession are apt to make a fuss about, but something, says your new friend, which “we”—and at the word “we” you try not to blush for mere pleasure—something “we always do.” And you will be drawn in, if you are drawn in, not by desire for gain or ease, but simply because at that moment, when the cup was so near your lips, you cannot bear to be thrust back again into the cold outer world. It would be so terrible to see the other man’s face—that genial, confidential, delightfully sophisticated face—turn suddenly cold and contemptuous, to know that you had been tried for the Inner Ring and rejected. And then, if you are drawn in, next week it will be something a little further from the rules, and next year something further still, but all in the jolliest, friendliest spirit. It may end in a crash, a scandal, and penal servitude; it may end in millions, a peerage, and giving the prizes at your old school. But you will be a scoundrel. . . . Of all passions the passion for the Inner Ring is most skillful in making a man who is not yet a very bad man do very bad things.

—from “The Inner Ring,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Isaiah 5:20


NAKED BEFORE HIM
When any man comes into the presence of God he will find, whether he wishes it or not, that all those things which seemed to make him so different from the men of other times, or even from his earlier self, have fallen off him. He is back where he always was, where every man always is. Eadem sunt omnia semper [“Everything is always the same”]. Do not let us deceive ourselves. No possible complexity which we can give to our picture of the universe can hide us from God: there is no copse, no forest, no jungle thick enough to provide cover. We read in Revelation of Him that sat on the throne “from whose face the earth and heaven fled away.” It may happen to any of us at any moment. In the twinkling of an eye, in a time too small to be measured, and in any place, all that seems to divide us from God can flee away, vanish, leaving us naked before Him, like the first man, like the only man, as if nothing but He and I existed. And since that contact cannot be avoided for long, and since it means either bliss or horror, the business of life is to learn to like it.

—from “Dogma and the Universe,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Isaiah 6:1–6


THE WONDER OF MIRACLES
You will hear people say, “The early Christians believed that Christ was the son of a virgin, but we know that this is a scientific impossibility.” Such people seem to have an idea that belief in miracles arose at a period when men were so ignorant of the course of nature that they did not perceive a miracle to be contrary to it. A moment’s thought shows this to be nonsense: and the story of the Virgin Birth is a particularly striking example. When St. Joseph discovered that his fiancée was going to have a baby, he not unnaturally decided to repudiate her. Why? Because he knew just as well as any modern gynaecologist that in the ordinary course of nature women do not have babies unless they have lain with men. No doubt the modern gynaecologist knows several things about birth and begetting which St. Joseph did not know. But those things do not concern the main point—that a virgin birth is contrary to the course of nature. And St. Joseph obviously knew that. In any sense in which it is true to say now, “The thing is scientifically impossible,” he would have said the same: the thing always was, and was always known to be, impossible unless the regular processes of nature were, in this particular case, being over-ruled or supplemented by something from beyond nature. When St. Joseph finally accepted the view that his fiancée’s pregnancy was due not to unchastity but to a miracle, he accepted the miracle as something contrary to the known order of nature. All records of miracles teach the same thing. In such stories the miracles excite fear and wonder (that is what the very word miracle implies) among the spectators, and are taken as evidence of supernatural power. If they were not known to be contrary to the laws of nature how could they suggest the presence of the supernatural? How could they be surprising unless they were seen to be exceptions to the rules? And how can anything be seen to be an exception till the rules are known? . . . Nothing can seem extraordinary until you have discovered what is ordinary. Belief in miracles, far from depending on an ignorance of the laws of nature, is only possible in so far as those laws are known.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Isaiah 7:14

HE HUMBLED HIMSELF
Did you ever think, when you were a child, what fun it would be if your toys could come to life? Well suppose you could really have brought them to life. Imagine turning a tin soldier into a real little man. It would involve turning the tin into flesh. And suppose the tin soldier did not like it. He is not interested in flesh: all he sees is that the tin is being spoilt. He thinks you are killing him. He will do everything he can to prevent you. He will not be made into a man if he can help it.

What you would have done about that tin soldier I do not know. But what God did about us was this. The Second Person in God, the Son, became human Himself: was born into the world as an actual man—a real man of a particular height, with hair of a particular colour, speaking a particular language, weighing so many stone. The Eternal Being, who knows everything and who created the whole universe, became not only a man but (before that) a baby, and before that a foetus inside a Woman’s body. If you want to get the hang of it, think how you would like to become a slug or a crab.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Isaiah 9:6


COMPETING POWERS WITH GOD
But the doctrine of Satan’s existence and fall is not among the things we know to be untrue: it contradicts not the facts discovered by scientists but the mere, vague “climate of opinion” that we happen to be living in. Now I take a very low view of “climates of opinion.” In his own subject every man knows that all discoveries are made and all errors corrected by those who ignore the “climate of opinion.”

It seems to me, therefore, a reasonable supposition, that some mighty created power had already been at work for ill on the material universe, or the solar system, or, at least, the planet Earth, before ever man came on the scene: and that when man fell, someone had, indeed, tempted him. This hypothesis is not introduced as a general “explanation of evil”: it only gives a wider application to the principle that evil comes from the abuse of free will. If there is such a power, as I myself believe, it may well have corrupted the animal creation before man appeared. The intrinsic evil of the animal world lies in the fact that animals, or some animals, live by destroying each other. That plants do the same I will not admit to be an evil. The Satanic corruption of the beasts would therefore be analogous, in one respect, with the Satanic corruption of man.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Isaiah 14:12–14

For reflection: Isaiah 22:11

Everyone has noticed how hard it is to turn our thoughts to God when everything is going well with us. We “have all we want” is a terrible saying when “all” does not include God. We find God an interruption.

—from The Problem of Pain



GOD’S JUDGEMENT
The Day of Judgement is an idea very familiar, and very dreadful, to Christians. “In all times of our tribulation, in all time of our wealth, in the hour of death, and in the day of judgement, Good LORD deliver us.” If there is any concept which cannot by any conjuring be removed from the teaching of Our Lord, it is that of the great separation; the sheep and the goats, the broad way and the narrow, the wheat and the tares, the winnowing fan, the wise and the foolish virgins, the good fish and the refuse, the door closed on the marriage feast, with some inside and some outside in the dark. We may dare to hope—some dare to hope—that this is not the whole story, that, as Julian of Norwich said, “All will be well and all manner of things will be well.” But it is no use going to Our Lord’s own words for that hope. Something we may get from St. Paul: nothing, of that kind, from Jesus. It is from His own words that the picture of “Doomsday” has come into Christianity.

—from “The Psalms,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Isaiah 24:1–23


THE REMEDY FOR THE FALL
On the one hand Death is the triumph of Satan, the punishment of the Fall, and the last enemy. Christ shed tears at the grave of Lazarus and sweated blood in Gethsemane: the Life of Lives that was in Him detested this penal obscenity not less than we do, but more. On the other hand, only he who loses his life will save it. We are baptised into the death of Christ, and it is the remedy for the Fall. Death is, in fact, what some modern people call “ambivalent.” It is Satan’s great weapon and also God’s great weapon: it is holy and unholy; our supreme disgrace and our only hope; the thing Christ came to conquer and the means by which He conquered.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Isaiah 25:6–9


THE IMMORTALITY OF THE SOUL
From the earliest times the Jews, like many other nations, had believed that man possessed a “soul” or Nephesh separable from the body, which went at death into the shadowy world called Sheol: a land of forgetfulness and imbecility where none called upon Jehovah any more, a land half unreal and melancholy like the Hades of the Greeks or the Niflheim of the Norsemen. From it shades could return and appear to the living, as Samuel’s shade had done at the command of the Witch of Endor. In much more recent times there had arisen a more cheerful belief that the righteous passed at death to “heaven.” Both doctrines are doctrines of “the immortality of the soul” as a Greek or modern Englishman understands it: and both are quite irrelevant to the story of the Resurrection. The writers look upon this event as an absolute novelty. Quite clearly they do not think they have been haunted by a ghost from Sheol, nor even that they have had a vision of a “soul” in “heaven”. . . . What the apostles claimed to have seen did not corroborate, nor exclude, and had indeed nothing to do with, either the doctrine of “heaven” or the doctrine of Sheol. Insofar as it corroborated anything it corroborated a third Jewish belief which is quite distinct from both these. This third doctrine taught that in “the day of Jahweh” peace would be restored and world dominion given to Israel under a righteous King: and that when this happened the righteous dead, or some of them, would come back to earth—not as floating wraiths but as solid men who cast shadows in the sunlight and made a noise when they tramped the floors. “Awake and sing, ye that dwell in the dust,” said Isaiah, “And the earth shall cast out the dead” (26:19). What the apostles thought they had seen was, if not that, at any rate a lonely first instance of that: the first movement of a great wheel beginning to turn in the direction opposite to that which all men hitherto had observed. Of all the ideas entertained by man about death it is this one, and this one only, which the story of the Resurrection tends to confirm. If the story is false then it is this Hebrew myth of resurrection which begot it. If the story is true then the hint and anticipation of the truth is to be found not in popular ideas about ghosts nor in eastern doctrines of reincarnation nor in philosophical speculations about the immortality of the soul, but exclusively in the Hebrew prophecies of the return, the restoration, the great reversal. Immortality simply as immortality is irrelevant to the Christian claim.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Isaiah 26:19


RETURNING AND REST
The real difficulty is, isn’t it, to adapt ones steady beliefs about tribulation to this particular tribulation; for the particular, when it arrives, always seems so peculiarly intolerable. I find it helpful to keep it very particular—to stop thinking about the ruin of the world etc, for no one is going to experience that, and to see it as each individual’s personal sufferings, which never can be more than those of one man, or more than one man, if he were very unlucky, might have suffered in peacetime. Do you get sudden lucid intervals? islands of profound peace? I do: and though they don’t last, I think one brings something away from them.

—from a letter to Owen Barfield, June 2, 1940

For reflection  Isaiah 30:15


THE WEIGHT OF OUR DECISIONS
Good and evil both increase at compound interest. That is why the little decisions you and I make every day are of such infinite importance. The smallest good act today is the capture of a strategic point from which, a few months later, you may be able to go on to victories you never dreamed of. An apparently trivial indulgence in lust or anger today is the loss of a ridge or railway line or bridgehead from which the enemy may launch an attack otherwise impossible.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Isaiah 33:15–16


For reflection: Isaiah 35:1–10

For God is not merely mending, not simply restoring a status quo. Redeemed humanity is to be something more glorious than unfallen humanity would have been, more glorious than any unfallen race now is.

—from Miracles



OUR GOD, OUR DELIVERER
Pain is terrible, but surely you need not have fear as well? Can you not see death as the friend and deliverer? It means stripping off that body which is tormenting you: like taking off a hair-shirt or getting out of a dungeon. What is there to be afraid of? You have long attempted (and none of us does more) a Christian life. Your sins are confessed and absolved. Has this world been so kind to you that you should leave it with regret? There are better things ahead than any we leave behind.

Remember, tho’ we struggle against things because we are afraid of them, it is often the other way round—we get afraid because we struggle. Are you struggling, resisting? Don’t you think Our Lord says to you “Peace, child, peace. Relax. Let go. Underneath are the everlasting arms. Let go, I will catch you. Do you trust me so little?”

Of course, this may not be the end. Then make it a good rehearsal.

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, June 17, 1963

For reflection  Isaiah 40:6–11


WHO CREATED THESE?
Every scientific statement in the long run, however complicated it looks, really means something like, “I pointed the telescope to such and such a part of the sky at 2:20 A.M. on January 15th and saw so-and-so,” or, “I put some of this stuff in a pot and heated it to such-and-such a temperature and it did so-and-so.” Do not think I am saying anything against science: I am only saying what its job is. And the more scientific a man is, the more (I believe) he would agree with me that this is the job of science—and a very useful and necessary job it is too. But why anything comes to be there at all, and whether there is anything behind the things science observes—something of a different kind—this is not a scientific question. If there is “Something Behind,” then either it will have to remain altogether unknown to men or else make itself known in some different way. The statement that there is any such thing, and the statement that there is no such thing, are neither of them statements that science can make. And real scientists do not usually make them. It is usually the journalists and popular novelists who have picked up a few odds and ends of half-baked science from textbooks who go in for them. After all, it is really a matter of common sense. Supposing science ever became complete so that it knew every single thing in the whole universe. Is it not plain that the questions, “Why is there a universe?” “Why does it go on as it does?” “Has it any meaning?” would remain just as they were?

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Isaiah 40:26


A THIRST FOR THE LIVING GOD
Judaism in its earlier stages had no belief in immortality, and for a long time no belief which was religiously relevant. The shadowy existence of the ghost in Sheol was one of which Jehovah took no account and which took no account of Jehovah. In Sheol all things are forgotten. The religion was centered on the ritual and ethical demands of Jehovah in the present life, and also, of course, on benefits expected from Him. These benefits are often merely worldly benefits (grandchildren and peace upon Israel), but a more specifically religious note is repeatedly struck. The Jew is athirst for the living God, he delights in His Laws as in honey or treasure, he is conscious of himself in Jehovah’s presence as unclean of lips and heart. The glory or splendour of God is worshipped for its own sake.

—from “Religion Without Dogma?” God in the Dock

For reflection  Isaiah 42:5–12


I AM THE FIRST AND I AM THE LAST
Everyone who believes in God at all believes that He knows what you and I are going to do tomorrow. But if He knows I am going to do so-and-so, how can I be free to do otherwise? Well, here once again, the difficulty comes from thinking that God is progressing along the Time-line like us: the only difference being that He can see ahead and we cannot. Well, if that were true, if God foresaw our acts, it would be very hard to understand how we could be free not to do them. But suppose God is outside and above the Time-line. In that case, what we call “tomorrow” is visible to Him in just the same way as what we call “today.” All the days are “Now” for Him. He does not remember you doing things yesterday; He simply sees you doing them, because, though you have lost yesterday, He has not. He does not “foresee” you doing things tomorrow; He simply sees you doing them: because, though tomorrow is not yet there for you, it is for Him. You never supposed that your actions at this moment were any less free because God knows what you are doing. Well, He knows your tomorrow’s actions in just the same way—because He is already in tomorrow and can simply watch you. In a sense, He does not know your action till you have done it: but then the moment at which you have done it is already “Now” for Him.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Isaiah 44:6–8


WHEN THE HEAVENS SING
Then the new earth and sky, the same yet not the same as these, will rise in us as we have risen in Christ. And once again, after who knows what aeons of the silence and the dark, the birds will sing and the waters flow, and lights and shadows move across the hills, and the faces of our friends laugh upon us with amazed recognition.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Isaiah 44:23


CHRISTIANITY’S ACCOUNT OF THE UNIVERSE
Christianity is not a patent medicine. Christianity claims to give an account of facts—to tell you what the real universe is like. Its account of the universe may be true, or it may not, and once the question is really before you, then your natural inquisitiveness must make you want to know the answer. If Christianity is untrue, then no honest man will want to believe it, however helpful it might be: if it is true, every honest man will want to believe it, even if it gives him no help at all.

—from “Man or Rabbit?” God in the Dock

For reflection  Isaiah 45:1–19


TURNING GREY
Not that you and I have now much reason to rejoice in having bodies! Like old automobiles, aren’t they? where all sorts of apparently different things keep going wrong, but what they add up to is the plain fact that the machine is wearing out. Well, it was not meant to last forever. Still, I have a kindly feeling for the old rattle-trap. Through it God showed me that whole side of His beauty which is embodied in colour, sound, smell and size. No doubt it has often led me astray: but not half so often, I suspect, as my soul has led it astray. For the spiritual evils which we share with the devils (pride, spite) are far worse than what we share with the beasts: and sensuality really arises more from the imagination than from the appetites; which, if left merely to their own animal strength, and not elaborated by our imagination, would be fairly easily managed.

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, November 26, 1962

For reflection  Isaiah 46:3–4


DISARMAMENT
Now the proper good of a creature is to surrender itself to its Creator—to enact intellectually, volitionally, and emotionally, that relationship which is given in the mere fact of its being a creature. When it does so, it is good and happy. Lest we should think this a hardship, this kind of good begins on a level far above the creatures, for God Himself, as Son, from all eternity renders back to God as Father by filial obedience the being which the Father by paternal love eternally generates in the Son. This is the pattern which man was made to imitate—which Paradisal man did imitate—and wherever the will conferred by the Creator is thus perfectly offered back in delighted and delighting obedience by the creature, there, most undoubtedly, is Heaven, and there the Holy Ghost proceeds. In the world as we now know it, the problem is how to recover this self-surrender. We are not merely imperfect creatures who must be improved: we are, as Newman said, rebels who must lay down our arms.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Isaiah 48:6–19



For reflection: Isaiah 53:5

Human Death is a result of sin and the triumph of Satan. But it is also the means of redemption from sin, God’s medicine for man and His weapon against Satan.

—from Miracles



SHATTERING OUR IDEAS
LEWIS, GRIEVING THE DEATH OF HIS WIFE, JOY:
Ineed Christ, not something that resembles Him. I want H., not something that is like her. A really good photograph might become in the end a snare, a horror, and an obstacle.

Images, I must suppose, have their use or they would not have been so popular. (It makes little difference whether they are pictures and statues outside the mind or imaginative constructions within it.) To me, however, their danger is more obvious. Images of the Holy easily become holy images—sacrosanct. My idea of God is not a divine idea. It has to be shattered time after time. He shatters it Himself. He is the great iconoclast. Could we not almost say that this shattering is one of the marks of His presence? The Incarnation is the supreme example; it leaves all previous ideas of the Messiah in ruins. And most are “offended” by the iconoclasm; and blessed are those who are not. But the same thing happens in our private prayers.

All reality is iconoclastic.

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Isaiah 53:1–12


SEEK THE LORD
We should, I believe, distrust states of mind which turn our attention upon ourselves. Even at our sins we should look no longer than is necessary to know and to repent them: and our virtues or progress (if any) are certainly a dangerous object of contemplation. When the sun is vertically above a man he casts no shadow: similarly when we have come to the Divine meridian our spiritual shadow (that is, our consciousness of self) will vanish. One will thus in a sense be almost nothing: a room to be filled by God and our blessed fellow creatures, who in their turn are rooms we help to fill. But how far one is from this at present!

—from a letter to Walter Hooper, November 30, 1954

For reflection  Isaiah 55:6–7




For reflection: Isaiah 55:8

The night sky suggests that the inanimate also has for God some value we cannot imagine. His ways are not (not there, anyway) like ours.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer



IN MY OWN BACKYARD
It is one of the evils of rapid diffusion of news that the sorrows of all the world come to us every morning. I think each village was meant to feel pity for its own sick and poor whom it can help and I doubt if it is the duty of any private person to fix his mind on ills wh. he cannot help. (This may even become an escape from the works of charity we really can do to those we know).

A great many people (not you) do now seem to think that the mere state of being worried is in itself meritorious. I don’t think it is. We must, if it so happens, give our lives for others: but even while we’re doing it, I think we’re meant to enjoy Our Lord and, in Him, our friends, our food, our sleep, our jokes, and the birds song and the frosty sunrise.

—from a letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, December 20, 1946

For reflection  Isaiah 58:6–12

BROKEN SOULS
Whether we feel miserable or not, and however we feel, there is on each of us a load which, if nothing is done about it, will in fact break us, will send us from this world to whatever happens afterwards, not as souls but as broken souls.

—from “‘Miserable Offenders,’” God in the Dock

For reflection  Isaiah 59:9–15


ARISE, SHINE
We should hardly dare to ask that any notice be taken of ourselves. But we pine. The sense that in this universe we are treated as strangers, the longing to be acknowledged, to meet with some response, to bridge some chasm that yawns between us and reality, is part of our inconsolable secret. And surely, from this point of view, the promise of glory, in the sense described, becomes highly relevant to our deep desire. For glory means good report with God, acceptance by God, response, acknowledgement, and welcome into the heart of things. The door on which we have been knocking all our lives will open at last.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Isaiah 60:1–2


FINDING COMFORT
All I am doing is to ask people to face the facts—to understand the questions which Christianity claims to answer. And they are very terrifying facts. I wish it was possible to say something more agreeable. But I must say what I think true. Of course, I quite agree that the Christian religion is, in the long run, a thing of unspeakable comfort. But it does not begin in comfort; it begins in the dismay I have been describing, and it is no use at all trying to go on to that comfort without first going through that dismay. In religion, as in war and everything else, comfort is the one thing you cannot get by looking for it. If you look for truth, you may find comfort in the end: if you look for comfort you will not get either comfort or truth—only soft soap and wishful thinking to begin with and, in the end, despair.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Isaiah 61:1–11


DIVINE WORK OF ART
We are, not metaphorically but in very truth, a Divine work of art, something that God is making, and therefore something with which He will not be satisfied until it has a certain character. Here again we come up against what I have called the “intolerable compliment.” Over a sketch made idly to amuse a child, an artist may not take much trouble: he may be content to let it go even though it is not exactly as he meant it to be. But over the great picture of his life—the work which he loves, though in a different fashion, as intensely as a man loves a woman or a mother a child—he will take endless trouble—and would, doubtless, thereby give endless trouble to the picture if it were sentient. One can imagine a sentient picture, after being rubbed and scraped and recommenced for the tenth time, wishing that it were only a thumbnail sketch whose making was over in a minute. In the same way, it is natural for us to wish that God had designed for us a less glorious and less arduous destiny; but then we are wishing not for more love but for less.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Isaiah 64:8


THE REDEEMED EARTH
Only Supernaturalists really see Nature. You must go a little away from her, and then turn round, and look back. Then at last the true landscape will become visible. You must have tasted, however briefly, the pure water from beyond the world before you can be distinctly conscious of the hot, salty tang of Nature’s current. To treat her as God, or as Everything, is to close the whole pith and pleasure of her. Come out, look back, and then you will see . . . this astonishing cataract of bears, babies and bananas: this immoderate deluge of atoms, orchids, oranges, cancers, canaries, fleas, gases, tornadoes and toads. How could you ever have thought this was the ultimate reality? How could you ever have thought that it was merely a stage-set for the moral drama of men and women? She is herself. Offer her neither worship nor contempt. Meet her and know her. If we are immortal, and if she is doomed (as the scientists tell us) to run down and die, we shall miss this half-shy and half-flamboyant creature, this ogress, this hoyden, this incorrigible fairy, this dumb witch. But the theologians tell us that she, like ourselves, is to be redeemed. The “vanity” to which she was subjected was her disease, not her essence. She will be cured in character: not tamed (Heaven forbid) nor sterilised. We shall still be able to recognise our old enemy, friend, playfellow and foster-mother, so perfected as to be not less, but more, herself. And that will be a merry meeting.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Isaiah 65:17–25


THE END GAME
Some will not be redeemed. There is no doctrine which I would more willingly remove from Christianity than this, if it lay in my power. But it has the full support of Scripture and, specially, of Our Lord’s own words; it has always been held by Christendom; and it has the support of reason. If a game is played, it must be possible to lose it. If the happiness of a creature lies in self-surrender, no one can make that surrender but himself (though many can help him to make it) and he may refuse. I would pay any price to be able to say truthfully “All will be saved.” But my reason retorts “Without their will, or with it?” If I say “Without their will” I at once perceive a contradiction; how can the supreme voluntary act of self-surrender be involuntary? If I say “With their will,” my reason replies “How if they will not give in?”

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Isaiah 66:22–24


GOD’S BELOVED
If the world exists not chiefly that we may love God but that God may love us, yet that very fact, on a deeper level, is so for our sakes. If He who in Himself can lack nothing chooses to need us, it is because we need to be needed. Before and behind all the relations of God to man, as we now learn them from Christianity, yawns the abyss of a Divine act of pure giving—the election of man, from nonentity, to be the beloved of God, and therefore (in some sense) the needed and desired of God, who but for that act needs and desires nothing, since He eternally has, and is, all goodness.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Jeremiah 31:3

HOPE IN MOURNING
Lewis, grieving the death of his wife, Joy:
And poor C. quotes to me, “Do not mourn like those that have no hope.” It astonishes me, the way we are invited to apply to ourselves words so obviously addressed to our betters. What St. Paul says can comfort only those who love God better than the dead, and the dead better than themselves. If a mother is mourning not for what she has lost but for what her dead child has lost, it is a comfort to believe that the child has not lost the end for which it was created. And it is a comfort to believe that she herself, in losing her chief or only natural happiness, has not lost a greater thing, that she may still hope to “glorify God and enjoy Him forever.” A comfort to the God-aimed, eternal spirit within her. But not to her motherhood. The specifically maternal happiness must be written off. Never, in any place or time, will she have her son on her knees, or bathe him, or tell him a story, or plan for his future, or see her grandchild.

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Jeremiah 31:15

GOD’S WARNINGS
It is just here, where God’s providence seems at first to be most cruel, that the Divine humility, the stooping down of the Highest, most deserves praise. We are perplexed to see misfortune falling upon decent, inoffensive, worthy people—on capable, hard-working mothers of families or diligent, thrifty little tradespeople, on those who have worked so hard, and so honestly, for their modest stock of happiness and now seem to be entering on the enjoyment of it with the fullest right. How can I say with sufficient tenderness what here needs to be said? It does not matter that I know I must become, in the eyes of every hostile reader, as it were, personally responsible for all the sufferings I try to explain—just as, to this day, everyone talks as if St. Augustine wanted unbaptised infants to go to Hell. But it matters enormously if I alienate anyone from the truth. Let me implore the reader to try to believe, if only for the moment, that God, who made these deserving people, may really be right when He thinks that their modest prosperity and the happiness of their children are not enough to make them blessed: that all this must fall from them in the end, and that if they have not learned to know Him they will be wretched. And therefore He troubles them, warning them in advance of an insufficiency that one day they will have to discover. The life to themselves and their families stands between them and the recognition of their need; He makes that life less sweet to them.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Jeremiah 32:17–42

For reflection: Jeremiah 33:15–16

Justice is much more than the sort of thing that goes on in law courts. It is the old name for everything we should now call “fairness”; it includes honesty, give and take, truthfulness, keeping promises, and all that side of life.

—from Mere Christianity



THE PATH OF OBEDIENCE
Those who think God has spoken will naturally listen to what He has to say about the where, how, to what extent, and in what spirit any “good” is to be pursued. This does not mean our own “conscience” is simply negated. On the contrary, just as reason sends me to authority, so conscience sends me to obedience.

—from “Christianity and Culture,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Jeremiah 42:1–6



For reflection: Jeremiah 49:19

In God you come up against something which is in every respect immeasurably superior to yourself. Unless you know God as that—and, therefore, know yourself as nothing in comparison—you do not know God at all.

—from Mere Christianity




RIGHT OR RIGHTEOUS
Idon’t know what to think about the present state of the world. The sins on the side of the democracies are very great. I suppose they differ from those on the other side by being less deliberately blasphemous, fulfilling less the condition of a perfectly mortal sin. Anyway, the question “Who is in the right” (in a given quarrel) is quite distinct from the question “Who is righteous?”—for the worse of two disputants may always be in the right on one particular issue. It is therefore not self righteous to claim that we are in the right now. But I am chary of doing what my emotions prompt me to do every hour; i.e. identifying the enemy with the forces of evil. Surely one of the things we learn from history is that God never allows a human conflict to become unambiguously one between simple good and simple evil?

—from a letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 16, 1940

For reflection  Jeremiah 51:14–19


For reflection: Lamentations 1:16

It is quite useless knocking at the door of heaven for earthly comfort; it’s not the sort of comfort they supply there.

—from a letter to Sir Henry Willink, December 3, 1959




WHAT GOD ORDAINS
Once we have accepted an omniscient & providential God, the distinction we used to draw between the significant and the fortuitous must either break down or be restated in some v. much subtler form. If an event coming about in the ordinary course of nature becomes to me the occasion of hope and faith and love or increased efforts after virtue, do we suppose that this result was unforeseen by, or is indifferent to, God? Obviously not. What we should have called its fortuitous effects must have been present to Him for all eternity. And indeed, we can’t suppose God saying (as a human artist might) “That effect, though it has turned out rather well, was, I must admit, no part of my original design.” Then the total act of creation, including our own creation (wh. is going on all the time) meets us, doesn’t it? In every event at every moment: the act of a Person dealing with persons and knowing what He does.

—from a letter to Sheldon Vanauken, March 6, 1955

For reflection  Lamentations 2:17


MY SOUL IS BOWED DOWN
LEWIS, GRIEVING THE DEATH OF HIS WIFE, JOY:
Meanwhile, where is God? This is one of the most disquieting symptoms. When you are happy, so happy that you have no sense of needing Him, so happy that you are tempted to feel His claims upon you as an interruption, if you remember yourself and turn to Him with gratitude and praise, you will be—or so it feels—welcomed with open arms. But go to Him when your need is desperate, when all other help is vain, and what do you find? A door slammed in your face, and a sound of bolting and double bolting on the inside. After that, silence. You may as well turn away. The longer you wait, the more emphatic the silence will become. There are no lights in the windows. It might be an empty house. Was it ever inhabited? It seemed so once. And that seeming was as strong as this. What can this mean? Why is He so present a commander in our time of prosperity and so very absent a help in time of trouble?

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Lamentations 3:19–23


For reflection: Ezekiel 2:6–7

O universal strength, I know it well,

It is but froth of folly to rebel,

For thou art Lord and hast the keys of Hell.

—from “De Profundis,” Spirits in Bondage



THE CERTAINTY OF DEATH
There is no question of death or life for any of us, only a question of this death or of that—of a machine gun bullet now or a cancer forty years later. What does war do to death? It certainly does not make it more frequent; 100 percent of us die, and the percentage cannot be increased. It puts several deaths earlier, but I hardly suppose that that is what we fear. Certainly when the moment comes, it will make little difference how many years we have behind us. Does it increase our chances of a painful death? I doubt it. As far as I can find out, what we call natural death is usually preceded by suffering, and a battlefield is one of the very few places where one has a reasonable prospect of dying with no pain at all. Does it decrease our chances of dying at peace with God? I cannot believe it. If active service does not persuade a man to prepare for death, what conceivable concatenation of circumstances would? Yet war does do something to death. It forces us to remember it. The only reason why the cancer at sixty or the paralysis at seventy-five do not bother us is that we forget them.

—from “Learning in War-Time,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Ezekiel 3:16–21

A PROPHET’S OBEDIENCE TO HIS VOCATION
Ithink there is a great deal to be said for having one’s deepest spiritual interest distinct from one’s ordinary duty as a student or professional man. St. Paul’s job was tent-making. When the two coincide I shd. have thought there was a danger lest the natural interest in one’s job and the pleasures of gratified ambition might be mistaken for spiritual progress and spiritual consolation; and I think clergymen sometimes fall into this trap. . . . In fact, the change [to a Christian ministry] might do good or harm. I’ve always been glad myself that Theology is not the thing I earn my living by. On the whole, I’d advise you to get on with your tent-making. The performance of a duty will probably teach you quite as much about God as academic Theology wd. do. Mind, I’m not certain: but that is the view I incline to....

Look: the question is not whether we should bring God into our work or not. We certainly should and must: as MacDonald says “All that is not God is death.” The question is whether we should simply (a.) Bring Him in in the dedication of our work to Him, in the integrity, diligence, and humility with which we do it or also (b.) Make His professed and explicit service our job. The A vocation rests on all men whether they know it or not; the B vocation only on those who are specially called to it. Each vocation has its peculiar dangers and peculiar rewards.

—from letters to Sheldon Vanauken, January 5 and 8, 1951

For reflection  Ezekiel 3:22—4:17




For reflection: Ezekiel 6:6–7

There are also all sorts of things in our own spiritual life where a thing has to be killed, and broken, in order that it may then become bright, and strong, and splendid.

—from “The Grand Miracle,” God in the Dock




For reflection: Ezekiel 11:19–20

Christ says “. . . Hand over the whole natural self, all the desires which you think innocent as well as the ones you think wicked—the whole outfit. I will give you a new self instead. In fact, I will give you Myself: my own will shall become yours.”

—from Mere Christianity


WHITEWASHING AND MAKE BELIEVE
No one can deceive you unless he makes you think he is telling the truth. The unblushing romantic has far less power to deceive than the apparently realistic. Admitted fantasy is precisely the kind of literature which never deceives at all. Children are not deceived by fairy-tales; they are often and gravely deceived by school-stories. Adults are not deceived by science-fiction; they can be deceived by the stories in the women’s magazines.

—from An Experiment in Criticism

For reflection  Ezekiel 13:1–19

WHEN THE WICKED WON’T REPENT
The demand that God should forgive such a man while he remains what he is, is based on a confusion between condoning and forgiving. To condone an evil is simply to ignore it, to treat it as if it were good. But forgiveness needs to be accepted as well as offered if it is to be complete: and a man who admits no guilt can accept no forgiveness.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Ezekiel 18:25–32


RELIGIOUS BAD MEN
The Jews sinned in this matter worse than the Pagans not because they were further from God but because they were nearer to Him. For the Supernatural, entering a human soul, opens to it new possibilities both of good and evil. From that point the road branches: one way to sanctity, love, humility, the other to spiritual pride, self-righteousness, persecuting zeal. And no way back to the mere humdrum virtues and vices of the unawakened soul. If the Divine call does not make us better, it will make us very much worse. Of all bad men religious bad men are the worst. Of all created beings the wickedest is one who originally stood in the immediate presence of God. There seems no way out of this. It gives a new application to Our Lord’s words about “counting the cost.”

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Ezekiel 22:23–31



For reflection: Ezekiel 26:16–21

How is it that people who are quite obviously eaten up with Pride can say they believe in God and appear to themselves very religious? I am afraid it means they are worshipping an imaginary God.

—from Mere Christianity



For reflection: Ezekiel 28:2

Yes, pride is a perpetual nagging temptation. Keep on knocking it on the head but don’t be too worried about it. As long as one knows one is proud one is safe from the worst form of pride.

—from a letter to Genia Goelz, May 15, 1952



UNDERSTANDING OUR BADNESS
When a man is getting better he understands more and more clearly the evil that is still left in him. When a man is getting worse he understands his own badness less and less. A moderately bad man knows he is not very good; a thoroughly bad man thinks he is all right. This is common sense, really. You understand sleep when you are awake, not while you are sleeping. You can see mistakes in arithmetic when your mind is working properly: while you are making them you cannot see them. You can understand the nature of drunkenness when you are sober, not when you are drunk. Good people know about both good and evil: bad people do not know about either.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Ezekiel 33:7–20


WE SHALL STAND BEFORE HIM
Iread in a periodical the other day that the fundamental thing is how we think of God. By God Himself, it is not! How God thinks of us is not only more important, but infinitely more important. Indeed, how we think of Him is of no importance at all except in so far as it is related to how He thinks of us. It is written that we shall “stand before” Him, shall appear, shall be inspected. The promise of glory is the promise, almost incredible and only possible by the work of Christ, that some of us, that any of us who really chooses, shall actually survive that examination, shall find approval, shall please God.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Ezekiel 34:11–31

I WILL REMOVE YOUR HEART OF STONE
On the one hand, God’s demand for perfection need not discourage you in the least in your present attempts to be good, or even in your present failures. Each time you fall He will pick you up again. And He knows perfectly well that your own efforts are never going to bring you anywhere near perfection. On the other hand, you must realise from the outset that the goal towards which He is beginning to guide you is absolute perfection; and no power in the whole universe, except you yourself, can prevent Him from taking you to that goal. That is what you are in for. And it is very important to realise that. If we do not, then we are very likely to start pulling back and resisting Him after a certain point.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Ezekiel 36:24–28


YOU SHALL KNOW THAT I AM THE LORD
The Christians are not claiming that simply “God” was incarnate in Jesus. They are claiming that the one true God is He whom the Jews worshipped as Jahweh, and that it is He who has descended. Now the double character of Jahweh is this. On the one hand He is the God of Nature, her glad Creator. It is He who sends rain into the furrows till the valleys stand so thick with corn that they laugh and sing. The trees of the wood rejoice before Him and His voice causes the wild deer to bring forth their young. He is the God of wheat and wine and oil. In that respect He is constantly doing all the things that Nature-Gods do: He is Bacchus, Venus, Ceres all rolled into one. . . .

On the other hand, Jahweh is clearly not a Nature-God. He does not die and come to life each year as a true Corn-king should. He may give wine and fertility, but must not be worshipped with Bacchanalian or aphrodisiac rites. He is not the soul of Nature nor of any part of Nature. He inhabits eternity: He dwells in the high and holy place: heaven is His throne, not His vehicle, earth is His footstool, not His vesture. One day He will dismantle both and make a new heaven and earth. He is not to be identified even with the “divine spark” in man. He is “God and not man”: His thoughts are not our thoughts: all our righteousness is filthy rags. His appearance to Ezekiel is attended with imagery that does not borrow from Nature, but (it is a mystery too seldom noticed) from those machines which men were to make centuries after Ezekiel’s death. The prophet saw something suspiciously like a dynamo.

Jahweh is neither the soul of Nature nor her enemy. She is neither His body nor a declension and falling away from Him. She is His creature. He is not a nature-God, but the God of Nature—her inventor, maker, owner, and controller. To everyone who reads this book the conception has been familiar from childhood; we therefore easily think it is the most ordinary conception in the world. “If people are going to believe in a God at all,” we ask, “what other kind would they believe in?” But the answer of history is, “Almost any other kind.” We mistake our privileges for our instincts: just as one meets ladies who believe their own refined manners to be natural to them. They don’t remember being taught.

— from Miracles

For reflection  Ezekiel 37:1–14


EVIL IS SIMPLY GOOD SPOILED
Only because He has laid up real goods for us to desire are we able to go wrong by snatching at them in greedy, misdirected ways. The truth is that evil is not a real thing at all, like God. It is simply good spoiled. That is why I say there can be good without evil, but no evil without good. You know what the biologists mean by a parasite—an animal that lives on another animal. Evil is a parasite. It is there only because good is there for it to spoil and confuse.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, September 12, 1933

For reflection  Ezekiel 38:10


GOD WILL MAKE HIMSELF KNOWN
The instrument through which you see God is your whole self. And if a man’s self is not kept clean and bright, his glimpse of God will be blurred—like the Moon seen through a dirty telescope. That is why horrible nations have horrible religions: they have been looking at God through a dirty lens.

God can show Himself as He really is only to real men. And that means not simply to men who are individually good, but to men who are united together in a body, loving one another, helping one another, showing Him to one another. For that is what God meant humanity to be like; like players in one band, or organs in one body.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Ezekiel 39:7–8


OUR INHERITANCE
Your soul has a curious shape because it is a hollow made to fit a particular swelling in the infinite contours of the divine substance, or a key to unlock one of the doors in the house with many mansions. For it is not humanity in the abstract that is to be saved, but you—you, the individual reader. . . . Blessed and fortunate creature, your eyes shall behold Him and not another’s. All that you are, sins apart, is destined, if you will let God have His good way, to utter satisfaction. . . . Your place in heaven will seem to be made for you and you alone, because you were made for it.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Ezekiel 44:28


THE FATAL FLAW
The moment you have a self at all, there is a possibility of putting yourself first—wanting to be the centre—wanting to be God, in fact. That was the sin of Satan: and that was the sin he taught the human race. Some people think the fall of man had something to do with sex, but that is a mistake. (The story in the Book of Genesis rather suggests that some corruption in our sexual nature followed the fall and was its result, not its cause.) What Satan put into the heads of our remote ancestors was the idea that they could “be like gods”—could set up on their own as if they had created themselves—be their own masters—invent some sort of happiness for themselves outside God, apart from God. And out of that hopeless attempt has come nearly all that we call human history—money, poverty, ambition, war, prostitution, classes, empires, slavery—the long terrible story of man trying to find something other than God which will make him happy.

The reason why it can never succeed is this. God made us: invented us as a man invents an engine. A car is made to run on petrol, and it would not run properly on anything else. Now God designed the human machine to run on Himself. He Himself is the fuel our spirits were designed to burn, or the food our spirits were designed to feed on. There is no other. That is why it is just no good asking God to make us happy in our own way without bothering about religion. God cannot give us a happiness and peace apart from Himself, because it is not there. There is no such thing.

That is the key to history. Terrific energy is expended—civilisations are built up—excellent institutions devised; but each time something goes wrong. Some fatal flaw always brings the selfish and cruel people to the top and it all slides back into misery and ruin. In fact, the machine conks. It seems to start up all right and runs a few yards, and then it breaks down. They are trying to run it on the wrong juice. That is what Satan has done to us humans.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Daniel 2:27–45

IN GOD’S HANDS
One last word, about getting rid of fear. Two men had to cross a dangerous bridge. The first convinced himself that it wd. bear them, and called this conviction Faith. The second said “Whether it breaks or holds, whether I die here or somewhere else, I am equally in God’s good hands.” And the bridge did break and they were both killed: and the second man’s Faith was not disappointed and the first man’s was.

—from a letter to Mrs. D. Jessup, March 26, 1954

For reflection  Daniel 3:8–30

FINDING GOD HIMSELF
It is always shocking to meet life where we thought we were alone. “Look out!” we cry, “it’s alive.” And therefore this is the very point at which so many draw back—I would have done so myself if I could—and proceed no further with Christianity. An “impersonal God”—well and good. A subjective God of beauty, truth and goodness, inside our own heads—better still. A formless life-force surging through us, a vast power which we can tap—best of all. But God Himself, alive, pulling at the other end of the cord, perhaps approaching at an infinite speed, the hunter, king, husband—that is quite another matter. There comes a moment when the children who have been playing at burglars hush suddenly: was that a real footstep in the hall? There comes a moment when people who have been dabbling in religion (“Man’s search for God!”) suddenly draw back. Supposing we really found Him? We never meant it to come to that! Worse still, supposing He had found us?

—from Miracles

For reflection  Daniel 5:5–9


For reflection: Daniel 6:1–23

There is always some peace in having submitted to the right. Don’t spoil it by worrying about the results, if you can help it. It is not your business to succeed (no one can be sure of that) but to do right: when you have done so, the rest lies with God—and Will!

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, December 29, 1935



OPEN SHAME FALLS ON US
We have laboured to overcome that sense of shrinking, that desire to conceal, which either Nature herself or the tradition of almost all mankind has attached to cowardice, unchastity, falsehood, and envy. We are told to “get things out into the open,” not for the sake of self-humiliation, but on the grounds that these “things” are very natural and we need not be ashamed of them. But unless Christianity is wholly false, the perception of ourselves which we have in moments of shame must be the only true one; and even Pagan society has usually recognised “shamelessness” as the nadir of the soul. In trying to extirpate shame we have broken down one of the ramparts of the human spirit, madly exulting in the work as the Trojans exulted when they broke their walls and pulled the Horse into Troy. I do not know that there is anything to be done but to set about the rebuilding as soon as we can. It is mad work to remove hypocrisy by removing the temptation to hypocrisy: the “frankness” of people sunk below shame is a very cheap frankness.

A recovery of the old sense of sin is essential to Christianity.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Daniel 9:6–8


For reflection: Daniel 12:1–4

What death is to each man, the Second Coming is to the whole human race.

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays



A TIME FOR PURIFICATION
Our souls demand Purgatory, don’t they? Would it not break the heart if God said to us, “It is true, my son, that your breath smells and your rags drip with mud and slime, but we are charitable here and no one will upbraid you with these things, nor draw away from you. Enter into the joy”? Should we not reply, “With submission, sir, and if there is no objection, I’d rather be cleaned first.” “It may hurt, you know”—”Even so, sir.”

I assume that the process of purification will normally involve suffering. Partly from tradition; partly because most real good that has been done me in this life has involved it. But I don’t think the suffering is the purpose of the purgation. I can well believe that people neither much worse nor much better than I will suffer less than I or more. “No nonsense about merit.” The treatment given will be the one required, whether it hurts little or much.

My favorite image on this matter comes from the dentist’s chair. I hope that when the tooth of life is drawn and I am “coming round,” a voice will say, “Rinse your mouth out with this.” This will be Purgatory. The rinsing may take longer than I can now imagine. The taste of this may be more fiery and astringent than my present sensibility could endure. But [no theologian] will persuade me that it will be disgusting and unhallowed.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Daniel 12:10

LESSON IN LOVE
Love may forgive all infirmities and love still in spite of them: but Love cannot cease to will their removal. Love is more sensitive than hatred itself to every blemish in the beloved; his “feeling is more soft and sensible than are the tender horns of cockled snails.” Of all powers he forgives most, but he condones least: he is pleased with little, but demands all.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Hosea 3:1–5


NO KNOWLEDGE OF GOD IN THE LAND
We continue to clamour for those very qualities we are rendering impossible. You can hardly open a periodical without coming across the statement that what our civilization needs is more “drive,” or dynamism, or self-sacrifice, or “creativity.” In a sort of ghastly simplicity we remove the organ and demand the function. We make men without chests and expect of them virtue and enterprise. We laugh at honour and are shocked to find traitors in our midst. We castrate and bid the geldings be fruitful.

—from The Abolition of Man

For reflection  Hosea 4:1–19

GOD DESIRES STEADFAST LOVE
One point in your story looms large in my mind—the fatal consequences of your husband’s lack of faith in you when he did not get those letters. For this is just how we also might desert God. If nothing, or nothing we recognise comes through, we imagine He has let us down and reject Him, perhaps at the very moment when help was on its way. No doubt your husband may have been readier to desert you because a quite different temptation had already begun. But then that applies to the God-Man situation also . . .

—from a letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September 2, 1949

For reflection  Hosea 6:4–6


WHAT GOD GIVES
God gives what He has, not what He has not: He gives the happiness that there is, not the happiness that is not. To be God—to be like God and to share His goodness in creaturely response—to be miserable—these are the only three alternatives. If we will not learn to eat the only food that the universe grows—the only food that any possible universe ever can grow—then we must starve eternally.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Hosea 14:1–7


REND YOUR HEARTS
A live body is not one that never gets hurt, but one that can to some extent repair itself. In the same way a Christian is not a man who never goes wrong, but a man who is enabled to repent and pick himself up and begin over again after each stumble—because the Christ-life is inside him, repairing him all the time, enabling him to repeat (in some degree) the kind of voluntary death which Christ Himself carried out.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Joel 2:12–13


YOUR PROUD HEART HAS DECEIVED YOU
When I said that your besetting sin was Indolence and mine Pride I was thinking of the old classification of the seven deadly sins: They are Gula (Gluttony), Luxuria (Unchastity), Accidia (Indolence), Ira (Anger), Superbia (Pride), Invidia (Envy), Avaricia (Avarice). Accidia, which is sometimes called Tristicia (despondence) is the kind of indolence which comes from indifference to the good—the mood in which though it tries to play on us we have no string to respond. Pride, on the other hand, is the mother of all sins, and the original sin of Lucifer—so you are rather better off than I am. You at your worst are an instrument unstrung: I am an instrument strung but preferring to play itself because it thinks it knows the tune better than the Musician.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, February 10, 1930 (begun January 30, 1930)

For reflection  Obadiah 3


EVADING GOD’S PRESENCE
Icall upon Him in prayer. Often He might reply—I think He does reply—“But you have been evading me for hours.” For He comes not only to raise up but to cast down; to deny, to rebuke, to interrupt. . . . The presence which we voluntarily evade is often, and we know it, His presence in wrath.

And out of this evil comes a good. If I never fled from His presence, then I should suspect those moments when I seemed to delight in it of being wish-fulfilment dreams. That, by the way, explains the feebleness of all those water versions of Christianity which leave out all the darker elements and try to establish a religion of pure consolation. No real belief in the watered versions can last. Bemused and besotted as we are, we still dimly know at heart that nothing which is at all times and in every way agreeable to us can have objective reality. It is of the very nature of the real that it should have sharp corners and rough edges, that it should be resistant, should be itself. Dream-furniture is the only kind on which you never stub your toes or bang your knee.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Jonah 1:3


For reflection: Jonah 1:16

Fear isn’t repentance—but it’s alright as a beginning—much better at that stage than not being afraid.

—from a letter to Patricia Thomson, December 8, 1941



For reflection: Jonah 3:4–10

God will use all repented evil as fuel for fresh good in the end.

—from a letter to Mary Neylan, April 18, 1940





For reflection: Jonah 4:1–11

We Goyim misread much of the O.T. because we start with the assumption that its sacred character excludes humour. That no one who knew the Jewish ethos from inside could fail to see the fully accepted comic element in Abraham’s dialogue with God (Genesis XVIII) or in Jonah.

—from a letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 30, 1959


For reflection: Micah 6:1–8

We might think that God wanted simply obedience to a set of rules: whereas He really wants people of a particular sort.

—from Mere Christianity




For reflection: Micah 7:19

SCREWTAPE COMPLAINS:

Even of his sins the Enemy does not want him to think too much: once they are repented, the sooner the man turns his attention outward, the better the Enemy is pleased.

—from The Screwtape Letters



For reflection: Nahum 1:9

The filth that our poor, muddled, sincere, resentful enemies fling at the Holy One, either does not stick, or, sticking, turns to glory.

—from “Miracles,” God in the Dock





GREAT IN POWER
Iwonder whether people who ask God to interfere openly and directly in our world quite realise what it will be like when He does. When that happens, it is the end of the world. When the author walks on to the stage the play is over. God is going to invade, all right: but what is the good of saying you are on His side then, when you see the whole natural universe melting away like a dream and something else—something it never entered your head to conceive—comes crashing in; something so beautiful to some of us and so terrible to others that none of us will have any choice left? For this time it will be God without disguise; something so overwhelming that it will strike either irresistible love or irresistible horror into every creature. It will be too late then to choose your side. There is no use saying you choose to lie down when it has become impossible to stand up. That will not be the time for choosing: it will be the time when we discover which side we really have chosen, whether we realised it before or not. Now, to-day, this moment, is our chance to choose the right side. God is holding back to give us that chance. It will not last for ever. We must take it or leave it.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Nahum 1:1–6


For reflection: Zephaniah 3:14–17

Our whole being by its very nature is one vast need; incomplete, preparatory, empty yet cluttered, crying out for Him who can untie things that are knotted together and tie up things that are still dangling loose.

—from The Four Loves


CONSIDER THE EMPTINESS OF YOUR EFFORTS
If the first and lowest operation of pain shatters the illusion that all is well, the second shatters the illusion that what we have, whether good or bad in itself, is our own and enough for us. Everyone has noticed how hard it is to turn our thoughts to God when everything is going well with us. We “have all we want” is a terrible saying when “all” does not include God. We find God an interruption. As St. Augustine says somewhere, “God wants to give us something, but cannot, because our hands are full—there’s nowhere for Him to put it.” Or as a friend of mine said, “We regard God as an airman regards his parachute; it’s there for emergencies but he hopes he’ll never have to use it.” Now God, who has made us, knows what we are and that our happiness lies in Him. Yet we will not seek it in Him as long as He leaves us any other resort where it can even plausibly be looked for. While what we call “our own life” remains agreeable we will not surrender it to Him. What then can God do in our interests but make “our own life” less agreeable to us, and take away the plausible source of false happiness?

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Haggai 1:1–6

THE SPIRIT OF GOD
The union between the Father and the Son is such a live concrete thing that this union itself is also a Person.... You know that among human beings, when they get together in a family, or a club, or a trade union, people talk about the “spirit” of that family, or club, or trade union. They talk about its “spirit” because the individual members, when they are together, do really develop particular ways of talking and behaving which they would not have if they were apart. It is as if a sort of communal personality came into existence. Of course, it is not a real person: it is only rather like a person. But that is just one of the differences between God and us. What grows out of the joint life of the Father and Son is a real Person, is in fact the Third of the three Persons who are God.

This third Person is called . . . the Holy Ghost or the “spirit” of God.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Zechariah 4:1–6



For reflection: Zechariah 4:6

After the first few steps in the Christian life we realise that everything which really needs to be done in our souls can be done only by God.

—from Mere Christianity





For reflection: Zechariah 7:8–14

For a damned soul is nearly nothing: it is shrunk, shut up in itself. Good beats upon the damned incessantly as sound waves beat on the ears of the deaf, but they cannot receive it. Their fists are clenched, their teeth are clenched, their eyes fast shut. First they will not, in the end they cannot, open their hands for gifts, or their mouth for food, or their eyes to see.

—from The Great Divorce




For reflection: Zechariah 14:1–11

The doctrine of the Second Coming has failed, so far as we are concerned, if it does not make us realize that at every moment of every year in our lives Donne’s question “What if this present were the world’s last night?” is equally relevant.

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays




GOD’S VIEW OF MARRIAGE
The Christian idea of marriage is based on Christ’s words that a man and wife are to be regarded as a single organism—for that is what the words “one flesh” would be in modern English. And the Christians believe that when He said this He was not expressing a sentiment but stating a fact—just as one is stating a fact when one says that a lock and its key are one mechanism, or that a violin and a bow are one musical instrument. The inventor of the human machine was telling us that its two halves, the male and the female, were made to be combined together in pairs, not simply on the sexual level, but totally combined. The monstrosity of sexual intercourse outside marriage is that those who indulge in it are trying to isolate one kind of union (the sexual) from all the other kinds of union which were intended to go along with it and make up the total union. The Christian attitude does not mean that there is anything wrong about sexual pleasure, any more than about the pleasure of eating. It means that you must not isolate that pleasure and try to get it by itself, any more than you ought to try to get the pleasures of taste without swallowing and, digesting, by chewing things and spitting them out again.

As a consequence, Christianity teaches that marriage is for life. There is, of course, a difference here between different Churches: some do not admit divorce at all; some allow it reluctantly in very special cases. It is a great pity that Christians should disagree about such a question; but for an ordinary layman the thing to notice is that the Churches all agree with one another about marriage a great deal more than any of them agrees with the outside world. I mean, they all regard divorce as something like cutting up a living body, as a kind of surgical operation. Some of them think the operation so violent that it cannot be done at all; others admit it as a desperate remedy in extreme cases. They are all agreed that it is more like having both your legs cut off than it is like dissolving a business partnership or even deserting a regiment. What they all disagree with is the modern view that it is a simple readjustment of partners, to be made whenever people feel they are no longer in love with one another, or when either of them falls in love with someone else.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Malachi 2:15–16

THE REFINER’S FIRE
When a man turns to Christ and seems to be getting on pretty well (in the sense that some of his bad habits are now corrected) he often feels that it would now be natural if things went fairly smoothly. When troubles come along—illnesses, money troubles, new kinds of temptation—he is disappointed. These things, he feels, might have been necessary to rouse him and make him repent in his bad old days; but why now? Because God is forcing him on, or up, to a higher level: putting him into situations where he will have to be very much braver, or more patient, or more loving, than he ever dreamed of being before. It seems to us all unnecessary: but that is because we have not yet had the slightest notion of the tremendous thing He means to make of us.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Malachi 3:2


For reflection: Malachi 3:10

The limit of giving is to be the limit of our ability to give.

—from English Literature in the Sixteenth Century


 

NEW

 

TESTAMENT

THE GOSPEL ACCORDING TO
MATTHEW
Matthew 1

Matthew 2

Matthew 3

Matthew 4

Matthew 5

Matthew 6

Matthew 7

Matthew 8

Matthew 9

Matthew 10

Matthew 11

Matthew 12

Matthew 13

Matthew 14

Matthew 15

Matthew 16

Matthew 17

Matthew 18

Matthew 19

Matthew 20

Matthew 21

Matthew 22

Matthew 23

Matthew 24

Matthew 25

Matthew 26

Matthew 27

Matthew 28


THE INCARNATION
In the Christian story God descends to reascend. He comes down; down from the heights of absolute being into time, and space, down into humanity; down further still, if embryologists are right, to recapitulate in the womb ancient and pre-human phases of life; down to the very roots and seabed of the Nature He has created. But He goes down to come up again and bring the whole ruined world up with Him. One has the picture of a strong man stooping lower and lower to get himself underneath some great complicated burden. He must stoop in order to lift, he must almost disappear under the load before he incredibly straightens his back and marches off with the whole mass swaying on his shoulders. . . .

In this descent and reascent everyone will recognise a familiar pattern: a thing written all over the world. It is the pattern of all vegetable life. It must belittle itself into something hard, small and deathlike, it must fall into the ground: thence the new life reascends. It is the pattern of all animal generation too. There is descent from the full and perfect organisms into the spermatozoon and ovum, and in the dark womb a life at first inferior in kind to that of the species which is being reproduced: then the slow ascent to the perfect embryo, to the living, conscious baby, and finally to the adult. So it is also in our moral and emotional life. The first innocent and spontaneous desires have to submit to the deathlike process of control or total denial: but from that there is a reascent to fully formed character in which the strength of the original material all operates but in a new way. Death and Rebirth—go down to go up—it is a key principle. Through this bottleneck, this belittlement, the highroad nearly always lies.

The doctrine of the Incarnation, if accepted, puts this principle even more emphatically at the centre. The pattern is there in Nature because it was first there in God. All the instances of it which I have mentioned turn out to be but transpositions of the Divine theme into a minor key.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Matthew 1:18–25

For reflection: Matthew 1:23

Christianity is not merely what a man does with his solitude. It is not even what God does with His solitude. It tells of God descending into the coarse publicity of history and there enacting what can—and must—be talked about.

—from “The Founding of the Oxford Socratic Club,” God in the Dock



For reflection: Matthew 5:8

Heaven offers nothing that a mercenary soul can desire. It is safe to tell the pure in heart that they shall see God, for only the pure in heart want to.

—from The Problem of Pain


NOT TO ABOLISH BUT TO FULFILL
This is one of the rewards of reading the Old Testament regularly. You keep on discovering more and more what a tissue of quotations from it the New Testament is; how constantly Our Lord repeated, reinforced, continued, refined, and sublimated, the Judaic ethics, how very seldom He introduced a novelty.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Matthew 5:17–18

BE PERFECT
I find a good many people have been bothered by . . . Our Lord’s words, “Be ye perfect.” Some people seem to think this means “Unless you are perfect, I will not help you”; and as we cannot be perfect, then, if He meant that, our position is hopeless. But I do not think He did mean that. I think He meant “The only help I will give is help to become perfect. You may want something less: but I will give you nothing less.”

Let me explain. When I was a child I often had toothache, and I knew that if I went to my mother she would give me something which would deaden the pain for that night and let me get to sleep. But I did not go to my mother—at least, not till the pain became very bad. And the reason I did not go was this. I did not doubt she would give me the aspirin; but I knew she would also do something else. I knew she would take me to the dentist next morning. I could not get what I wanted out of her without getting something more, which I did not want. I wanted immediate relief from pain: but I could not get it without having my teeth set permanently right. And I knew those dentists: I knew they started fiddling about with all sorts of other teeth which had not yet begun to ache. They would not let sleeping dogs lie, if you gave them an inch they took an ell.

Now, if I may put it that way, Our Lord is like the dentists. If you give Him an inch, He will take an ell. Dozens of people go to Him to be cured of some one particular sin which they are ashamed of (like masturbation or physical cowardice) or which is obviously spoiling daily life (like bad temper or drunkenness). Well, He will cure it all right: but He will not stop there. That may be all you asked; but if once you call Him in, He will give you the full treatment.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Matthew 5:43–48

For reflection: Matthew 6:1–4, 16–21

A man is never so proud as when striking an attitude of humility!

—from “Christianity and Culture,” Christian Reflections



WHEN TO FORGIVE
We believe that God forgives us our sins; but also that He will not do so unless we forgive other people their sins against us. There is no doubt about the second part of this statement. It is in the Lord’s Prayer; it was emphatically stated by our Lord. If you don’t forgive, you will not be forgiven. No part of His teaching is clearer, and there are no exceptions to it. He doesn’t say that we are to forgive other people’s sins provided they are not too frightful, or provided there are extenuating circumstances, or anything of that sort. We are to forgive them all, however spiteful, however mean, however often they are repeated. If we don’t, we shall be forgiven none of our own.

—from “On Forgiveness,” The Weight of Glory

  

To be a Christian means to forgive the inexcusable, because God has forgiven the inexcusable in you.

This is hard. It is perhaps not so hard to forgive a single great injury. But to forgive the incessant provocations of daily life—to keep on forgiving the bossy mother-in-law, the bullying husband, the nagging wife, the selfish daughter, the deceitful son—how can we do it? Only, I think, by remembering where we stand, by meaning our words when we say in our prayers each night “forgive us our trespasses as we forgive those that trespass against us.” We are offered forgiveness on no other terms. To refuse it is to refuse God’s mercy for ourselves. There is no hint of exceptions and God means what He says.

—from “On Forgiveness,” The Weight of Glory

  

To forgive for the moment is not difficult. But to go on forgiving, to forgive the same offence again every time it recurs to the memory—there’s the real tussle. My resource is to look for some action of my own which is open to the same charge as the one I’m resenting, If I still smart to remember how A let me down, I must still remember how I let B down. If I find it difficult to forgive those who bullied me at school, let me, at that very moment, remember, and pray for, those I bullied.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Matthew 6:12


INTO THE FUTURE
SCREWTAPE EXPLAINS:
Our business is to get them away from the eternal, and from the Present. With this in view, we sometimes tempt a human (say a widow or a scholar) to live in the Past. But this is of limited value, for they have some real knowledge of the past and it has a determinate nature and, to that extent, resembles eternity. It is far better to make them live in the Future. . . . In a word, the Future is, of all things, the thing least like eternity. It is the most completely temporal part of time—for the Past is frozen and no longer flows, and the Present is all lit up with eternal rays....

To be sure, the Enemy wants men to think of the Future too—just so much as is necessary for now planning the acts of justice or charity which will probably be their duty tomorrow. The duty of planning the morrow’s work is today’s duty; though its material is borrowed from the future, the duty, like all duties, is in the Present. This is now straw splitting. He does not want men to give the Future their hearts, to place their treasure in it. We do. His ideal is a man who, having worked all day for the good of posterity (if that is his vocation), washes his mind of the whole subject, commits the issue to Heaven, and returns at once to the patience or gratitude demanded by the moment that is passing over him. But we want a man hag-ridden by the Future—haunted by visions of an imminent heaven or hell upon earth—ready to break the Enemy’s commands in the present if by so doing we make him think he can attain the one or avert the other—dependent for his faith on the success or failure of schemes whose end he will not live to see . We want a whole race perpetually in pursuit of the rainbow’s end, never honest, nor kind, nor happy now, but always using as mere fuel wherewith to heap the altar of the future every real gift which is offered them in the Present.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Matthew 6:34


BEARING GOOD FRUIT
The terrible thing, the almost impossible thing, is to hand over your whole self—all your wishes and precautions—to Christ. But it is far easier than what we are all trying to do instead. For what we are trying to do is to remain what we call “ourselves,” to keep personal happiness as our great aim in life, and yet at the same time be “good.” We are all trying to let our mind and heart go their own way—centred on money or pleasure or ambition—and hoping, in spite of this, to behave honestly and chastely and humbly. And that is exactly what Christ warned us you could not do. As He said, a thistle cannot produce figs. If I am a field that contains nothing but grass-seed, I cannot produce wheat. Cutting the grass may keep it short: but I shall still produce grass and no wheat. If I want to produce wheat, the change must go deeper than the surface. I must be ploughed up and re-sown.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Matthew 7:16–20


RELIGIOUS PRIDE
How is it that people who are quite obviously eaten up with Pride can say they believe in God and appear to themselves very religious? I am afraid it means they are worshipping an imaginary God. They theoretically admit themselves to be nothing in the presence of this phantom God, but are really all the time imagining how He approves of them and thinks them far better than ordinary people: that is, they pay a pennyworth of imaginary humility to Him and get out of it a pound’s worth of Pride towards their fellow-men. I suppose it was of those people Christ was thinking when He said that some would preach about Him and cast out devils in His name, only to be told at the end of the world that He had never known them. And any of us may at any moment be in this death-trap. Luckily, we have a test. Whenever we find that our religious life is making us feel that we are good—above all, that we are better than someone else—l think we may be sure that we are being acted on, not by God, but by the devil. The real test of being in the presence of God is, that you either forget about yourself altogether or see yourself as a small, dirty object. It is better to forget about yourself altogether.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Matthew 7:21–23


HE TAUGHT WITH AUTHORITY
We may observe that the teaching of Our Lord Himself, in which there is no imperfection, is not given us in that cut-and-dried, fool-proof, systematic fashion we might have expected or desired. He wrote no book. We have only reported sayings, most of them uttered in answer to questions, shaped in some degree by their context. And when we have collected them all we cannot reduce them to a system. He preaches but He does not lecture. He uses paradox, proverb, exaggeration, parable, irony; even (I mean no irreverence) the “wise-crack.” He utters maxims which, like popular proverbs, if rigorously taken, may seem to contradict one another. His teaching therefore cannot be grasped by the intellect alone, cannot be “got up” as if it were a “subject.” If we try to do that with it, we shall find Him the most elusive of teachers. He hardly ever gave a straight answer to a straight question. He will not be, in the way we want, “pinned down.” The attempt is (again, I mean no irreverence) like trying to bottle a sunbeam.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Matthew 7:28–29

AN ACTUAL HELL
About Hell. All I have ever said is that the N.T. plainly implies the possibility of some being finally left in “the outer darkness.” Whether this means (horror of horror) being left to a purely mental existence, left with nothing at all but one’s own envy, prurience, resentment, loneliness & self conceit, or whether there is still some sort of environment, something you cd. call a world or a reality, I wd. never pretend to know. But I wouldn’t put the question in the form “do I believe in an actual Hell.” One’s own mind is actual enough. If it doesn’t seem fully actual now that is because you can always escape from it a bit into the physical world—look out of the window, smoke a cigarette, go to sleep. But when there is nothing for you but your own mind (no body to go to sleep, no books or landscape, no sounds, no drugs) it will be as actual as—as—well, as a coffin is actual to a man buried alive.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, May 13, 1946

For reflection  Matthew 8:11–12


WISE AS SERPENTS, INNOCENT AS DOVES
Prudence means practical common sense, taking the trouble to think out what you are doing and what is likely to come of it. Nowadays most people hardly think of Prudence as one of the “virtues.” In fact, because Christ said we could only get into His world by being like children, many Christians have the idea that, provided you are “good,” it does not matter being a fool. But that is a misunderstanding. In the first place, most children show plenty of “prudence” about doing the things they are really interested in, and think them out quite sensibly. In the second place, as St. Paul points out, Christ never meant that we were to remain children in intelligence: on the contrary. He told us to be not only “as harmless as doves,” but also “as wise as serpents.” He wants a child’s heart, but a grown-up’s head. He wants us to be simple, single-minded, affectionate, and teachable, as good children are; but He also wants every bit of intelligence we have to be alert at its job, and in first-class fighting trim. The fact that you are giving money to a charity does not mean that you need not try to find out whether that charity is a fraud or not. The fact that what you are thinking about is God Himself (for example, when you are praying) does not mean that you can be content with the same babyish ideas which you had when you were a five-year-old. It is, of course, quite true that God will not love you any the less, or have less use for you, if you happen to have been born with a very second-rate brain. He has room for people with very little sense, but He wants every one to use what sense they have.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Matthew 10:16

THE CHRISTIAN WAY
The ordinary idea which we all have before we become Christians is this. We take as starting point our ordinary self with its various desires and interests. We then admit that something else—call it “morality” or “decent behaviour,” or “the good of society”—has claims on this self: claims which interfere with its own desires. What we mean by “being good” is giving in to those claims. Some of the things the ordinary self wanted to do turn out to be what we call “wrong”: well, we must give them up. Other things, which the self did not want to do, turn out to be what we call “right”: well, we shall have to do them. But we are hoping all the time that when all the demands have been met, the poor natural self will still have some chance, and some time, to get on with its own life and do what it likes. In fact, we are very like an honest man paying his taxes. He pays them all right, but he does hope that there will be enough left over for him to live on. Because we are still taking our natural self as the starting point.

As long as we are thinking that way, one or other of two results is likely to follow. Either we give up trying to be good, or else we become very unhappy indeed. For, make no mistake: if you are really going to try to meet all the demands made on the natural self, it will not have enough left over to live on. The more you obey your conscience, the more your conscience will demand of you. And your natural self, which is thus being starved and hampered and worried at every turn, will get angrier and angrier. In the end, you will either give up trying to be good, or else become one of those people who, as they say, “live for others” but always in a discontented, grumbling way—always wondering why the others do not notice it more and always making a martyr of yourself. And once you have become that you will be a far greater pest to anyone who has to live with you than you would have been if you had remained frankly selfish.

The Christian way is different: harder, and easier. Christ says “Give me All. I don’t want so much of your time and so much of your money and so much of your work: I want You. I have not come to torment your natural self, but to kill it. No half-measures are any good. I don’t want to cut off a branch here and a branch there, I want to have the whole tree down. I don’t want to drill the tooth, or crown it, or stop it, but to have it out. Hand over the whole natural self, all the desires which you think innocent as well as the ones you think wicked—the whole outfit. I will give you a new self instead. In fact, I will give you Myself: my own will shall become yours.”

Both harder and easier than what we are all trying to do. You have noticed, I expect, that Christ Himself sometimes describes the Christian way as very hard, sometimes as very easy. He says, “Take up your Cross”—in other words, it is like going to be beaten to death in a concentration camp. Next minute he says, “My yoke is easy and my burden light.” He means both.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Matthew 11:28–30

TEACHING THROUGH PARABLE
It is perhaps idle to speak here of spirit and letter. There is almost no “letter” in the words of Jesus. Taken by a literalist, He will always prove the most elusive of teachers. Systems cannot keep up with that darting illumination. No net less wide than a man’s whole heart, nor less fine of mesh than love, will hold the sacred Fish.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

WHEN WE RECEIVE GRACE
I do get that sudden feeling that the whole thing is hocus pocus and it now worries me hardly at all. Surely the mechanism is quite simple? Sceptical, incredulous, materialistic ruts have been deeply engraved in our thought, perhaps even in our physical brains by all our earlier lives. At the slightest jerk our thought will flow down those old ruts. And notice when the jerks come. Usually at the precise moment when we might receive Grace. And if you were a devil would you not give the jerk just at those moments? I think that all Christians have found that he is v. active near the altar or on the eve of conversion: worldly anxieties, physical discomforts, lascivious fancies, doubt, are often poured in at such junctures . . . But the Grace is not frustrated. One gets more by pressing steadily on through these interruptions than on occasions when all goes smoothly. . . .

—from a letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” March 5, 1951

For reflection  Matthew 14:22–33

For reflection: Matthew 16:21–23

When natural things look most divine, the demoniac is just round the corner.

—from The Four Loves



HATE THE SIN, NOT THE SINNER
It is made perfectly clear that if we do not forgive we shall not be forgiven. There are no two ways about it. What are we to do?

It is going to be hard enough, anyway, but I think there are two things we can do to make it easier. When you start mathematics you do not begin with the calculus; you begin with simple addition. In the same way, if we really want (but all depends on really wanting) to learn how to forgive, perhaps we had better start with something easier than the Gestapo. One might start with forgiving one’s husband or wife, or parents or children, or the nearest N.C.O., for something they have done or said in the last week. That will probably keep us busy for the moment. And secondly, we might try to understand exactly what loving your neighbour as yourself means. I have to love him as I love myself. Well, how exactly do I love myself?

Now that I come to think of it, I have not exactly got a feeling of fondness or affection for myself, and I do not even always enjoy my own society. So apparently “Love your neighbour” does not mean “feel fond of him” or “find him attractive.” I ought to have seen that before, because, of course, you cannot feel fond of a person by trying. Do I think well of myself, think myself a nice chap? Well, I am afraid I sometimes do (and those are, no doubt, my worst moments) but that is not why I love myself. In fact it is the other way round: my self-love makes me think myself nice, but thinking myself nice is not why I love myself. So loving my enemies does not apparently mean thinking them nice either. That is an enormous relief. For a good many people imagine that forgiving your enemies means making out that they are really not such bad fellows after all, when it is quite plain that they are. Go a step further. In my most clear-sighted moments not only do I not think myself a nice man, but I know that I am a very nasty one. I can look at some of the things I have done with horror and loathing. So apparently I am allowed to loathe and hate some of the things my enemies do. Now that I come to think of it, I remember Christian teachers telling me long ago that I must hate a bad man’s actions, but not hate the bad man: or, as they would say, hate the sin but not the sinner.

For a long time I used to think this a silly, straw-splitting distinction: how could you hate what a man did and not hate the man? But years later it occurred to me that there was one man to whom I had been doing this all my life—namely myself. However much I might dislike my own cowardice or conceit or greed, I went on loving myself. There had never been the slightest difficulty about it. In fact the very reason why I hated the things was that I loved the man. Just because I loved myself, I was sorry to find that I was the sort of man who did those things. Consequently, Christianity does not want us to reduce by one atom the hatred we feel for cruelty and treachery. We ought to hate them. Not one word of what we have said about them needs to be unsaid. But it does want us to hate them in the same way in which we hate things in ourselves: being sorry that the man should have done such things, and hoping, if it is anyway possible, that somehow, sometime, somewhere he can be cured and made human again.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Matthew 18:21–35


REFLECTING GOD PERFECTLY
The command Be ye perfect is not idealistic gas. Nor is it a command to do the impossible. He is going to make us into creatures that can obey that command. He said (in the Bible) that we were “gods” and He is going to make good His words. If we let Him—for we can prevent Him, if we choose—He will make the feeblest and filthiest of us into a god or goddess, a dazzling, radiant, immortal creature, pulsating all through with such energy and joy and wisdom and love as we cannot now imagine, a bright stainless mirror which reflects back to God perfectly (though, of course, on a smaller scale) His own boundless power and delight and goodness. The process will be long and in parts very painful, but that is what we are in for. Nothing less. He meant what He said.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Matthew 19:21


For reflection: Matthew 19:24

He who has God and everything else has no more than he who has God only.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory


WHERE FULLNESS AWAITS US
The letter and spirit of scripture, and of all Christianity, forbid us to suppose that life in the New Creation will be a sexual life; and this reduces our imagination to the withering alternative either of bodies which are hardly recognisable as human bodies at all or else of a perpetual fast. As regards the fast, I think our present outlook might be like that of a small boy who, on being told that the sexual act was the highest bodily pleasure should immediately ask whether you ate chocolates at the same time. On receiving the answer “No,” he might regard absence of chocolates as the chief characteristic of sexuality. In vain would you tell him that the reason why lovers in their carnal raptures don’t bother about chocolates is that they have something better to think of. The boy knows chocolate: he does not know the positive thing that excludes it. We are in the same position. We know the sexual life; we do not know, except in glimpses, the other thing which, in Heaven, will leave no room for it. Hence where fullness awaits us we anticipate fasting. In denying that sexual life, as we now understand it, makes any part of the final beatitude, it is not of course necessary to suppose that the distinction of sexes will disappear. What is no longer needed for biological purposes may be expected to survive for splendour. Sexuality is the instrument both of virginity and of conjugal virtue; neither men nor women will be asked to throw away weapons they have used victoriously. It is the beaten and the fugitives who throw away their swords. The conquerors sheathe theirs and retain them.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Matthew 22:24–30


For reflection: Matthew 22:37

An old saint, being asked whether it is easy or hard to love God, replied: “It is easy to those who do it.”

—from “Williams and the Arthuriad,” Arthurian Torso


WANTING TO BE SEEN BY OTHERS
We must not think Pride is something God forbids because He is offended at it, or that Humility is something He demands as due to His own dignity—as if God Himself was proud. He is not in the least worried about His dignity. The point is, He wants you to know Him: wants to give you Himself. And He and you are two things of such a kind that if you really get into any kind of touch with Him you will, in fact, be humble—delightedly humble, feeling the infinite relief of having for once got rid of all the silly nonsense about your own dignity which has made you restless and unhappy all your life. He is trying to make you humble in order to make this moment possible: trying to take off a lot of silly, ugly, fancy-dress in which we have all got ourselves up and are strutting about like the little idiots we are. I wish I had got a bit further with humility myself: if I had, I could probably tell you more about the relief, the comfort, of taking the fancy dress off—getting rid of the false self, with all its “Look at me” and “Aren’t I a good boy?” and all its posing and posturing. To get even near it, even for a moment, is like a drink of cold water to a man in a desert.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Matthew 23:5–7

WHEN THE END FEELS NEAR
War creates no absolutely new situation: it simply aggravates the permanent human situation so that we can no longer ignore it. Human life has always been lived on the edge of a precipice. Human culture has always had to exist under the shadow of something infinitely more important than itself. If men had postponed the search for knowledge and beauty until they were secure, the search would never have begun. We are mistaken when we compare war with “normal life.” Life has never been normal.

—from “Learning in War-Time,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Matthew 24:6


For reflection: Matthew 24:34–35

We must at all costs not move with the times. We serve One who said, “Heaven and Earth shall move with the times, but my words shall not move with the times.”

—from “Christian Apologetics,” God in the Dock



KEEP AWAKE
Precisely because we cannot predict the moment, we must be ready at all moments. Our Lord repeated this practical conclusion again and again; as if the promise of the Return had been made for the sake of this conclusion alone. Watch, watch, is the burden of his advice. I shall come like a thief. You will not, I most solemnly assure you you will not see me approaching. If the householder had known at what time the burglar would arrive, he would have been ready for him. If the servant had known when his absent employer would come home, he would not have been found drunk in the kitchen. But they didn’t. Nor will you. Therefore you must be ready at all times. The point is surely simple enough. The schoolboy does not know which part of his Virgil lesson he will be made to translate: that is why he must be prepared to translate any passage. The sentry does not know at what time an enemy will attack, or an officer inspect, his post: that is why he must keep awake all the time. The Return is wholly unpredictable. There will be wars and rumours of wars and all kinds of catastrophes, as there always are. Things will be, in that sense, normal, the hour before the heavens roll up like a scroll. You cannot guess it.

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Matthew 24:36–44


HIDING OUR TALENTS
To love at all is to be vulnerable. Love anything, and your heart will certainly be wrung and possibly broken. If you want to make sure of keeping it intact, you must give your heart to no one, not even to an animal. Wrap it carefully round with hobbies and little luxuries; avoid all entanglements; lock it up safe in the casket or coffin of your selfishness. But in that casket—safe, dark, motionless, airless—it will change. It will not be broken; it will become unbreakable, impenetrable, irredeemable. The alternative to tragedy, or at least to the risk of tragedy, is damnation. The only place outside Heaven where you can be perfectly safe from all dangers and perturbations of love is Hell.

I believe that the most lawless and inordinate loves are less contrary to God’s will than a self-invited and self-protective lovelessness. It is like hiding the talent in a napkin and for much the same reason. “I knew thee that thou wert a hard man.” Christ did not teach and suffer that we might become, even in the natural loves, more careful of our own happiness. If a man is not uncalculating towards the earthly beloveds whom he has seen, he is none the more likely to be so towards God whom he has not. We shall draw nearer to God, not by trying to avoid the sufferings inherent in all loves, but by accepting them and offering them to Him; throwing away all defensive armour. If our hearts need to be broken, and if He chooses this as the way in which they should break, so be it.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  Matthew 25:14–30


WHEN DID WE FEED YOU?

I think that every prayer which is sincerely made even to a false god or to a v. imperfectly conceived true God, is accepted by the true God and that Christ saves many who do not think they know Him. For He is (dimly) present in the good side of the inferior teachers they follow. In the parable of the Sheep & Goats (Matt. XXV. 31 and following) those who are saved do not seem to know that they have served Christ. But of course our anxiety about unbelievers is most usefully employed when it leads us not to speculation but to earnest prayer for them and the attempt to be in our own lives such good advertisements for Christianity as will make it attractive.

—from a letter to Mrs. Johnson, November 8, 1952

For reflection  Matthew 25:31–46

TAKE, EAT
I hope I do not offend God by making my Communions in the frame of mind I have been describing. The command, after all, was Take, eat: not Take, understand. Particularly, I hope I need not be tormented by the question “What is this?”—this wafer, this sip of wine. That has a dreadful effect on me. It invites me to take “this” out of its holy context and regard it as an object among objects, indeed as part of nature. It is like taking a red coal out of the fire to examine it: it becomes a dead coal. To me, I mean. All this is autobiography, not theology.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Matthew 26:26


NOT WHAT I WANT BUT WHAT YOU WANT
Our act, when we pray, must not, any more than all our other acts, be separated from the continuous act of God Himself, in which alone all finite causes operate. It would be even worse to think of those who get what they pray for as a sort of court favorites, people who have influence with the throne. The refused prayer of Christ in Gethsemane is answer enough to that. And I dare not leave out the hard saying which I once heard from an experienced Christian: “I have seen many striking answers to prayer and more than one that I thought miraculous. But they usually come at the beginning: before conversion, or soon after it. As the Christian life proceeds, they tend to be rarer. The refusals, too, are not only more frequent; they become more unmistakable, more emphatic.”

Does God then forsake just those who serve him best? Well, He who served Him best of all said, near His tortured death, “Why hast thou forsaken me?” When God becomes man, that Man, of all others, is least comforted by God, at His greatest need. There is a mystery here which, even if I had the power, I might not have the courage to explore. Meanwhile, little people like you and me, if our prayers are sometimes granted, beyond all hope and probability, had better not draw hasty conclusions to our own advantage. If we were stronger, we might be less tenderly treated. If we were braver, we might be sent, with far less help, to defend far more desperate posts in the great battle.

—from “The Efficacy of Prayer,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Matthew 26:36–46


PILATE’S CHOICE
SCREWTAPE WEIGHS HIS OPTIONS:
There is here a cruel dilemma before us. If we promoted justice and charity among men, we should be playing directly into the Enemy’s hands; but if we guide them to the opposite behaviour, this sooner or later produces (for He permits it to produce) a war or a revolution, and the undisguisable issue of cowardice or courage awakes thousands of men from moral stupor.

This, indeed, is probably one of the Enemy’s motives for creating a dangerous world—a world in which moral issues really come to the point. He sees as well as you do that courage is not simply one of the virtues, but the form of every virtue at the testing point, which means, at the point of highest reality. A chastity or honesty, or mercy, which yields to danger will be chaste or honest or merciful only on conditions. Pilate was merciful till it became risky.

—from The Screwtape Letters


HEREIN IS LOVE
God, who needs nothing, loves into existence wholly superfluous creatures in order that He may love and perfect them. He creates the universe, already foreseeing . . . the buzzing cloud of flies about the cross, the flayed back pressed against the uneven stake, the nails driven through the mesial nerves, the repeated incipient suffocation as the body droops, the repeated torture of back and arms as it is time after time, for breath’s sake, hitched up. If I may dare the biological image, God is a “host” who deliberately creates His own parasites, causes us to be that we may exploit and “take advantage of” Him. Herein is love. This is the diagram of Love Himself, the inventor of all loves.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  Matthew 27:27–50


THE ULTIMATE LAW
What God sends us must be sent in love and will all be for the best if we have the grace to use it so. My mind doesn’t waver on this point; my feelings sometimes do. That’s why it does me good to hear what I believe repeated in your voice—it being the rule of the universe that others can do for us what we cannot do for ourselves and one can paddle every canoe except one’s own. That is why Christ’s suffering for us is not mere theological dodge but the supreme case of the law that governs the whole world: and when they mocked him by saying “He saved others, himself he cannot save” they were really uttering, little as they knew it, the ultimate law of the spiritual world.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, July 2, 1949

For reflection  Matthew 27:42


For reflection: Mark 1:12–13

There is no neutral ground in the universe: every square inch, every split second, is claimed by God and counterclaimed by Satan.

—from “Christianity and Culture,”

Christian Reflections



AS ONE HAVING AUTHORITY
The things He says are very different from what any other teacher has said. Others say, “This is the truth about the Universe. This is the way you ought to go,” but He says, “I am the Truth, and the Way, and the Life.” He says, “No man can reach absolute reality, except through Me. Try to retain your own life and you will be inevitably ruined. Give yourself away and you will be saved.” He says, “If you are ashamed of Me, if, when you hear this call, you turn the other way, I also will look the other way when I come again as God without disguise. If anything whatever is keeping you from God and from Me, whatever it is, throw it away. If it is your eye, pull it out. If it is your hand, cut it off. If it is your self first you will be last. Come to Me everyone who is carrying a heavy load, I will set that right. Your sins, all of them, are wiped out, I can do that. I am Re-birth, I am Life. Eat Me, drink Me, I am your Food. And finally, do not be afraid, I have overcome the whole Universe.” That is the issue.

—from “What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” God in the Dock

For reflection  Mark 1:21–22

A LIAR, A LUNATIC, OR THE SON OF GOD
Among these Jews there suddenly turns up a man who goes about talking as if He was God. He claims to forgive sins. He says He has always existed. He says He is coming to judge the world at the end of time. Now let us get this clear. Among Pantheists, like the Indians, anyone might say that he was a part of God, or one with God: there would be nothing very odd about it. But this man, since He was a Jew, could not mean that kind of God. God, in their language, meant the Being outside the world, who had made it and was infinitely different from anything else. And when you have grasped that, you will see that what this man said was, quite simply, the most shocking thing that has ever been uttered by human lips.

One part of the claim tends to slip past us unnoticed because we have heard it so often that we no longer see what it amounts to. I mean the claim to forgive sins: any sins. Now unless the speaker is God, this is really so preposterous as to be comic. We can all understand how a man forgives offences against himself. You tread on my toes and I forgive you, you steal my money and I forgive you. But what should we make of a man, himself unrobbed and untrodden on, who announced that he forgave you for treading on other men’s toes and stealing other men’s money? Asinine fatuity is the kindest description we should give of his conduct. Yet this is what Jesus did. He told people that their sins were forgiven, and never waited to consult all the other people whom their sins had undoubtedly injured. He unhesitatingly behaved as if He was the party chiefly concerned, the person chiefly offended in all offences. This makes sense only if He really was the God whose laws are broken and whose love is wounded in every sin. In the mouth of any speaker who is not God, these words would imply what I can only regard as a silliness and conceit unrivalled by any other character in history.

Yet (and this is the strange, significant thing) even His enemies, when they read the Gospels, do not usually get the impression of silliness and conceit. Still less do unprejudiced readers. Christ says that He is “humble and meek” and we believe Him; not noticing that, if He were merely a man, humility and meekness are the very last characteristics we could attribute to some of His sayings.

I am trying here to prevent anyone saying the really foolish thing that people often say about Him: “I’m ready to accept Jesus as a great moral teacher, but I don’t accept His claim to be God.” That is the one thing we must not say. A man who was merely a man and said the sort of things Jesus said would not be a great moral teacher. He would either be a lunatic—on a level with the man who says he is a poached egg—or else he would be the Devil of Hell. You must make your choice. Either this man was, and is, the Son of God: or else a madman or something worse. You can shut Him up for a fool, you can spit at Him and kill Him as a demon; or you can fall at His feet and call Him Lord and God. But let us not come with any patronising nonsense about His being a great human teacher. He has not left that open to us. He did not intend to.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Mark 2:1–12

SENT OUT TWO BY TWO
For He seems to do nothing of Himself which He can possibly delegate to His creatures. He commands us to do slowly and blunderingly what He could do perfectly and in the twinkling of an eye....We are not mere recipients or spectators. We are either privileged to share in the game or compelled to collaborate in the work.

—from “The Efficacy of Prayer,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Mark 6:1–13

THE PERSISTENT GENTILE
I think myself that the point of the shocking reply to the Syrophenician woman (it came alright in the end) is to remind all us Gentile Christians—who forget it easily enough & even flirt with anti-Semitism—that the Jews are spiritually senior to us, that God did entrust the descendants of Abraham with the first revelation of Himself. To “put us in our place.”

—from a letter to Mrs. Johnson, May 14, 1955

For reflection  Mark 7:24–30


WE ARE FAR TOO EASILY PLEASED
The New Testament has lots to say about self-denial, but not about self-denial as an end in itself. We are told to deny ourselves and to take up our crosses in order that we may follow Christ; and nearly every description of what we shall ultimately find if we do so contains an appeal to desire. If there lurks in most modern minds the notion that to desire our own good and earnestly to hope for the enjoyment of it is a bad thing, I submit that this notion has crept in from Kant and the Stoics and is no part of the Christian faith. Indeed, if we consider the unblushing promises of reward and the staggering nature of the rewards promised in the Gospels, it would seem that Our Lord finds our desires not too strong, but too weak. We are half-hearted creatures, fooling about with drink and sex and ambition when infinite joy is offered us, like an ignorant child who wants to go on making mud pies in a slum because he cannot imagine what is meant by the offer of a holiday at the sea. We are far too easily pleased.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Mark 8:34–35


HELP MY UNBELIEF!
Don’t bother at all about that question of a person being “made a Christian” by baptism. It is only the usual trouble about words being used in more than one sense. Thus we might say a man “became a soldier” the moment that he joined the army. But his instructors might say six months later “I think we have made a soldier of him.” Both usages are quite definable, only one wants to know which is being used in a given sentence. The Bible itself gives us one short prayer which is suitable for all who are struggling with the beliefs and doctrines. It is: “LORD I believe, help Thou my unbelief.” Would something of this sort be any good?: Almighty God, who art the father of lights and who has promised by thy dear Son that all who do thy will shall know thy doctrine: give me grace so to live that by daily obedience I daily increase in faith and in the understanding of thy Holy Word, through Jesus Christ our Lord. Amen.

—from a letter to Genia Goelz, March 18, 1952

For reflection  Mark 9:14–24

MONEY TROUBLE
Christ said it was difficult for “the rich” to enter the Kingdom of Heaven, referring, no doubt, to “riches” in the ordinary sense. But I think it really covers riches in every sense—good fortune, health, popularity, and all the things one wants to have. All these things tend—just as money tends—to make you feel independent of God, because if you have them you are happy already and contented in this life. You don’t want to turn away to anything more, and so you try to rest in a shadowy happiness as if it could last for ever. But God wants to give you a real and eternal happiness. Consequently He may have to take all these “riches” away from you: if He doesn’t, you will go on relying on them. It sounds cruel, doesn’t it? But I am beginning to find out that what people call the cruel doctrines are really the kindest ones in the long run. I used to think it was a “cruel” doctrine to say that troubles and sorrows were “punishments.” But I find in practice that when you are in trouble, the moment you regard it as a “punishment,” it becomes easier to bear. If you think of this world as a place intended simply for our happiness, you find it quite intolerable: think of it as a place of training and correction and it’s not so bad.

—from “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Mark 10:17–31

For reflection: Mark 11:22–24

For most of us the prayer in Gethsemane is the only model. Removing mountains can wait.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer



For reflection: Mark 12:28–34

Every Christian would agree that a man’s spiritual health is exactly proportional to his love for God.

—from The Four Loves




KEEP ALERT
Think of yourself just as a seed patiently wintering in the earth; waiting to come up a flower in the Gardener’s good time, up into the real world, the real waking. I suppose that our whole present life, looked back on from there, will seem only a drowsy half-waking. We are here in the land of dreams. But cock-crow is coming. It is nearer now than when I began this letter.

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, June 28, 1963

For reflection  Mark 13:32


WHEN HE COMES SUDDENLY
If you do not believe our Lord’s words, why do you believe in his return at all? And if you do believe them must you not put away from you, utterly and forever, any hope of dating that return? His teaching on the subject quite clearly consisted of three propositions, (1) That he will certainly return. (2) That we cannot possibly find out when. (3) And that therefore we must always be ready for him.

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Mark 13:32–37


UNANSWERED PRAYER
Some things are proved by the unbroken uniformity of our experiences. The law of gravitation is established by the fact that, in our experience, all bodies without exception obey it. Now even if all the things that people prayed for happened, which they do not, this would not prove what Christians mean by the efficacy of prayer. For prayer is request. The essence of request, as distinct from compulsion, is that it may or may not be granted. And if an infinitely wise Being listens to the requests of finite and foolish creatures, of course He will sometimes grant and sometimes refuse them. Invariable “success” in prayer would not prove the Christian doctrine at all. It would prove something much more like magic—a power in certain human beings to control, or compel, the course of nature.

There are, no doubt, passages in the New Testament which may seem at first sight to promise an invariable granting of our prayers. But that cannot be what they really mean. For in the very heart of the story we meet a glaring instance to the contrary. In Gethsemane the holiest of all petitioners prayed three times that a certain cup might pass from Him. It did not. After that the idea that prayer is recommended to us as a sort of infallible gimmick may be dismissed.

—from “The Efficacy of Prayer,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Mark 14:32–43


WORK TO BE DONE
We read of spiritual efforts, and our imagination makes us believe that, because we enjoy the idea of doing them, we have done them. I am appalled to see how much of the change wh. I thought I had undergone lately was only imaginary. The real work seems still to be done. It is so fatally easy to confuse an aesthetic appreciation of the spiritual life with the life itself—to dream that you have waked, washed, and dressed, & then to find yourself still in bed.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, June 15, 1930

For reflection  Mark 14:66–72


FORSAKEN BY ALL
Does not every movement in the Passion write large some common element in the sufferings of our race? First, the prayer of anguish; not granted. Then He turns to His friends. They are asleep—as ours, or we, are so often, or busy, or away, or preoccupied. Then He faces the Church; the very Church that He brought into existence. It condemns Him. This also is characteristic. In every Church, in every institution, there is something which sooner or later works against the very purpose for which it came into existence. But there seems to be another chance. There is the State; in this case, the Roman state. Its pretensions are far lower than those of the Jewish church, but for that very reason it may be free from local fanaticisms. It claims to be just on a rough, worldly level. Yet, but only so far as is consistent with political expediency and raison d’etat. One becomes a counter in a complicated game. But even now all is not lost. There is still an appeal to the People—the poor and simple whom He had blessed, whom He had healed and fed and taught, to whom He Himself belongs. But they have become over-night (it is nothing unusual) a murderous rabble shouting for His blood. There is, then, nothing left but God. And to God, God’s last words are “Why hast thou forsaken me?”

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Mark 15:1–34



THE SHORTER ENDING OF MARK

And all that had been commanded them they told briefly to those around Peter. And afterward Jesus himself sent out through them, from east to west, the sacred and imperishable proclamation of eternal salvation.[125] 

THE LONGER ENDING OF MARK


INCURABLY IRREVERENT
The same divine humility which decreed that God should become a baby at a peasant-woman’s breast, and later an arrested field-preacher in the hands of the Roman police, decreed also that He should be preached in a vulgar, prosaic and unliterary language. If you can stomach the one, you can stomach the other. The Incarnation is in that sense an irreverent doctrine: Christianity, in that sense, an incurably irreverent religion. When we expect that it should have come before the World in all the beauty that we now feel in the Authorised Version we are as wide of the mark as the Jews were in expecting that the Messiah would come as a great earthly King. The real sanctity, the real beauty and sublimity of the New Testament (as of Christ’s life) are of a different sort: miles deeper or further in.

—from “Modern Translations of the Bible,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Luke 1:1–4

For reflection: Luke 1:30

I believe no angel ever appears in Scripture without exciting terror: they always have to begin by saying “Fear not.”

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, March 4, 1953



THE MIRACLE AT THE CENTER
The central miracle asserted by Christians is the Incarnation. They say that God became Man. Every other miracle prepares for this, or exhibits this, or results from this. Just as every natural event is the manifestation at a particular place and moment of Nature’s total character, so every particular Christian miracle manifests at a particular place and moment the character and significance of the Incarnation. There is no question in Christianity of arbitrary interferences just scattered about. It relates not a series of disconnected raids on Nature but the various steps of a strategically coherent invasion—an invasion which intends complete conquest and “occupation.”

—from Miracles

For reflection  Luke 1:26–35


THE NATIVITY
Among the oxen (like an ox I’m slow)

I see a glory in the stable grow

Which, with the ox’s dullness might at length

Give me an ox’s strength.


Among the asses (stubborn I as they)

I see my Saviour where I looked for hay;

So may my beastlike folly learn at least

The patience of a beast.


Among the sheep (I like a sheep have strayed)

I watch the manger where my Lord is laid;

Oh that my baa-ing nature would win thence

Some wooly innocence!

—from Poems

For reflection  Luke 2:1–7


NOT JUST A MORAL TEACHER
There is no half-way house and there is no parallel in other religions. If you had gone to Buddha and asked him, “Are you the son of Bramah?” he would have said, “My son, you are still in the vale of illusion.” If you had gone to Socrates and asked, “Are you Zeus?” he would have laughed at you. If you had gone to Mohamed and asked, “Are you Allah?” he would first have rent his clothes and then cut your head off. If you had asked Confucius, “Are you Heaven?” I think he would have probably replied, “Remarks which are not in accordance with nature are in bad taste.” The idea of a great moral teacher saying what Christ said is out of the question. In my opinion, the only person who can say that sort of thing is either God or a complete lunatic suffering from that form of delusion which undermines the whole mind of man. If you think you are a poached egg, when you are looking at a piece of toast to suit you, you may be sane, but if you think you are God, there is no chance for you. We may note in passing that He was never regarded as a mere moral teacher. He did not produce that effect on any of the people who actually met him. He produced mainly three effects—Hatred—Terror—Adoration. There was no trace of people expressing mild approval.

—from “What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” God in the Dock

For reflection  Luke 4:14–37


THE FORGIVER OF SIN
We can all understand how a man forgives offences against himself. You tread on my toes and I forgive you, you steal my money and I forgive you. But what should we make of a man, himself unrobbed and untrodden on, who announced that he forgave you for treading on other men’s toes and stealing other men’s money? Asinine fatuity is the kindest description we should give of his conduct. Yet this is what Jesus did. He told people that their sins were forgiven, and never waited to consult all the other people whom their sins had undoubtedly injured. He unhesitatingly behaved as if He was the party chiefly concerned, the person chiefly offended in all offences. This makes sense only if He really was the God whose laws are broken and whose love is wounded in every sin. In the mouth of any speaker who is not God, these words would imply what I can only regard as a silliness and conceit unrivalled by any other character in history.

Yet (and this is the strange, significant thing) even His enemies, when they read the Gospels, do not usually get the impression of silliness and conceit. Still less do unprejudiced readers. Christ says that He is “humble and meek” and we believe Him; not noticing that, if He were merely a man, humility and meekness are the very last characteristics we could attribute to some of His sayings.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Luke 5:17–26


For reflection: Luke 6:27–31

In praying for people one dislikes I find it helpful to remember that one is joining in His prayer for them.

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, January 5, 1951


CREATED DIFFERENT
About the question of abandoning the “World” or fighting right inside it, don’t you think that both may be right for different people? Some are called to the one and some to the other. Hence Our Lord, after pointing the contrast between the hermit and ascetic John the Baptist, and Himself who drank wine & went to dinner parties and jostled with every kind of man, concluded “But Wisdom is justified of all her children”: meaning, I take it, both these kinds. I fancy we are all too ready, once we are converted ourselves, to assume that God will deal with everyone exactly as He does with us. But He is no mass-producer and treats no two quite alike.

—from a letter to Mrs. D. Jessup, February 5, 1954

For reflection  Luke 7:31–35



For reflection: Luke 7:36–50

I sometimes think that shame, mere awkward, senseless shame, does as much towards preventing good acts and straightforward happiness as any our vices can do.

—from A Grief Observed



ALL THE CROWDS WERE AMAZED
And what did God do? First of all He left us conscience, the sense of right and wrong: and all through history there have been people trying (some of them very hard) to obey it. None of them ever quite succeeded. Secondly, He sent the human race what I call good dreams: I mean those queer stories scattered all through the heathen religions about a god who dies and comes to life again and, by his death, has somehow given new life to men. Thirdly, He selected one particular people and spent several centuries hammering into their heads the sort of God He was—that there was only one of Him and that He cared about right conduct. Those people were the Jews, and the Old Testament gives an account of the hammering process.

Then comes the real shock. Among these Jews there suddenly turns up a man who goes about talking as if He was God. He claims to forgive sins. He says He has always existed. He says He is coming to judge the world at the end of time. Now let us get this clear. Among Pantheists, like the Indians, anyone might say that he was a part of God, or one with God: there would be nothing very odd about it. But this man, since He was a Jew, could not mean that kind of God. God, in their language, meant the Being outside the world, who had made it and was infinitely different from anything else. And when you have grasped that, you will see that what this man said was, quite simply, the most shocking thing that has ever been uttered by human lips.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Luke 7:48–50


NOT AN ISOLATED MIRACLE
I contend that in all these miracles alike the incarnate God does suddenly and locally something that God has done or will do in general. Each miracle writes for us in small letters something that God has already written, or will write, in letters almost too large to be noticed, across the whole canvas of Nature. They focus at a particular point either God’s actual, or His future, operations on the universe. When they reproduce operations we have already seen on the large scale they are miracles of the Old Creation: when they focus those which are still to come they are miracles of the New. Not one of them is isolated or anomalous: each carries the signature of the God whom we know through conscience and from Nature. Their authenticity is attested by the style.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Luke 9:10–17


WHO’S THE GREATEST?
Ambition! We must be careful what we mean by it. If it means the desire to get ahead of other people—which is what I think it does mean—then it is bad. If it means simply wanting to do a thing well, then it is good. It isn’t wrong for an actor to want to act his part as well as it can possibly be acted, but the wish to have his name in bigger type than the other actors is a bad one.

—from “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Luke 9:46–50

BEHAVE YOUR WAY TO LOVE
Do not waste time bothering whether you “love” your neighbour; act as if you did. As soon as we do this we find one of the great secrets. When you are behaving as if you loved someone, you will presently come to love him. If you injure someone you dislike, you will find yourself disliking him more. If you do him a good turn, you will find yourself disliking him less.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Luke 10:30–37

DEMANDING DISTRACTIONS
Don’t be too easily convinced that God really wants you to do all sorts of work you needn’t do. Each must do his duty “in that state of life to which God has called him.” Remember that a belief in the virtues of doing for doing’s sake is characteristically feminine, characteristically American, and characteristically modern: so that three veils may divide you from the correct view!

There can be intemperance in work just as in drink. What feels like zeal may be only fidgets or even the flattering of one’s self-importance. As MacDonald says “In holy things may be unholy greed.” And by doing what “one’s station and its duties” does not demand, one can make oneself less fit for the duties it does demand, and so commit some injustice. Just you give Mary a little chance as well as Martha!

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, March 19, 1956

For reflection  Luke 10:38–42


SOME CONSIDERATIONS REGARDING PRAYER
The prayer preceding all prayer is, “May it be the real I who speaks. May it be the real Thou that I speak to.” Infinitely various are the levels from which we pray. Emotional intensity is in itself no proof of spiritual depth. If we pray in terror we shall pray earnestly; it only proves that terror is an earnest emotion. Only God Himself can let the bucket down to the depths in us. And, on the other side, He must constantly work as the iconoclast. Every idea of Him we form, He must in mercy shatter. The most blessed result of prayer would be to rise thinking “But I never knew before. I never dreamed . . .”

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

We have our New Testament regimental orders upon the subject. I would take it for granted that everyone who becomes a Christian would undertake this practice. It is enjoined upon us by our Lord; and since they are His commands, I believe in following them. It is always just possible that Jesus Christ meant what He said when He told us to seek the secret place and to close the door.

—from “Cross-Examination,” God in the Dock

We say that we believe God to be omniscient; yet a great deal of prayer seems to consist of giving Him information. And indeed we have been reminded by Our Lord too not to pray as if we forgot the omniscience—“for your heavenly Father knows you need all these things.”

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

Thy will be done.” But a great deal of it is to be done by God’s creatures; including me. The petition, then, is not merely that I may patiently suffer God’s will but also that I may vigorously do it. I must be an agent as well as a patient. I am asking that I may be enabled to do it.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

We make a great mistake by quoting “thy will be done” without the rest of the sentence “on earth as it is in Heaven.” That is the real point, isn’t it? Not merely submission but a prayer that we may be enabled to do God’s will as (in the same way as) angels and blessed human spirits do it, with alacrity & delight like players in an orchestra responding spontaneously to the conductor.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, July 27, 1949

I fully agree that “Thy will be done” should principally be taken in the sense “God’s will has blank well got to be done even if I have to go and do it myself.”

—from a letter to Valerie Pitt, May 17, 1956

I am beginning to feel that we need a preliminary act of submission not only towards possible future afflictions but also towards possible future blessings. I know it sounds fantastic; but think it over. It seems to me that we often, almost sulkily, reject the good that God offers us because, at that moment, we expected some other good.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Luke 11:4

EVADING GOD
Honest rejection of Christ, however mistaken, will be forgiven and healed—“Whosoever shall speak a word against the Son of man, it shall be forgiven him.” But to evade the Son of Man, to look the other way, to pretend you haven’t noticed, to become suddenly absorbed in something on the other side of the street, to leave the receiver off the telephone because it might be He who was ringing up, to leave unopened certain letters in a strange handwriting because they might be from Him—this is a different matter. You may not be certain yet whether you ought to be a Christian; but you do know you ought to be a Man, not an ostrich, hiding its head in the sand.

—from “Man or Rabbit,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Luke 12:8–12

GOD’S EXPECTATIONS
If you have sound nerves and intelligence and health and popularity and a good upbringing, you are likely to be quite satisfied with your character as it is. “Why drag God into it?” you may ask. A certain level of good conduct comes fairly easily to you. You are not one of those wretched creatures who are always being tripped up by sex, or dipsomania, or nervousness, or bad temper. Everyone says you are a nice chap and (between ourselves) you agree with them. You are quite likely to believe that all this niceness is your own doing: and you may easily not feel the need for any better kind of goodness. Often people who have all these natural kinds of goodness cannot be brought to recognise their need for Christ at all until, one day, the natural goodness lets them down and their self-satisfaction is shattered. In other words, it is hard for those who are “rich” in this sense to enter the Kingdom.

It is very different for the nasty people—the little, low, timid, warped, thin-blooded, lonely people, or the passionate, sensual, unbalanced people. If they make any attempt at goodness at all, they learn, in double quick time, that they need help. It is Christ or nothing for them. It is taking up the cross and following—or else despair. They are the lost sheep; He came specially to find them. They are (in one very real and terrible sense) the “poor”: He blessed them. They are the “awful set” He goes about with—and of course the Pharisees say still, as they said from the first, “If there were anything in Christianity those people would not be Christians.”

There is either a warning or an encouragement here for every one of us. If you are a nice person—if virtue comes easily to you—beware! Much is expected from those to whom much is given. If you mistake for your own merits what are really God’s gifts to you through nature, and if you are contented with simply being nice, you are still a rebel: and all those gifts will only make your fall more terrible, your corruption more complicated, your bad example more disastrous. The Devil was an archangel once; his natural gifts were as far above yours as yours are above those of a chimpanzee.

But if you are a poor creature—poisoned by a wretched upbringing in some house full of vulgar jealousies and senseless quarrels—saddled, by no choice of your own, with some loathsome sexual perversion—nagged day in and day out by an inferiority complex that makes you snap at your best friends—do not despair. He knows all about it. You are one of the poor whom He blessed. He knows what a wretched machine you are trying to drive. Keep on. Do what you can. One day (perhaps in another world, but perhaps far sooner than that) He will fling it on the scrap-heap and give you a new one. And then you may astonish us all—not least yourself: for you have learned your driving in a hard school. (Some of the last will be first and some of the first will be last).

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Luke 12:48


CREATION CORRUPTED
I think it would be dangerous to suppose that Satan had created all the creatures that are disagreeable or dangerous to us for (a) those creatures, if they could think, wd. have just the same reason for thinking that we were created by Satan. (b) I don’t think evil, in the strict sense, can create. It can spoil something that Another has created. Satan may have corrupted other creatures as well as us. Part of the corruption in us might be the unreasoning horror and disgust we feel at some creatures quite apart from any harm they can do us. (I can’t abide a spider myself.) We have scriptural authority for Satan originating diseases—See Luke XIII.16.

—from a letter to Belle Allen, November 1, 1954

For reflection  Luke 13:16


CALCULATING THE COST
He warned people to “count the cost” before becoming Christians. “Make no mistake,” He says, “if you let me, I will make you perfect. The moment you put yourself in My hands, that is what you are in for. Nothing less, or other, than that. You have free will, and if you choose, you can push Me away. But if you do not push Me away, understand that I am going to see this job through. Whatever suffering it may cost you in your earthly life, whatever inconceivable purification it may cost you after death, whatever it costs Me, I will never rest, nor let you rest, until you are literally perfect—until my Father can say without reservation that He is well pleased with you, as He said He was well pleased with me. This I can do and will do. But I will not do anything less.”

And yet—this is the other and equally important side of it—this Helper who will, in the long run, be satisfied with nothing less than absolute perfection, will also be delighted with the first feeble, stumbling effort you make tomorrow to do the simplest duty. As a great Christian writer (George MacDonald) pointed out, every father is pleased at the baby’s first attempt to walk: no father would be satisfied with anything less than a firm, free, manly walk in a grown-up son. In the same way, he said, “God is easy to please, but hard to satisfy.”

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Luke 14:25–33

THE COMMAND TO HATE
As so often, Our Lord’s own words are both far fiercer and far more tolerable than those of the theologians. He says nothing about guarding against earthly loves for fear we might be hurt; He says something that cracks like a whip about trampling them all under foot the moment they hold us back from following Him. “If any man come to me and hate not his father and mother and wife . . . and his own life also, he cannot be my disciple” (Luke XIV:26).

But how are we to understand the word hate? That Love Himself should be commanding what we ordinarily mean by hatred—commanding us to cherish resentment, to gloat over another’s misery, to delight in injuring him—is almost a contradiction in terms. I think Our Lord, in the sense here intended, “hated” St. Peter when He said, “Get thee behind me.” To hate is to reject, to set one’s face against, to make no concession to, the Beloved when the Beloved utters, however sweetly and however pitiably, the suggestions of the Devil. A man, said Jesus, who tries to serve two masters, will “hate” the one and “love” the other. . . . So, in the last resort, we must turn down or disqualify our nearest and dearest when they come between us and our obedience to God. Heaven knows, it will seem to them sufficiently like hatred. We must not act on the pity we feel; we must be blind to tears and deaf to pleadings.

I will not say that this duty is hard; some find it too easy; some, hard almost beyond endurance. What is hard for all is to know when the occasion for such “hating” has arisen. Our temperaments deceive us. The meek and tender—uxorious husbands, submissive wives, doting parents, dutiful children—will not easily believe that it has ever arrived. Self-assertive people, with a dash of the bully in them, will believe it too soon. That is why it is of such extreme importance so to order our loves that it is unlikely to arrive at all.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  Luke 14:26



For reflection: Luke 15:11–32

A Christian is not a man who never goes wrong, but a man who is enabled to repent and pick himself up and begin over again after each stumble.

—from Mere Christianity




WHO DO YOU SERVE?
I wonder have any of us taken seriously enough the prohibition of casting pearls before swine? This is the point of Our Lord’s remarks after the parable of the Unjust Steward. We are denied many graces we ask for because they wd. be our ruin. If we can’t be trusted even with the perishable wealth of the world, who will trust us with the real wealth?

—from a letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, December 20, 1961

For reflection  Luke 16:1–13

LEFT WITHOUT OBJECTIONS
In the long run the answer to all those who object to the doctrine of hell, is itself a question: “What are you asking God to do?” To wipe out their past sins and, at all costs, to give them a fresh start, smoothing every difficulty and offering every miraculous help? But He has done so, on Calvary. To forgive them? They will not be forgiven. To leave them alone? Alas, I am afraid that is what He does.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Luke 16:19–31


ONE OFFENSE OR MANY, IT MATTERS NOT
There is no use in talking as if forgiveness were easy. We all know the old joke, “You’ve given up smoking once; I’ve given it up a dozen times.” In the same way I could say of a certain man, “Have I forgiven him for what he did that day? I’ve forgiven him more times than I can count.” For we find that the work of forgiveness has to be done over and over again. We forgive, we mortify our resentment; a week later some chain of thought carries us back to the original offence and we discover the old resentment blazing away as if nothing had been done about it at all. We need to forgive our brother seventy times seven not only for 490 offences but for one offence.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Luke 17:3–4

11 On the way to Jerusalem Jesus[139] was going through the region between Samaria and Galilee. 12As he entered a village, ten lepers[140] approached him. Keeping their distance, 13they called out, saying, “Jesus, Master, have mercy on us!” 14When he saw them, he said to them, “Go and show yourselves to the priests.” And as they went, they were made clean. 15Then one of them, when he saw that he was healed, turned back, praising God with a loud voice. 16He prostrated himself at Jesus’[141] feet and thanked him. And he was a Samaritan. 17Then Jesus asked, “Were not ten made clean? But the other nine, where are they? 18Was none of them found to return and give praise to God except this foreigner?” 19Then he said to him, “Get up and go on your way; your faith has made you well.”



For reflection: Luke 17:11–19

It is important to keep on giving thanks. Otherwise, as one continues to pray for the others who have not yet been relieved, one simply fails to notice how many of one’s intercessory prayers have been granted—never notices how the list of Thank-you’s grows & perhaps outstrips the list of mere Please’s.

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, November 9, 1955



THE UNEXAMINED LIFE
Those who do not think about their own sins make up for it by thinking incessantly about the sins of others. It is healthier to think of one’s own. It is the reverse of morbid. It is not even, in the long run, very gloomy. A serious attempt to repent and really to know one’s own sins is in the long run a lightening and relieving process. Of course, there is bound to be a first dismay and often terror and later great pain, yet that is much less in the long run than the anguish of a mass of unrepented and unexamined sins, lurking the background of our minds. It is the difference between the pain of the tooth about which you should go to the dentist, and the simple straight-forward pain which you know is getting less and less every moment when you have had the tooth out.

—from “‘Miserable Offenders,’” God in the Dock

For reflection  Luke 18:9–14


ABOUT MONEY
I’m a panic-y person about money myself (which is a shameful confession and a thing dead against our Lord’s words) and poverty frightens me more than anything else except large spiders and the tops of cliffs: one is sometimes even tempted to say that if God wanted us to live like the lilies of the field He might have given us an organism more like theirs! But of course He is right. And when you meet anyone who does live like the lilies, one sees that He is.

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, August 10, 1953

For reflection  Luke 18:18–30



For reflection: Luke 19:8–10

It does one good to see the fine side of people we’ve always seen the worst of.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, June 7, 1930



WHAT IS GOD’S AND WHAT IS NOT?
There is therefore this analogy between the claims of our religion and the claims of the war: neither of them, for most of us, will simply cancel or remove from the slate the merely human life which we were leading before we entered them. But they will operate in this way for different reasons. The war will fail to absorb our whole attention because it is a finite object and, therefore, intrinsically unfitted to support the whole attention of a human soul. In order to avoid misunderstanding I must here make a few distinctions. I believe our cause to be, as human causes go, very righteous, and I therefore believe it to be a duty to participate in this war. And every duty is a religious duty, and our obligation to perform every duty is therefore absolute. Thus we may have a duty to rescue a drowning man, and perhaps, if we live on a dangerous coast, to learn lifesaving so as to be ready for any drowning man when he turns up. It may be our duty to lose our own lives in saving him. But if anyone devoted himself to lifesaving in the sense of giving it his total attention—so that he thought and spoke of nothing else and demanded the cessation of all other human activities until everyone had learned to swim—he would be a monomaniac. The rescue of drowning men is, then, a duty worth dying for, but not worth living for. It seems to me that all political duties (among which I include military duties) are of this kind. A man may have to die for our country: but no man must, in any exclusive sense, live for his country. He who surrenders himself without reservation to the temporal claims of a nation, or a party, or a class is rendering to Caesar that which, of all things, most emphatically belongs to God: himself.

—from “Learning in War-Time,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Luke 20:20–26


STAY ALERT!
The world might stop in ten minutes; meanwhile, we are to go on doing our duty. The great thing is to be found at one’s post as a child of God, living each day as though it were our last, but planning as though our world might last a hundred years.

We have, of course, the assurance of the New Testament regarding events to come. I find it difficult to keep from laughing when I find people worrying about future destruction of some kind or other. Didn’t they know they were going to die anyway?

—from “Cross-Examination,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Luke 21:36


NO BEAUTY WE COULD DESIRE
Yes, you are always everywhere. But I

Hunting in such immeasurable forests,

Could never bring the noble Hart to bay.


The scent was too perplexing for my hounds;

Nowhere sometimes, then again everywhere.

Other scents, too, seemed to them almost the same.


Therefore I turn my back on the unapproachable

Stars and horizons and all musical sounds,

Poetry itself, and the winding stair of thought.


Leaving the forests where you are pursued in vain

—Often a mere white gleam—I turn instead

To the appointed place where you pursue.


Not in Nature, not even in Man, but in one

Particular Man, with a date, so tall, weighing

So much, talking Aramaic, having learned a trade;


Not in all food, not in all bread and wine

(Not, I mean, as my littleness requires)

But this wine, this bread . . . no beauty we could desire.

—from Poems

For reflection  Luke 22:7–20


THE TORMENTS OF HOPE
Some people feel guilty about their anxieties and regard them as a defect of faith. I don’t agree at all. They are afflictions, not sins. Like all afflictions, they are, if we can so take them, our share in the Passion of Christ. For the beginning of the Passion—the first move, so to speak—is in Gethsemane. In Gethsemane a very strange and significant thing seems to have happened.

It is clear from many of his sayings that Our Lord had long foreseen His own death. He knew what conduct such as His, in a world such as we have made of this, must inevitably lead to. But it is clear that this knowledge must somehow have been withdrawn from Him before He prayed in Gethsemane. He could not, with whatever reservation about the Father’s will, have prayed that the cup might pass and simultaneously known that it would not. That is both a logical and a psychological impossibility. You see what this involves? Lest any trial incident to humanity should be lacking, the torments of hope—of suspense, anxiety—were at the last moment loosed on Him—the supposed possibility that, after all, He might, He just conceivably might, be spared the supreme horror. There was precedent. Isaac had been spared: he too at the last moment, he also against all apparent probability. It was not quite impossible . . . and doubtless He had seen other men crucified . . . a sight very unlike most of our religious pictures and images.

But for this last (and erroneous) hope against hope, and the consequent tumult of the soul, the sweat of blood, perhaps he would not have been very Man. To live in a fully predictable world is not to be a man.

At the end, I know, we are told that an angel appeared “comforting” Him. But neither comforting in sixteenth-century English nor εʹννισχυʹων [ennischuon] in Greek means “consoling.” “Strengthening” is more the word. May not the strengthening have consisted in the renewed certainty—cold comfort this—that the thing must be endured and therefore could be?

We all try to accept with some sort of submission our afflictions when they actually arrive. But the prayer in Gethsemane show that the preceding anxiety is equally God’s will and equally part of our human destiny. The perfect Man experienced it. And the servant is not greater than the master. We are Christians, not Stoics.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Luke 22:39–49

63 Now the men who were holding Jesus began to mock him and beat him; 64they also blindfolded him and kept asking him, “Prophesy! Who is it that struck you?” 65They kept heaping many other insults on him.



For reflection: Luke 22:54–60

SCREWTAPE OBSERVES:

The act of cowardice is all that matters; the emotion of fear is, in itself, no sin and, though we enjoy it, does us no good.

—from The Screwtape Letters




OPENING THE SCRIPTURES
On that famous journey to Emmaus he found fault with the two disciples for not believing what the prophets had said. They ought to have known from their Bibles that the Anointed One, when He came, would enter his glory through suffering. He then explained, from “Moses” (i.e. the Pentateuch) down, all the places in the Old Testament “concerning Himself” (Luke 24, 25–27). He clearly identified Himself with a figure often mentioned in the Scriptures; appropriated to Himself many passages where a modern scholar might see no such reference. In the predictions of His Own Passion which He had previously made to the disciples. He was obviously doing the same thing. He accepted—indeed he claimed to be—the second meaning of Scripture.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Luke 24:13–35


THE RESURRECTION OF THE BODY
I agree that we don’t know what a spiritual body is. But I don’t like contrasting it with (your words) “an actual, physical body.” This suggests that the spiritual body wd. be the opposite of “actual”—i.e. some kind of vision or imagination. And I do think most people imagine it as something that looks like the present body and isn’t really there. Our Lord’s eating the boiled fish seems to put the boots on that idea, don’t you think? I suspect the distinction is the other way round—that it is something compared with which our present bodies are half real and phantasmal.

—from a letter to Arthur Greeves, August 19, 1947

For reflection  Luke 24:36–42


AND THE WORD WAS GOD
It is Christ Himself, not the Bible, who is the true word of God. The Bible, read in the right spirit and with the guidance of good teachers, will bring us to Him. When it becomes really necessary (i.e., for our spiritual life, not for controversy or curiosity) to know whether a particular passage is rightly translated or is Myth (but of course Myth specially chosen by God from among countless Myths to carry a spiritual truth) or history, we shall no doubt be guided to the right answer. But we must not use the Bible (our fathers too often did) as a sort of Encyclopedia out of which texts (isolated from their context and not read without attention to the whole nature & purport of the books in which they occur) can be taken for use as weapons.

—from a letter to Mrs. Johnson, November 8, 1952

For reflection  John 1:1


GRACE UPON GRACE
The Christian story is precisely the story of one grand miracle, the Christian assertion being that what is beyond all space and time, what is uncreated, eternal, came into nature, into human nature, descended into His own universe, and rose again, bringing nature up with Him. It is precisely one great miracle. If you take that away there is nothing specifically Christian left.

—from “The Grand Miracle,” God in the Dock

For reflection  John 1:1–18


THE GOOD WINE
God creates the vine and teaches it to draw up water by its roots and, with the aid of the sun, to turn that water into a juice which will ferment and take on certain qualities. Thus every year, from Noah’s time till ours, God turns water into wine. That, men fail to see. Either like the Pagans they refer the process to some finite spirit. Bacchus or Dionysus: or else, like the moderns, they attribute real and ultimate causality to the chemical and other material phenomena which are all that our senses can discover in it. But when Christ at Cana makes water into wine, the mask is off. The miracle has only half its effect if it only convinces us that Christ is God: it will have its full effect if whenever we see a vineyard or drink a glass of wine we remember that here works He who sat at the wedding party in Cana.

—from “Miracles,” God in the Dock

For reflection  John 2:1–11


MORE THAN MERE KINDNESS
There is kindness in Love: but Love and kindness are not coterminous, and when kindness (in the sense given above) is separated from the other elements of Love, it involves a certain fundamental indifference to its object, and even something like contempt of it. Kindness consents very readily to the removal of its object—we have all met people whose kindness to animals is constantly leading them to kill animals lest they should suffer. Kindness, merely as such, cares not whether its object becomes good or bad, provided only that it escapes suffering. As Scripture points out, it is bastards who are spoiled: the legitimate sons, who are to carry on the family tradition, are punished. [Hebrews 12:8]. It is for people whom we care nothing about that we demand happiness on any terms: with our friends, our lovers, our children, we are exacting and would rather see them suffer much than be happy in contemptible and estranging modes. If God is Love, He is, by definition, something more than mere kindness. And it appears, from all the records, that though He has often rebuked us and condemned us, He has never regarded us with contempt. He has paid us the intolerable compliment of loving us, in the deepest, most tragic, most inexorable sense.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  John 3:16

HE MUST INCREASE
For it is not so much of our time and so much of our attention that God demands; it is not even all our time and all our attention; it is ourselves. For each of us the Baptist’s words are true: “He must increase and I decrease.” He will be infinitely merciful to our repeated failures; I know no promise that He will accept a deliberate compromise. For He has, in the last resort, nothing to give us but Himself; and He can give that only insofar as our self-affirming will retires and makes room for Him in our souls. Let us make up our minds to it; there will be nothing “of our own” left over to live on, no “ordinary” life. I do not mean that each of us will necessarily be called to be a martyr or even an ascetic. That’s as may be. For some (nobody knows which) the Christian life will include much leisure, many occupations we naturally like. But these will be received from God’s hands. In a perfect Christian they would be as much part of his “religion,” his “service,” as his hardest duties, and his feasts would be as Christian as his fasts. What cannot be admitted—what must exist only as an undefeated but daily resisted enemy—is the idea of something that is “our own,” some area in which we are to be “out of school,” on which God has no claim.

For He claims all, because He is love and must bless. He cannot bless us unless He has us. When we try to keep within us an area that is our own, we try to keep an area of death. Therefore, in love, He claims all. There’s no bargaining with Him.

—from “A Slip of the Tongue,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  John 3:27–36


For reflection: John 4:7–26

You are no longer faced with an argument which demands your assent, but with a Person who demands your confidence.

—from “On Obstinacy in Belief,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays



A NEW KIND OF MAN
Niceness”—wholesome, integrated personality—is an excellent thing. We must try by every medical, educational, economic, and political means in our power to produce a world where as many people as possible grow up “nice”; just as we must try to produce a world where all have plenty to eat. But we must not suppose that even if we succeeded in making everyone nice we should have saved their souls. A world of nice people, content in their own niceness, looking no further, turned away from God, would be just as desperately in need of salvation as a miserable world—and might even be more difficult to save.

For mere improvement is not redemption, though redemption always improves people even here and now and will, in the end, improve them to a degree we cannot yet imagine. God became man to turn creatures into sons: not simply to produce better men of the old kind but to produce a new kind of man. It is not like teaching a horse to jump better and better but like turning a horse into a winged creature.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  John 6:35–40


IRRELEVANT DETAILS?
As a literary historian, I am perfectly convinced that whatever the Gospels are they are not legends. I have read a great deal of legend and I am quite clear that they are not the same sort of thing. They are not artistic enough to be legends. From an imaginative point of view they are clumsy, they don’t work up to things properly. Most of the life of Jesus is totally unknown to us, as is the life of anyone else who lived at that time, and no people building up a legend would allow that to be so. Apart from bits of the Platonic dialogues, there are no conversations that I know of in ancient literature like the Fourth Gospel. There is nothing, even in modern literature, until about a hundred years ago when the realistic novel came into existence. In the story of the woman taken in adultery we are told Christ bent down and scribbled in the dust with His finger. Nothing comes of this. No one has ever based any doctrine on it. And the art of inventing little irrelevant details to make an imaginary scene more convincing is a purely modern art. Surely the only explanation of this passage is that the thing really happened? The author put it in simply because he had seen it.

—from “What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” God in the Dock

For reflection  John 8:6–8

TRUE DISCIPLES
A perfect practice of Christianity would, of course, consist in a perfect imitation of the life of Christ—I mean, in so far as it was applicable in one’s own particular circumstances. Not in an idiotic sense—it doesn’t mean that every Christian should grow a beard, or be a bachelor, or become a travelling preacher. It means that every single act and feeling, every experience, whether pleasant or unpleasant, must be referred to God.

—from “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” God in the Dock

For reflection  John 8:31–32


WHO SINNED?
That suffering is not always sent as a punishment is clearly established for believers by the book of Job and by John IX. 1–4. That it sometimes is, is suggested by parts of the Old Testament and Revelation. It wd. certainly be most dangerous to assume that any given pain was penal. I believe that all pain is contrary to God’s will, absolutely but not relatively. When I am taking a thorn out of my own finger (or a child’s finger) the pain is “absolutely” contrary to my will; i.e. if I could have chosen a situation without pain I would have done so. But I do will what caused the pain, relatively to the given situation; i.e. granted the thorn I prefer the pain to leaving the thorn where it is. A mother spanking a child would be in the same position; she would rather cause it this pain than let it go on pulling the cat’s tail, but she would like it better if no situation which demands a smack had arisen.

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, January 31, 1952

For reflection  John 9:1–4


For reflection: John 9:25

I believe in Christianity as I believe that the Sun has risen; not only because I see it, but because by it I see everything else.

—from “Is Theology Poetry?” The Weight of Glory




STEPHEN TO LAZARUS
But was I the first martyr, who

Gave up no more than life, while you

Already free among the dead,

Your rags stripped off, your fetters shed,

Surrendered what all other men

Irrevocably keep, and when

Your battered ship at anchor lay

Seemingly safe in the dark bay

No ripple stirs, obediently

Put out a second time to sea

Well knowing that your death (in vain

Died once) must all be died again?

—from Poems

For reflection  John 11:28–44


ASHAMED OF DEATH
The world, knowing how all our real investments are beyond the grave, might expect us to be less concerned than other people who go in for what is called Higher Thought and tell us that “death doesn’t matter;” but we “are not high-minded,” and we follow One who stood and wept at the grave of Lazarus—not surely, because He was grieved that Mary and Martha wept, and sorrowed for their lack of faith (though some thus interpret) but because death, the punishment of sin, is even more horrible in his eyes than in ours. The nature which He had created as God, the nature which He had assumed as man, lay there before Him in its ignominy; a foul smell, food for worms. Though He was to revive it a moment later, He wept at the shame; if I may here quote a writer of my own communion, “I am not so much afraid of death as ashamed of it.” And that brings us again to the paradox. Of all men, we hope most of death; yet nothing will reconcile us to—well, it unnaturalness. We know that we were not made for it; we know how it crept into our destiny as an intruder; and we know Who has defeated it. Because Our Lord is risen we know that on one level it is an enemy already disarmed; but because we know that the natural level also is God’s creation we cannot cease to fight against the death which mars it, as against all those other blemishes upon it, against pain and poverty, barbarism and ignorance. Because we love something else more than this world we love even this world better than those who know no other.

—from “Some Thoughts,” God in the Dock

For reflection  John 11:1–12:19

MARY’S FRAGRANT GIFT
The allegorical sense of her great action dawned on me the other day. The precious alabaster box wh. one must break over the Holy Feet is one’s heart. Easier said than done. And the contents become perfume only when it is broken. While they are safe inside they are more like sewage. All v. alarming.

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, November 1, 1954

For reflection  John 12:1–8

NOTHING BUT A TOOL
I could well believe that it is God’s intention, since we have refused milder remedies, to compel us into unity, by persecution even and hardship. Satan is without doubt nothing else than a hammer in the hand of a benevolent and severe God. For all, either willingly or unwillingly, do the will of God: Judas and Satan as tools or instruments, John and Peter as sons.

—from a letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, September 20, 1947

For reflection  John 13:2


For reflection: John 13:5–9

We have Biblical authority for believing that it is “more blessed to give than recieve” (sic): but what the Bible does not point out is that it is more difficult to recieve (sic) than to give!

—from a letter to Vera Mathews, April 26, 1949



SHOW, DON’T TELL
It is right and inevitable that we shd. be much concerned about the salvation of those we love. But we must be careful not to expect or demand that their salvation shd. conform to some ready-made pattern of our own. Some Protestant sects have gone very wrong about this. They have a whole programme of conversion etc., marked out, the same for everyone, & will not believe that anyone can be saved who doesn’t go through it “just so.” But . . . God has His own way with each soul. There is no evidence that St. John underwent the same kind of “conversion” as St. Paul. It’s not essential to believe in the Devil; and I’m sure a man can get to Heaven without being accurate about Methuselah’s age. Also, as MacDonald says “the time for saying comes seldom, the time for being is always here.” What we practise, not (save at rare intervals) what we preach, is usually our great contribution to the conversion of others.

—from a letter to Mrs. Johnson, March 2, 1955

For reflection  John 13:34–35

OUR TRUE HOME
The Christian doctrine of suffering explains, I believe, a very curious fact about the world we live in. The settled happiness and security which we all desire, God withholds from us by the very nature of the world: but joy, pleasure, and merriment, He has scattered broadcast. We are never safe, but we have plenty of fun, and some ecstasy. It is not hard to see why. The security we crave would teach us to rest our hearts in this world and oppose an obstacle to our return to God: a few moments of happy love, a landscape, a symphony, a merry meeting with our friends, a bathe or a football match, have no such tendency. Our Father refreshes us on the journey with some pleasant inns, but will not encourage us to mistake them for home.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  John 14:1–3


IF YOU LOVE ME
A Christian society is not going to arrive until most of us really want it: and we are not going to want it until we become fully Christian. I may repeat “Do as you would be done by” till I am black in the face, but I cannot really carry it out till I love my neighbour as myself: and I cannot learn to love my neighbour as myself till I learn to love God: and I cannot learn to love God except by learning to obey Him. And so, as I warned you, we are driven on to something more inward—driven on from social matters to religious matters. For the longest way round is the shortest way home.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  John 14:15–21


NO ORDINARY PEOPLE
It may be possible for each to think too much of his own potential glory hereafter; it is hardly possible for him to think too often or too deeply about that of his neighbour. The load, or weight, or burden of my neighbour’s glory should be laid on my back, a load so heavy that only humility can carry it, and the backs of the proud will be broken. It is a serious thing to live in a society of possible gods and goddesses, to remember that the dullest and most uninteresting person you can talk to may one day be a creature which, if you saw it now, you would be strongly tempted to worship, or else a horror and a corruption such as you now meet, if at all, only in a nightmare. All day long we are, in some degree, helping each other to one or other of these destinations. It is in the light of these overwhelming possibilities, it is with the awe and the circumspection proper to them, that we should conduct all our dealings with one another, all friendships, all loves, all play, all politics. There are no ordinary people. You have never talked to a mere mortal. Nations, cultures, arts, civilisations—these are mortal, and their life is to ours as the life of a gnat. But it is immortals whom we joke with, work with, marry, snub, and exploit—immortal horrors or everlasting splendours. This does not mean that we are to be perpetually solemn. We must play. But our merriment must be of that kind (and it is, in fact, the merriest kind) which exists between people who have, from the outset, taken each other seriously—no flippancy, no superiority, no presumption. And our charity must be a real and costly love, with deep feeling for the sins in spite of which we love the sinner—no mere tolerance, or indulgence which parodies love as flippancy parodies merriment. Next to the Blessed Sacrament itself, your neighbour is the holiest object presented to your senses. If he is your Christian neighbour, he is holy in almost the same way, for in him also Christ vere latitat—the glorifier and the glorified, Glory Himself, is truly hidden.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  John 17:10


For reflection: John 17:22–23

The glory of God, and, as our only means to glorifying Him, the salvation of human souls, is the real business of life.

—from “Christianity and Culture,” Christian Reflections



OUR MODEL
FOR SACRIFICE
As suicide is the typical expression of the stoic spirit, and battle of the war- rior spirit, martyrdom always remains the supreme enacting and perfection of Christianity. This great action has been initiated for us, done on our behalf, exemplified for our imitation, and inconceivably communicated to all believers, by Christ on Calvary. There the degree of accepted Death reaches the utmost bounds of the imaginable and perhaps goes beyond them; not only all natural supports, but the presence of the very Father to whom the sacrifice is made deserts the victim, and surrender to God does not falter though God “forsakes” it. . . .

Christianity teaches us that the terrible task has already in some sense been accomplished for us—that a master’s hand is holding ours as we attempt to trace the difficult letters and that our script need only be a “copy,” not an original. Again, where other systems expose our total nature to death (as in Buddhist renunciation) Christianity demands only that we set right a misdirection of our nature, and has no quarrel, like Plato, with the body as such, nor with the psychical elements in our make-up. And sacrifice in its supreme realisation is not exacted of all. Confessors as well as martyrs are saved, and some old people whose state of grace we can hardly doubt seem to have got through their seventy years surprisingly easily. The sacrifice of Christ is repeated, or re-echoed, among His followers in very varying degrees, from the cruellest martyrdom down to a self-submission of intention whose outward signs have nothing to distinguish them from the ordinary fruits of temperance and “sweet reasonableness.” The causes of this distribution I do not know; but from our present point of view it ought to be clear that the real problem is not why some humble, pious, believing people suffer, but why some do not. Our Lord Himself, it will be remembered, explained the salvation of those who are fortunate in this world only by referring to the unsearchable omnipotence of God.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  John 19:1–30


For reflection: John 20:11–14

You can’t see anything properly while your eyes are blurred with tears.

—from A Grief Observed




DO NOT DOUBT BUT BELIEVE
When you are asked for trust you may give it or withhold it; it is senseless to say that you will trust if you are given demonstrative certainty. There would be no room for trust if demonstration were given. When demonstration is given what will be left will be simply the sort of relation which results from having trusted, or not having trusted, before it was given.

The saying “Blessed are those that have not seen and have believed” has nothing to do with our original assent to the Christian propositions. It was not addressed to a philosopher enquiring whether God exists. It was addressed to a man who already believed that, who already had long acquaintance with a particular Person, and evidence that that Person could do very odd things, and who then refused to believe one odd thing more, often predicted by that Person and vouched for by all his closest friends. It is a rebuke not to skepticism in the philosophic sense but to the psychological quality of being “suspicious.” It says in effect, “You should have known me better.” There are cases between man and man where we should all, in our different way, bless those who have not seen and have believed. Our relation to those who trusted us only after we were proved innocent in court cannot be the same as our relation to those who trusted us all through.

—from “On Obstinacy in Belief,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  John 20:24–29


THE BIRTH OF THE NEW CREATION
When modern writers talk of the Resurrection they usually mean one particular moment—the discovery of the Empty Tomb and the appearance of Jesus a few yards away from it. The story of that moment is what Christian apologists now chiefly try to support and sceptics chiefly try to impugn. But this almost exclusive concentration on the first five minutes or so of the Resurrection would have astonished the earliest Christian teachers. In claiming to have seen the Resurrection they were not necessarily claiming to have seen that. Some of them had, some of them had not. It had no more importance than any of the other appearances of the risen Jesus—apart from the poetic and dramatic importance which the beginnings of things must always have. What they were claiming was that they had all, at one time or another, met Jesus during the six or seven weeks that followed His death. Sometimes they seem to have been alone when they did so, but on one occasion twelve of them saw Him together, and on another occasion about five hundred of them. St. Paul says that the majority of the five hundred were still alive when he wrote the First Letter to the Corinthians, i.e. in about 55 AD.

The “Resurrection” to which they bore witness was, in fact, not the action of rising from the dead but the state of having risen; a state, as they held, attested by intermittent meetings during a limited period (except for the special, and in some ways different, meeting vouchsafed to St. Paul). This termination of the period is important, for, as we shall see, there is no possibility of isolating the doctrine of the Resurrection from that of the Ascension.

The next point to notice is that the Resurrection was not regarded simply or chiefly as evidence for the immortality of the soul. It is, of course, often so regarded today: I have heard a man maintain that “the importance of the Resurrection is that it proves survival.” Such a view cannot at any point be reconciled with the language of the New Testament. On such a view Christ would simply have done what all men do when they die: the only novelty would have been that in His case we were allowed to see it happening. But there is not in Scripture the faintest suggestion that the Resurrection was new evidence for something that had in fact been always happening. The New Testament writers speak as if Christ’s achievement in rising from the dead was the first event of its kind in the whole history of the universe. He is the “first fruits,” the “pioneer of life.” He has forced open a door that has been locked since the death of the first man. He has met, fought, and beaten the King of Death. Everything is different because He has done so. This is the beginning of the New Creation: a new chapter in cosmic history has opened.

—from Miracles

For reflection  John 20:1–21:25


For reflection: Romans 1:18–20

We cannot see light, though by light we can see things. Statements about God are extrapolations from the knowledge of other things which the divine illumination enables us to know.

—from The Four Loves


RIGHT AND WRONG
Whenever you find a man who says he does not believe in a real Right and Wrong, you will find the same man going back on this a moment later. He may break his promise to you, but if you try breaking one to him he will be complaining “It’s not fair” before you can say Jack Robinson. A nation may say treaties don’t matter; but then, next minute, they spoil their case by saying that the particular treaty they want to break was an unfair one. But if treaties do not matter, and if there is no such thing as Right and Wrong—in other words, if there is no Law of Nature—what is the difference between a fair treaty and an unfair one? Have they not let the cat out of the bag and shown that, whatever they say, they really know the Law of Nature just like anyone else?

It seems, then, we are forced to believe in a real Right and Wrong. People may be sometimes mistaken about them, just as people sometimes get their sums wrong; but they are not a matter of mere taste and opinion any more than the multiplication table.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Romans 1:18–23


GOD’S KINDNESS
LEWIS, GRIEVING THE DEATH OF HIS WIFE, JOY:
The terrible thing is that a perfectly good God is in this matter hardly less formidable than a Cosmic Sadist. The more we believe that God hurts only to heal, the less we can believe that there is any use in begging for tenderness. A cruel man might be bribed—might grow tired of his vile sport—might have a temporary fit of mercy, as alcoholics have fits of sobriety. But suppose that what you are up against is a surgeon whose intentions are wholly good. The kinder and more conscientious he is, the more inexorably he will go on cutting. If he yielded to your entreaties, if he stopped before the operation was complete, all the pain up to that point would have been useless. But is it credible that such extremities of torture should be necessary for us? Well, take your choice. The tortures occur. If they are unnecessary, then there is no God or a bad one. If there is good God, then these tortures are necessary. For no even moderately good Being could possibly inflict or permit them if they weren’t.

Either way, we’re for it.

What do people mean when they say, “I am not afraid of God because I know He is good”? Have they never even been to a dentist?

—from A Grief Observed

For reflection  Romans 2:4–8


WRITTEN ON THEIR HEARTS
First . . . human beings, all over the earth, have this curious idea that they ought to behave in a certain way, and cannot really get rid of it. Secondly . . . they do not in fact behave in that way. They know the Law of Nature; they break it. These two facts are the foundation of all clear thinking about ourselves and the universe we live in.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Romans 2:14–16

For reflection: Romans 3:4

Truth and falsehood are opposed; but truth is the norm not of truth only but of falsehood also.

—from The Allegory of Love



THERE IS NO ONE WHO IS RIGHTEOUS
Christ takes it for granted that men are bad. Until we really feel this assumption of His to be true, though we are part of the world He came to save, we are not part of the audience to whom His words are addressed. We lack the first condition for understanding what He is talking about. And when men attempt to be Christians without this preliminary consciousness of sin, the result is almost bound to be a certain resentment against God as to one always inexplicably angry. Most of us have at times felt a secret sympathy with the dying farmer who replied to the Vicar’s dissertation on repentance by asking “What harm have I ever done Him?” There is the real rub. The worst we have done to God is to leave Him alone—why can’t He return the compliment? Why not live and let live? What call has He, of all beings, to be “angry”? It’s easy for Him to be good!

Now at the moment when a man feels real guilt— moments too rare in our lives—all these blasphemies vanish away. Much, we may feel, can be excused to human infirmities: but not this—this incredibly mean and ugly action which none of our friends would have done, which even such a thorough-going little rotter as X would have been ashamed of, which we would not for the world allow to be published. At such a moment we really do know that our character, as revealed in this action, is, and ought to be, hateful to all good men, and, if there are powers above man, to them. A God who did not regard this with unappeasable distaste would not be a good being. We cannot even wish for such a God—it is like wishing that every nose in the universe were abolished, that smell of hay or roses or the sea should never again delight any creature, because our own breath happens to stink.

When we merely say that we are bad, the “wrath” of God seems a barbarous doctrine; as soon as we perceive our badness, it appears inevitable, a mere corollary from God’s goodness.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Romans 3:10–18; 23–24


CHRIST DIED FOR SINNERS
It is idle to say that men are of equal value. If value is taken in a worldly sense—if we mean that all men are equally useful or beautiful or good or entertaining—then it is nonsense. If it means that all are of equal value as immortal souls, then I think it conceals a dangerous error. The infinite value of each human soul is not a Christian doctrine. God did not die for man because of some value He perceived in him. The value of each human soul considered simply in itself, out of relation to God, is zero. As St. Paul writes, to have died for valuable men would have been not divine but merely heroic; but God died for sinners. He loved us not because we were lovable, but because He is Love. It may be that He loves all equally—He certainly loved all to the death—and I am not certain what the expression means. If there is equality, it is in His love, not in us.

—from “Membership,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Romans 5:6–8

THE GRAVITATION AWAY FROM GOD
We try, when we wake, to lay the new day at God’s feet; before we have finished shaving, it becomes our day and God’s share in it is felt as a tribute which we must pay out of “our own” pocket, a deduction from the time which ought, we feel, to be “our own.” A man starts a new job with a sense of vocation and, perhaps, for the first week still keeps the discharge of the vocation as his end, taking the pleasures and pains from God’s hand, as they come, as “accidents.” But in the second week he is beginning to “know the ropes”: by the third, he has quarried out of the total job his own plan for himself within that job, and when he can pursue this he feels that he is getting no more than his rights, and, when he cannot, that he is being interfered with. A lover, in obedience to a quite uncalculating impulse, which may be full of good will as well as of desire and need not be forgetful of God, embraces his beloved, and then, quite innocently, experiences a thrill of sexual pleasure; but the second embrace may have that pleasure in view, may be a means to an end, may be the first downward step towards the state of regarding a fellow creature as a thing, as a machine to be used for his pleasure. Thus the bloom of innocence, the element of obedience and the readiness to take what comes is rubbed off every activity. Thoughts undertaken for God’s sake—like that on which we are engaged at the moment—are continued as if they were an end in themselves, and then as if our pleasure in thinking were the end, and finally as if our pride or celebrity were the end. Thus all day long, and all the days of our life, we are sliding, slipping, falling away—as if God were, to our present consciousness, a smooth inclined plane on which there is no resting. And indeed we are now of such a nature that we must slip off, and the sin, because it is unavoidable, may be venial. But God cannot have made us so. The gravitation away from God, “the journey homeward to habitual self,” must, we think, be a product of the Fall.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Romans 5:15–21

WALK IN NEWNESS OF LIFE
The real problem of the Christian life comes where people do not usually look for it. It comes the very moment you wake up each morning. All your wishes and hopes for the day rush at you like wild animals. And the first job each morning consists simply in shoving them all back; in listening to that other voice, taking that other point of view, letting that other larger, stronger, quieter life come flowing in. And so on, all day. Standing back from all your natural fussings and frettings; coming in out of the wind.

We can only do it for moments at first. But from those moments the new sort of life will be spreading through our system: because now we are letting Him work at the right part of us. It is the difference between paint, which is merely laid on the surface, and a dye or stain which soaks right through. He never talked vague, idealistic gas. When He said, “Be perfect,” He meant it. He meant that we must go in for the full treatment. It is hard; but the sort of compromise we are all hankering after is harder—in fact, it is impossible. It may be hard for an egg to turn into a bird: it would be a jolly sight harder for it to learn to fly while remaining an egg. We are like eggs at present. And you cannot go on indefinitely being just an ordinary, decent egg. We must be hatched or go bad.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Romans 6:3–8


For reflection: Romans 6:19–23

But the really tough work—the bit we could not have done for ourselves—has been done for us. We have not got to try to climb up into spiritual life by our own efforts; it has already come down into the human race.

—from Mere Christianity


I DO NOT UNDERSTAND MY OWN ACTIONS
As regards the Fall, I submit that the general tenor of scripture does not encourage us to believe that our knowledge of the Law has been depraved in the same degree as our power to fulfil it. He would be a brave man who claimed to realize the fallen condition of man more clearly than St. Paul. In that very chapter (Romans 7) where he asserts most strongly our inability to keep the moral law he also asserts most confidently that we perceive the Law’s goodness and rejoice in it according to the inward man. Our righteousness may be filthy and ragged; but Christianity gives us no ground for holding that our perceptions of right are in the same condition. They may, no doubt, be impaired; but there is a difference between imperfect sight and blindness. A theology which goes about to represent our practical reason as radically unsound is heading for disaster. If we once admit that what God means by “goodness” is sheerly different from what we judge to be good, there is no difference left between pure religion and devil worship.

—from “The Poison of Subjectivism,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Romans 7:14–25

Roman

THE ROAD TO STABILITY
To find that one’s emotions do not “come to heel” and line up as stable sentiments in permanent conformity with one’s convictions is simply the facts of being a fallen, and still imperfectly redeemed, man. We may be thankful if, by continual prayer and self-discipline, we can, over years, make some approach to that stability. After all, St. Paul who was a good deal further along the road than you and I, could still write Romans, chapter 7, verses 21–23.

—from a letter to Michael Edwards, February 11, 1960

For reflection  Romans 7:21–23


REPENTANCE, A PRIMER
Now what was the sort of “hole” man had got himself into? He had tried to set up on his own, to behave as if he belonged to himself. In other words, fallen man is not simply an imperfect creature who needs improvement: he is a rebel who must lay down his arms. Laying down your arms, surrendering, saying you are sorry, realising that you have been on the wrong track and getting ready to start life over again from the ground floor—that is the only way out of our “hole.” This process of surrender—this movement full speed astern—is what Christians call repentance. Now repentance is no fun at all. It is something much harder than merely eating humble pie. It means unlearning all the self-conceit and self-will that we have been training ourselves into for thousands of years. It means killing part of yourself, undergoing a kind of death. In fact, it needs a good man to repent. And here comes the catch. Only a bad person needs to repent: only a good person can repent perfectly. The worse you are the more you need it and the less you can do it. The only person who could do it perfectly would be a perfect person—and he would not need it.

Remember, this repentance, this willing submission to humiliation and a kind of death, is not something God demands of you before He will take you back and which He could let you off if He chose: it is simply a description of what going back to Him is like. If you ask God to take you back without it, you are really asking Him to let you go back without going back. It cannot happen. Very well, then, we must go through with it. But the same badness which makes us need it, makes us unable to do it. Can we do it if God helps us? Yes, but what do we mean when we talk of God helping us? We mean God putting into us a bit of Himself, so to speak. He lends us a little of His reasoning powers and that is how we think: He puts a little of His love into us and that is how we love one another. When you teach a child writing, you hold its hand while it forms the letters: that is, it forms the letters because you are forming them. We love and reason because God loves and reasons and holds our hand while we do it. Now if we had not fallen, that would be all plain sailing. But unfortunately we now need God’s help in order to do something which God, in His own nature, never does at all—to surrender, to suffer, to submit, to die. Nothing in God’s nature corresponds to this process at all. So that the one road for which we now need God’s leadership most of all is a road God, in His own nature, has never walked. God can share only what He has: this thing, in His own nature, He has not.

But supposing God became a man—suppose our human nature which can suffer and die was amalgamated with God’s nature in one person—then that person could help us. He could surrender His will, and suffer and die, because He was man; and He could do it perfectly because He was God. You and I can go through this process only if God does it in us; but God can do it only if He becomes man. Our attempts at this dying will succeed only if we men share in God’s dying, just as our thinking can succeed only because it is a drop out of the ocean of His intelligence: but we cannot share God’s dying unless God dies; and He cannot die except by being a man. That is the sense in which He pays our debt, and suffers for us what He Himself need not suffer at all.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Romans 8:1–39


AND WHAT OF EARTH?
I believe, to be sure, that any man who reaches Heaven will find that what he abandoned (even in plucking out his right eye) has not been lost: that the kernel of what he was really seeking even in his most depraved wishes will be there, beyond expectation, waiting for him in “the High Countries.” In that sense it will be true for those who have completed the journey (and for no others) to say that good is everything and Heaven everywhere. But we, at this end of the road, must not try to anticipate that retrospective vision. If we do, we are likely to embrace the false and disastrous converse and fancy that everything is good and everywhere is Heaven.

But what, you ask, of earth? Earth, I think, will not be found by anyone to be in the end a very distinct place. I think earth, if chosen instead of Heaven, will turn out to have been, all along, only a region in Hell: and earth, if put second to Heaven, to have been from the beginning a part of Heaven itself.

—from The Great Divorce

For reflection  Romans 8:19–23


WHO IS CHOSEN?
The real inter-relation between God’s omnipotence and Man’s freedom is something we can’t find out. Looking at the Sheep & the Goats every man can be quite sure that every kind act he does will be accepted by Christ. Yet, equally, we all do feel sure that all the good in us comes from Grace. We have to leave it at that. I find the best plan is to take the Calvinist view of my own virtues and other people’s vices: and the other view of my own vices and other people’s virtues. But tho’ there is much to be puzzled about, there is nothing to be worried about. It is plain from Scripture that, in whatever sense the Pauline doctrine is true, it is not true in any sense which excludes its (apparent) opposite.

You know what Luther said: “Do you doubt if you are chosen? Then say your prayers and you may conclude that you are.”

—from a letter to Mrs. Emily McLay, August 3, 1953

For reflection  Romans 9:1–8


NO OTHER PURPOSE
The Church exists for nothing else but to draw men into Christ, to make them little Christs. If they are not doing that, all the cathedrals, clergy, missions, sermons, even the Bible itself, are simply a waste of time. God became Man for no other purpose. It is even doubtful, you know, whether the whole universe was created for any other purpose.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Romans 10:14–15


A LIVING SACRIFICE
Give up yourself, and you will find your real self. Lose your life and you will save it. Submit to death, death of your ambitions and favourite wishes every day and death of your whole body in the end: submit with every fibre of your being, and you will find eternal life. Keep back nothing. Nothing that you have not given away will be really yours. Nothing in you that has not died will ever be raised from the dead. Look for yourself, and you will find in the long run only hatred, loneliness, despair, rage, ruin, and decay. But look for Christ and you will find Him, and with Him everything else thrown in.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Romans 12:1–2


ONE BODY IN CHRIST
I would prefer to combat the “I’m special” feeling not by the thought “I’m no more special than anyone else” but by the feeling “Everyone is as special as me.” In one way there is no difference, I grant, for both remove the speciality. But there is a difference in another way. The first might lead you to think, “I’m only one of the crowd like anyone else.” But the second leads to the truth that there isn’t any crowd. No one is like anyone else. All are “members” (organs) in the Body of Christ. All different and all necessary to the whole and to one another: each loved by God individually, as if it were the only creature in existence. Otherwise you might get the idea that God is like the government which can only deal with the people in the mass.

—from a letter to Genia Goelz, June 20, 1952

For reflection  Romans 12:3–5


PUT ON THE LORD JESUS CHRIST
When we want to be something other than the thing God wants us to be, we must be wanting what, in fact, will not make us happy. Those Divine demands which sound to our natural ears most like those of a despot and least like those of a lover, in fact marshal us where we should want to go if we knew what we wanted. He demands our worship, our obedience, our prostration. Do we suppose that they can do Him any good, or fear, like the chorus in Milton, that human irreverence can bring about “His glory’s diminution”? A man can no more diminish God’s glory by refusing to worship Him than a lunatic can put out the sun by scribbling the word “darkness” on the walls of his cell. But God wills our good, and our good is to love Him (with that responsive love proper to creatures) and to love Him we must know Him: and if we know Him, we shall in fact fall on our faces. If we do not, that only shows that what we are trying to love is not yet God—though it may be the nearest approximation to God which our thought and fantasy can attain. Yet the call is not only to prostration and awe; it is to a reflection of the Divine life, a creaturely participation in the Divine attributes which is far beyond our present desires. We are bidden to “put on Christ,” to become like God. That is, whether we like it or not, God intends to give us what we need, not what we now think we want. Once more, we are embarrassed by the intolerable compliment, by too much love, not too little.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Romans 13:11–14


For reflection: Romans 14:7–9

The central Christian belief is that Christ’s death has somehow put us right with God and given us a fresh start.

—from Mere Christianity



ACCOUNTABLE TO GOD
I can imagine someone saying that he dislikes my idea of heaven as a place where we are patted on the back. But proud misunderstanding is behind that dislike. In the end that Face which is the delight or the terror of the universe must be turned upon each of us either with one expression or with the other, either conferring glory inexpressible or inflicting shame that can never be cured or disguised. I read in a periodical the other day that the fundamental thing is how we think of God. By God Himself, it is not! How God thinks of us is not only more important, but infinitely more important. Indeed, how we think of Him is of no importance except insofar as it is related to how He thinks of us. It is written that we shall “stand before” Him, shall appear, shall be inspected. The promise of glory is the promise, almost incredible and only possible by the work of Christ, that some of us, that any of us who really chooses, shall actually survive that examination, shall find approval, shall please God. To please God . . . to be a real ingredient in the divine happiness . . . to be loved by God, not merely pitied, but delighted in as an artist delights in his work or a father in a son—it seems impossible, a weight or burden of glory which our thoughts can hardly sustain. But so it is.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Romans 14:10–12

SPOILED APPETITES
Chastity is the most unpopular of the Christian virtues. There is no getting away from it; the Christian rule is, “Either marriage, with complete faithfulness to your partner, or else total abstinence.” Now this is so difficult and so contrary to our instincts, that obviously either Christianity is wrong or our sexual instinct, as it now is, has gone wrong. One or the other. Of course, being a Christian, I think it is the instinct which has gone wrong.

But I have other reasons for thinking so. The biological purpose of sex is children, just as the biological purpose of eating is to repair the body. Now if we eat whenever we feel inclined and just as much as we want, it is quite true most of us will eat too much: but not terrifically too much. One man may eat enough for two, but he does not eat enough for ten. The appetite goes a little beyond its biological purpose, but not enormously. But if a healthy young man indulged his sexual appetite whenever he felt inclined, and if each act produced a baby, then in ten years he might easily populate a small village. This appetite is in ludicrous and preposterous excess of its function.

Or take it another way. You can get a large audience together for a strip-tease act—that is, to watch a girl undress on the stage. Now suppose you come to a country where you could fill a theatre by simply bringing a covered plate on to the stage and then slowly lifting the cover so as to let everyone see, just before the lights went out, that it contained a mutton chop or a bit of bacon, would you not think that in that country something had gone wrong with the appetite for food? And would not anyone who had grown up in a different world think there was something equally queer about the state of the sex instinct among us?

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Romans 16:17–19

NO DIVISIONS
SCREWTAPE WRITES:
All extremes, except extreme devotion to the Enemy, are to be encouraged. Not always, of course, but at this period. Some ages are lukewarm and complacent, and then it is our business to soothe them yet faster asleep. Other ages, of which the present is one, are unbalanced and prone to faction, and it is our business to inflame them. Any small coterie, bound together by some interest which other men dislike or ignore, tends to develop inside itself a hothouse mutual admiration, and towards the outer world, a great deal of pride and hatred which is entertained without shame because the “Cause” is its sponsor and it is thought to be impersonal. Even when the little group exists originally for the Enemy’s own purposes, this remains true. We want the Church to be small not only that fewer men may know the Enemy but also that those who do may acquire the uneasy intensity and the defensive self-righteousness of a secret society or a clique. The Church herself is, of course, heavily defended and we have never yet quite succeeded in giving her all the characteristics of a faction; but subordinate factions within her have often produced admirable results, from the parties of Paul and of Apollos at Corinth down to the High and Low parties in the Church of England.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  1 Corinthians 1:10–17


FOOLISH OBJECTIONS
I have heard some people complain that if Jesus was God as well as man, then His sufferings and death lose all value in their eyes, “because it must have been so easy for Him.” Others may (very rightly) rebuke the ingratitude and ungraciousness of this objection; what staggers me is the misunderstanding it betrays. In one sense, of course, those who make it are right. They have even understated their own case. The perfect submission, the perfect suffering, the perfect death were not only easier to Jesus because He was God, but were possible only because He was God. But surely that is a very odd reason for not accepting them? The teacher is able to form the letters for the child because the teacher is grown-up and knows how to write. That, of course, makes it easier for the teacher; and only because it is easier for him can he help the child. If it rejected him because “it’s easy for grown-ups” and waited to learn writing from another child who could not write itself (and so had no “unfair” advantage), it would not get on very quickly. If I am drowning in a rapid river, a man who still has one foot on the bank may give me a hand which saves my life. Ought I to shout back (between my gasps) “No, it’s not fair! You have an advantage! You’re keeping one foot on the bank”? That advantage—call it “unfair” if you like—is the only reason why he can be of any use to me. To what will you look for help if you will not look to that which is stronger than yourself?

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Corinthians 1:18–25


A DIFFERENT SORT OF TEMPTATION
It has been widely held in the past, and is perhaps held by many unsophisticated people to-day, that the spiritual danger of Eros arises almost entirely from the carnal element within it; that Eros is “noblest” or “purest” when Venus is reduced to the minimum. The older moral theologians certainly seem to have thought that the danger we chiefly had to guard against in marriage was that of a soul-destroying surrender to the senses. It will be noticed, however, that this is not the Scriptural approach. St. Paul, dissuading his converts from marriage, says nothing about that side of the matter except to discourage prolonged abstinence from Venus (I Cor. VII, 5). What he fears is pre-occupation, the need of constantly “pleasing”—that is, considering—one’s partner, the multiple distractions of domesticity. It is marriage itself, not the marriage bed, that will be likely to hinder us from waiting uninterruptedly on God. And surely St. Paul is right? If I may trust my own experience, it is (within marriage as without) the practical and prudential cares of this world, and even the smallest and most prosaic of those cares, that are the great distraction. The gnat-like cloud of petty anxieties and decisions about the conduct of the next hour have interfered with my prayers more often than any passion or appetite whatever. The great, permanent temptation of marriage is not to sensuality but (quite bluntly) to avarice.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  1 Corinthians 7:8–9


For reflection: 1 Corinthians 10:13

God, who foresaw your tribulation, has specially armed you to go through it, not without pain but without stain.

—from a letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September 2, 1949



MATTER BECOMES SACRED
And let me make it quite clear that when Christians say the Christ-life is in them, they do not mean simply something mental or moral. When they speak of being “in Christ” or of Christ being “in them,” this is not simply a way of saying that they are thinking about Christ or copying Him. They mean that Christ is actually operating through them; that the whole mass of Christians are the physical organism through which Christ acts—that we are His fingers and muscles, the cells of His body. And perhaps that explains one or two things. It explains why this new life is spread not only by purely mental acts like belief, but by bodily acts like baptism and Holy Communion. It is not merely the spreading of an idea; it is more like evolution—a biological or superbiological fact. There is no good trying to be more spiritual than God. God never meant man to be a purely spiritual creature. That is why He uses material things like bread and wine to put the new life into us. We may think this rather crude and unspiritual. God does not: He invented eating. He likes matter. He invented it.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Corinthians 10:23–31


MANY MEMBERS, YET ONE BODY
Here is another thing that used to puzzle me. Is it not frightfully unfair that this new life should be confined to people who have heard of Christ and been able to believe in Him? But the truth is God has not told us what His arrangements about the other people are. We do know that no man can be saved except through Christ; we do not know that only those who know Him can be saved through Him. But in the meantime, if you are worried about the people outside, the most unreasonable thing you can do is to remain outside yourself. Christians are Christ’s body, the organism through which He works. Every addition to that body enables Him to do more. If you want to help those outside you must add your own little cell to the body of Christ who alone can help them. Cutting off a man’s fingers would be an odd way of getting him to do more work.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Corinthians 12:12–27

FOUR KINDS OF LOVE
There were three words in Gk. which covered most kinds of love (Eros = sexual love, Storge = family affection, Philia = friendship) but the N.T. word for “love” or “charity” is Agapë, wh. has hardly any use in classical Gk—i.e. it is a new word for a new thing. It is obvious that it cannot mean “an involuntary sentiment.” We all say that God is wise, and habitually argue as if He were a fool! How cd. He be commanding the involuntary? Agapë, is best seen, I think, in the words “love your neighbour as yourself,” i.e. by an act of will, aim at your neighbour’s good in the same way as you aim at your own.

Now you don’t “love” yourself because of your own “lovable qualities.” You may, in moments of vanity, attribute lovable qualities to yourself, but that is not the cause of your self-love but one of the results of it. At other moments, when you dislike yourself, you still wish for your own happiness. This attitude to ones own self is dictated by nature: towards other selves it has to be acquired.

I take it, it has nothing in the world to do with trying to pretend that the enemy is “not so bad after all” or that his sins “don’t matter,” or that he is really lovable. Not a bit. It’s the old business about “loving the sinner and hating the sin” wh. becomes alive to me when I realise that this is what I do to myself all the time. In fact I provisionally define Agapë as “steadily remembering that inside the Gestapo-man there is a thing wh. says I and Me just as you do, which has just the same grounds (neither more nor less) as your ‘Me’ for being distinguished from all its sins however numerous, which, like you, was made by God for eternal happiness—remembering, and always acting for the real interests of that thing as far as you can.”

—from a letter to his brother, May 4, 1940

For reflection  1 Corinthians 13:1–13

BUILDING UP THE BODY
Whenever we edify, we glorify, but when we glorify we do not always edify. The edification of the people is an act of charity and obedience and therefore in itself a glorification of God. But it is possible for a man to glorify God in modes that do not edify his neighbor. This fact confronted the Church at an early stage in her career, in the phenomenon called “speaking in tongues.” In I Corinthians xiv, St. Paul points out that the man who is inspired to speak in an unknown tongue may do very well, as far as he himself is concerned, but will not profit the congregation unless his utterance can be translated. Thus glorifying and edifying may come to be opposed.

—from “On Church Music,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  1 Corinthians 14:1–33


RAISED IMPERISHABLE
Christianity is almost the only one of the great religions which thoroughly approves of the body—which believes that matter is good, that God Himself once took on a human body, that some kind of body is going to be given to us even in Heaven and is going to be an essential part of our happiness, our beauty, and our energy.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Corinthians 15:35–50


WARDROBE CHANGE
Great prophets and saints have an intuition of God which is positive and concrete in the highest degree. Because, just touching the fringes of His being, they have seen that He is plenitude of life and energy and joy, therefore (and for no other reason) they have to pronounce that He transcends those limitations which we call personality, passion, change, materiality, and the like. The positive quality in Him which repels these limitations is their only ground for all the negatives. But when we come limping after and try to construct an intellectual or “enlightened” religion, we take over these negatives (infinite, immaterial, impassible, immutable, etc.) and use them unchecked by any positive intuition. At each step we have to strip off from our idea of God some human attribute. But the only real reason for stripping off the human attribute is to make room for putting in some positive divine attribute. In St. Paul’s language, the purpose of all this unclothing is not that our idea of God should reach nakedness but that it should be reclothed. But unhappily we have no means of doing the reclothing. When we have removed from our idea of God some puny human characteristic, we (as merely erudite or intelligent enquirers) have no resources from which to supply that blindingly real and concrete attribute of Deity which ought to replace it. Thus at each step in the process of refinement our idea of God contains less, and the fatal pictures come in (an endless, silent sea, an empty sky beyond all stars, a dome of white radiance) and we reach at last mere zero and worship a nonentity. And the understanding, left to itself, can hardly help following this path. The Christian statement that only He who does the will of the Father will ever know the true doctrine is philosophically accurate. Imagination may help a little: but in the moral life, and (still more) in the devotional life we touch something concrete which will at once begin to correct the growing emptiness of our idea of God. One moment even of feeble contrition or blurred thankfulness will, at least in some degree, head us off from the abyss of abstraction. It is Reason herself which teaches us not to rely on Reason only in this matter. For Reason knows that she cannot work without materials. When it becomes clear that you cannot find out by reasoning whether the cat is in the linen-cupboard, it is Reason herself who whispers, “Go and look. This is not my job: it is a matter for the senses.” So here. The materials for correcting our abstract conception of God cannot be supplied by Reason: she will be the first to tell you to go and try experience—“Oh, taste and see!”

—from Miracles

For reflection  1 Corinthians 15:53–54


For reflection: 2 Corinthians 2:11

SCREWTAPE INSTRUCTS WORMWOOD:

Do remember you are there to fuddle him.

—from The Screwtape Letters



For reflection: 2 Corinthians 3:18

We are always completely, and therefore equally, known to God . . . We have unveiled. Not that any veil could have baffled His sight. The change is in us. The passive changes to the active. Instead of merely being known, we show, we tell, we offer ourselves to view.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer



PREPARING FOR ETERNITY
I suspect that our conception of Heaven as merely a state of mind is not unconnected with the fact that the specifically Christian virtue of Hope has in our time grown so languid. Where our fathers, peering into the future, saw gleams of gold, we see only the mist, white, featureless, cold and never moving.

The thought at the back of all this negative spirituality is really one forbidden to Christians. They, of all men, must not conceive spiritual joy and worth as things that need to be rescued or tenderly protected from time and place and matter and the senses. Their God is the God of corn and oil and wine. He is the glad Creator. He has become Himself incarnate. The sacraments have been instituted. Certain spiritual gifts are offered us only on condition that we perform certain bodily acts. After that we cannot really be in doubt of His intention. To shrink back from all that can be called Nature into negative spirituality is as if we ran away from horses instead of learning to ride. There is in our present pilgrim condition plenty of room (more room than most of us like) for abstinence and renunciation and mortifying our natural desires. But behind all asceticism the thought should be, “Who will trust us with the true wealth if we cannot be trusted even with the wealth that perishes?” Who will trust me with a spiritual body if I cannot control even an earthly body? These small and perishable bodies we now have were given to us as ponies are given to schoolboys. We must learn to manage: not that we may some day be free of horses altogether but that some day we may ride bare-back, confident and rejoicing, those greater mounts, those winged, shining and world-shaking horses which perhaps even now expect us with impatience, pawing and snorting in the King’s stables. Not that the gallop would be of any value unless it were a gallop with the King; but how else—since He has retained His own charger—should we accompany Him?

—from Miracles

For reflection  2 Corinthians 4:16–18


MADE FOR GOD
For the dream of finding our end, the thing we were made for, in a Heaven of purely human love could not be true unless our whole Faith were wrong. We were made for God. Only by being in some respect like Him, only by being a manifestation of His beauty, lovingkindness, wisdom or goodness, has any earthly Beloved excited our love. It is not that we have loved them too much, but that we did not quite understand what we were loving. It is not that we shall be asked to turn from them, so dearly familiar, to a Stranger. When we see the face of God we shall know that we have always known it. He has been a party to, has made, sustained and moved moment by moment within, all our earthly experiences of innocent love. All that was true love in them was, even on earth, more His than ours, and ours only because His. In Heaven there will be no anguish and no duty of turning away from our Beloveds. First, because we shall have turned already; from the portraits to the Original, from the rivulets to the Fountain, from the creatures He made lovable to Love Himself. But secondly, because we shall find them all in Him. By loving Him more than them we shall love them more than we now do.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  2 Corinthians 5:1–10


For reflection: 2 Corinthians 5:17

“What are we to make of Christ?” There is no question of what we can make of Him; it is entirely a question of what He intends to make of us. You must accept or reject the story.

—from “What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” God in the Dock



BE PERFECT?
When Christ tells us to be perfect is it because only He knows how very small an addition to our present efforts would break the enemy’s line completely?—that perfection would cost very little more than our actual dithering does? But we’re all like the boy who takes nearly, but never quite, enough trouble over his prep. and always just spoils it.

—from a letter to Sister Penelope CSMV, September 6, 1944

For reflection  2 Corinthians 7:1


GOD LOVES A CHEERFUL GIVER
In the passage where the New Testament says that every one must work, it gives as a reason “in order that he may have something to give to those in need.” Charity—giving to the poor—is an essential part of Christian morality: in the frightening parable of the sheep and the goats it seems to be the point on which everything turns. Some people nowadays say that charity ought to be unnecessary and that instead of giving to the poor we ought to be producing a society in which there were no poor to give to. They may be quite right in saying that we ought to produce this kind of society. But if anyone thinks that, as a consequence, you can stop giving in the meantime, then he has parted company with all Christian morality. I do not believe one can settle how much we ought to give. I am afraid the only safe rule is to give more than we can spare. In other words, if our expenditure on comforts, luxuries, amusements, etc., is up to the standard common among those with the same income as our own, we are probably giving away too little. If our charities do not at all pinch or hamper us, I should say they are too small. There ought to be things we should like to do and cannot do because our charities expenditure excludes them. I am speaking now of “charities” in the common way. Particular cases of distress among your own relatives, friends, neighbours or employees, which God, as it were, forces upon your notice, may demand much more: even to the crippling and endangering of your own position. For many of us the great obstacle to charity lies not in our luxurious living or desire for more money, but in our fear—fear of insecurity. This must often be recognised as a temptation. Sometimes our pride also hinders our charity; we are tempted to spend more than we ought on the showy forms of generosity (tipping, hospitality) and less than we ought on those who really need our help.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  2 Corinthians 9:6–15

For reflection: 2 Corinthians 12:9

I’ve met so many innocent sufferers who seem to be gladly offering their pain to God in Christ as part of the Atonement, so patient, so meek, even so at peace, and so unselfish that we can hardly doubt they are being, as St. Paul says, “made perfect by suffering.”

—from a letter to Belle Allen [Mrs. Edward A. Allen ], November 1, 1954



MY GRACE IS SUFFICIENT
My own experience is something like this. I am progressing along the path of life in my ordinary contentedly fallen and godless condition, absorbed in a merry meeting with my friends for the morrow or a bit of work that tickles my vanity today, a holiday or a new book, when suddenly a stab of abdominal pain that threatens serious disease, or a headline in the newspapers that threatens us all with destruction, sends this whole pack of cards tumbling down. At first I am overwhelmed, and all my little happinesses look like broken toys. Then, slowly and reluctantly, bit by bit, I try to bring myself into the frame of mind that I should be in at all times. I remind myself that all these toys were never intended to possess my heart, that my true good is in another world and my only real treasure is Christ. And perhaps, by God’s grace, I succeed, and for a day or two become a creature consciously dependent on God and drawing its strength from the right sources. But the moment the threat is withdrawn, my whole nature leaps back to the toys: I am even anxious, God forgive me, to banish from my mind the only thing that supported me under the threat because it is now associated with the misery of those few days. Thus the terrible necessity of tribulation is only too clear. God has had me for but forty-eight hours and then only by dint of taking everything else away from me. Let Him but sheathe that sword for a moment and I behave like a puppy when the hated bath is over—I shake myself as dry as I can and race off to reacquire my comfortable dirtiness, if not in the nearest manure heap, at least in the nearest flower bed. And that is why tribulations cannot cease until God either sees us remade or sees that our remaking is now hopeless.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  2 Corinthians 12:9–10

MADE PERFECT IN WEAKNESS
He meant what He said. Those who put themselves in His hands will become perfect, as He is perfect—perfect in love, wisdom, joy, beauty, and immortality. The change will not be completed in this life, for death is an important part of the treatment. How far the change will have gone before death in any particular Christian is uncertain.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  2 Corinthians 13:9


IT IS CHRIST WHO LIVES IN ME
And now we begin to see what it is that the New Testament is always talking about. It talks about Christians “being born again”; it talks about them “putting on Christ”; about Christ “being formed in us”; about our coming to “have the mind of Christ.”

Put right out of your head the idea that these are only fancy ways of saying that Christians are to read what Christ said and try to carry it out—as a man may read what Plato or Marx said and try to carry it out. They mean something much more than that. They mean that a real Person, Christ, here and now, in that very room where you are saying your prayers, is doing things to you. It is not a question of a good man who died two thousand years ago. It is a living Man, still as much a man as you, and still as much God as He was when He created the world, really coming and interfering with your very self; killing the old natural self in you and replacing it with the kind of self He has. At first, only for moments. Then for longer periods. Finally, if all goes well, turning you permanently into a different sort of thing; into a new little Christ, a being which, in its own small way, has the same kind of life as God; which shares in His power, joy, knowledge and eternity.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Galatians 2:19–20


JUSTIFIED BY FAITH
Here is the paradox of Christianity. As practical imperatives for here and now, the two great commandments have to be translated “Behave as if you loved God and man.” For no man can love because he is told to. Yet obedience on this practical level is not really obedience at all. And if a man really loved God and man, once again this would hardly be obedience; for if he did, he would be unable to help it. Thus the command really says to us, “Ye must be born again.” Till then, we have duty, morality, the Law. A schoolmaster, as St. Paul says, is to bring us to Christ. We must expect no more of it than of a schoolmaster; we must allow it no less. I must say my prayers to-day whether I feel devout or not; but that is only as I must learn my grammar if I am ever to read the poets.

But the school-days, please God, are numbered.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  Galatians 3:23–26

A MATTER
OF SELF-CONTROL
Temperance is, unfortunately, one of those words that has changed its meaning. It now usually means teetotalism. But in the days when the second Cardinal virtue was christened “Temperance,” it meant nothing of the sort. Temperance referred not specially to drink, but to all pleasures; and it meant not abstaining, but going the right length and no further. It is a mistake to think that Christians ought all to be teetotallers. . . . Of course it may be the duty of a particular Christian, or of any Christian, at a particular time, to abstain from strong drink, either because he is the sort of man who cannot drink at all without drinking too much, or because he is with people who are inclined to drunkenness and must not encourage them by drinking himself. But the whole point is that he is abstaining, for a good reason, from something which he does not condemn and which he likes to see other people enjoying. One of the marks of a certain type of bad man is that he cannot give up a thing himself without wanting everyone else to give it up. That is not the Christian way. An individual Christian may see fit to give up all sorts of things for special reasons—marriage, or meat, or beer, or the cinema; but the moment he starts saying the things are bad in themselves, or looking down his nose at other people who do use them, he has taken the wrong turning.

One great piece of mischief has been done by the modern restriction of the word Temperance to the question of drink. It helps people to forget that you can be just as intemperate about lots of other things. A man who makes his golf or his motor-bicycle the centre of his life, or a woman who devotes all her thoughts to clothes or bridge or her dog, is being just as “intemperate” as someone who gets drunk every evening. Of course, it does not show on the outside so easily: bridge-mania or golf-mania do not make you fall down in the middle of the road. But God is not deceived by externals.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Galatians 5:22–24


DEAD TO THE WORLD
It’s all there in the New Testament, though. “Dying to the world”—“the world is crucified to me and I to the world.” And I find I haven’t begun: at least not if it means (and can it mean less than) a steady and progressive disentangling of all one’s motives from the merely natural or this-worldly objects: like training a creeper to grow up one wall instead of another. I don’t mean disentangling from things wrong in themselves, but, say, from the v. pleasant evening which we hope to have over one of your hams to-morrow night, or from gratification at my literary success. It is not the things, nor even the pleasure in them, but the fact that in such pleasures my heart, or so much of my heart, lies. . . .

Well, thank God (for there is still part of me, a tiny little infantine voice somewhere amidst all the strong, confident natural voices, which can just thank Him, or perhaps only thank Him for being able to wish to thank Him) we shall not be left to the world. All His terrible resources (but it is we who force him to use them) will be brought against us to detach us from it—insecurity, war, poverty, pain, unpopularity, loneliness. We must be taught that this tent is not home.

—from a letter to Warfield M. Firor, December 5, 1949

For reflection  Galatians 6:14


PRAISE THE LORD!
Of course you will all remain in my prayers. I think it v. wrong to pray for people while they are in distress and then not to continue praying, now with thanksgiving, when they are relieved.

Many people think their prayers are never answered because it is the answered ones that they forget. Like the others who find proof for a superstition by recording all the cases in wh. bad luck has followed a dinner with 13 at table and forget all the others where it hasn’t.

—from a letter to Mrs. D. Jessup, November 17, 1952

For reflection  Philippians 1:3–4

LIVING IS CHRIST AND DYING IS GAIN
What a state we have got into when we can’t say “I’ll be happy when God calls me” without being afraid one will be thought “morbid.” After all, St. Paul said just the same. If we really believe what we say we believe—if we really think that home is elsewhere and that this life is a “wandering to find home,” why should we not look forward to the arrival. There are, aren’t there, only three things we can do about death: to desire it, to fear it, or to ignore it. The third alternative, which is the one the modern world calls “healthy” is surely the most uneasy and precarious of all.

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, June 7, 1959

For reflection  Philippians 1:21


PERFECT SURRENDER
The perfect surrender and humiliation were undergone by Christ: perfect because He was God, surrender and humiliation because He was man. Now the Christian belief is that if we somehow share the humility and suffering of Christ we shall also share in His conquest of death and find a new life after we have died and in it become perfect, and perfectly happy, creatures. This means something much more than our trying to follow His teaching. People often ask when the next step in evolution—the step to something beyond man—will happen. But in the Christian view, it has happened already. In Christ a new kind of man appeared: and the new kind of life which began in Him is to be put into us.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Philippians 2:1–11

WITH FEAR AND TREMBLING
The Bible really seems to clinch the matter when it puts the two things together into one amazing sentence. The first half is, “Work out your own salvation with fear and trembling”—which looks as if everything depended on us and our good actions: but the second half goes on, “For it is God who worketh in you”—which looks as if God did everything and we nothing. I am afraid that is the sort of thing we come up against in Christianity. I am puzzled, but I am not surprised. You see, we are now trying to understand, and to separate into water-tight compartments, what exactly God does and what man does when God and man are working together. And, of course, we begin by thinking it is like two men working together, so that you could say, “He did this bit and I did that.” But this way of thinking breaks down. God is not like that. He is inside you as well as outside: even if we could understand who did what, I do not think human language could properly express it. In the attempt to express it different Churches say different things. But you will find that even those who insist most strongly on the importance of good actions tell you you need Faith; and even those who insist most strongly on Faith tell you to do good actions.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Philippians 2:12–13

A SLOW
TRANSFORMATION
An enjoyment of Greek poetry is certainly a proper, and not a mercenary, reward for learning Greek; but only those who have reached the stage of enjoying Greek poetry can tell from their own experience that this is so. The schoolboy beginning Greek grammar cannot look forward to his adult enjoyment of Sophocles as a lover looks forward to marriage or a general to victory. He has to begin by working for marks, or to escape punishment, or to please his parents, or, at best, in the hope of a future good which he cannot at present imagine or desire. His position, therefore, bears a certain resemblance to that of the mercenary; the reward he is going to get will, in actual fact, be a natural or proper reward, but he will not know that till he has got it. Of course, he gets it gradually; enjoyment creeps in upon the mere drudgery, and nobody could point to a day or an hour when the one ceased and the other began. But it is just insofar as he approaches the reward that he becomes able to desire it for its own sake; indeed, the power of so desiring it is itself a preliminary reward.

The Christian, in relation to heaven, is in much the same position as this schoolboy. Those who have attained everlasting life in the vision of God doubtless know very well that it is no mere bribe, but the very consummation of their earthly discipleship; but we who have not yet attained it cannot know this in the same way, and cannot even begin to know it at all except by continuing to obey and finding the first reward of our obedience in our increasing power to desire the ultimate reward. Just in proportion as the desire grows, our fear lest it should be a mercenary desire will die away and finally be recognised as an absurdity. But probably this will not, for most of us, happen in a day; poetry replaces grammar, gospel replaces law, longing transforms obedience, as gradually as the tide lifts a grounded ship.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Philippians 3:7–15


JESUS AND THE RESURRECTION
There is not in Scripture the faintest suggestion that the Resurrection was new evidence for something that had in fact been always happening. The New Testament writers speak as if Christ’s achievement in rising from the dead was the first event of its kind in the whole history of the universe. He is the “first fruits,” the “pioneer of life.” He has forced open a door that has been locked since the death of the first man. He has met, fought, and beaten the King of Death. Everything is different because He has done so. This is the beginning of the New Creation: a new chapter in cosmic history has opened.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Philippians 3:10

AGAIN I WILL SAY, REJOICE!
Yes—it is sometimes hard to obey St. Paul’s “Rejoice.” We must try to take life moment by moment. The actual present is usually pretty tolerable, I think, if only we refrain from adding to its burden that of the past and the future. How right Our Lord is about “sufficient to the day.” Do even pious people in their reverence for the more radiantly divine element in His sayings, sometimes attend too little to their sheer practical common-sense?

—from a letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, May 4, 1962

For reflection  Philippians 4:4


RESCUED!
To ask that God’s love should be content with us as we are is to ask that God should cease to be God: because He is what He is, His love must, in the nature of things, be impeded and repelled by certain stains in our present character, and because He already loves us He must labour to make us lovable.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Colossians 1:9–14


SUFFERING FOR OTHERS
I have not a word to say against the doctrine that Our Lord suffers in all the suffering of His people (see Acts IX. 6) or that when we willingly accept what we suffer for others and offer it to God on their behalf, then it may be united with His sufferings and, in Him, may help to their redemption or even that of others whom we do not dream of. So that it is not in vain; tho’ of course we must not count on seeing it work out exactly as we, in our present ignorance, might think best. The key text for this view is Colossians I. 24. Is it not, after all, one more application of the truth that we are all “members one of another”?

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, September 12, 1951

For reflection  Colossians 1:24


For reflection: Colossians 2:8–23

Even in this present life, there is danger in the very concept of religion. It carries the suggestion that this is one more department of life, an extra department added to the economic, the social, the intellectual, the recreational, and all the rest.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer



PUTTING ON CHRIST
What is the good of pretending to be what you are not? Well, even on the human level, you know, there are two kinds of pretending. There is a bad kind, where the pretence is there instead of the real thing; as when a man pretends he is going to help you instead of really helping you. But there is also a good kind, where the pretence leads up to the real thing. When you are not feeling particularly friendly but know you ought to be, the best thing you can do, very often, is to put on a friendly manner and behave as if you were a nicer person than you actually are. And in a few minutes, as we have all noticed, you will be really feeling friendlier than you were. Very often the only way to get a quality in reality is to start behaving as if you had it already. That is why children’s games are so important. They are always pretending to be grown-ups—playing soldiers, playing shop. But all the time, they are hardening their muscles and sharpening their wits so that the pretence of being grown-up helps them to grow up in earnest.

Now, the moment you realise “Here I am, dressing up as Christ,” it is extremely likely that you will see at once some way in which at that very moment the pretence could be made less of a pretence and more of a reality. You will find several things going on in your mind which would not be going on there if you were really a son of God. Well, stop them. Or you may realise that, instead of saying your prayers, you ought to be downstairs writing a letter, or helping your wife to wash-up. Well, go and do it.

You see what is happening. The Christ Himself, the Son of God who is man (just like you) and God (just like His Father) is actually at your side and is already at that moment beginning to turn your pretence into a reality.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Colossians 2:6–12


SET YOUR MIND ON THINGS THAT ARE ABOVE
If I find in myself a desire which no experience in this world can satisfy, the most probable explanation is that I was made for another world. If none of my earthly pleasures satisfy it, that does not prove that the universe is a fraud. Probably earthly pleasures were never meant to satisfy it, but only to arouse it, to suggest the real thing. If that is so, I must take care, on the one hand, never to despise, or be unthankful for, these earthly blessings, and on the other, never to mistake them for the something else of which they are only a kind of copy, or echo, or mirage. I must keep alive in myself the desire for my true country, which I shall not find till after death; I must never let it get snowed under or turned aside; I must make it the main object of life to press on to that other country and to help others to do the same.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Colossians 3:1–3

AS DONE TO THE LORD
I reject at once an idea which lingers in the mind of some modern people that cultural activities are in their own right spiritual and meritorious—as though scholars and poets were intrinsically more pleasing to God than scavengers and bootblacks. . . . Let us clear it forever from our minds. The work of a Beethoven and the work of a charwoman become spiritual on precisely the same condition, that of being offered to God, of being done humbly “as to the LORD.” This does not, of course, mean that it is for anyone a mere toss-up whether he should sweep rooms or compose symphonies. A mole must dig to the glory of God and a cock must crow. We are members of one body, but differentiated members, each with his own vocation.

—from “Learning in War-Time,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Colossians 3:23–24


THE ARCHANGEL’S CALL
The doctrine of the Second Coming has failed, so far as we are concerned, if it does not make us realize that at every moment of every year in our lives Donne’s question “What if this present were the world’s last night?” is equally relevant.

Sometimes this question has been pressed upon our minds with the purpose of exciting fear. I do not think that is its right use. I am, indeed, far from agreeing with those who think all religious fear barbarous and degrading and demand that it should be banished from the spiritual life. Perfect love, we know, casteth out fear. But so do several other things—ignorance, alcohol, passion, presumption, and stupidity. It is very desirable that we should all advance to that perfection of love in which we shall fear no longer; but it is very undesirable, until we have reached that stage, that we should allow any inferior agent to cast out our fear. The objection to any attempt at perpetual trepidation about the Second Coming is, in my view, quite a different one: namely, that it will certainly not succeed. Fear is an emotion: and it is quite impossible—even physically impossible—to maintain any emotion for very long. A perpetual excitement of hope about the Second Coming is impossible for the same reason. Crisis-feeling of any sort is essentially transitory. Feelings come and go, and when they come a good use can be made of them: they cannot be our regular spiritual diet.

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  1 Thessalonians 4:13–18

REJOICE ALWAYS
My own idea, for what it is worth, is that all sadness which is not either arising from the repentance of a concrete sin and hastening towards concrete amendment or restitution, or else arising from pity and hastening to active assistance, is simply bad; and I think we all sin by needlessly disobeying the apostolic injunction to “rejoice” as much as by anything else.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  1 Thessalonians 5:16–18


BECOMING GOD’S OBJECTS
The problem of reconciling human suffering with the existence of a God who loves, is only insoluble so long as we attach a trivial meaning to the word “love,” and look on things as if man were the centre of them. Man is not the centre. God does not exist for the sake of man. Man does not exist for his own sake. “Thou hast created all things, and for thy pleasure they are and were created.” [Revelation 4:11] We were made not primarily that we may love God (though we were made for that too) but that God may love us, that we may become objects in which the Divine love may rest “well pleased.” To ask that God’s love should be content with us as we are is to ask that God should cease to be God: because He is what He is, His love must, in the nature of things, be impeded and repelled by certain stains in our present character, and because He already loves us He must labour to make us lovable. We cannot even wish, in our better moments, that He could reconcile Himself to our present impurities. . . . What we would here and now call our “happiness” is not the end God chiefly has in view: but when we are such as He can love without impediment, we shall in fact be happy.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  2 Timothy 2:20–21


INSPIRED BY GOD
My own position is not Fundamentalist, if Fundamentalism means accepting as a point of faith at the outset the proposition “Every statement in the Bible is completely true in the literal, historical sense.” That wd. break down at once on the parables. All the same commonsense and general understanding of literary kinds wd. forbid anyone to take the parables as historical statements, carried a v. little further, wd. force us to distinguish between (1.) Books like Acts or the account of David’s reign, wh. are everywhere dovetailed into a known history, geography, & genealogies (2.) Books like Esther, or Jonah or Job which deal with otherwise unknown characters living in unspecified period, & pretty well proclaim themselves to be sacred fiction.

Such distinctions are not new. Calvin left the historicity of Job an open question and, from earlier, St. Jerome said that the whole Mosaic account of creation was done “after the method of a popular poet.” Of course I believe the composition, presentation, & selection for inclusion in the Bible, of all the books to have been guided by the Holy Ghost. But I think He meant us to have sacred myth & sacred fiction as well as sacred history.

Mind you, I never think a story unhistorical because it is miraculous. I accept miracles. It’s almost the manner that distinguishes the fictions from the histories. Compare the “Once upon a time” opening of Job with the accounts of David, St. Paul, or Our Lord Himself. The basis of our Faith is not the Bible taken by itself but the agreed affirmation of all Christendom: to wh. we owe the Bible itself.

—from a letter to Janet Wise, October 5, 1955

For reflection  2 Timothy 3:16

ENEMY-OCCUPIED TERRITORY
One of the things that surprised me when I first read the New Testament seriously was that it talked so much about a Dark Power in the universe—a mighty evil spirit who was held to be the Power behind death and disease, and sin. The difference is that Christianity thinks this Dark Power was created by God, and was good when he was created, and went wrong. Christianity agrees with Dualism that this universe is at war. But it does not think this is a war between independent powers. It thinks it is a civil war, a rebellion, and that we are living in a part of the universe occupied by the rebel.

Enemy-occupied territory—that is what this world is. Christianity is the story of how the rightful king has landed, you might say landed in disguise, and is calling us all to take part in a great campaign of sabotage. When you go to church you are really listening-in to the secret wireless from our friends: that is why the enemy is so anxious to prevent us from going. He does it by playing on our conceit and laziness and intellectual snobbery. I know someone will ask me, “Do you really mean, at this time of day, to re-introduce our old friend the devil—hoofs and horns and all?” Well, what the time of day has to do with it I do not know. And I am not particular about the hoofs and horns. But in other respects my answer is “Yes, I do.” I do not claim to know anything about his personal appearance. If anybody really wants to know him better I would say to that person, “Don’t worry. If you really want to, you will. Whether you’ll like it when you do is another question.”

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Hebrews 2:14–15

TESTED AS WE ARE, YET WITHOUT SIN
God cd., had He pleased, have been incarnate in a man of iron nerves, the Stoic sort who lets no sigh escape Him. Of His great humility He chose to be incarnate in a man of delicate sensibilities who wept at the grave of Lazarus, and sweated blood in Gethsemane. Otherwise we should have missed the great lesson that it is by his will alone that a man is good or bad, and that feelings are not, in themselves, of any importance. . . . If he had been incarnate in a man of immense natural courage, that wd. have been for many of us almost the same as His not being incarnate at all.

—from a letter to Mrs. Frank L. Jones, February 23, 1947

For reflection  Hebrews 4:14–16


HIS DEATH BECOMES OURS
Humanity must embrace death freely, submit to it with total humility, drink it to the dregs, and so convert it into that mystical death which is the secret of life. But only a Man who did not need to have been a Man at all unless He had chosen, only one who served in our sad regiment as a volunteer, yet also only one who was perfectly a Man, could perform this perfect dying; and thus (which way you put it is unimportant) either defeat death or redeem it. He tasted death on behalf of all others. He is the representative “Die-er” of the universe: and for that very reason the Resurrection and the Life. Or conversely, because He truly lives, He truly dies, for that is the very pattern of reality. Because the higher can descend into the lower He who from all eternity has been incessantly plunging Himself in the blessed death of self-surrender to the Father can also most fully descend into the horrible and (for us) involuntary death of the body. Because Vicariousness is the very idiom of the reality He has created, His death can become ours. The whole Miracle, far from denying what we already know of reality, writes the comment which makes that crabbed text plain: or rather, proves itself to be the text on which Nature was only the commentary. In science we have been reading only the notes to a poem; in Christianity we find the poem itself.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Hebrews 9:11–16


GO TO CHURCH!
My own experience is that when I first became a Christian, about fourteen years ago, I thought that I could do it on my own, by retiring to my rooms and reading theology, and I wouldn’t go to the churches and Gospel Halls; and then later I found that it was the only way of flying your flag; and, of course, I found that this meant being a target. It is extraordinary how inconvenient to your family it becomes for you to get up early to go to Church. It doesn’t matter so much if you get up early for anything else, but if you get up early to go to Church it’s very selfish of you and you upset the house. If there is anything in the teaching of the New Testament which is in the nature of a command, it is that you are obliged to take the Sacrament, and you can’t do it without going to Church. I disliked very much their hymns, which I considered to be fifth-rate poems set to sixth-rate music. But as I went on I saw the great merit of it. I came up against different people of quite different outlooks and different education, and then gradually my conceit just began peeling off. I realized that the hymns (which were just sixth-rate music) were, nevertheless, being sung with devotion and benefit by an old saint in elastic-side boots in the opposite pew, and then you realize that you aren’t fit to clean those boots. It gets you out of your solitary conceit.

—from “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Hebrews 10:24–25


FAITH VS. SIGHT
There are things, say in learning to swim or to climb, which look dangerous and aren’t. Your instructor tells you it’s safe. You have good reason from past experience to trust him. Perhaps you can even see for yourself, by your own reason, that it is safe. But the crucial question is, will you be able to go on believing this when you actually see the cliff edge below you or actually feel yourself unsupported in the water? You will have no rational grounds for disbelieving. It is your senses and your imagination that are going to attack belief. Here, as in the New Testament, the conflict is not between faith and reason but between faith and sight. We can face things which we know to be dangerous if they don’t look or sound too dangerous; our real trouble is often with things we know to be safe but which look dreadful. Our faith in Christ wavers not so much when real arguments come against it as when it looks improbable—when the whole world takes on the desolate look which really tells us much more about the state of our passions and even our digestion than about reality.

—from “Religion: Reality or Substitute?” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Hebrews 11:6

AWAITING A WELCOME
When I attempted . . . to describe our spiritual longings, I was omitting one of their most curious characteristics. We usually notice it just as the moment of vision dies away, as the music ends, or as the landscape loses the celestial light. . . . You know what I mean. For a few minutes we have had the illusion of belonging to that world. Now we wake to find that it is no such thing. We have been mere spectators. Beauty has smiled, but not to welcome us; her face was turned in our direction, but not to see us. We have not been accepted, welcomed, or taken into the dance. We may go when we please, we may stay if we can: “Nobody marks us.” A scientist may reply that since most of the things we call beautiful are inanimate, it is not very surprising that they take no notice of us. That, of course, is true. It is not the physical objects that I am speaking of, but that indescribable something of which they become for a moment the messengers. And part of the bitterness which mixes with the sweetness of that message is due to the fact that it so seldom seems to be a message intended for us, but rather something we have overheard. By bitterness I mean pain, not resentment. We should hardly dare to ask that any notice be taken of ourselves. But we pine. The sense that in this universe we are treated as strangers, the longing to be acknowledged, to meet with some response, to bridge some chasm that yawns between us and reality, is part of our inconsolable secret. And surely, from this point of view, the promise of glory, in the sense described, becomes highly relevant to our deep desire. For glory means good report with God, acceptance by God, response, acknowledgement, and welcome into the heart of things. The door on which we have been knocking all our lives will open at last.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Hebrews 11:13–16


EMBRACE HIS PLAN
I think that many of us, when Christ has enabled us to overcome one or two sins that were an obvious nuisance, are inclined to feel (though we do not put it into words) that we are now good enough. He has done all we wanted Him to do, and we should be obliged if He would now leave us alone. As we say “I never expected to be a saint, I only wanted to be a decent ordinary chap.” And we imagine when we say this that we are being humble.

But this is the fatal mistake. Of course we never wanted, and never asked, to be made into the sort of creatures He is going to make us into. But the question is not what we intended ourselves to be, but what He intended us to be when He made us. He is the inventor, we are only the machine. He is the painter, we are only the picture. How should we know what He means us to be like? You see, He has already made us something very different from what we were. Long ago, before we were born, when we were inside our mothers’ bodies, we passed through various stages. We were once rather like vegetables, and once rather like fish: it was only at a later stage that we became like human babies. And if we had been conscious at those earlier stages, I daresay we should have been quite contented to stay as vegetables or fish—should not have wanted to be made into babies. But all the time He knew His plan for us and was determined to carry it out. Something the same is now happening at a higher level. We may be content to remain what we call “ordinary people”: but He is determined to carry out a quite different plan. To shrink back from that plan is not humility: it is laziness and cowardice. To submit to it is not conceit or megalomania; it is obedience.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Hebrews 12:1


TRAINING MAKES THE DIFFERENCE
There is a difference between doing some particular just or temperate action and being a just or temperate man. Someone who is not a good tennis player may now and then make a good shot. What you mean by a good player is a man whose eye and muscles and nerves have been so trained by making innumerable good shots that they can now be relied on. They have a certain tone or quality which is there even when he is not playing, just as a mathematician’s mind has a certain habit and outlook which is there even when he is not doing mathematics. In the same way a man who perseveres in doing just actions gets in the end a certain quality of character. Now it is that quality rather than the particular actions which we mean when we talk of a “virtue.”

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Hebrews 12:7–11




For reflection: Hebrews 13:2

In the poor man who knocks at my door, in my ailing mother, in the young man who seeks my advice, the Lord Himself is present: therefore let us wash His feet.

—from a letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, March 27, 1948



FAITH—A NECESSARY VIRTUE
Now Faith, in the sense in which I am here using the word, is the art of holding on to things your reason has once accepted, in spite of your changing moods. For moods will change, whatever view your reason takes. I know that by experience. Now that I am a Christian I do have moods in which the whole thing looks very improbable: but when I was an atheist I had moods in which Christianity looked terribly probable. This rebellion of your moods against your real self is going to come anyway. That is why Faith is such a necessary virtue: unless you teach your moods “where they get off,” you can never be either a sound Christian or even a sound atheist, but just a creature dithering to and fro, with its beliefs really dependent on the weather and the state of its digestion. Consequently one must train the habit of Faith.

The first step is to recognise the fact that your moods change. The next is to make sure that, if you have once accepted Christianity, then some of its main doctrines shall be deliberately held before your mind for some time every day. That is why daily prayers and religious readings and churchgoing are necessary parts of the Christian life. We have to be continually reminded of what we believe. Neither this belief nor any other will automatically remain alive in the mind. It must be fed. And as a matter of fact, if you examined a hundred people who had lost their faith in Christianity, I wonder how many of them would turn out to have been reasoned out of it by honest argument? Do not most people simply drift away?

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  James 1:5–8


NO FAITH WITHOUT WORKS
Christians have often disputed as to whether what leads the Christian home is good actions, or Faith in Christ. I have no right really to speak on such a difficult question, but it does seem to me like asking which blade in a pair of scissors is most necessary. A serious moral effort is the only thing that will bring you to the point where you throw up the sponge. Faith in Christ is the only thing to save you from despair at that point: and out of that Faith in Him good actions must inevitably come.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  James 2:14–26




For reflection: James 2:15–16

I am often, I believe, praying for others when I should be doing things for them. It’s so much easier to pray for a bore than to go and see him.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer


INNUMERABLE CHOICES
People often think of Christian morality as a kind of bargain in which God says, “If you keep a lot of rules I’ll reward you, and if you don’t I’ll do the other thing.” I do not think that is the best way of looking at it. I would much rather say that every time you make a choice you are turning the central part of you, the part of you that chooses, into something a little different from what it was before. And taking your life as a whole, with all your innumerable choices, all your life long you are slowly turning this central thing either into a heavenly creature or into a hellish creature: either into a creature that is in harmony with God, and with other creatures, and with itself, or else into one that is in a state of war and hatred with God, and with its fellow-creatures, and with itself. To be the one kind of creature is heaven: that is, it is joy and peace and knowledge and power. To be the other means madness, horror, idiocy, rage, impotence, and eternal loneliness. Each of us at each moment is progressing to the one state or the other.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  James 3:13–18

LIVING IN THE PRESENT
Never, in peace or war, commit your virtue or your happiness to the future. Happy work is best done by the man who takes his long-term plans somewhat lightly and works from moment to moment “as to the LORD.” It is only our daily bread that we are encouraged to ask for. The present is the only time in which any duty can be done or any grace received.

—from “Learning in War-Time,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  James 4:13–15




For reflection: James 5:1–5

If you want a religion to make you feel really comfortable, I certainly don’t recommend Christianity.

—from “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” God in the Dock



SERVANT OR FRIEND?
It seems to me we must conclude that such promises about prayer with faith refer to a degree or kind of faith which most believers never experience. A far inferior degree is, I hope, acceptable to God. Even the kind that says “Help thou my unbelief” may make way for a miracle. Again, the absence of such faith as insures the granting of the prayer is not even necessarily a sin; for Our Lord had no such assurance when He prayed in Gethsemane.

How or why does such faith occur sometimes, but not always, even in the perfect petitioner? We, or I, can only guess. My own idea is that it occurs only when the one who prays does so as God’s fellow-worker, demanding what is needed for the joint work. It is the prophet’s, the apostle’s, the missionary’s, the healer’s prayer that is made with this confidence and finds the confidence justified by the event. The difference, we are told, between a servant and a friend is that a servant is not in his master’s secrets. For him, “orders are orders.” He has only his own surmises as to the plans he helps to execute. But the fellow-worker, the companion or (dare we say?) the colleague of God is so united with Him at certain moments that something of the divine foreknowledge enters his mind. Hence his faith is the “evidence”—that is, the evidentness, the obviousness—of things not seen.

As the friend is above the servant, the servant is above the suitor, the man praying on his own behalf. It is no sin to be a suitor. Our Lord descends into the humiliation of being a suitor, of praying on His own behalf, in Gethsemane. But when He does so the certitude about His Father’s will is apparently withdrawn.

After that it would be no true faith—it would be idle presumption—for us, who are habitually suitors and do not often rise to the level of servants, to imagine that we shall have any assurance which is not an illusion—or correct only by accident—about the event of our prayers. Our struggle is—isn’t it?—to achieve and retain faith on a lower level. To believe that, whether He can grant them or not, God will listen to our prayers, will take them into account. Even to go on believing that there is a Listener at all.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  James 5:13–18

A TASTE OF HEAVEN
You may say that no temptation is ever overcome until we stop trying to overcome it—throw up the sponge. But then you could not “stop trying” in the right way and for the right reason until you had tried your very hardest. And, in yet another sense, handing everything over to Christ does not, of course, mean that you stop trying. To trust Him means, of course, trying to do all that He says. There would be no sense in saying you trusted a person if you would not take his advice. Thus if you have really handed yourself over to Him, it must follow that you are trying to obey Him. But trying in a new way, a less worried way. Not doing these things in order to be saved, but because He has begun to save you already. Not hoping to get to Heaven as a reward for your actions, but inevitably wanting to act in a certain way because a first faint gleam of Heaven is already inside you.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Peter 1:6–9

GOD’S ARRANGEMENT
God can show Himself as He really is only to real men. And that means not simply to men who are individually good, but to men who are united together in a body, loving one another, helping one another, showing Him to one another. For that is what God meant humanity to be like; like players in one band, or organs in one body.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  1 Peter 1:22


For reflection: 1 Peter 4:16

We are not necessarily doubting that God will do the best for us: we are wondering how painful the best will turn out to be.

—from a letter to Father Peter Bide, April 29, 1959



For reflection: 1 Peter 5:7

One has to act as if everything depended on one’s own exertions and then, as soon as the moment of action is over, “cast all your care” upon God and realise that in some deeper sense, you don’t matter in the least and it is only for your sake He uses you to do what He cd. do v. much more easily Himself.

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, April 22, 1954



THE ADVERSARY
No reference to the Devil or devils is included in any Christian Creeds, and it is quite possible to be a Christian without believing in them. I do believe such beings exist, but that is my own affair. Supposing there to be such beings, the degree to which humans were conscious of their presence would presumably vary very much. I mean, the more a man was in the Devil’s power, the less he would be aware of it, on the principle that a man is still fairly sober as long as he knows he’s drunk. It is the people who are fully awake and trying hard to be good who would be most aware of the Devil. It is when you start arming against Hitler that you first realise your country is full of Nazi agents. Of course, they don’t want you to believe in the Devil. If devils exist, their first aim is to give you an anaesthetic—to put you off your guard. Only if that fails, do you become aware of them.

—from “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” God in the Dock

For reflection  1 Peter 5:8–9


WHEN THE MORNING STAR RISES
For if we take the imagery of Scripture seriously, if we believe that God will one day give us the Morning Star and cause us to put on the splendour of the sun, then we may surmise that both the ancient myths and the modern poetry, so false as history, may be very near the truth as prophecy. At present we are on the outside of the world, the wrong side of the door. We discern the freshness and purity of morning, but they do not make us fresh and pure. We cannot mingle with the splendours we see. But all the leaves of the New Testament are rustling with the rumour that it will not always be so. Some day, God willing, we shall get in.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  2 Peter 1:16–19

CONDEMNED
I willingly believe that the damned are, in one sense, successful, rebels to the end; that the doors of hell are locked on the inside. I do not mean that the ghosts may not wish to come out of hell, in the vague fashion wherein an envious man “wishes” to be happy: but they certainly do not will even the first preliminary stages of that self-abandonment through which alone the soul can reach any good. They enjoy forever the horrible freedom they have demanded, and are therefore self-enslaved: just as the blessed, forever submitting to obedience, become through all eternity more and more free.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  2 Peter 2:2–18

ONE DAY IS AS A THOUSAND YEARS
I firmly believe that God’s life is non temporal. Time is a defect of reality since by its v. nature any temporal being loses each moment of its life to get the next—the moments run through us as if we were sieves. God forbid that we shd. think God to be like that.

—from a letter to Edward T. Dell, February 4, 1949

For reflection  2 Peter 3:8

14 Therefore, beloved, while you are waiting for these things, strive to be found by him at peace, without spot or blemish; 15and regard the patience of our Lord as salvation. So also our beloved brother Paul wrote to you according to the wisdom given him, 16speaking of this as he does in all his letters. There are some things in them hard to understand, which the ignorant and unstable twist to their own destruction, as they do the other scriptures. 17You therefore, beloved, since you are forewarned, beware that you are not carried away with the error of the lawless and lose your own stability. 18But grow in the grace and knowledge of our Lord and Savior Jesus Christ. To him be the glory both now and to the day of eternity. Amen.[27]

UNDERSTANDING SAINT PAUL
You will be glad to hear that I am at last beginning to get some small understanding of St. Paul: hitherto an author quite opaque to me. I am speaking now, of course, of the general drift of whole epistles: short passages, treated devotionally, are of course another matter. And yet the distinction is not, for me, quite a happy one. Devotion is best raised when we intend something else. At least, that is my experience. Sit down to meditate devotionally on a single verse, and nothing happens. Hammer your way through a continued argument, just as you would in a profane writer, and the heart will sometimes sing unbidden.

—from a letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 4, 1934

For reflection  2 Peter 3:14–16


For reflection: 1 John 1:8–10

It is no use to ask God with facetious earnestness for A when our whole mind is in reality filled with B. We must lay before Him what is in us, not what ought to be in us.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer



NO EXCUSES
I find that when I think I am asking God to forgive me I am often in reality (unless I watch myself very carefully) asking Him to do something quite different. I am asking Him not to forgive me but to excuse me. But there is all the difference in the world between forgiving and excusing. Forgiveness says “Yes, you have done this thing, but I accept your apology; I will never hold it against you and everything between us two will be exactly as it was before.” But excusing says “I see that you couldn’t help it or didn’t mean it; you weren’t really to blame.” If one was not really to blame then there is nothing to forgive. In that sense forgiveness and excusing are almost opposites. . . .

When it comes to a question of our forgiving other people, it is partly the same and partly different. It is the same because, here also, forgiving does not mean excusing. Many people seem to think it does. They think that if you ask them to forgive someone who has cheated or bullied them you are trying to make out...that there was really no cheating or no bullying. But if that were so, there would be nothing to forgive. They keep on replying, “But I tell you the man broke a most solemn promise.” Exactly: that is precisely what you have to forgive. (This doesn’t mean that you must necessarily believe his next promise. It does mean that you must make every effort to kill every taste of resentment in your own heart—every wish to humiliate or hurt him or to pay him out.) The difference between this situation and the one in which you are asking God’s forgiveness is this. In our own case we accept excuses too easily; in other people’s we do not accept them easily enough.

—from “On Forgiveness,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  1 John 1:9


JUST ENOUGH SELF-KNOWLEDGE
I come back to St. John: “if our heart condemn us, God is greater than our heart.” And equally, “if our heart flatter us, God is greater than our heart.” I sometimes pray not for self-knowledge in general but for just so much self-knowledge at the moment as I can bear and use at the moment; the little daily dose.

Have we any reason to suppose that total self-knowledge, if it were given us, would be for our good? Children and fools, we are told, should never look at half-done work; and we are not yet, I trust, even half done. You and I wouldn’t, at all stages, think it wise to tell a pupil exactly what we thought of his quality. It is much more important that he should know what to do next.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  1 John 3:18–20


HE DESIRES TO GIVE
God is love. Again, “Herein is love, not that we loved God but that He loved us” (I John IV, 10). We must not begin with mysticism, with the creature’s love for God, or with the wonderful foretastes of the fruition of God vouchsafed to some in their earthly life. We begin at the real beginning, with love as the Divine energy. This primal love is Gift-love. In God there is no hunger that needs to be filled, only plenteousness that desires to give. The doctrine that God was under no necessity to create is not a piece of dry scholastic speculation. It is essential.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  1 John 4:7–10

CASTING OUT FEAR
Perfect love, we know, casteth out fear. But so do several other things—ignorance, alcohol, passion, presumption, and stupidity. It is very desirable that we should all advance to that perfection of love in which we shall fear no longer; but it is very undesirable, until we have reached that stage, that we should allow any inferior agent to cast out our fear.

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  1 John 4:18

HE HEARS US
We can bear to be refused but not to be ignored. In other words, our faith can survive many refusals if they really are refusals and not mere disregards. The apparent stone will be bread to us if we believe that a Father’s hand put it into ours, in mercy or in justice or even in rebuke.

—from Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer

For reflection  1 John 5:14


HOW GOD LOVES US
There are two kinds of love: we love wise & kind & beautiful people because we need them, but we love (or try to love) stupid & disagreeable people because they need us. This second kind is the more divine because that is how God loves us: not because we are lovable but because He is love, not because He needs to receive but He delights to give.

—from a letter to Mary Van Deusen, May 25, 1951

For reflection  2 John 5


AFTERWORD
Reflections on Scripture

by C. S. Lewis



For us these writings are “holy,” or “inspired,” or, as St. Paul says, “the Oracles of God.” But this has been understood in more than one way, and I must try to explain how I understand it, at least so far as the Old Testament is concerned. I have been suspected of being what is called a Fundamentalist. That is because I never regard any narrative as unhistorical simply on the ground that it includes the miraculous. Some people find the miraculous so hard to believe that they cannot imagine any reason for my acceptance of it other than a prior belief that every sentence of the Old Testament has historical or scientific truth. But this I do not hold, any more than St. Jerome did when he said that Moses described Creation “after the manner of a popular poet” (as we should say, mythically) or than Calvin did when he doubted whether the story of Job were history or fiction. The real reason why I can accept as historical a story in which a miracle occurs is that I have never found any philosophical grounds for the universal negative proposition that miracles do not happen. I have to decide on quite other grounds (if I decide at all) whether a given narrative is historical or not. The Book of Job appears to me unhistorical because it begins about a man quite unconnected with all history or even legend, with no genealogy, living in a country of which the Bible elsewhere has hardly anything to say; because, in fact, the author quite obviously writes as a story-teller not as a chronicler.

I have therefore no difficulty in accepting, say, the view of those scholars who tell us that the account of Creation in Genesis is derived from earlier Semitic stories which were Pagan and mythical. We must of course be quite clear what “derived from” means. Stories do not reproduce their species like mice. They are told by men. Each re-teller either repeats exactly what his predecessor had told him or else changes it. He may change it unknowingly or deliberately. If he changes it deliberately, his invention, his sense of form, his ethics, his ideas of what is fit, or edifying, or merely interesting, all come in. If unknowingly, then his unconscious (which is so largely responsible for our forgettings) has been at work. Thus at every step in what is called—a little misleadingly—the “evolution” of a story, a man, all he is and all his attitudes, are involved. And no good work is done anywhere without aid from the Father of Lights. When a series of such retellings turns a creation story which at first had almost no religious or metaphysical significance into a story which achieves the idea of true Creation and of a transcendent Creator (as Genesis does), then nothing will make me believe that some of the re-tellers, or some one of them, has not been guided by God.

Thus something originally merely natural—the kind of myth that is found among most nations—will have been raised by God above itself, qualified by Him and compelled by Him to serve purposes which of itself it would not have served. Generalising this, I take it that the whole Old Testament consists of the same sort of material as any other literature—chronicle (some of it obviously pretty accurate), poems, moral and political diatribes, romances, and what not; but all taken into the service of God’s word. Not all, I suppose, in the same way. There are prophets who write with the clearest awareness that Divine compulsion is upon them. There are chroniclers whose intention may have been merely to record. There are poets like those in the Song of Songs who probably never dreamed of any but a secular and natural purpose in what they composed. There is (and it is not less important) the work first of the Jewish and then of the Christian Church in preserving and canonizing just these books. There is the work of redactors and editors in modifying them. On all of these I suppose a Divine pressure; of which not by any means all need have been conscious.

The human qualities of the raw materials show through. Naïvety, error, contradiction, even (as in the cursing Psalms) wickedness are not removed. The total result is not “the Word of God” in the sense that every passage, in itself, gives impeccable science or history. It carries the Word of God; and we under grace, with attention to tradition and to interpreters wiser than ourselves, and with the use of such intelligence and learning as we may have, receive that word from it not by using it as an encyclopedia or an encyclical but by steeping ourselves in its tone or temper and so learning its overall message.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

Indexes

Index by Source

Index by Scripture Reference

 

 

INDEXES
There are numerous editions of the works of C. S. Lewis in circulation, all much loved and well read. The following indexes provide chapter numbers, essay titles, or addressees (if the citation is from a letter) as well as page numbers. The page numbers are keyed to the following editions of his works.



BOOKS BY C. S. LEWIS


The Abolition of Man. HarperOne, 2001.

The Allegory of Love: A Study in Medieval Tradition. Oxford Univ. Press, 1960.

Arthurian Torso. In Taliesin Through Logres, The Region of the Summer Stars, and Arthurian Torso. Wm. B. Eerdmans, 1974.

Christian Reflections. Wm. B. Eerdmans, 1967.

The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, vol. 1, Family Letters, 1905–1931. HarperCollins, 2000.

The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, vol. 2, Books, Broadcasts and the War 1931–1949. HarperCollins, 2004.

The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, vol. 3, Narnia, Cambridge, and Joy, 1950–1963. HarperCollins, 2006.

English Literature in the Sixteenth Century. Oxford Univ. Press, 1954.

An Experiment in Criticism. Cambridge Univ. Press, 1961.

The Four Loves. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1991.

God in the Dock: Essays on Theology and Ethics. Wm. B. Eerdmans, 1970.

The Great Divorce. HarperOne, 2001.

A Grief Observed. HarperOne, 2001.

Letters: C. S. Lewis [and] Don Giovanni Calabria: A Study in Friendship. Ann Arbor, MI: Servant Books, 1988.

Letters of C. S. Lewis, revised and enlarged. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1988, 2003.

Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1964, 2003.

The Magician’s Nephew. HarperCollins, 1955.

Mere Christianity. HarperOne, 2001.

Miracles. HarperOne, 2001.

On Stories: And Other Essays on Literature. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1982, 2002.

Out of the Silent Planet. Scribner, 2003.

Perelandra. Scribner, 2006.

The Pilgrim’s Regress: An Allegorical Apology for Christianity, Reason and Romanticism. Wm. B. Eerdmans, 1981.

Poems. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1977, 2003.

A Preface to “Paradise Lost.” Oxford Univ. Press, 1961.

Present Concerns. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1986, 2002.

The Problem of Pain. HarperOne, 2001.

Reflections on the Psalms. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1964.

The Screwtape Letters. Macmillan, 1961 (introduction). HarperOne, 2001.

Selected Literary Essays. Cambridge: Cambridge Univ. Press, 1969.

Spirits in Bondage: A Cycle of Lyrics. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1984.

Surprised by Joy: The Shape of My Early Life. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1956.

Till We Have Faces: A Myth Retold. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1957.

The Weight of Glory. HarperOne, 2001.

The World’s Last Night and Other Essays. Harcourt, Inc./Harvest, 1973, 2002.



OTHER SOURCES



Como, James T., ed. C. S. Lewis at the Breakfast Table and Other Reminiscences. Macmillan, 1979.

Davidman, Joy. Smoke on the Mountain: An Interpretation of the Ten Commandments. Westminster John Knox Press, 1954.

St. Athanasius. On the Incarnation. St. Vladimir’s Seminary Press, 1977.

INDEX BY SOURCE
The Abolition of Man
Chapter 1, pp. 16–17	Proverbs 4:1–6
Chapter 1, p. 26	Hosea 4:1–19
Chapter 2, p. 40	Proverbs 12:15–16
Chapter 3, p. 56	Deuteronomy 32:4–7
The Allegory of Love: A Study in Medieval Tradition
Chapter 4.2, p. 188	1 Samuel 28:3–20
Chapter 7.2, p. 315	Romans 3:4
Arthurian Torso
Chapter 4, pp. 326–27	Matthew 22:37
Chapter 4, p. 340	Nehemiah 9:6
Chapter 5, p. 368	Ezra 9:8
C. S. Lewis at the Breakfast Table and Other Reminiscences
“About Anthroposophy,” by A. C. Harwood, p. 29	Psalm 103:17–22
Christian Reflections
“Christianity and Culture,” p. 14	Matthew 6:1–4, 16–21
“Christianity and Culture,” p. 14	John 17:22–23
“Christianity and Culture,” p. 17	1 Samuel 13:19–20
“Christianity and Culture,” p. 24	Ezra 7:23
“Christianity and Culture,” p. 27	Jeremiah 42:1–6
“Christianity and Culture,” p. 27	Jeremiah 1:4–5
“Christianity and Culture,” p. 33	Mark 1:12–13
“Historicism,” p. 102	Job 19:23–27
“Modern Theology and Biblical Criticism,” p. 152	Acts 1:8
“On Church Music,” p. 94	1 Corinthians 14:1–33
“On Ethics,” pp. 52, 53, 55	Judges 17:6
“The Poison of Subjectivism,” p. 79	Romans 7:14–25
“The Poison of Subjectivism,” p. 80	1 Chronicles 19:13
“The Psalms,” p. 114	Psalm 1 [opening]
“The Psalms,” pp. 122–23	Isaiah 24:1–23
“The Psalms,” p. 124	Judges 15:1–20
“Religion: Reality or Substitute?” p. 41	Habakkuk 1:1–17
“Religion: Reality or Substitute?” pp. 41–42	Acts 28:11–27
“Religion: Reality or Substitute?” pp. 42–43	Hebrews 11:6
“Religion: Reality or Substitute?” p. 43	2 Chronicles 18:4
“The Seeing Eye,” pp. 168–69	Jeremiah 15:6
The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, Volume 1
Letter to Arthur Greeves, July 11, 1916, p. 210	Genesis 2:3
Letter to Arthur Greeves, February 10, 1930
(begun January 30, 1930), p. 882	Obadiah 3
Letter to Arthur Greeves, June 7, 1930, p. 903	Luke 19:8–10
Letter to Arthur Greeves, June 15, 1930, p. 906	Mark 14:66–72
Letter to Arthur Greeves, August 28, 1930, p. 933	Psalm 96:1–13
The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, Volume 2
Letter to Owen Barfield, June 2, 1940, p. 419	Isaiah 30:15
Letter to Rhona Bodle, January 3, 1948, p. 826	Psalm 143:1
Letter to Miss Breckenridge, August 1, 1949, p. 962	Psalm 84:10
Letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, March 27, 1948, p. 844	Hebrews 13:2
Letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, September 20, 1947, p. 804	Job 2:3
Letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, September 20, 1947, p. 804	John 13:2
Letter to Edward T. Dell, February 4, 1949, p. 915	2 Peter 3:8
Letter to Edward T. Dell, March 28, 1949, p. 929	2 Chronicles 20:31–34
Letter to Warfield M. Firor, December 5, 1949, pp. 1007–8	Galatians 6:14
Letter to Edith Gates, May 23, 1944, pp. 616–17	Leviticus 19:33–34
Letter to Arthur Greeves, December 20, 1943, p. 595	Psalm 37:8
Letter to Arthur Greeves, December 29, 1935, p. 174	Daniel 6:1–23
Letter to Arthur Greeves, December 29, 1935, p. 174	Proverbs 27:17
Letter to Arthur Greeves, July 2, 1949, p. 953	Matthew 27:42
Letter to Arthur Greeves, July 27, 1949, p. 960	Luke 11:4
Letter to Arthur Greeves, May 13, 1946, p. 710	Matthew 8:11–12
Letter to Arthur Greeves, October 1, 1934, p. 144	Numbers 13:33
Letter to Arthur Greeves, September 12, 1933, p. 124	Ezekiel 38:10
Letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 4, 1934, p. 136	2 Peter 3:14–16
Letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 29, 1938, pp. 225–26	Psalm 62:1–8
Letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, May 8, 1939, p. 258	Psalm 55:1–8
Letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 16, 1940, p. 391	Jeremiah 51:14–19
Letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, December 20, 1946, pp. 747–48	Isaiah 58:6–12
Letter to Mrs. Frank L. Jones, February 23, 1947, pp. 764–65	Hebrews 4:14–16
Letter to his brother, February 18, 1940, pp. 351–52	Amos 5:18
Letter to his brother, February 25, 1940, pp. 354	Genesis 39:1–20
Letter to his brother, May 4, 1940, pp. 408–9	1 Corinthians 13:1–13
Letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September 2, 1949, p. 976	Hosea 6:4–6
Letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September 2, 1949, p. 975	1 Corinthians 10:13
Letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September [12,] 1949, p. 980	Proverbs 8:32–35
Letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September 27, 1949, p. 983	Jeremiah 17:9
Letter to Vera Mathews, April 26, 1949, p. 935	John 13:5–9
Letter to Mary Neylan, March 26, 1940, pp. 371–72	Deuteronomy 11:18–21
Letter to Mary Neylan, April 18, 1940, p. 394	Jonah 3:4–10
Letter to Mary Neylan, January 20, 1942, p. 507	Psalm 40:1–3
Letter to Mary Neylan, May 20, 1945, p. 652	2 Samuel 1:11–12
Letter to Sister Penelope CSMV, May 15, 1941, p. 565	Numbers 22:24–31
Letter to Sister Penelope CSMV, March 25, 1943, p. 565	Numbers 21:1–9
Letter to Sister Penelope CSMV, September 6, 1944, p. 625	2 Corinthians 7:1
Letter to Patricia Thomson, December 8, 1941, p. 500	Jonah 1:16
The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, Volume 3
Letter to Belle Allen [Mrs. Edward A. Allen],	2 Corinthians 12:9 November 1, 1954, p. 520
Letter to Belle Allen [Mrs. Edward A. Allen],	Luke 13:16 November 1, 1954, p. 520
Letter to Peter Bide, June 14, 1960, p. 1161	Job 32:1–22
Letter to Rhona Bodle, February 9, 1953, p. 292	Acts 8:26–39
Letter to Miss Breckenridge, April 19, 1951, p. 109	1 Timothy 1:13–17
Letter to Ruth Broady, October 26, 1963, p. 1474	3 John 4
Letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, July 14, 1952, p. 214	Revelation 22:20
Letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, August 10, 1953, p. 358	1 Kings 14:7–14
Letter to Michael Edwards, February 11, 1960, pp. 1133–34	Romans 7:21–23
Letter to Genia Goelz, March 18, 1952, p. 172	Mark 9:14–24
Letter to Genia Goelz, May 15, 1952, p. 191	Ezekiel 28:2
Letter to Genia Goelz, June 20, 1952, p. 204	Romans 12:3–5
Letter to Arthur Greeves, August 19, 1947, pp. 1573–74	Luke 24:36–42
Letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 23, 1951, p. 111	Deuteronomy 4:19
Letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, November 5, 1954, pp. 522–23	Genesis 49:33–50:3
Letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 30, 1959, p. 1043	Jonah 4:1–11
Letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, December 20, 1961, p. 1304	Luke 16:1–13
Letter to Walter Hooper, November 30, 1954, p. 535	Isaiah 55:6–7
Letter to Mrs. D. Jessup, November 17, 1952, p. 252	Philippians 1:3–4
Letter to Mrs. D. Jessup, February 5, 1954, pp. 425–26	Luke 7:31–35
Letter to Mrs. D. Jessup, March 26, 1954, p. 448	Daniel 3:8–30
Letter to Mrs. Johnson, November 8, 1952, pp. 245–46	Matthew 25:31–46
Letter to Mrs. Johnson, November 8, 1952, p. 246	John 1:1
Letter to Mrs. Johnson, July 17, 1953, pp 347–48	1 Kings 19:1–18
Letter to Mrs. Johnson, March 2, 1955, p. 576	John 13:34–35
Letter to Mrs. Johnson, March 16, 1955, p. 580	Proverbs 31:10–31
Letter to Mrs. Johnson, May 14, 1955, p. 608	2 Kings 2:23–24
Letter to Mrs. Johnson, May 14, 1955, p. 608	Genesis 9:20–21
Letter to Mrs. Johnson, May 14, 1955, p. 608	Mark 7:24–30
Letter to Professor Clyde S. Kilby, May 7, 1959, pp. 1044–45	Ruth 1:1–4
Letter to Professor Clyde S. Kilby, May 7, 1959, p. 1046	Psalm 86:11
Letter to Joan Lancaster, July 18, 1957, pp. 871–72	Deuteronomy 10:12–22
Letter to Joan Lancaster, August 31, 1958, p. 971	Chronicles 10:12–15
Letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” March 5, 1951, p. 93	Matthew 14:22–33
Letter to Mrs. Emily McLay, August 3, 1953, p. 355	Romans 9:1–8
Letter to Mrs. Emily McLay, August 8, 1953, p. 357	Joshua 11:1–23
Letter to Valerie Pitt, May 17, 1956, p. 752	Luke 11:4
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, March 4, 1953, p. 301	Luke 1:30
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, August 10, 1953, p. 359	Luke 18:18–30
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, February 22, 1954, p. 432	2 Samuel 18:33
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, March 31, 1954, p. 449	Job 6:11
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, November 1, 1954, p. 522	John 12:1–8
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, March 19, 1956, pp. 720–21	Luke 10:38–42
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, July 5, 1956, pp. 767–68	Ruth 3:1–13
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, August 3, 1956, p. 776	Psalm 56:3–4
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, August 18, 1956, p. 782	Psalm 148:1–14
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, October 20, 1957, p. 889	Exodus 16:1–35
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, June 7, 1959, p. 1056	Philippians 1:21
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, May 4, 1962, p. 1335	Philippians 4:4
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, October 26, 1962, p. 1376	Psalm 82:3–4
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, November 26, 1962, p. 1384	Isaiah 46:3–4
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, June 17, 1963, pp. 1430–31	Isaiah 40:6–11
Letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, June 28, 1963, p. 1434	Mark 13:32
Letter to Lee Turner, July 19, 1958, pp. 960–61	Acts 15:7–9
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, December 7, 1950, p. 69	Genesis 39:1–6
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, January 5, 1951, p. 82	Luke 6:27–31
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, May 25, 1951, p. 119	2 John 5
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, September 12, 1951, pp. 134–35	Colossians 1:24
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, January 31, 1952, p. 163	John 9:1–4
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, June [2]9, 1953, p. 242	Psalm 119:57–64
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, April 22, 1954, p. 463	1 Peter 5:7
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, November 9, 1955, p. 670	Luke 17:11–19
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, February 5, 1956, pp. 701–2	Psalm 19:1–14
Letter to Mary Van Deusen, March 31, 1958, pp. 930–31	1 Samuel 3:1–21
Letter to Sheldon Vanauken, January 5 and 8, 1951, pp. 82, 84	Ezekiel 3:22–4:17
Letter to Sheldon Vanauken, March 6, 1955, p. 592	Lamentations 2:17
Letter to Sheldon Vanauken, May 8, 1955, p. 606	1 Samuel 15:17–23
Letter to Sir Henry Willinik, December 3, 1959, p. 1102	Lamentations 1:16
Letter to Janet Wise, October 5, 1955, pp. 652–53	2 Timothy 3:16
English Literature in the Sixteenth Century
Introduction, p. 35	Malachi 3:10
Book 2, chapter 1, p. 187	Proverbs 5:21–23
An Experiment in Criticism
Chapter 5, p. 44	Job 38:25–33
Chapter 8, pp. 67–68	Ezekiel 13:1–19
The Four Loves
Chapter 1: Introduction, p. 3	Mark 12:28–34
Chapter 1: Introduction, p. 3	Zephaniah 3:14–17
Chapter 2, p. 30	Revelation 2:19–23
Chapter 4, pp. 61–62	1 Samuel 18:1
Chapter 4, pp. 71–72	1 Samuel 20:17
Chapter 5, pp. 96–97	1 Corinthians 7:8–9
Chapter 5, p. 102	Matthew 16:21–23
Chapter 5, p. 105	Ephesians 5:25–28
Chapter 6, pp. 117–18	Jeremiah 17:7–8
Chapter 6, pp. 121–22	Matthew 25:14–30
Chapter 6, pp. 122–23	Deuteronomy 19:9
Chapter 6, pp. 123–24	Luke 14:26
Chapter 6, p. 126	Romans 1:18–20
Chapter 6, p. 126	1 John 4:7–10
Chapter 6, p. 127	Matthew 27:27–50
Chapter 6, p. 139	2 Corinthians 5:1–10
God in the Dock
“Answers to Questions on Christianity,” p. 50	John 8:31–32
“Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 51–52	Mark 10:17–31
“Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 53–54	Esther 4:4–17
“Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 55–56	Luke 9:46–50
“Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 56–57	1 Peter 5:8–9
“Answers to Questions on Christianity,” p. 58	James 5:1–5
“Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 61–62	Hebrews 10:24–25
“Christian Apologetics,” p. 90	Titus 1:9
“Christian Apologetics,” p. 92	Matthew 24:34–35
“Cross-Examination,” p. 262	Acts 4:13–20
“Cross-Examination,” p. 265	1 Samuel 13:1–15
“Cross-Examination,” p. 265	Revelation 3:16
“Cross-Examination,” p. 266	Luke 11:4
“Cross-Examination,” p. 266	Luke 21:36
“Dangers of National Repentance,” p. 191	2 Samuel 14:25–33
“Dogma and the Universe,” p. 43	Jeremiah 10:6–7
“Dogma and the Universe,” p. 47	Isaiah 6:1–6
“The Founding of the Oxford Socratic Club,” p. 128	Matthew 1:23
“The Grand Miracle,” p. 80	John 1:1–18
“The Grand Miracle,” p. 82	Ezekiel 6:6–7
“The Humanitarian Theory of Punishment,” p. 294	2 Samuel 8:15
“Letters” (to the editor of the journal Theology), p. 326	Joshua 8:1–29
“Man or Rabbit?” pp. 108–9	Isaiah 45:1–19
“Man or Rabbit?” p. 111	Luke 12:8–12
“Miracles,” p. 25	Exodus 3:1–6
“Miracles,” pp. 25–26	Exodus 7–13
“Miracles,” p. 28	2 Kings 19:35
“Miracles,” p. 29	John 2:1–11
“Miracles,” p. 32	Nahum 1:9
“‘Miserable Offenders,’” p. 121	Isaiah 59:9–15
“‘Miserable Offenders,’” pp. 123–24	Leviticus 4:27–31
“‘Miserable Offenders,’” p. 124	Luke 18:9–14
“‘Miserable Offenders,’” p. 124	Numbers 32:23
“Modern Translations of the Bible,” p. 230	Luke 1:1–4
“On the Transmission of Christianity,” p. 116	Judges 2:10
“On the Transmission of Christianity,” pp. 118–19	Revelation 13:1–9
“Religion Without Dogma?” p. 130	Isaiah 42:5–12
“Scraps,” p. 217	Genesis 18:16–33
“Some Thoughts,” pp. 148–49	Psalm 136:1–26
“Some Thoughts,” pp. 149–50	John 11:1–12:19
“‘The Trouble with “X,”’” pp. 152–53	Genesis 3:1–13
“‘The Trouble with “X,”’” p. 153	2 Samuel 12:1–13
“What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” p. 158	Luke 4:14–37
“What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” pp. 158–59	John 8:6–8
“What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” p. 160	2 Corinthians 5:17
“What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” p. 160	Mark 1:21–22
The Great Divorce
Preface, pp. viii–ix	Jeremiah 6:16–19
Preface, p. ix	Romans 8:19–23
Chapter 9, p. 69	Revelation 14:13–20
Chapter 9, pp. 71–72	Jeremiah 7:21–26
Chapter 9, p. 75	Joshua 24:14–15
Chapter 11, p. 106	Jeremiah 5:21–25
Chapter 13, pp. 138–39	Revelation 12:10–12
Chapter 13, p. 139	Zechariah 7:8–14
A Grief Observed
Chapter 1, p. 5	Genesis 37:34–35
Chapter 1, pp. 5–6	Lamentations 3:19–23
Chapter 1, pp. 6–7	Psalm 10:11–14
Chapter 1, p. 9	Luke 7:36–50
Chapter 1, pp. 9–10	Job 3:26
Chapter 1, p. 15	Job 28:22–28
Chapter 2, pp. 25–26	Job 23:1–9, 16–17
Chapter 2, pp. 26–27	Jeremiah 31:15
Chapter 3, pp. 40–41	Job 10:1–22
Chapter 3, pp. 42–43	Romans 2:4–8
Chapter 3, pp. 36–37	Ruth 1:1–4, 20
Chapter 3, pp. 45–46	John 20:11–14
Chapter 3, p. 49	Genesis 1:27
Chapter 4, p. 62	Ezra 3:10–11
Chapter 4, pp. 65–66	Isaiah 53:1–12
Chapter 4, p. 69	Job 9:11–24
Letters: C. S. Lewis [and] Don Giovanni Calabria: A Study in Friendship
Letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, April 17, 1949, p. 55	1 Samuel 12:19–25
Letters of C. S. Lewis (Revised and Enlarged)
Letter to Father Peter Bide, April 29, 1959, p. 477	1 Peter 4:16
Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer
Letter 2, p. 12	1 Kings 8:38–40
Letter 4, p. 19	Luke 11:4
Letter 4, pp. 20–21	Exodus 34:29–35
Letter 4, pp. 20–21	2 Corinthians 3:18
Letter 4, pp. 21–22	Exodus 19:7–25
Letter 4, p. 22	1 John 1:8–10
Letter 5, pp. 25–26	Luke 11:4
Letter 5, p. 26	Luke 11:4
Letter 5, pp. 26–27	Numbers 11:1–6
Letter 5, pp. 27–28	Matthew 6:12
Letter 6, p. 30	Colossians 2:8–23
Letter 6, p. 34	1 John 3:18–20
Letter 8, pp. 41–43	Luke 22:39–49
Letter 8, p. 43	Mark 15:1–34
Letter 9, p. 48	2 Samuel 22:7
Letter 10, p. 53	1 John 5:14
Letter 10, p. 55	Isaiah 55:8
Letter 11, p. 60	Mark 11:22–24
Letter 11, pp. 60–61	James 5:13–18
Letter 12, p. 66	James 2:15–16
Letter 13, p. 69	Leviticus 22:31–33
Letter 13, p. 69	1 Kings 13:18–19
Letter 13, p. 70	Genesis 2:19
Letter 14, p. 73	1 Kings 6:1–14
Letter 14, p. 75	Exodus 20:18–21
Letter 14, p. 75	Leviticus 25:1–7
Letter 14, p. 75	Numbers 28:26–30
Letter 14, pp. 75–76	Jonah 1:3
Letter 14, p. 76	Psalm 42:1–11
Letter 15, p. 82	Luke 11:4
Letter 17, p. 90	Psalm 29:1–2
Letter 17, p. 91	Psalm 34:8
Letter 17, pp. 92–93	Psalm 16:11
Letter 18, p. 96	2 Kings 22:13
Letter 18, p. 99	Acts 5:1–11
Letter 19, pp. 104–5	Matthew 26:26
Letter 20, p. 106	Genesis 33:3–4
Letter 20, p. 107	Job 17:13–16
Letter 20, pp. 108–9	Daniel 12:10
Letter 20, pp. 113–14	Psalm 119:33–40
Letter 21, p. 114	Psalm 66:16–20
Letter 21, p. 115	Galatians 3:23–36
Letter 21, p. 116	Exodus 24:3
Letter 22, p. 124	Isaiah 44:23
The Magician’s Nephew
Chapter 8, pp. 106–7, 109–10	Genesis 1:1–19
Mere Christianity
Book 1, chapter 1, pp. 6–7	Romans 1:18–23
Book 1, chapter 1, p. 8	Romans 2:14–16
Book 1, chapter 4, pp. 22–23	Isaiah 40:26
Book 1, chapter 5, pp. 28–29	2 Chronicles 30:6–9
Book 1, chapter 5, p. 31	Exodus 33:17–20
Book 1, chapter 5, p. 31	Acts 23:1–11
Book 1, chapter 5, pp. 31–32	Numbers 5:1–10
Book 1, chapter 5, p. 32	Isaiah 61:1–11
Book 2, chapter 2, pp. 44–45	Deuteronomy 22:23–27
Book 2, chapter 2, pp. 45–46	Hebrews 2:14–15
Book 2, chapter 3, p. 47	Jeremiah 3:19–4:2
Book 2, chapter 3, pp. 47–48	Deuteronomy 26:16–19
Book 2, chapter 3, pp. 49–50	Daniel 2:27–45
Book 2, chapter 3, p. 50	Numbers 6:24–26
Book 2, chapter 3, pp. 51–52	Mark 2:1–12
Book 2, chapter 3, pp. 51–52	Luke 5:17–26
Book 2, chapter 4, p. 54	Romans 14:7–9
Book 2, chapter 4, pp. 56–58	Romans 8:1–39
Book 2, chapter 4, pp. 58–59	1 Corinthians 1:18–25
Book 2, chapter 5, p. 60	Philippians 2:1–11
Book 2, chapter 5, p. 63	Joel 2:12–13
Book 2, chapter 5, p. 63	Luke 15:11–32
Book 2, chapter 5, p. 63	Ephesians 2:10
Book 2, chapter 5, pp. 63–64	1 Corinthians 10:23–31
Book 2, chapter 5, p. 64	1 Corinthians 12:12–27
Book 2, chapter 5, p. 65	Nahum 1:1–6
Book 3, chapter 1, pp. 71–72	Exodus 20:1–26
Book 3, chapter 1, pp. 72–73	Deuteronomy 5:7–21
Book 3, chapter 1, pp. 74–75	Revelation 7:13–17
Book 3, chapter 2, p. 77	Matthew 10:16
Book 3, chapter 2, pp. 78–79	Galatians 5:22–24
Book 3, chapter 2, p. 79	Proverbs 25:28
Book 3, chapter 2, p. 79	Jeremiah 33:15–16
Book 3, chapter 2, pp. 79–80	Hebrews 12:7–11
Book 3, chapter 2, p. 80	Micah 6:1–8
Book 3, chapter 3, pp. 82–83	Leviticus 19:18
Book 3, chapter 3, pp. 82–83	Deuteronomy 15:11
Book 3, chapter 3, pp. 84–85	2 Thessalonians 3:6–13
Book 3, chapter 3, pp. 85	Nehemiah 5:1–13
Book 3, chapter 3, pp. 86–87	2 Corinthians 9:6–15
Book 3, chapter 3, p. 87	John 14:15–21
Book 3, chapter 4, p. 92	James 3:13–18
Book 3, chapter 4, pp. 92–93	Deuteronomy 29:19–20
Book 3, chapter 4, p. 93	Ezekiel 33:7–20
Book 3, chapter 5, pp. 95–96	Romans 16:17–19
Book 3, chapter 5, p. 98	1 Corinthians 15:35–50
Book 3, chapter 5, pp. 98–99	Song of Solomon 1–8
Book 3, chapter 5, p. 100	1 Kings 11:1–6
Book 3, chapter 5, p. 101	1 Samuel 7:3–4
Book 3, chapter 5, pp. 101–2	Joshua 1:6–9
Book 3, chapter 5, p. 102	Judges 16:15–18
Book 3, chapter 6, pp. 104–5	Malachi 2:15–16
Book 3, chapter 6, pp. 108–9	Song of Solomon 1:1–17
Book 3, chapter 6, pp. 110–11	Proverbs 1:7
Book 3, chapter 7, pp. 116–18	Matthew 18:21–35
Book 3, chapter 7, pp. 119–20	Proverbs 24:17–18
Book 3, chapter 7, p. 120	1 Samuel 24:5–22
Book 3, chapter 7, p. 120	Acts 7:60
Book 3, chapter 8, pp. 122–23	Esther 5:11–13
Book 3, chapter 8, p. 123	2 Kings 5:19–27
Book 3, chapter 8, pp. 123–24	1 Kings 18:17–40
Book 3, chapter 8, p. 124	Jeremiah 49:19
Book 3, chapter 8, p. 124	Ezekiel 26:16–21
Book 3, chapter 8, pp. 124–25	Matthew 7:21–23
Book 3, chapter 8, p. 127	2 Samuel 11:2–5
Book 3, chapter 8, pp. 127–28	Matthew 23:5–7
Book 3, chapter 8, p. 128	2 Chronicles 7:14
Book 3, chapter 9, p. 129	Ruth 2:4–18
Book 3, chapter 9, p. 131	Luke 10:30–37
Book 3, chapter 9, p. 132	Isaiah 33:15–16
Book 3, chapter 9, pp. 132–33	Deuteronomy 6:5
Book 3, chapter 10, pp. 134–35	Titus 2:11–14
Book 3, chapter 10, pp. 136–37	Colossians 3:1–3
Book 3, chapter 10, p. 137	Revelation 4:1–11
Book 3, chapter 11, pp. 140–41	James 1:5–8
Book 3, chapter 11, pp. 141–42	Ephesians 6:10–18
Book 3, chapter 11, p. 143	Psalm 40:6–8
Book 3, chapter 11, p. 143	Numbers 29:1–40
Book 3, chapter 12, p. 145	Genesis 15:1–21
Book 3, chapter 12, p. 146	Leviticus 12–16
Book 3, chapter 12, pp. 147–48	1 Peter 1:6–9
Book 3, chapter 12, p. 148	James 2:14–26
Book 3, chapter 12, p. 149	Philippians 2:12–13
Book 3, chapter 12, pp. 149–50	Revelation 21:21–23
Book 4, chapter 1, pp. 153–54	Proverbs 3:1–8
Book 4, chapter 2, p. 164	2 Kings 6:16–17
Book 4, chapter 2, pp. 164–65	Ezekiel 39:7–8
Book 4, chapter 2, p. 165	1 Peter 1:22
Book 4, chapter 3, pp. 167–68	Psalm 145:19
Book 4, chapter 3, pp. 169–70	1 Chronicles 29:10–11
Book 4, chapter 3, p. 170	Isaiah 44:6–8
Book 4, chapter 4, p. 175	Zechariah 4:1–6
Book 4, chapter 4, p. 176	Psalm 73:27–28
Book 4, chapter 5, p. 179	Isaiah 9:6
Book 4, chapter 5, p. 181	Romans 6:19–23
Book 4, chapter 7, pp. 188–89	Colossians 2:6–12
Book 4, chapter 7, pp. 191–92	Galatians 2:19–20
Book 4, chapter 7, p. 192	Psalm 139:1–24
Book 4, chapter 7, p. 193	Zechariah 4:6
Book 4, chapter 8, pp. 195–97	Matthew 11:28–30
Book 4, chapter 8, p. 195	Ephesians 4:22–24
Book 4, chapter 8, pp. 196–97	Ezekiel 11:19–20
Book 4, chapter 8, pp. 197–98	Matthew 7:16–20
Book 4, chapter 8, pp. 198–99	Romans 6:3–8
Book 4, chapter 8, p. 199	Romans 10:14–15
Book 4, chapter 9, pp. 201–2	Matthew 5:43–48
Book 4, chapter 9, pp. 202–3	Luke 14:25–33
Book 4, chapter 9, p. 203	Ezekiel 36:24–28
Book 4, chapter 9, pp. 203–4	Hebrews 12:1
Book 4, chapter 9, pp. 204–5	Malachi 3:2
Book 4, chapter 9, p. 205	Psalm 127:1
Book 4, chapter 9, pp. 205–6	Matthew 19:21
Book 4, chapter 10, p. 207	2 Corinthians 13:9
Book 4, chapter 10, pp. 208–9	Acts 16:9–10
Book 4, chapter 10, p. 212	Isaiah 1:18
Book 4, chapter 10, pp. 213–14	Deuteronomy 8:10–20
Book 4, chapter 10, pp. 214–15	Luke 12:48
Book 4, chapter 10, pp. 215–16	John 6:35–40
Book 4, chapter 10, pp. 216–17	Genesis 28:16
Book 4, chapter 11, pp. 226–27	Romans 12:1–2
Miracles
Chapter 1, pp. 1–2	Deuteronomy 7:17–19
Chapter 4, p. 51	Genesis 1:1
Chapter 7, pp. 73–75	Isaiah 7:14
Chapter 9, pp. 104–5	Isaiah 65:17–25
Chapter 11, pp. 143–45	1 Corinthians 15:53–54
Chapter 11, pp. 146–47	Amos 9:5–6
Chapter 11, p. 150	Daniel 5:5–9
Chapter 14, p. 173	Luke 1:26–35
Chapter 14, pp. 179–81	Matthew 1:18–25
Chapter 14, pp. 184–86	Ezekiel 37:1–14
Chapter 14, pp. 186–87	Habakkuk 2:18–20
Chapter 14, pp. 187–88	1 Chronicles 1:1–9:1
Chapter 14, pp. 195–97	Genesis 6:1–7
Chapter 14, pp. 197–98	Revelation 21:1–5
Chapter 14, p. 198	Isaiah 35:1–10
Chapter 14, pp. 202–3	Isaiah 25:6–9
Chapter 14, p. 208	Isaiah 53:5
Chapter 14, pp. 209–10	Job 14:1–22
Chapter 14, pp. 211–12	Hebrews 9:11–16
Chapter 15, p. 219	Luke 9:10–17
Chapter 16, pp. 233–35	Acts 2:14–36
Chapter 16, pp. 235–37	John 20:1–21:25
Chapter 16, pp. 236–37	Philippians 3:10
Chapter 16, pp. 237–39	Isaiah 26:19
Chapter 16, pp. 241–42	Acts 1:6–11
Chapter 16, p. 258	Job 37:18
Chapter 16, pp. 260–61	Matthew 22:24–30
Chapter 16, pp. 265–66	2 Corinthians 4:16–18
Appendix B, pp. 287–88	Job 38:1–3
Appendix B, pp. 291–92	Acts 12:1–17
On the Incarnation by St. Athanasius
From the introduction, pp. 4–5	2 Kings 22:1–23:4
From the introduction, p. 7	Psalm 133:1
On Stories: And Other Essays on Literature
“On Three Ways of Writing for Children,” pp. 39–40	1 Samuel 17:1–53
Out of the Silent Planet
Chapter 12, pp. 75–76	Exodus 11:1
Perelandra
Chapter 6, p. 71	Revelation 22:21
Chapter 9, p. 100	Genesis 6:16–26
The Pilgrim’s Regress
Book 8, chapter 8, p. 149	Psalm 78:40
Book 10, chapter 3 (“Divine Justice”), p. 179	Revelation 20:10–15
Poems
“As the Ruin Falls,” pp. 109–10	Jeremiah 45:4–5
“Sonnet,” p. 120	2 Chronicles 32:20–22
“The Nativity,” p. 122	Luke 2:1–7
“No Beauty We Could Desire,” p. 124	Luke 22:7–20
“Stephen to Lazarus,” p. 125	John 11:28–44
Present Concerns: Essays by C. S. Lewis
“Equality,” pp. 17–18	Philemon 8–16
“Equality,” p. 18	Exodus 23:1–11
“Modern Man and His Categories of Thought,” p. 65	Jude 3–4
“On Living in an Atomic Age,” pp. 73–74	Psalm 27:1–3
A Preface to “Paradise Lost”
Chapter 2, p. 11	Jeremiah 9:6
Chapter 8, pp. 61	Exodus 29:42
Chapter 10, p. 68	Genesis 45:1–10
Chapter 10, pp. 70–71	Jeremiah 19:14–15
Chapter 12, p. 88	2 Chronicles 2:6
Chapter 13, pp. 96–97	Numbers 16:1–11
Chapter 13, p. 102	Deuteronomy 28:15
Chapter 14, pp. 104–5	Revelation 18:4–8
The Problem of Pain
Preface, p. xii	Job 42:11
Chapter 1, p. 11	Genesis 4:3–16
Chapter 1, p. 13	Psalm 97:1–12
Chapter 2, p. 27	Proverbs 21:1
Chapter 3, pp. 32–33	John 3:16
Chapter 3, pp. 34–35	Isaiah 64:8
Chapter 3, p. 35	Jeremiah 18:1–11
Chapter 3, p. 39	Hosea 3:1–5
Chapter 3, pp. 39–40	Psalm 23:1–6
Chapter 3, pp. 40–41	2 Timothy 2:20–21
Chapter 3, p. 41	Colossians 1:9–14
Chapter 3, p. 43	Joshua 21:45
Chapter 3, p. 44	Jeremiah 31:3
Chapter 3, p. 44	Revelation 3:19–20
Chapter 3, p. 46	Jeremiah 8:1–22
Chapter 3, p. 46	2 Chronicles 29:20–36
Chapter 3, pp. 46–47	Romans 13:11–14
Chapter 3, p. 47	Hosea 14:1–7
Chapter 4, p. 50	Daniel 9:6–8
Chapter 4, pp. 50–52	Romans 3:10–18, 23–24
Chapter 4, pp. 53–54	Leviticus 26:40–45
Chapter 4, pp. 54–55	Isaiah 1:1–31
Chapter 4, p. 58	Joshua 7:1–26
Chapter 4, pp. 59–60	Exodus 32:1–35
Chapter 4, p. 61	1 Thessalonians 5:16–18
Chapter 4, p. 62	1 Chronicles 21:1–19
Chapter 4, p. 62	Leviticus 11:44–45
Chapter 5, p. 63	Genesis 3:1–7
Chapter 5, p. 70	Proverbs 9:10
Chapter 5, pp. 70–71	Romans 5:15–21
Chapter 5, p. 75	Genesis 3:1–5
Chapter 6, p. 88	Isaiah 48:6–19
Chapter 6, pp. 90–91	Jeremiah 25:30
Chapter 6, p. 93	2 Chronicles 26:1–20
Chapter 6, p. 94	Haggai 1:1–6
Chapter 6, p. 94	Isaiah 22:11
Chapter 6, pp. 94–95	Jeremiah 32:17–42
Chapter 6, pp. 95–96	Judges 10:6–16
Chapter 6, p. 99	Job 12:13
Chapter 6, pp. 99–100	1 Samuel 15:22–23
Chapter 6, pp. 100–101	Genesis 22:1–19
Chapter 6, pp. 102–4	John 19:1–30
Chapter 6, pp. 104–5	Job 30:17–31
Chapter 6, pp. 106–7	2 Corinthians 12:9–10
Chapter 7, pp. 111–12	2 Kings 8:7–19
Chapter 7, p. 116	John 14:1–3
Chapter 7, p. 117	Ezra 10:1–4
Chapter 8, pp. 119–20	Isaiah 66:22–24
Chapter 8, p. 124	Ezekiel 18:25–32
Chapter 8, p. 130	2 Peter 2:2–18
Chapter 8, p. 130	Luke 16:19–31
Chapter 8, p. 131	Exodus 14:8
Chapter 9, p. 138	Isaiah 14:12–14
Chapter 9, p. 138	Judges 21:25
Chapter 10, p. 149	Matthew 5:8
Chapter 10, p. 149	Song of Solomon 4:1–15
Chapter 10, pp. 151–52	Revelation 5:1–10
Chapter 10, p. 152	Ezekiel 44:28
Chapter 10, p. 152	Joshua 22:5
Chapter 10, pp. 154–55	Revelation 2:17
Chapter 10, p. 157	Acts 20:35
Chapter 10, p. 159	1 Timothy 6:16
Reflections on the Psalms
Chapter 3, p. 22	Psalm 109:1–20
Chapter 3, pp. 24–25	Luke 17:3–4
Chapter 3, pp. 25–26	Psalm 52:1–9
Chapter 3, pp. 26–27	Matthew 5:17–18
Chapter 3, pp. 31–32	Ezekiel 22:23–31
Chapter 3, p. 32	Psalm 106:1–48
Chapter 3, p. 33	2 Kings 13:22–23
Chapter 4, pp. 40–41	Psalm 49:7–9, 15
Chapter 4, p. 43	Jeremiah 29:10–19
Chapter 5, pp. 45–46	2 Samuel 6:14–16
Chapter 6, pp. 60–61	Psalm 119:97–112
Chapter 6, pp. 62–63	2 Kings 17:5–41
Chapter 7, pp. 71–72	Proverbs 4:23–27
Chapter 7, p. 74	Psalm 1:1–6
Chapter 8, pp. 82–83	Deuteronomy 4:15–20
Chapter 9, pp. 92–93	Leviticus 9:1–6
Chapter 9, pp. 93–94	Psalm 33:1–22
Chapter 9, pp. 94–95	Psalm 150:1–6
Chapter 9, pp. 95–97	1 Chronicles 16:23–24
Chapter 9, pp. 96–97	1 Samuel 2:1–10
Chapter 9, p. 97	Leviticus 17:1–16
Chapter 9, pp. 97–98	Psalm 50:19–23
Chapter 10, pp. 105–7	Acts 17:22–23
Chapter 11, pp. 109–12	Afterword
Chapter 11, pp. 112–13	Matthew 7:28–29
Chapter 11, pp. 114–15	Ecclesiastes 12:13
Chapter 11, pp. 117–18	Luke 24:13–35
Chapter 11, p. 119	Matthew 13:10–17
Chapter 12, p. 120	Acts 8:27–38
Chapter 12, pp. 126–27	Psalm 22:1–31
Chapter 12, pp. 131–32	Genesis 12:1–3
Chapter 12, p. 134	Psalm 8:1–9
Chapter 12, p. 136	Psalm 137:1–9
Smoke on the Mountain by Joy Davidman
From the foreword, p. 7	Acts 22:4–19
The Screwtape Letters
Preface to the 1961 ed. (Macmillan), p. viii	Job 1:6–12
Letter 1, p. 4	2 Corinthians 2:11
Letter 4, pp. 18–19	Numbers 14:5–24
Letter 7, pp. 32–33	1 Corinthians 1:10–17
Letter 8, pp. 39–40	Habakkuk 3:16–19
Letter 9, pp. 44–45	Ecclesiastes 2:1–10
Letter 9, pp. 45–46	Ecclesiastes 7:15–18
Letter 12, pp. 59–60	Ecclesiastes 2:24–26
Letter 12, pp. 60–61	Ecclesiastes 8:16–17
Letter 14, p. 73	Micah 7:19
Letter 15, pp. 75–76	Ecclesiastes 3:1–11
Letter 15, pp. 76–78	Matthew 6:34
Letter 21, pp. 111–12	Psalm 31:15
Letter 22, pp. 119–20	Revelation 15:2–3
Letter 25, pp. 135–36	Ecclesiastes 1:1–10
Letter 27, pp. 149–50	Psalm 90:2–4
Letter 28, p. 155	Ecclesiastes 11:8–9
Letter 29, p. 160	1 Samuel 18:12
Letter 29, pp. 161–62	Matthew 27:19–26
Letter 29, p. 162	Ecclesiastes 9:3–6
Letter 29, p. 163	Luke 22:54–60
Letter 30, p. 166	Esther 6:6–14
Spirits in Bondage: A Cycle of Lyrics
“De Profundis,” p. 21	Ezekiel 2:6–7
Surprised by Joy
Chapter 5, p. 75	Nehemiah 1:4–11
Chapter 11, p. 177	Jeremiah 2:19
Chapter 12, p. 191	Psalm 14:1
Chapter 14, pp. 228–29	Acts 26:8–10
Chapter 15, pp. 231–32	1 Chronicles 28:9
The Weight of Glory
“The Inner Ring,” p. 153–54	Isaiah 5:20
“Is Theology Poetry?” p. 140	John 9:25
“Learning in War-Time,” p. 49	Matthew 24:6
“Learning in War-Time,” pp. 52–53	Luke 20:20–26
“Learning in War-Time,” pp. 53–54	Acts 5:29
“Learning in War-Time,” pp. 55–56	Colossians 3:23–24
“Learning in War-Time,” pp. 58–59	Nehemiah 12:44–13:22
“Learning in War-Time,” p. 60	1 Kings 3:3–9
“Learning in War-Time,” p. 61	James 4:13–15
“Learning in War-Time,” pp. 61–62	Ezekiel 3:16–21
“Membership,” p. 160	Proverbs 17:17
“Membership,” pp. 166–67	Ephesians 4:7–16
“Membership,” p. 170	Romans 5:6–8
“Membership,” p. 170	2 Chronicles 15:8–15
“On Forgiveness,” p. 178	Matthew 6:12
“On Forgiveness,” pp. 178–79, 181–82	1 John 1:9
“On Forgiveness,” p. 181	Psalm 51:1–17
“On Forgiveness,” pp. 182–83	Matthew 6:12
“A Slip of the Tongue,” pp. 189–90	John 3:27–36
“A Slip of the Tongue,” pp. 190–91	Deuteronomy 30:15–20
“The Weight of Glory,” pp. 25–26	Mark 8:34–35
“The Weight of Glory,” pp. 27–28	Philippians 3:7–15
“The Weight of Glory,” p. 34	Matthew 19:24
“The Weight of Glory,” pp. 36–38	Jeremiah 9:23–24
“The Weight of Glory,” pp. 38–39	Romans 14:10–12
“The Weight of Glory,” pp. 38–39	Ezekiel 34:11–31
“The Weight of Glory,” pp. 39–41	Hebrews 11:13–16
“The Weight of Glory,” pp. 40–41	Isaiah 60:1–2
“The Weight of Glory,” pp. 41–42	Genesis 32:26–30
“The Weight of Glory,” p. 43	2 Peter 1:16–19
“The Weight of Glory,” p. 44	Revelation 22:1–7
“The Weight of Glory,” pp. 45–46	John 17:10
“Why I Am Not a Pacifist,” pp. 79–80	Acts 9:36–42
The World’s Last Night and Other Essays
“The Efficacy of Prayer,” pp. 4–5	Mark 14:32–43
“The Efficacy of Prayer,” pp. 8–9	1 Kings 17:17–24
“The Efficacy of Prayer,” pp. 8–9	Psalm 105:40–42
“The Efficacy of Prayer,” p. 9	Mark 6:1–13
“The Efficacy of Prayer,” pp. 10–11	Matthew 26:36–46
“On Obstinacy in Belief,” p. 26	Judges 6:11–24
“On Obstinacy in Belief,” p. 26	John 4:7–26
“On Obstinacy in Belief,” pp. 28–29	John 20:24–29
“The World’s Last Night,” pp. 100–101	2 Thessalonians 2:1–12
“The World’s Last Night,” pp. 104–6	Revelation 16:1–21
“The World’s Last Night,” p. 107	Mark 13:32–37
“The World’s Last Night,” pp. 107–8	Matthew 24:36–44
“The World’s Last Night,” p. 109	1 Thessalonians 4:13–18
“The World’s Last Night,” p. 109	Zechariah 14:1–11
“The World’s Last Night,” p. 109	1 John 4:18
“The World’s Last Night,” p. 110	Daniel 12:1–4
“The World’s Last Night,” pp. 112–13	Deuteronomy 1:16–17
“The World’s Last Night,” pp. 112–13	Amos 1:3–2:6
INDEX BY SCRIPTURE REFERENCE
Genesis
1:1	Miracles, chapter 4, p. 51
1:1–19	The Magician’s Nephew, chapter 8, pp. 106–7, 109–10
1:27	A Grief Observed, chapter 3, p. 49
2:3	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 1, letter to Arthur Greeves, July 11, 1916, p. 210
2:19	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 13, p. 70
3:1–5	The Problem of Pain, chapter 5, p. 75
3:1–7	The Problem of Pain, chapter 5, p. 63
3:1–13	God in the Dock, “‘The Trouble with “X,”’” pp. 152–53
4:3–16	The Problem of Pain, chapter 1, p. 11
4:16	Perelandra, chapter 9, p. 100
6:1–7	Miracles, chapter 14, pp. 195–97
9:20–21	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Johnson, May 14, 1955, p. 608
12:1–3	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 12, pp. 131–32
15:1–21	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 12, p. 145
18:16–33	God in the Dock, “Scraps,” p. 217
22:1–19	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, pp. 100–101
28:16	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 10, pp. 216–17
32:26–30	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” pp. 41–42
33:3–4	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 20, p. 106
37:34–35	A Grief Observed, chapter 1, p. 5
39:1–6	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, December 7, 1950, p. 69
39:1–20	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to his brother, February 25, 1940, p. 354
45:1–10	A Preface to “Paradise Lost,” chapter 10, p. 68
49:33–50:3	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, November 5, 1954, pp. 522–23
Exodus
3:1–6	God in the Dock, “Miracles,” p. 25
7–13	God in the Dock, “Miracles,” pp. 25–26
11:1	Out of the Silent Planet, chapter 12, pp. 75–76
14:8	The Problem of Pain, chapter 8, p. 131
16:1–35	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, October 20, 1957, p. 889
19:7–25	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 4, pp. 21–22
20:1–26	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 1, pp. 71–72
20:18–21	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 14, p. 75
23:1–11	Present Concerns: Essays by C. S. Lewis , “Equality,” p. 18
24:3	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 21, p. 116
29:42	A Preface to “Paradise Lost,” chapter 8, p. 61
32:1–35	The Problem of Pain, chapter 4, pp. 59–60
33:17–20	Mere Christianity, book 1, chapter 5, p. 31
34:29–35	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 4, pp. 20–21
Leviticus
4:27–31	God in the Dock, “‘Miserable Offenders,’” pp. 123–24
9:1–6	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 9, pp. 92–93
11:44–45	The Problem of Pain, chapter 4, p. 62
12–16	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 12, p. 146
17:1–16	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 9, p. 97
19:18	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 3, pp. 82–83
19:33–34	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Edith Gates, May 23, 1944, pp. 616–17
22:31–33	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 13, p. 69
25:1–7	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 14, p. 75
26:40–45	The Problem of Pain, chapter 4, pp. 53–54
Numbers
5:1–10	Mere Christianity, book 1, chapter 5, pp. 31–32
6:24–26	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 3, p. 50
11:1–6	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 5, pp. 26–27
13:33	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Arthur Greeves, October 1, 1934, p. 144
14:5–24	The Screwtape Letters, letter 4, pp. 18–19
16:1–11	A Preface to “Paradise Lost,” chapter 13, pp. 96–97
21:1–9	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Sister Penelope CSMV, March 25, 1943, p. 565
22:24–31	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Sister Penelope CSMV, May 15, 1941, p. 565
28:26–30	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 14, p. 75
29:1–40	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 11, p. 143
32:23	God in the Dock, “‘Miserable Offenders,’” p. 124
Deuteronomy
1:16–17	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” pp. 112–13
4:15–20	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 8, pp. 82–83
4:19	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 23, 1951, p. 111
5:7–21	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 1, pp. 72–73
6:5	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 9, pp. 132–133
7:17–19	Miracles, chapter 1, pp. 1–2
8:10–20	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 10, pp. 213–14
10:12–22	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Joan Lancaster, July 18, 1957, pp. 871–72
11:18–21	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Mary Neylan, March 26, 1940, pp. 371–72
15:11	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 3, pp. 82–83
19:9	The Four Loves, chapter 6, pp. 122–23
22:23–27	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 2, pp. 44–45
26:16–19	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 3, pp. 47–48
28:15	A Preface to “Paradise Lost,” chapter 13, p. 102
29:19–20	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 4, pp. 92–93
30:15–20	The Weight of Glory, “A Slip of the Tongue,” pp. 190–91
32:4–7	The Abolition of Man, chapter 3, p. 56
Joshua
1:6–9	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 5, pp. 101–2
7:1–26	The Problem of Pain, chapter 4, p. 58
8:1–29	God in the Dock, letter to the editor of the journal Theology, p. 326
11:1–23	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Emily McLay, August 8, 1953, p. 357
21:45	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, p. 43
22:5	The Problem of Pain, chapter 10, p. 152
24:14–15	The Great Divorce, chapter 9, p. 75
Judges
2:10	God in the Dock, “On the Transmission of Christianity,” p. 116
6:11–24	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “On Obstinacy in Belief,” p. 26
10:6–16	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, pp. 95–96
15:1–20	Christian Reflections, “The Psalms,” p. 124
16:15–18	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 5, p. 102
17:6	Christian Reflections, “On Ethics,” pp. 52, 53, 55
21:25	The Problem of Pain, chapter 9, p. 138
Ruth
1:1–4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Professor Clyde S. Kilby, May 7, 1959, pp. 1044–45
1:1–4, 20	A Grief Observed, chapter 3, pp. 36–37
2:4–18	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 9, p. 129
3:1–13	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, July 5, 1956, pp. 767–68
1 Samuel
2:1–10	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 9, pp. 96–97
3:1–21	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, March 31, 1958, pp. 930–31
7:3–4	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 5, p. 101
12:19–25	Letters: C. S. Lewis [and] Don Giovanni Calabria: A Study in Friendship, letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, April 17, 1949, p. 55
13:1–15	God in the Dock, “Cross-Examination,” p. 265
13:19–20	Christian Reflections, “Christianity and Culture,” p. 17
15:17–23	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Sheldon Vanauken, May 8, 1955, p. 606
15:22–23	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, pp. 99–100
17:1–53	On Stories: And Other Essays on Literature, “On Three Ways of Writing for Children,” pp. 39–40
18:1	The Four Loves, chapter 4, pp. 61–62
18:12	The Screwtape Letters, letter 29, p. 160
20:17	The Four Loves, chapter 4, pp. 71–72
24:5–22	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 7, p. 120
28:3–20	The Allegory of Love: A Study in Medieval Tradition, chapter 4.2, p. 188
2 Samuel
1:11–12	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Mary Neylan, May 20, 1945, p. 652
6:14–16	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 5, pp. 45–46
8:15	God in the Dock, “The Humanitarian Theory of Punishment,” p. 294
11:2–5	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 8, p. 127
12:1–13	God in the Dock, “‘The Trouble with “X,”’” p. 153
14:25–33	God in the Dock, “Dangers of National Repentance,” p. 191
18:33	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, February 22, 1954, p. 432
22:7	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 9, p. 48
1 Kings
3:3–9	The Weight of Glory, “Learning in War-Time,” p. 60
6:1–14	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 14, p. 73
8:38–40	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 2, p. 12
11:1–6	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 5, p. 100
13:18–19	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 13, p. 69
14:7–14	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, August 10, 1953, p. 358
17:17–24	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The Efficacy of Prayer,” pp. 8–9
18:17–40	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 8, pp. 123–24
19:1–18	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Johnson, July 17, 1953, pp. 347–48
2 Kings
2:23–24	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Johnson, May 14, 1955, p. 608
5:19–27	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 8, p. 123
6:16–17	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 2, p. 164
8:7–19	The Problem of Pain, chapter 7, pp. 111–12
13:22–23	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 3, p. 33
17:5–41	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 6, pp. 62–63
19:35	God in the Dock, “Miracles,” p. 28
22:1–23:4	On the Incarnation, by St. Athanasius, from the introduction, pp. 4–5
22:13	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 18, p. 96
1 Chronicles
1:1–9:1	Miracles, chapter 14, pp. 187–88
16:23–24	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 9, pp. 95–97
19:13	Christian Reflections, “The Poison of Subjectivism,” p. 80
21:1–19	The Problem of Pain, chapter 4, p. 62
28:9	Surprised by Joy, chapter 15, pp. 231–32
29:10–11	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 3, pp. 169–70
2 Chronicles
2:6	A Preface to “Paradise Lost,” chapter 12, p. 88
7:14	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 8, p. 128
10:12–15	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Joan Lancaster, August 31, 1958, p. 971
15:8–15	The Weight of Glory, “Membership,” p. 170
18:4	Christian Reflections, “Religion: Reality or Substitute?” p. 43
20:31–34	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Edward T. Dell, March 28, 1949, p. 929
26:1–20	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, p. 93
29:20–36	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, p. 46
30:6–9	Mere Christianity, book 1, chapter 5, pp. 28–29
32:20–22	Poems, “Sonnet,” p. 120
Ezra
3:10–11	A Grief Observed, chapter 4, p. 62
7:23	Christian Reflections, “Christianity and Culture,” p. 24
9:8	Arthurian Torso, chapter 5, p. 368
10:1–4	The Problem of Pain, chapter 7, p. 117
Nehemiah
1:4–11	Surprised by Joy, chapter 5, p. 75
5:1–13	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 3, p. 85
9:6	Arthurian Torso, chapter 4, p. 340
12:44–13:22	The Weight of Glory, “Learning in War-Time,” pp. 58–59
Esther
4:4–17	God in the Dock, “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 53–54
5:11–13	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 8, pp. 122–23
6:6–14	The Screwtape Letters, letter 30, p. 166
Job
1:6–12	The Screwtape Letters, preface to 1961 ed. (Macmillan), pp. viii
2:3	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, September 20, 1947, p. 804
3:26	A Grief Observed, chapter 1, pp. 9–10
6:11	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, March 31, 1954, p. 449
9:11–24	A Grief Observed, chapter 4, p. 69
10:1–22	A Grief Observed, chapter 3, pp. 40–41
12:13	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, p. 99
14:1–22	Miracles, chapter 14, pp. 209–10
17:13–16	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 20, p. 107
19:23–27	Christian Reflections, “Historicism,” p. 102
23:1–9, 16–17	A Grief Observed, chapter 2, pp. 25–26
28:22–28	A Grief Observed, chapter 1, p. 15
30:17–31	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, pp. 104–5
32:1–22	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Peter Bide, June 14, 1960, p. 1161
37:18	Miracles, chapter 16, p. 258
38:1–3	Miracles, appendix B, pp. 287–88
38:25–33	An Experiment in Criticism, chapter 5, p. 44
42:11	The Problem of Pain, preface, pp. xii
Psalms
[opening]	Christian Reflections, “The Psalms,” p. 114
1:1–6	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 7, p. 74
8:1–9	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 12, p. 134
10:11–14	A Grief Observed, chapter 1, pp. 6–7
14:1	Surprised by Joy, chapter 12, p. 191
16:11	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 17, pp. 92–93
19:1–14	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, February 5, 1956, pp. 701–2
22:1–31	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 12, pp. 126–27
23:1–6	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, pp. 39–40
27:1–3	Present Concerns: Essays by C. S. Lewis, “On Living in an Atomic Age,” pp. 73–74
29:1–2	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 17, p. 90
31:15	The Screwtape Letters, letter 21, pp. 111–12
33:1–22	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 9, pp. 93–94
34:8	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 17, p. 91
37:8	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Arthur Greeves, December 20, 1943, p. 595
40:1–3	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Mary Neylan, January 20, 1942, p. 507
40:6–8	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 11, p. 143
42:1–11	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 14, p. 76
49:7–9, 15	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 4, pp. 40–41
50:19–23	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 9, pp. 97–98
51:1–17	The Weight of Glory, “On Forgiveness,” p. 181
52:1–9	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 3, pp. 25–26
55:1–8	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, May 8, 1939, p. 258
56:3–4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, August 3, 1956, p. 776
62:1–8	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 29, 1938, pp. 225–26
66:16–20	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 21, p. 114
73:27–28	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 4, p. 176
78:40	The Pilgrim’s Regress, book 8, chapter 8, p. 149
82:3–4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, October 26, 1962, p. 1376
84:10	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Miss Breckenridge, August 1, 1949, p. 962
86:11	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Professor Clyde S. Kilby, May 7, 1959, p. 1046
90:2–4	The Screwtape Letters, letter 27, pp. 149–50
96:1–13	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 1, letter to Arthur Greeves, August 28, 1930, p. 933
97:1–12	The Problem of Pain, chapter 1, p. 13
103:17–22	C. S. Lewis at the Breakfast Table and Other Reminiscences, “About Anthroposophy,” by A. C. Harwood, p. 29
105:40–42	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The Efficacy of Prayer,” pp. 8–9
106:1–48	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 3, p. 32
109:1–20	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 3, p. 22
119:33–40	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 20, pp. 113–14
119:57–64	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, June [2]9, 1953, p. 242
119:97–112	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 6, pp. 60–61
127:1	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 9, p. 205
133:1	On the Incarnation, by St. Athanasius, from the introduction, p. 7
136:1–26	God in the Dock, “Some Thoughts,” pp. 148–49
137:1–9	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 12, p. 136
139:1–24	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 7, p. 192
143:1	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Rhona Bodle, January 3, 1948, p. 826
145:19	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 3, pp. 167–68
148:1–14	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, August 18, 1956, p. 782
150:1–6	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 9, pp. 94–95
Proverbs
1:7	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 6, pp. 110–11
3:1–8	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 1, pp. 153–54
4:1–6	The Abolition of Man, chapter 1, pp. 16–17
4:23–27	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 7, pp. 71–72
5:21–23	English Literature in the Sixteenth Century, book 2, chapter 1, p. 187
8:32–35	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September [12,] 1949, p. 980
9:10	The Problem of Pain, chapter 5, p. 70
12:15–16	The Abolition of Man, chapter 2, p. 40
17:17	The Weight of Glory, “Membership,” p. 160
21:1	The Problem of Pain, chapter 2, p. 27
24:17–18	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 7, pp. 119–20
25:28	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 2, p. 79
27:17	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Arthur Greeves, December 29, 1935, p. 174
31:10–31	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Johnson, March 16, 1955, p. 580
Ecclesiastes
1:1–10	The Screwtape Letters, letter 25, pp. 135–36
2:1–10	The Screwtape Letters, letter 9, pp. 44–45
2:24–26	The Screwtape Letters, letter 12, pp. 59–60
3:1–11	The Screwtape Letters, letter 15, pp. 75–76
7:15–18	The Screwtape Letters, letter 9, pp. 45–46
8:16–17	The Screwtape Letters, letter 12, pp. 60–61
9:3–6	The Screwtape Letters, letter 29, p. 162
11:8–9	The Screwtape Letters, letter 28, p. 155
12:13	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 11, pp. 114–15
Song of Solomon
1:1–17	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 6, pp. 108–9
4:1–15	The Problem of Pain, chapter 10, p. 149
1–8	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 5, pp. 98–99
Isaiah
1:1–31	The Problem of Pain, chapter 4, pp. 54–55
1:18	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 10, p. 212
5:20	The Weight of Glory, “The Inner Ring,” pp. 153–54
6:1–6	God in the Dock, “Dogma and the Universe,” p. 47
7:14	Miracles, chapter 7, pp. 73–75
9:6	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 5, p. 179
14:12–14	The Problem of Pain, chapter 9, p. 138
22:11	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, p. 94
24:1–23	Christian Reflections, “The Psalms,” pp. 122–23
25:6–9	Miracles, chapter 14, pp. 202–3
26:19	Miracles, chapter 16, pp. 237–39
30:15	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Owen Barfield, June 2, 1940, p. 419
33:15–16	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 9, p. 132
35:1–10	Miracles, chapter 14, p. 198
40:6–11	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, June 17, 1963, pp. 1430–31
40:26	Mere Christianity, book 1, chapter 4, pp. 22–23
42:5–12	God in the Dock, “Religion Without Dogma?” p. 130
44:6–8	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 3, p. 170
44:23	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 22, p. 124
45:1–19	God in the Dock, “Man or Rabbit?” pp. 108–9
46:3–4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, November 26, 1962, p. 1384
48:6–19	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, p. 88
53:1–12	A Grief Observed, chapter 4, pp. 65–66
53:5	Miracles, chapter 14, p. 208
55:6–7	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Walter Hooper, November 30, 1954, p. 535
55:8	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 10, p. 55
58:6–12	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, December 20, 1946, pp. 747–48
59:9–15	God in the Dock, “‘Miserable Offenders,’” p. 121
60:1–2	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” pp. 40–41
61:1–11	Mere Christianity, book 1, chapter 5, p. 32
64:8	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, pp. 34–35
65:17–25	Miracles, chapter 9, pp. 104–5
66:22–24	The Problem of Pain, chapter 8, pp. 119–20
Jeremiah
1:4–5	Christian Reflections, “Christianity and Culture,” p. 27
2:19	Surprised by Joy , chapter 11, p. 177
3:19–4:2	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 3, p. 47
5:21–25	The Great Divorce, chapter 11, p. 106
6:16–19	The Great Divorce, preface, pp. viii–ix
7:21–26	The Great Divorce, chapter 9, pp. 71–72
8:1–22	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, p. 46
9:6	A Preface to “Paradise Lost,” chapter 2, p. 11
9:23–24	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” pp. 36–38
10:6–7	God in the Dock, “Dogma and the Universe,” p. 43
15:6	Christian Reflections, “The Seeing Eye,” pp. 168–69
17:7–8	The Four Loves, chapter 6, pp. 117–18
17:9	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September 27, 1949, p. 983
18:1–11	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, p. 35
19:14–15	A Preface to “Paradise Lost,” chapter 10, pp. 70–71
25:30	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, pp. 90–91
29:10–19	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 4, p. 43
31:3	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, p. 44
31:15	A Grief Observed, chapter 2, pp. 26–27
32:17–42	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, pp. 94–95
33:15–16	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 2, p. 79
42:1–6	Christian Reflections, “Christianity and Culture,” p. 27
45:4–5	Poems, “As the Ruin Falls,” pp. 109–10
49:19	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 8, p. 124
51:14–19	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 16, 1940, p. 391
Lamentations
1:16	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Sir Henry Willink, December 3, 1959, p. 1102
2:17	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Sheldon Vanauken, March 6, 1955, p. 592
3:19–23	A Grief Observed, chapter 1, pp. 5–6
Ezekiel
2:6–7	Spirits in Bondage: A Cycle of Lyrics, “De Profundis,” p. 21
3:16–21	The Weight of Glory, “Learning in War-Time,” pp. 61–62
3:22–4:17	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letters to Sheldon Vanauken, January 5 and 8, 1951, pp. 82, 84
6:6–7	God in the Dock, “The Grand Miracle,” p. 82
11:19–20	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 8, pp. 196–97
13:1–19	An Experiment in Criticism, chapter 8, pp. 67–68
18:25–32	The Problem of Pain, chapter 8, p. 124
22:23–31	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 3, pp. 31–32
26:16–21	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 8, p. 124
28:2	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Genia Goelz, May 15, 1952, p. 191
33:7–20	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 4, p. 93
34:11–31	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” pp. 38–39
36:24–28	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 9, p. 203
37:1–14	Miracles, chapter 14, pp. 184–86
38:10	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Arthur Greeves, September 12, 1933, p. 124
39:7–8	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 2, pp. 164–65
44:28	The Problem of Pain, chapter 10, p. 152
Daniel
2:27–45	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 3, pp. 49–50
3:8–30	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. D. Jessup, March 26, 1954, p. 448
5:5–9	Miracles, chapter 11, p. 150
6:1–23	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Arthur Greeves, December 29, 1935, p. 174
9:6–8	The Problem of Pain, chapter 4, p. 50
12:1–4	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” p. 110
12:10	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 20, pp. 108–9
Hosea
3:1–5	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, p. 39
4:1–19	The Abolition of Man, chapter 1, p. 26
6:4–6	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September 2, 1949, p. 976
14:1–7	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, p. 47
Joel
2:12–13	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 5, p. 63
Amos
1:3–2:6	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” pp. 112–13
5:18	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to his brother, February 18, 1940, pp. 351–52
9:5–6	Miracles, chapter 11, pp. 146–47
Obadiah
3	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 1, letter to Arthur Greeves, February 10, 1930 (begun January 30, 1930), p. 882
Jonah
1:3	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 14, pp. 75–76
1:16	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Patricia Thomson, December 8, 1941, p. 500
3:4–10	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Mary Neylan, April 18, 1940, p. 394
4:1–11	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 30, 1959, p. 1043
Micah
6:1–8	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 2, p. 80
7:19	The Screwtape Letters, letter 14, p. 73
Nahum
1:1–6	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 5, p. 65
1:9	God in the Dock, “Miracles,” p. 32
Habakkuk
1:1–17	Christian Reflections, “Religion: Reality or Substitute?” p. 41
2:18–20	Miracles, chapter 14, pp. 186–87
3:16–19	The Screwtape Letters, letter 8, pp. 39–40
Zephaniah
3:14–17	The Four Loves, chapter 1: Introduction, p. 3
Haggai
1:1–6	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, p. 94
Zechariah
4:1–6	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 4, p. 175
4:6	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 7, p. 193
7:8–14	The Great Divorce, chapter 13, p. 139
14:1–11	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” p. 109
Malachi
2:15–16	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 6, pp. 104–5
3:2	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 9, pp. 204–5
3:10	English Literature in the Sixteenth Century, introduction, p. 35
Matthew
1:18–25	Miracles, chapter 14, pp. 179–81
1:23	God in the Dock, “The Founding of the Oxford Socratic Club,” p. 128
5:8	The Problem of Pain, chapter 10, p. 149
5:17–18	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 3, pp. 26–27
5:43–48	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 9, pp. 201–2
6:1–4, 16–21	Christian Reflections, “Christianity and Culture,” p. 14
6:12	The Weight of Glory, “On Forgiveness,” p. 178
6:12	The Weight of Glory, “On Forgiveness,” pp. 182–83
6:12	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 5, pp. 27–28
6:34	The Screwtape Letters, letter 15, pp. 76–78
7:16–20	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 8, pp. 197–98
7:21–23	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 8, pp. 124–25
7:28–29	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 11, pp. 112–13
8:11–12	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Arthur Greeves, May 13, 1946, p. 710
10:16	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 2, p. 77
11:28–30	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 8, pp. 195–97
13:10–17	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 11, p. 119
14:22–33	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” March 5, 1951, p. 93
16:21–23	The Four Loves, chapter 5, p. 102
18:21–35	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 7, pp. 116–18
19:21	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 9, pp. 205–6
19:24	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” p. 34
22:24–30	Miracles, chapter 16, pp. 260–61
22:37	Arthurian Torso, chapter 4, pp. 326–27
23:5–7	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 8, pp. 127–28
24:6	The Weight of Glory, “Learning in War-Time,” p. 49
24:34–35	God in the Dock, “Christian Apologetics,” p. 92
24:36–44	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” pp. 107–8
25:14–30	The Four Loves, chapter 6, pp. 121–22
25:31–46	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Johnson, November 8, 1952, pp. 245–46
26:26	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 19, pp. 104–5
26:36–46	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The Efficacy of Prayer,” pp. 10–11
27:19–26	The Screwtape Letters, letter 29, pp. 161–62
27:27–50	The Four Loves, chapter 6, p. 127
27:42	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Arthur Greeves, July 2, 1949, p. 953
Mark
1:12–13	Christian Reflections, “Christianity and Culture,” p. 33
1:21–22	God in the Dock, “What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” p. 160
2:1–12	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 3, pp. 51–52
6:1–13	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “Efficacy of Prayer,” p. 9
7:24–30	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Johnson, May 14, 1955, p. 608
8:34–35	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” pp. 25–26
9:14–24	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Genia Goelz, March 18, 1952, p. 172
10:17–31	God in the Dock, “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 51–52
11:22–24	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 11, p. 60
12:28–34	The Four Loves, chapter 1: Introduction, p. 3
13:32	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, June 28, 1963, p. 1434
13:32–37	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” p. 107
14:32–43	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The Efficacy of Prayer,” pp. 4–5
14:66–72	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 1, letter to Arthur Greeves, June 15, 1930, p. 906
15:1–34	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 8, p. 43
Luke
1:1–4	God in the Dock, “Modern Translations of the Bible,” p. 230
1:26–35	Miracles, chapter 14, p. 173
1:30	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, March 4, 1953, p. 301
2:1–7	Poems, “The Nativity,” p. 122
4:14–37	God in the Dock, “What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” p. 158
5:17–26	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 3, pp. 51–52
6:27–31	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, January 5, 1951, p. 82
7:31–35	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. D. Jessup, February 5, 1954, pp. 425–26
7:36–50	A Grief Observed, chapter 1, p. 9
9:10–17	Miracles, chapter 15, p. 219
9:46–50	God in the Dock, “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 55–56
10:30–37	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 9, p. 131
10:38–42	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, March 19, 1956, pp. 720–21
11:4	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 15, p. 82
11:4	God in the Dock, “Cross-Examination,” p. 266
11:4	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 4, p. 19
11:4	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 5, pp. 25–26
11:4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Arthur Greeves, July 27, 1949, p. 960
11:4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Valerie Pitt, May 17, 1956, p. 752
11:4	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 5, p. 26
12:8–12	God in the Dock, “Man or Rabbit,” p. 111
12:48	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 10, pp. 214–15
13:16	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Belle Allen [Mrs. Edward A. Allen], November 1, 1954, p. 520
14:25–33	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 9, pp. 202–3
14:26	The Four Loves, chapter 6, pp. 123–24
15:11–32	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 5, p. 63
16:1–13	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, December 20, 1961, p. 1304
16:19–31	The Problem of Pain, chapter 8, p. 130
17:3–4	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 3, pp. 24–25
17:11–19	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, November 9, 1955, p. 670
18:9–14	God in the Dock, “‘Miserable Offenders,’” p. 124
18:18–30	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, August 10, 1953, p. 359
19:8–10	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 1, letter to Arthur Greeves, June 7, 1930, p. 903
20:20–26	The Weight of Glory, “Learning in War-Time,” pp. 52–53
21:36	God in the Dock, “Cross-Examination,” p. 266
22:7–20	Poems, “No Beauty We Could Desire,” p. 124
22:39–49	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 8, pp. 41–43
22:54–60	The Screwtape Letters, letter 29, p. 163
24:13–35	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 11, pp. 117–18
24:36–42	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Arthur Greeves, August 19, 1947, pp. 1573–74
John
1:1	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Johnson, November 8, 1952, p. 246
1:1–18	God in the Dock, “The Grand Miracle,” p. 80
2:1–11	God in the Dock, “Miracles,” p. 29
3:16	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, pp. 32–33
3:27–36	The Weight of Glory, “A Slip of the Tongue,” pp. 189–90
4:7–26	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “On Obstinacy in Belief,” p. 26
6:35–40	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 10, pp. 215–16
8:6–8	God in the Dock, “What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” pp. 158–59
8:31–32	God in the Dock, “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” p. 50
9:1–4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, January 31, 1952, p. 163
9:25	The Weight of Glory, “Is Theology Poetry?” p. 140
11:28–44	Poems, “Stephen to Lazarus,” p. 125
11:1–12:19	God in the Dock, “Some Thoughts,” pp. 149–50
12:1–8	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, November 1, 1954, p. 522
13:2	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, September 20, 1947, p. 804
13:5–9	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Vera Mathews, April 26, 1949, p. 935
13:34–35	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Johnson, March 2, 1955, p. 576
14:1–3	The Problem of Pain, chapter 7, p. 116
14:15–21	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 3, p. 87
17:10	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” pp. 45–46
17:22–23	Christian Reflections, “Christianity and Culture,” p. 14
19:1–30	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, pp. 102–4
20:1–21:25	Miracles, chapter 16, pp. 235–37
20:11–14	A Grief Observed, chapter 3, pp. 45–46
20:24–29	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “On Obstinacy in Belief,” pp. 28–29
Acts
1:6–11	Miracles, chapter 16, pp. 241–42
1:8	Christian Reflections, “Modern Theology and Biblical Criticism,” p. 152
2:14–36	Miracles, chapter 16, pp. 233–35
4:13–20	God in the Dock, “Cross-Examination,” p. 262
5:1–11	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 18, p. 99
5:29	The Weight of Glory, “Learning in War-Time,” pp. 53–54
7:60	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 7, p. 120
8:26–39	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Rhona Bodle, February 9, 1953, p. 292
8:27–38	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 12, p. 120
9:36–42	The Weight of Glory, “Why I Am Not a Pacifist,” pp. 79–80
12:1–17	Miracles, appendix B, pp. 291–92
15:7–9	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Lee Turner, July 19, 1958, pp. 960–61
16:9–10	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 10, pp. 208–9
17:22–23	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 10, pp. 105–7
20:35	The Problem of Pain, chapter 10, p. 157
22:4–19	Smoke on the Mountain, by Joy Davidman, from the foreword, p. 7
23:1–11	Mere Christianity, book 1, chapter 5, p. 31
26:8–10	Surprised by Joy, chapter 14, pp. 228–29
28:11–27	Christian Reflections, “Religion: Reality or Substitute?” pp. 41–42
Romans
1:18–23	Mere Christianity, book 1, chapter 1, pp. 6–7
1:18–20	The Four Loves, chapter 6, p. 126
2:4–8	A Grief Observed, chapter 3, pp. 42–43
2:14–16	Mere Christianity, book 1, chapter 1, p. 8
3:4	The Allegory of Love: A Study in Medieval Tradition, chapter 7.2, p. 315
3:10–18, 23–24	The Problem of Pain, chapter 4, pp. 50–52
5:6–8	The Weight of Glory, “Membership,” p. 170
5:15–21	The Problem of Pain, chapter 5, pp. 70–71
6:3–8	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 8, pp. 198–99
6:19–23	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 5, p. 181
7:14–25	Christian Reflections, “The Poison of Subjectivism,” p. 79
7:21–23	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Michael Edwards, February 11, 1960, pp. 1133–34
8:1–39	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 4, pp. 56–58
8:19–23	The Great Divorce, preface, p. ix
9:1–8	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. Emily McLay, August 3, 1953, p. 355
10:14–15	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 8, p. 199
12:1–2	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 11, pp. 226–27
12:3–5	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Genia Goelz, June 20, 1952, p. 204
13:11–14	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, pp. 46–47
14:7–9	Mere Christianity , book 2, chapter 4, p. 54
14:10–12	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” pp. 38–39
16:17–19	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 5, pp. 95–96
1 Corinthians
1:10–17	The Screwtape Letters, letter 7, pp. 32–33
1:18–25	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 4, pp. 58–59
7:8–9	The Four Loves, chapter 5, pp. 96–97
10:13	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to “Mrs. Lockley,” September 2, 1949, p. 975
10:23–31	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 5, pp. 63–64
12:12–27	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 5, p. 64
13:1–13	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to his brother, May 4, 1940, pp. 408–9
14:1–33	Christian Reflections, “On Church Music,” p. 94
15:35–50	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 5, p. 98
15:53–54	Miracles, chapter 11, pp. 143–145
2 Corinthians
2:11	The Screwtape Letters, letter 1, p. 4
3:18	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 4, pp. 20–21
4:16–18	Miracles, chapter 16, pp. 265–66
5:1–10	The Four Loves, chapter 6, p. 139
5:17	God in the Dock, “What Are We to Make of Jesus Christ?” p. 160
7:1	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Sister Penelope CSMV, September 6, 1944, p. 625
9:6–15	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 3, pp. 86–87
12:9	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Belle Allen [Mrs. Edward A. Allen ], November 1, 1954, p. 520
12:9–10	The Problem of Pain, chapter 6, pp. 106–7
13:9	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 10, p. 207
Galatians
2:19–20	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 7, pp. 191–92
3:23–36	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 21, p. 115
5:22–24	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 2, pp. 78–79
6:14	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Warfield M. Firor, December 5, 1949, pp. 1007–8
Ephesians
2:10	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 5, p. 63
4:7–16	The Weight of Glory, “Membership,” pp. 166–67
4:22–24	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 8, p. 195
5:25–28	The Four Loves, chapter 5, p. 105
6:10–18	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 11, pp. 141–42
Philippians
1:3–4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mrs. D. Jessup, November 17, 1952, p. 252
1:21	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, June 7, 1959, p. 1056
2:1–11	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 5, p. 60
2:12–13	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 12, p. 149
3:7–15	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” pp. 27–28
3:10	Miracles, chapter 16, pp. 236–37
4:4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Willis Shelburne, May 4, 1962, p. 1335
Colossians
1:9–14	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, p. 41
1:24	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, September 12, 1951, pp. 134–35
2:6–12	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 7, pp. 188–89
2:8–23	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 6, p. 30
3:1–3	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 10, pp. 136–37
3:23–24	The Weight of Glory, “Learning in War-Time,” pp. 55–56
1 Thessalonians
4:13–18	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” p. 109
5:16–18	The Problem of Pain, chapter 4, p. 61
2 Thessalonians
2:1–12	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” pp. 100–101
3:6–13	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 3, pp. 84–85
1 Timothy
1:13–17	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Miss Breckenridge, April 19, 1951, p. 109
6:16	The Problem of Pain, chapter 10, p. 159
2 Timothy
2:20–21	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, pp. 40–41
3:16	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Janet Wise, October 5, 1955, pp. 652–53
Titus
1:9	God in the Dock, “Christian Apologetics,” p. 90
2:11–14	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 10, pp. 134–35
Philemon
8–16	Present Concerns: Essays by C. S. Lewis, “Equality,” pp. 17–18
Hebrews
2:14–15	Mere Christianity, book 2, chapter 2, pp. 45–46
4:14–16	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Mrs. Frank L. Jones, February 23, 1947, pp. 764–65
9:11–16	Miracles, chapter 14, pp. 211–12
10:24–25	God in the Dock, “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 61–62
11:6	Christian Reflections, “Religion: Reality or Substitute?” pp. 42–43
11:13–16	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” pp. 39–41
12:1	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 9, pp. 203–4
12:7–11	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 2, pp. 79–80
13:2	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, March 27, 1948, p. 844
James
1:5–8	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 11, pp. 140–41
2:14–26	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 12, p. 148
2:15–16	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 12, p. 66
3:13–18	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 4, p. 92
4:13–15	The Weight of Glory, “Learning in War-Time,” p. 61
5:1–5	God in the Dock, “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” p. 58
5:13–18	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 11, pp. 60–61
1 Peter
1:6–9	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 12, pp. 147–48
1:22	Mere Christianity, book 4, chapter 2, p. 165
4:16	Letters of C. S. Lewis (revised and enlarged), letter to Father Peter Bide, April 29, 1959, p. 477
5:7	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, April 22, 1954, p. 463
5:8–9	God in the Dock, “Answers to Questions on Christianity,” pp. 56–57
2 Peter
1:16–19	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” p. 43
2:2–18	The Problem of Pain, chapter 8, p. 130
3:8	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Edward T. Dell, February 4, 1949, p. 915
3:14–16	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 2, letter to Dom Bede Griffiths OSB, April 4, 1934, p. 136
1 John
1:8–10	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 4, p. 22
1:9	The Weight of Glory, “On Forgiveness,” pp. 178–79, 181–82
3:18–20	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 6, p. 34
4:7–10	The Four Loves, chapter 6, p. 126
4:18	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” p. 109
5:14	Letters to Malcolm: Chiefly on Prayer, letter 10, p. 53
2 John
5	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Mary Van Deusen, May 25, 1951, p. 119
3 John
4	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Ruth Broady, October 26, 1963, p. 1474
Jude
3–4	Present Concerns: Essays by C. S. Lewis, “Modern Man and His Categories of Thought,” p. 65
Revelation
2:17	The Problem of Pain, chapter 10, pp. 154–55
2:19–23	The Four Loves, chapter 2, p. 30
3:16	God in the Dock, “Cross-Examination,” p. 265
3:19–20	The Problem of Pain, chapter 3, p. 44
4:1–11	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 10, p. 137
5:1–10	The Problem of Pain, chapter 10, pp. 151–52
7:13–17	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 1, pp. 74–75
12:10–12	The Great Divorce, chapter 13, pp. 138–39
13:1–9	God in the Dock, “On the Transmission of Christianity,” pp. 118–19
14:13–20	The Great Divorce, chapter 9, p. 69
15:2–3	The Screwtape Letters, letter 22, pp. 119–20
16:1–21	The World’s Last Night and Other Essays, “The World’s Last Night,” pp. 104–6
18:4–8	A Preface to “Paradise Lost,” chapter 14, pp. 104–5
20:10–15	The Pilgrim’s Regress, book 10, chapter 3 (“Divine Justice”), p. 179
21:1–5	Miracles, chapter 14, pp. 197–98
21:21–23	Mere Christianity, book 3, chapter 12, pp. 149–50
22:1–7	The Weight of Glory, “The Weight of Glory,” p. 44
22:20	The Collected Letters of C. S. Lewis, volume 3, letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, July 14, 1952, p. 214
22:21	Perelandra, chapter 6, p. 71
Afterword
 	Reflections on the Psalms, chapter 11, pp. 109–12
CONCORDANCE
ABBREVIATIONS

The following abbreviations are used for the books of the Bible:

1Ch	1 Chronicles
1Co	1 Corinthians
1Jn	1 John
1Ki	1 Kings
1Pe	1 Peter
1Sa	1 Samuel
1Th	1 Thessalonians
1Ti	1 Timothy
2Ch	2 Chronicles
2Co	2 Corinthians
2Jn	2 John
2Ki	2 Kings
2Pe	2 Peter
2Sa	2 Samuel
2Th	2 Thessalonians
2Ti	2 Timothy
3Jn	3 John
Ac	Acts
Am	Amos
Col	Colossians
Da	Daniel
Dt	Deuteronomy
Ecc	Ecclesiastes
Eph	Ephesians
Est	Esther
Ex	Exodus
Eze	Ezekiel
Ezr	Ezra
Gal	Galatians
Ge	Genesis
Hab	Habakkuk
Hag	Haggai
Heb	Hebrews
Hos	Hosea
Isa	Isaiah
Jas	James
Jdg	Judges
Jer	Jeremiah
Jn	John
Jnh	Jonah
Job	Job
Joel	Joel
Jos	Joshua
Jude	Jude
La	Lamentations
Lev	Leviticus
Lk	Luke
Mal	Malachi
Mic	Micah
Mk	Mark
Mt	Matthew
Na	Nahum
Ne	Nehemiah
Nu	Numbers
Ob	Obadiah
Phm	Philemon
Php	Philippians
Pr	Proverbs
Ps	Psalms
Rev	Revelation
Ro	Romans
Ru	Ruth
SS	Song of Solomon
Tit	Titus
Zec	Zechariah
Zep	Zephaniah
 

 

 

Other abbreviations and special symbols used:

 

S	Shorter ending of Mark
T	Psalm titles
†	A Dagger distinguishes “LORD” and “GOD” from “Lord” and “God” in Hebrew Bible references
→	An arrow following an entry heading points to related words for additional study
 	Contexts in double brackets are from passages that are similarly bracketed in the NRSV (e.g., John 7:53—8:11)
For further study consult The Concise Concordance to the New Revised Standard Version (Oxford University Press, 1993) and The NRSV Concordance Unabridged (Zondervan, 1991).


—John R. Kohlenberger III

 

A

ABANDON → ABANDONED

Dt	4.	31	will neither a you nor destroy you;
2Ch	15.	2	but if you a him, he will a you.
Ac	2.	27	For you will not a my soul to Hades
ABANDONED → ABANDON

Dt	29.	25	they a the covenant of the LORD,
Isa	54.	7	For a brief moment I a you,
ABBA

Mk	14.	36	“A, Father, for you all things are possible;
Ro	8.	15	When we cry, “A! Father!”
Gal	4.	6	into our hearts, crying, “A! Father!”
ABIDE

Ge	6.	3	My spirit shall not a in mortals forever,
Ps	91.	1	a in the shadow of the Almighty,
Jn	15.	4	A in me as I a in you.
1Co	13.	13	faith, hope, and love a, these three;
1Jn	2.	28	And now, little children, a in him,
ABILITY → ABLE

Mt	25.	15	to each according to his a.
Ac	2.	4	as the Spirit gave them a.
ABLE → ABILITY

Da	3.	17	God whom we serve is a to deliver
Mk	10.	38	you a to drink the cup that I drink,
Ro	14.	4	the Lord is a to make them stand.
2Co	9.	8	God is a to provide you with every
Eph	6.	11	a to stand against the wiles of the devil.
Heb	2.	18	a to help those who are being tested.
 	7.	25	he is a for all time to save
ABOLISH → ABOLISHED

Da	11.	31	shall a the regular burnt offering
Mt	5.	17	I have come not to a but to fulfill.
ABOLISHED → ABOLISH

Eph	2.	15	a the law with its commandments
2Ti	1.	10	who a death and brought life
ABOMINABLE → ABOMINATION

2Ch	28.	3	the a practices of the nations
Eze	7.	20	they made their a images,
ABOMINATION → ABOMINABLE

Pr	6.	16	seven that are an a to him:
Da	9.	27	shall be an a that desolates,
ABOUND → ABOUNDED, ABOUNDING

Dt	28.	11	LORD will make you a in prosperity,
Ro	6.	1	in sin in order that grace may a?
ABOUNDED → ABOUND

Ro	5.	20	sin increased, grace a all the more,
ABOUNDING → ABOUND

Ex	34.	6	a in steadfast love and faithfulness,
Ps	86.	5	a in steadfast love to all who call
Joel	2.	13	to anger, and a in steadfast love,
Jnh	4.	2	to anger, and a in steadfast love,
ABUNDANCE → ABUNDANTLY

Lk	12.	15	one’s life does not consist in the a
2Co	9.	8	provide you with every blessing in a
ABUNDANTLY → ABUNDANCE

Jn	10.	10	that they may have life, and have it a.
ACCEPT → ACCEPTABLE

Jn	1.	11	his own people did not a him.
ACCEPTABLE → ACCEPT

Ps	19.	14	meditation of my heart be a to you,
 	51.	17	sacrifice a to God is a broken spirit;
Ro	12.	1	a living sacrifice, holy and a to God,
ACCOUNT → ACCOUNTABLE

Mt	12.	36	judgment you will have to give an a
Heb	4.	13	to whom we must render an a.
ACCOUNTABLE → ACCOUNT

Ro	14.	12	each of us will be a to God.
ACCURSED → CURSE

Ro	9.	3	I could wish that I myself were a
Rev	22.	3	Nothing a will be found there any
ACCUSATION → ACCUSE

Lk	23.	4	no basis for an a against this man.”
ACCUSE → ACCUSATION, ACCUSER

Ps	103.	9	He will not always a,
Zec	3.	1	Satan standing at his right hand to a
Mt	12.	10	so that they might a him.
ACCUSER → ACCUSE

Rev	12.	10	the a of our comrades has been thrown
ACKNOWLEDGE

Dt	4.	35	would a that the LORD is God;
Pr	3.	6	In all your ways a him,
Mt	10.	32	I also will a before my Father in
ACTIVE

Heb	4.	12	the word of God is living and a,
ADD → ADDED

Dt	4.	2	You must neither a anything
Pr	30.	6	Do not a to his words, or else
Lk	12.	25	by worrying a a single hour to your
ADDED → ADD

Ecc	3.	14	nothing can be a to it, nor anything
ADOPTION

Ro	8.	23	groan inwardly while we wait for a,
Gal	4.	5	that we might receive a as children.
ADORNMENT

Pr	3.	22	for your soul and a for your neck.
1Pe	3.	4	let your a be the inner self with the
ADULTERERS → ADULTERY

Jer	23.	10	For the land is full of a;
1Co	6.	9	idolaters, a, male prostitutes,
ADULTERESS → ADULTERY

Lev	20.	10	the a shall be put to death.
Pr	2.	16	from the a with her smooth words,
ADULTERY → ADULTERERS, ADULTERESS

Ex	20.	14	You shall not commit a.
Jer	3.	9	committing a with stone and tree.
Mt	5.	28	committed a with her in his heart.
Lk	16.	18	and marries another commits a,
Jn	8.	3	a woman who had been caught in a;
ADVANTAGE

Ecc	7.	12	a of knowledge is that wisdom gives
1Co	10.	24	Do not seek your own a, but that of
ADVERSARY

1Pe	5.	8	roaring lion your a the devil prowls
ADVICE

Ps	1.	1	do not follow the a of the wicked,
Pr	8.	14	I have good a and sound wisdom;
ADVOCATE

Jn	14.	26	But the A, the Holy Spirit,
 	15.	26	the A comes, whom I will send
1Jn	2.	1	we have an a with the Father,
AFFLICT → AFFLICTED, AFFLICTION, AFFLICTIONS

2Sa	7.	10	evildoers shall a them no more,
La	3.	33	for he does not willingly a
2Th	1.	6	repay with affliction those who a
AFFLICTED → AFFLICT

Na	1.	12	Though I have a you, I will afflict
2Co	4.	8	are a in every way, but not crushed;
AFFLICTION → AFFLICT

Ps	25.	18	Consider my a and my trouble,
La	1.	9	“O LORD, look at my a,
2Co	4.	17	this slight momentary a is preparing
AFFLICTIONS → AFFLICT

Ps	34.	19	Many are the a of the righteous,
AFRAID → FEAR

Ex	3.	6	for he was a to look at God.
Lev	26.	6	and no one shall make you a;
Dt	20.	3	Do not lose heart, or be a,
Ps	3.	6	I am not a of ten thousands
 	27.	1	of whom shall I be a?
Isa	12.	2	I will trust, and will not be a,
Mt	28.	10	Jesus said to them, “Do not be a;
Lk	12.	32	“Do not be a, little flock,
Heb	13.	6	Lord is my helper; I will not be a.
AGE → AGES

Mt	28.	20	with you always, to the end of the a.”
Gal	1.	4	to set us free from the present evil a,
AGES → AGE

Col	1.	26	has been hidden throughout the a
1Ti	1.	17	To the King of the a, immortal,
AGREE

Mt	18.	19	if two of you a on earth about
Mk	14.	56	and their testimony did not a.
AIR

Eph	2.	2	the ruler of the power of the a,
1Th	4.	17	to meet the Lord in the a;
ALERT

Lk	12.	37	slaves whom the master finds a
1Co	16.	13	Keep a, stand firm in your faith,
Eph	6.	18	keep a and always persevere
1Pe	5.	8	Discipline yourselves, keep a.
ALIEN → ALIENS

Ex	2.	22	an a residing in a foreign land.”
Lev	19.	34	you shall love the a as yourself,
Dt	24.	17	You shall not deprive a resident a
ALIENS → ALIEN

Eph	2.	19	you are no longer strangers and a,
1Pe	2.	11	I urge you as a and exiles to abstain
ALIVE → LIVE

Ac	1.	3	suffering he presented himself a
Ro	6.	11	dead to sin and a to God
Eph	2.	5	made us a together with Christ—
1Th	4.	17	Then we who are a, who are left,
Rev	1.	18	I am a forever and ever;
 	19.	20	were thrown a into the lake of fire
ALMIGHTY → MIGHT

Ge	17.	1	“I am God A; walk before me,
Ps	91.	1	who abide in the shadow of the A,
Rev	1.	8	who was and who is to come, the A.
 	21.	22	its temple is the Lord God the A
ALMS

Mt	6.	2	“So whenever you give a,
ALONE

Ge	2.	18	not good that the man should be a;
Dt	6.	4	The LORD is our God, the LORD a.
Mk	2.	7	Who can forgive sins but God a?”
 	10.	18	No one is good but God a.
ALPHA

Rev	1.	8	“I am the A and the Omega,”
 	22.	13	I am the A and the Omega,
ALTAR

Ex	27.	1	shall make the a of acacia wood,
 	30.	1	an a on which to offer incense;
Heb	13.	10	We have an a from which those
Rev	6.	9	I saw under the a the souls of those
ALWAYS

Mt	28.	20	And remember, I am with you a,
Php	4.	4	Rejoice in the Lord a; again I will
AMAZED → AMAZING

Mt	8.	27	a, saying, “What sort of man is this,
Mk	6.	6	And he was a at their unbelief.
Ac	2.	7	A and astonished, they asked,
AMAZING → AMAZED

Mk	12.	11	and it is a in our eyes’?”
Rev	15.	3	“Great and a are your deeds,
AMBASSADORS

2Co	5.	20	So we are a for Christ,
AMBITION

Php	2.	3	Do nothing from selfish a or conceit
Jas	3.	14	envy and selfish a in your hearts,
AMEN

Dt	27.	15	people shall respond, saying, “A!”
2Co	1.	20	through him that we say the “A,”
Rev	3.	14	The words of the A, the faithful and
ANCESTORS

Ex	3.	13	‘The God of your a has sent me to
Dt	4.	31	not forget the covenant with your a
La	5.	7	Our a sinned; they are no more,
Ac	5.	30	The God of our a raised up Jesus,
Heb	1.	1	Long ago God spoke to our a in
ANCHOR

Heb	6.	19	a sure and steadfast a of the soul,
ANCIENT

Da	7.	9	and an A One took his throne,
Mic	5.	2	origin is from of old, from a days.
Rev	20.	2	He seized the dragon, that a serpent,
ANGEL → ANGELS, ARCHANGEL, ARCHANGEL’S

Ex	3.	2	the a of the LORD appeared to him
 	23.	20	going to send an a in front of you,
Ps	34.	7	The a of the LORD encamps
Isa	37.	36	the a of the LORD set out and
Da	3.	28	who has sent his a and delivered
 	6.	22	God sent his a and shut the lions’
Mt	1.	20	an a of the Lord appeared to him in
Lk	1.	26	In the sixth month the a Gabriel
Ac	5.	19	during the night an a of the Lord
 	23.	8	say that there is no resurrection, or a,
2Co	11.	14	Satan disguises himself as an a of light.
ANGELS → ANGEL

Ge	28.	12	a of God were ascending and
Ps	103.	20	Bless the LORD, O you his a,
Mk	12.	25	but are like a in heaven.
Jn	1.	51	and the a of God ascending and
Ro	8.	38	that neither death, nor life, nor a,
1Co	6.	3	not know that we are to judge a—
Heb	2.	7	for a little while lower than the a;
2Pe	2.	4	not spare the a when they sinned,
Rev	1.	20	stars are the a of the seven churches,
 	21.	12	and at the gates twelve a,
ANGER → ANGRY

Ex	34.	6	merciful and gracious, slow to a,
Jdg	2.	12	they provoked the LORD to a.
1Ki	16.	13	God of Israel to a with their idols.
Ps	30.	5	For his a is but for a moment;
Pr	12.	16	Fools show their a at once,
Joel	2.	13	slow to a, and abounding in
Jnh	4.	2	slow to a, and abounding in
Mk	3.	5	He looked around at them with a;
Eph	4.	26	not let the sun go down on your a,
Jas	1.	19	slow to speak, slow to a;
ANGRY → ANGER

Jer	3.	12	I will not be a forever.
Mt	5.	22	that if you are a with a brother
ANGUISH

Isa	53.	11	Out of his a he shall see light;
Da	12.	1	There shall be a time of a,
Zep	1.	15	a day of distress and a,
ANIMAL → ANIMALS

Ge	2.	19	God formed every a of the field
ANIMALS → ANIMAL

Ge	3.	14	cursed are you among all a
Ps	36.	6	save humans and a alike, O LORD.
ANOINT → ANOINTED, ANOINTING

Ex	30.	30	You shall a Aaron and his sons,
1Sa	15.	1	“The LORD sent me to a you king
Ps	23.	5	you a my head with oil; my cup
Da	9.	24	and to a a most holy place.
ANOINTED → ANOINT

1Ch	16.	22	“Do not touch my a ones;
Ps	2.	2	against the LORD and his a,
Isa	61.	1	because the LORD has a me;
Da	9.	26	an a one shall be cut off and
Lk	4.	18	he has a me to bring good news to
Jn	1.	41	Messiah” (which is translated A).
ANOINTING → ANOINT

Ex	30.	25	it shall be a holy a oil.
Jas	5.	14	a them with oil in the name of the Lord
1Jn	2.	27	as his a teaches you about all things,
ANOTHER

Isa	48.	11	My glory I will not give to a.
Jn	14.	16	and he will give you a Advocate,
Gal	1.	7	not that there is a gospel,
ANSWER

Pr	15.	1	A soft a turns away wrath,
Isa	65.	24	Before they call I will a,
Lk	23.	9	but Jesus gave him no a.
ANT

Pr	6.	6	Go to the a, you lazybones;
ANTICHRIST

1Jn	2.	18	As you have heard that a is coming,
 	2.	22	the a, the one who denies the Father
 	4.	3	And this is the spirit of the a,
2Jn	1.	7	person is the deceiver and the a!
ANXIETIES → ANXIETY

1Co	7.	32	I want you to be free from a.
ANXIETY → ANXIETIES

Ecc	11.	10	Banish a from your mind,
1Pe	5.	7	Cast all your a on him, because he
ANYTHING

Ge	18.	14	Is a too wonderful for the LORD?
Jer	32.	27	is a too hard for me?
Mt	18.	19	if two of you agree on earth about a
Jn	16.	23	if you ask a of the Father in my name,
APART

Jn	15.	5	a from me you can do nothing.
Jas	2.	20	that faith a from works is barren?
APOSTASIES

Jer	2.	19	and your a will convict you.
Eze	37.	23	I will save them from all the a
APOSTLE → APOSTLES

Ro	11.	13	as I am an a to the Gentiles,
1Co	9.	1	Am I not an a?
2Co	12.	12	signs of a true a were performed
Heb	3.	1	a and high priest of our confession,
APOSTLES → APOSTLE

Mt	10.	2	the names of the twelve a:
Ac	2.	43	and signs were being done by the a.
1Co	12.	28	has appointed in the church first a,
Eph	2.	20	foundation of the a and prophets,
 	4.	11	he gave were that some would be a,
Rev	21.	14	are the twelve names of the twelve a
APPEAR → APPEARANCE, APPEARANCES, APPEARED, APPEARING

Mt	24.	30	the sign of the Son of Man will a in
Mk	13.	22	messiahs and false prophets will a
APPEARANCE → APPEAR

1Sa	16.	7	not look on his a or on the height
2Co	5.	12	those who boast in outward a
APPEARANCES → APPEAR

Jn	7.	24	not judge by a, but judge with right
APPEARED → APPEAR

Jn	21.	14	that Jesus a to the disciples after he
1Co	15.	5	he a to Cephas, then to the twelve.
Heb	9.	26	a once for all at the end of the age
APPEARING → APPEAR

Ac	1.	3	a to them during forty days and
2Ti	4.	8	to all who have longed for his a.
APPETITES

Ro	16.	18	our Lord Christ, but their own a,
APPOINTED → APPOINT

Mk	3.	16	So he a the twelve: Simon (to whom
Ac	3.	20	that he may send the Messiah a for
Heb	1.	2	whom he a heir of all things,
 	9.	27	as it is a for mortals to die once,
APPROACH

Heb	4.	16	a the throne of grace with boldness,
 	11.	6	whoever would a him must believe
APPROVAL → APPROVED

Gal	1.	10	I now seeking human a, or God’s a?
Heb	11.	2	by faith our ancestors received a.
APPROVED → APPROVAL

1Th	2.	4	but just as we have been a by God
2Ti	2.	15	to present yourself to God as one a
ARARAT

Ge	8.	4	ark came to rest on the mountains of A.
ARCHANGEL → ANGEL

Jude	1.	9	a Michael contended with the devil
ARCHANGEL’S → ANGEL

1Th	4.	16	a call and with the sound of God’s
ARCHITECT

Heb	11.	10	whose a and builder is God.
AREOPAGUS

Ac	17.	22	Then Paul stood in front of the A
ARGUE → ARGUMENTS

Isa	1.	18	let us a it out, says the LORD:
Ac	18.	4	Every sabbath he would a in the
Ro	9.	20	a human being, to a with God?
ARGUMENTS → ARGUE

2Co	10.	4	destroy strongholds. We destroy a
Col	2.	4	may deceive you with plausible a.
ARISE → RISE

Isa	60.	1	A, shine; for your light has come,
Mt	24.	11	false prophets will a and lead many
ARK

Ge	6.	14	Make yourself an a of cypress wood
Ex	25.	10	shall make an a of acacia wood;
1Sa	4.	11	The a of God was captured;
Rev	11.	19	the a of his covenant was seen
ARM → ARMOR, ARMS, ARMY

Ex	6.	6	redeem you with an outstretched a
Dt	7.	19	mighty hand and the outstretched a
2Ch	32.	8	With him is an a of flesh;
Ps	98.	1	his holy a have gotten him victory.
Isa	53.	1	the a of the LORD been revealed?
Jn	12.	38	the a of the Lord been revealed?”
ARMOR → ARM

Ro	13.	12	and put on the a of light;
Eph	6.	11	Put on the whole a of God,
ARMS → ARM

Hos	11.	3	I took them up in my a;
Mk	10.	16	And he took them up in his a,
ARMY → ARM

Jos	5.	14	as commander of the a of the LORD
Ps	27.	3	Though an a encamp against me,
 	33.	16	A king is not saved by his great a;
Rev	19.	19	rider on the horse and against his a.
AROMA

2Co	2.	15	For we are the a of Christ to God
ARRESTED

Mt	26.	50	and laid hands on Jesus and a him.
Ac	5.	18	a the apostles and put them in the
ARROGANCE → ARROGANT

Pr	8.	13	Pride and a and the way of evil
Eze	7.	24	put an end to the a of the strong,
ARROGANT → ARROGANCE

Ps	73.	3	For I was envious of the a;
1Co	13.	4	love is not envious or boastful or a
ARROW

Ps	64.	7	But God will shoot his a at them;
Isa	49.	2	he made me a polished a,
ASCEND → ASCENDED

Ps	139.	8	If I a to heaven, you are there;
Isa	14.	13	in your heart, “I will a to heaven;
Ro	10.	6	‘Who will a into heaven?’ ”
ASCENDED → ASCEND

2Ki	2.	11	Elijah a in a whirlwind into heaven.
Jn	3.	13	No one has a into heaven except
ASHAMED → SHAME

Ge	2.	25	were both naked, and were not a.
Mk	8.	38	who are a of me and of my words
Ro	1.	16	For I am not a of the gospel;
2Ti	2.	15	a worker who has no need to be a,
Heb	2.	11	Jesus is not a to call them brothers
 	11.	16	God is not a to be called their God;
ASHES

Ge	18.	27	I who am but dust and a.
Est	4.	1	and put on sackcloth and a,
Job	42.	6	and repent in dust and a.”
Jnh	3.	6	himself with sackcloth, and sat in a.
Mt	11.	21	long ago in sackcloth and a.
ASK

Isa	65.	1	sought out by those who did not a,
Mt	6.	8	knows what you need before you a
 	7.	7	“A, and it will be given you;
Jn	16.	24	A and you will receive,
Jas	4.	3	You a and do not receive, because
1Jn	5.	14	we a anything according to his will,
ASLEEP → SLEEP

Jnh	1.	5	had lain down, and was fast a.
Mt	8.	24	by the waves; but he was a.
1Th	5.	6	So then let us not fall a as others do,
ASSIGNED

Ro	12.	3	the measure of faith that God has a.
1Co	3.	5	as the Lord a to each.
 	7.	17	lead the life that the Lord has a,
ASSURANCE

Dt	28.	66	in dread, with no a of your life.
Heb	6.	11	so as to realize the full a of hope
 	11.	1	faith is the a of things hoped for,
ASTONISHED

Isa	52.	14	there were many who were a at him
Lk	2.	48	his parents saw him they were a;
ASTRAY → STRAY

Dt	30.	17	are led a to bow down to other gods
Isa	53.	6	All we like sheep have gone a;
Jer	50.	6	their shepherds have led them a,
Mt	18.	12	go in search of the one that went a?
1Pe	2.	25	For you were going a like sheep,
ATE → EAT

Ge	3.	6	she took of its fruit and a;
Ex	16.	35	The Israelites a manna forty years,
Ps	78.	25	Mortals a of the bread of angels;
Mt	14.	20	And all a and were filled;
 	15.	37	And all of them a and were filled;
ATHLETE → ATHLETES

2Ti	2.	5	And in the case of an a,
ATHLETES → ATHLETE

1Co	9.	25	A exercise self-control in all
ATONE → ATONEMENT

Da	9.	24	an end to sin, and to a for iniquity,
ATONED → ATONEMENT

Pr	16.	6	and faithfulness iniquity is a for,
ATONEMENT → ATONE, ATONED, ATONING

Ex	29.	36	a bull as a sin offering for a.
 	30.	10	Aaron shall perform the rite of a
 	32.	30	perhaps I can make a for your sin.”
Lev	23.	28	for it is a day of a,
Ro	3.	25	God put forward as a sacrifice of a
Heb	2.	17	to make a sacrifice of a for the sins
ATONING → ATONEMENT

1Jn	2.	2	and he is the a sacrifice for our sins,
 	4.	10	sent his Son to be the a sacrifice for
ATTENTION

Heb	2.	1	greater a to what we have heard,
AUTHOR

Ac	3.	15	and you killed the A of life,
AUTHORITIES → AUTHORITY

Ro	13.	1	be subject to the governing a;
Col	2.	15	He disarmed the rulers and a and
AUTHORITY → AUTHORITIES

Pr	29.	2	When the righteous are in a,
Mk	1.	27	A new teaching—with a!
Lk	5.	24	Son of Man has a on earth to forgive
Ac	5.	29	obey God rather than any human a.
Ro	13.	1	for there is no a except from God,
1Co	11.	10	woman ought to have a symbol of a
Col	2.	10	who is the head of every ruler and a.
1Ti	2.	12	no woman to teach or to have a over
Rev	12.	10	and the a of his Messiah,
 	20.	4	on them were given a to judge.
AVENGE → VENGEANCE

Dt	32.	43	he will a the blood of his children,
Ro	12.	19	Beloved, never a yourselves,
Rev	6.	10	and a our blood on the inhabitants
AVENGER → VENGEANCE

Nu	35.	12	shall be for you a refuge from the a,
Ps	8.	2	to silence the enemy and the a.
1Th	4.	6	the Lord is an a in all these things,
AVENGING → VENGEANCE

Na	1.	2	A jealous and a God is the LORD,
AWAKE

Da	12.	2	in the dust of the earth shall a,
Mk	14.	37	Could you not keep a one hour?
Eph	5.	14	“Sleeper, a! Rise from the dead,
1Th	5.	6	but let us keep a and be sober;
Rev	16.	15	Blessed is the one who stays a and
AWE → AWESOME

Ps	119.	161	my heart stands in a of your words.
Isa	29.	23	will stand in a of the God of Israel.
Mt	9.	8	saw it, they were filled with a,
Ac	2.	43	A came upon everyone, because
Ro	11.	20	do not become proud, but stand in a.
AWESOME → AWE

Ex	15.	11	majestic in holiness, a in splendor,
Dt	10.	17	the great God, mighty and a,
Ne	1.	5	and a God who keeps covenant
Ps	47.	2	For the LORD, the Most High, is a,
Da	9.	4	saying, “Ah, Lord, great and a God,
B

BAAL

Jdg	2.	13	and worshiped B and the Astartes.
1Ki	18.	25	Elijah said to the prophets of B,
Jer	2.	8	the prophets prophesied by B,
Ro	11.	4	not bowed the knee to B.”
BABEL → BABYLON

Ge	11.	9	Therefore it was called B,
BABES

Ps	8.	2	Out of the mouths of b and infants
Isa	3.	4	and b shall rule over them.
BABYLON → BABEL

2Ki	24.	15	into captivity from Jerusalem to B.
Ps	137.	1	By the rivers of B—there we sat
Isa	14.	4	this taunt against the king of B:
 	21.	9	he responded, “Fallen, fallen is B;
Jer	25.	11	serve the king of B seventy years.
1Pe	5.	13	Your sister church in B, chosen
Rev	14.	8	“Fallen, fallen is B the great!
BACKSLIDING

Jer	8.	5	people turned away in perpetual b?
BAD

Mt	7.	17	but the b tree bears b fruit.
1Co	15.	33	“B company ruins good morals.”
BALM

Jer	8.	22	Is there no b in Gilead?
BANISH

Ecc	11.	10	B anxiety from your mind,
Ro	11.	26	he will b ungodliness from Jacob.”
BANNER

Ex	17.	15	and called it, The LORD is my b.
BAPTISM → BAPTIZE

Mk	1.	4	proclaiming a b of repentance for
 	10.	38	be baptized with the b that I am
Lk	20.	4	the b of John come from heaven,
Ac	18.	25	though he knew only the b of John.
 	19.	3	They answered, “Into John’s b.”
Ro	6.	4	buried with him by b into death,
1Co	15.	29	receive b on behalf of the dead?
Eph	4.	5	one Lord, one faith, one b,
Col	2.	12	when you were buried with him in b,
1Pe	3.	21	b, which this prefigured, now saves
BAPTISMS → BAPTIZE

Heb	6.	2	about b, laying on of hands,
BAPTIST → BAPTIZE

Mt	3.	1	In those days John the B appeared
 	11.	11	has arisen greater than John the B;
 	14.	8	the head of John the B here on a
BAPTIZE → BAPTISM, BAPTISMS, BAPTIST, BAPTIZED, BAPTIZING

Mt	3.	11	“I b you with water for repentance,
Lk	3.	16	He will b you with the Holy Spirit
1Co	1.	17	For Christ did not send me to b but
BAPTIZED → BAPTIZE

Mt	3.	13	to John at the Jordan, to be b
Ac	1.	5	John b with water, but you will be b with the Holy
 	2.	38	“Repent, and be b every one of you
Ro	6.	3	b into Christ Jesus were b into his
1Co	10.	2	all were b into Moses in the cloud
 	12.	13	one Spirit we were all b into one
BAPTIZING → BAPTIZE

Mt	28.	19	b them in the name of the Father
Jn	4.	1	“Jesus is making and b more
BARN → BARNS

Lk	12.	24	they have neither storehouse nor b,
BARNS → BARN

Dt	28.	8	the blessing upon you in your b,
Ps	144.	13	May our b be filled, with produce
Lk	12.	18	pull down my b and build larger
BARREN

Ge	11.	30	Now Sarai was b; she had no child.
Ex	23.	26	No one shall miscarry or be b in
1Sa	2.	5	The b has borne seven, but she who
Ps	113.	9	He gives the b woman a home,
Isa	54.	1	Sing, O b one who did not bear;
Lk	1.	7	because Elizabeth was b,
Heb	11.	11	too old—and Sarah herself was b—
BASIN

Ex	30.	18	You shall make a bronze b with a
1Ki	7.	30	four corners were supports for a b.
Jn	13.	5	b and began to wash the disciples’
BASKET

Mt	5.	15	a lamp puts it under the bushel b,
Ac	9.	25	in the wall, lowering him in a b.
BATTLE

Ps	24.	8	and mighty, the LORD, mighty in b.
Ecc	9.	11	nor the b to the strong, nor bread to
Rev	16.	14	them for b on the great day of God
 	20.	8	Magog, in order to gather them for b;
BEAR → BEARS, BIRTH, BIRTHRIGHT, BORE, BORN, CHILDBEARING, FIRSTBORN

Ge	4.	13	punishment is greater than I can b!
Isa	7.	14	is with child and shall b a son,
Mt	1.	23	virgin shall conceive and b a son,
 	7.	18	A good tree cannot b bad fruit,
Lk	11.	46	load people with burdens hard to b,
Jn	15.	2	he prunes to make it b more fruit.
Gal	6.	2	B one another’s burdens,
Col	3.	13	B with one another and,
Heb	9.	28	offered once to b the sins of many,
Rev	12.	4	woman who was about to b a child,
BEARS → BEAR

Ps	68.	19	Blessed be the Lord, who daily b us
1Co	13.	7	It b all things, believes all things,
BEAST → BEASTS

Rev	11.	7	b that comes up from the bottomless pit
 	13.	18	calculate the number of the b,
 	16.	2	who had the mark of the b
 	19.	20	who had received the mark of the b
BEASTS → BEAST

Da	7.	3	four great b came up out of the sea,
BEAT → BEATEN

Isa	2.	4	shall b their swords into plowshares,
Joel	3.	10	B your plowshares into swords,
Lk	22.	63	began to mock him and b him;
BEATEN → BEAT

2Co	11.	25	Three times I was b with rods.
1Pe	2.	20	If you endure when you are b for
BEAUTIFUL → BEAUTY

Ge	12.	11	you are a woman b in appearance;
1Sa	25.	3	The woman was clever and b,
Est	2.	7	the girl was fair and b,
Job	42.	15	no women so b as Job’s daughters;
SS	1.	5	I am black and b, O daughters of
Isa	4.	2	the branch of the LORD shall be b
 	52.	7	How b upon the mountains are the
Ac	3.	2	the temple called the B Gate so that
Ro	10.	15	b are the feet of those who bring
BEAUTY → BEAUTIFUL

Ps	27.	4	to behold the b of the LORD,
Pr	31.	30	Charm is deceitful, and b is vain,
1Pe	3.	4	with the lasting b of a gentle
BEGGAR → BEGS

Mk	10.	46	son of Timaeus, a blind b,
Jn	9.	8	who had seen him before as a b
BEGINNING

Ge	1.	1	In the b when God created the
Ps	111.	10	fear of the LORD is the b of wisdom;
Pr	1.	7	The fear of the LORD is the b of
 	8.	22	The LORD created me at the b of his
Isa	40.	21	Has it not been told you from the b?
Mt	24.	8	this is but the b of the birth pangs.
Jn	1.	1	In the b was the Word,
1Jn	1.	1	declare to you what was from the b,
2Jn	1.	6	as you have heard it from the b—
Rev	21.	6	and the Omega, the b and the end.
BEGOTTEN

Ps	2.	7	You are my son; today I have b you.
Ac	13.	33	are my Son; today I have b you.’
Heb	1.	5	are my Son; today I have b you”?
BEGS → BEG

Lk	6.	30	Give to everyone who b from you;
BEHEADED → HEAD

Lk	9.	9	Herod said, “John I b;
Rev	20.	4	the souls of those who had been b
BEHEMOTH

Job	40.	15	“Look at B, which I made just as I
BELIEF → BELIEVE

2Th	2.	13	the Spirit and through b in the truth.
BELIEVE → BELIEF, BELIEVED, BELIEVER, BELIEVERS, BELIEVES

Nu	14.	11	long will they refuse to b in me,
2Ki	17.	14	not b in the LORD their God.
Ps	119.	66	for I b in your commandments.
Mt	18.	6	one of these little ones who b in me,
 	24.	23	or ‘There he is!’—do not b it.
Mk	1.	15	repent, and b in the good news.”
 	9.	24	“I b; help my unbelief!”
Lk	24.	25	how slow of heart to b all that the
Jn	1.	7	so that all might b through him.
 	3.	18	who b in him are not condemned;
 	5.	46	believed Moses, you would b me,
 	6.	29	you b in him whom he has sent.”
 	14.	1	B in God, b also in me.
 	17.	20	will b in me through their word,
 	20.	29	not seen and yet have come to b.”
Ac	16.	31	answered, “B on the Lord Jesus,
 	28.	24	while others refused to b.
Ro	3.	22	faith in Jesus Christ for all who b.
 	10.	9	b in your heart that God raised him
Gal	3.	9	this reason, those who b are blessed
1Th	4.	14	For since we b that Jesus died and
Heb	11.	6	would approach him must b
Jas	2.	19	Even the demons b—and shudder.
1Pe	1.	8	you do not see him now, you b
1Jn	4.	1	Beloved, do not b every spirit,
Jude	1.	5	destroyed those who did not b.
BELIEVED → BELIEVE

Ge	15.	6	And he b the LORD;
Ex	14.	31	b in the LORD and in his
Isa	53.	1	Who has b what we have heard?
Jn	1.	12	received him, who b in his name,
 	12.	38	“Lord, who has b our message,
Ac	2.	44	All who b were together and had
Ro	4.	3	“Abraham b God, and it was
2Co	4.	13	“I b, and so I spoke”—
Gal	3.	6	Just as Abraham “b God,
1Ti	3.	16	b in throughout the world, taken up
Heb	4.	3	For we who have b enter that rest,
Jas	2.	23	that says, “Abraham b God,
BELIEVER → BELIEVE

1Co	7.	12	b has a wife who is an unbeliever,
2Co	6.	15	Or what does a b share with an
BELIEVERS → BELIEVE

Gal	2.	4	because of false b secretly brought
2Th	3.	6	keep away from b who are living in
1Pe	2.	17	Love the family of b.
BELIEVES → BELIEVE

Jn	3.	15	whoever b in him may have eternal
 	11.	26	everyone who lives and b in me
Ro	10.	10	b with the heart and so is justified,
1Co	13.	7	It bears all things, b all things,
BELLY

Ge	3.	14	upon your b you shall go,
Jnh	1.	17	and Jonah was in the b of the fish
Mt	12.	40	three days and three nights in the b
BELOVED → LOVE

SS	2.	16	My b is mine and I am his;
Mt	3.	17	heaven said, “This is my Son, the B,
 	12.	18	my b, with whom my soul is well
 	17.	5	“This is my Son, the B;
Col	3.	12	As God’s chosen ones, holy and b,
Rev	20.	9	camp of the saints and the b city.
BEND → BENT

Php	2.	10	name of Jesus every knee should b,
BENEFICIAL → BENEFIT

1Co	6.	12	but not all things are b.
 	10.	23	lawful,” but not all things are b.
BENEFIT → BENEFICIAL, BENEFITS

Gal	5.	2	Christ will be of no b to you.
Phm	1.	20	have this b from you in the Lord!
Heb	4.	2	message they heard did not b them,
BENEFITS → BENEFIT

Ps	103.	2	and do not forget all his b—
1Co	9.	11	if we reap your material b?
BENT → BEND

Hos	11.	4	I b down to them and fed them.
Jn	8.	6	Jesus b down and wrote with his
BEST → GOOD

Dt	33.	21	He chose the b for himself,
Mk	12.	39	the b seats in the synagogues and
2Ti	2.	15	your b to present yourself to God
BETHANY

Mt	26.	6	Jesus was at B in the house of
Jn	11.	1	a certain man was ill, Lazarus of B,
BETHLEHEM

1Sa	17.	12	David was the son of an Ephrathite of B
Mic	5.	2	But you, O B of Ephrathah,
Mt	2.	1	after Jesus was born in B of Judea,
Lk	2.	15	“Let us go now to B and see this
BETRAY → BETRAYED

Mt	10.	21	Brother will b brother to death,
Mk	14.	11	to look for an opportunity to b him.
Jn	13.	11	For he knew who was to b him;
BETRAYED → BETRAY

Lk	21.	16	You will be b even by parents and
1Co	11.	23	Jesus on the night when he was b
BETTER → GOOD

1Sa	15.	22	Surely, to obey is b than sacrifice,
Ps	63.	3	your steadfast love is b than life,
Pr	15.	16	B is a little with the fear of
Ecc	2.	24	There is nothing b for mortals than
SS	1.	2	For your love is b than wine,
Mt	5.	29	it is b for you to lose one of your
Mk	14.	21	It would have been b for that one
Jn	11.	50	b for you to have one man die for
Php	1.	23	be with Christ, for that is far b;
 	2.	3	in humility regard others as b than
Heb	7.	22	the guarantee of a b covenant.
 	9.	23	need b sacrifices than these.
BIND → BINDS

Dt	6.	8	B them as a sign on your hand,
Pr	6.	21	B them upon your heart always;
Isa	61.	1	to b up the brokenhearted,
Mt	16.	19	whatever you b on earth will be
BINDS → BIND

Job	5.	18	For he wounds, but he b up;
Col	3.	14	b everything together in perfect
BIRD → BIRDS

Ge	1.	21	and every winged b of every kind.
Lev	20.	25	the unclean b and the clean;
BIRDS → BIRD

Ge	7.	3	and seven pairs of the b of the air
Ps	50.	11	I know all the b of the air,
Mt	6.	26	Look at the b of the air;
BIRTH → BEAR

Dt	32.	18	you forgot the God who gave you b.
Ps	22.	10	On you I was cast from my b,
Mt	24.	8	is but the beginning of the b pangs.
Jas	1.	18	he gave us b by the word of truth,
1Pe	1.	3	given us a new b into a living hope
BIRTHRIGHT → BEAR, RIGHT

Ge	25.	34	Thus Esau despised his b.
Heb	12.	16	who sold his b for a single meal.
BISHOP

1Ti	3.	1	whoever aspires to the office of b
Tit	1.	7	For a b, as God’s steward, must be
BITE

Gal	5.	15	If, however, you b and devour one
BITTER → BITTERNESS

Ex	1.	14	made their lives b with hard service
 	12.	8	with unleavened bread and b herbs.
Rev	8.	11	the water, because it was made b.
BITTERNESS → BITTER

Pr	14.	10	The heart knows its own b,
Ro	3.	14	mouths are full of cursing and b.”
Eph	4.	31	Put away from you all b and wrath
BLACK

SS	1.	5	I am b and beautiful, O daughters
Zec	6.	2	the second chariot b horses,
Mt	5.	36	cannot make one hair white or b.
Rev	6.	5	I looked, and there was a b horse!
BLAMELESS

2Sa	22.	26	with the b you show yourself b;
Ps	37.	18	The LORD knows the days of the b,
Pr	11.	20	but those of b ways are his delight.
Eph	1.	4	holy and b before him in love.
Php	2.	15	so that you may be b and innocent,
1Th	5.	23	and b at the coming of our Lord
Tit	1.	7	bishop, as God’s steward, must be b
Heb	7.	26	b, undefiled, separated from sinners,
Rev	14.	5	mouth no lie was found; they are b.
BLASPHEME → BLASPHEMED, BLASPHEMER, BLASPHEMES, BLASPHEMIES, BLASPHEMOUS

Ac	26.	11	I tried to force them to b;
1Ti	1.	20	so that they may learn not to b.
BLASPHEMED → BLASPHEME

Eze	20.	27	In this again your ancestors b me,
Mt	26.	65	tore his clothes and said, “He has b!
BLASPHEMER → BLASPHEME

1Ti	1.	13	even though I was formerly a b,
BLASPHEMES → BLASPHEME

Lev	24.	16	One who b the name of the LORD
Lk	12.	10	whoever b against the Holy Spirit
BLASPHEMIES → BLASPHEME

Mk	3.	28	their sins and whatever b they utter;
Rev	13.	6	its mouth to utter b against God,
BLASPHEMOUS → BLASPHEME

Ac	6.	11	“We have heard him speak b words
Rev	13.	1	and on its heads were b names.
BLEMISH

Ex	12.	5	Your lamb shall be without b,
Lev	22.	20	not offer anything that has a b,
Eph	5.	27	that she may be holy and without b.
Heb	9.	14	offered himself without b to God,
1Pe	1.	19	that of a lamb without defect or b.
Jude	1.	24	to make you stand without b in the
BLESS → BLESSED, BLESSING, BLESSINGS

Ge	12.	2	I will b you, and make your name
 	22.	17	I will indeed b you, and I will make
 	26.	3	I will be with you, and will b you;
Ex	20.	24	I will come to you and b you.
Nu	6.	24	The LORD b you and keep you;
 	23.	20	See, I received a command to b;
Dt	7.	13	he will love you, b you,
 	30.	16	the LORD your God will b you
1Ch	29.	20	“B the LORD your God.”
Ps	5.	12	For you b the righteous, O LORD;
 	34.	1	I will b the LORD at all times;
 	103.	1	B the LORD, O my soul,
Hag	2.	19	From this day on I will b you.
Lk	6.	28	b those who curse you, pray
Ro	12.	14	B those who persecute you;
1Co	4.	12	When reviled, we b;
Jas	3.	9	With it we b the Lord and Father,
BLESSED → BLESS

Ge	1.	22	God b them, saying, “Be fruitful
 	2.	3	So God b the seventh day and
 	14.	19	He b him and said, “B be Abram
Nu	24.	9	B is everyone who blesses you,
Job	1.	21	b be the name of the LORD.”
Ps	118.	26	B is the one who comes in the name
Isa	30.	18	b are all those who wait for him.
Jer	17.	7	B are those who trust in the LORD,
Mt	5.	3	“B are the poor in spirit,
Mk	10.	16	laid his hands on them, and b them.
Lk	1.	42	“B are you among women,
 	6.	20	“B are you who are poor,
Jn	12.	13	B is the one who comes in the name
 	20.	29	B are those who have not seen and
Ac	20.	35	It is more b to give than to receive.
Gal	3.	8	“All the Gentiles shall be b in you.”
Eph	1.	3	who has b us in Christ
1Pe	3.	14	for doing what is right, you are b.
Rev	22.	7	B is the one who keeps the words of
BLESSING → BLESS

Ge	12.	2	so that you will be a b.
 	22.	18	the nations of the earth gain b for
Dt	11.	26	before you today a b and a curse:
 	23.	5	your God turned the curse into a b
Ne	13.	2	our God turned the curse into a b.
Eze	34.	26	they shall be showers of b.
Mk	14.	22	bread, and after b it he broke it,
Lk	24.	51	While he was b them, he withdrew
1Co	10.	16	The cup of b that we bless,
Gal	3.	14	in Christ Jesus the b of Abraham
Eph	1.	3	every spiritual b in the heavenly
Rev	5.	12	might and honor and glory and b!”
 	7.	12	B and glory and wisdom and
BLESSINGS → BLESS

Dt	28.	2	all these b shall come upon you
Jos	8.	34	the words of the law, b and curses,
Mal	2.	2	and I will curse your b;
Ro	15.	27	come to share in their spiritual b,
BLIND → BLINDED, BLINDNESS

Ex	4.	11	mute or deaf, seeing or b?
Ps	146.	8	the LORD opens the eyes of the b.
Isa	35.	5	the eyes of the b shall be opened,
Mt	11.	5	b receive their sight, the lame walk,
Lk	6.	39	“Can a b person guide a b person?
Jn	9.	25	though I was b, now I see.”
Ro	2.	19	sure that you are a guide to the b,
BLINDED → BLIND

Jn	12.	40	“He has b their eyes and hardened
2Co	4.	4	has b the minds of the unbelievers,
BLINDNESS → BLIND

Dt	28.	28	will afflict you with madness, b,
1Jn	2.	11	the darkness has brought on b.
BLOCK → BLOCKS

Eze	14.	7	their iniquity as a stumbling b
Mt	16.	23	You are a stumbling b to me;
Ro	11.	9	a stumbling b and a retribution for
1Co	1.	23	stumbling b to Jews and foolishness
BLOCKS → BLOCK

Jer	6.	21	before this people stumbling b
Mt	18.	7	the world because of stumbling b!
BLOOD → BLOODSHED

Ge	9.	6	sheds the b of a human, by a human shall that person’s b be shed;
Ex	7.	17	and it shall be turned to b.
 	12.	13	when I see the b, I will pass over
 	24.	8	the b of the covenant that the LORD
Lev	17.	11	it is the b that makes atonement.
Nu	35.	33	for b pollutes the land,
Ps	72.	14	and precious is their b in his sight.
Isa	1.	11	I do not delight in the b of bulls,
Eze	33.	4	b shall be upon their own heads.
Joel	2.	30	b and fire and columns of smoke.
Mt	27.	8	field has been called the Field of B
Mk	14.	24	“This is my b of the covenant,
Lk	22.	44	sweat became like great drops of b
Jn	1.	13	who were born, not of b
 	6.	53	of the Son of Man and drink his b,
 	19.	34	and at once b and water came out.
Ac	2.	20	to darkness and the moon to b,
Ro	5.	9	that we have been justified by his b,
1Co	11.	25	cup is the new covenant in my b.
Eph	1.	7	we have redemption through his b,
Heb	9.	12	the b of goats and calves, but with his own b,
 	9.	22	without the shedding of b there is no
1Jn	5.	6	the one who came by water and b,
Rev	6.	12	the full moon became like b,
 	8.	9	A third of the sea became b,
 	12.	11	conquered him by the b of the Lamb
GNASHING

Mt	8.	12	will be weeping and g of teeth.”
 	25.	30	will be weeping and g of teeth.’
GOAT → GOATS

Lev	16.	9	Aaron shall present the g on which
GOATS → GOAT

Mt	25.	32	separates the sheep from the g,
GOD → GOD’S, GODLINESS, GODLY, GODS

Ge	1.	1	In the beginning when G created
 	1.	27	So G created humankind in his image,
 	6.	2	sons of G saw that they were fair;
Ex	34.	6	a G merciful and gracious, slow to
Nu	23.	19	G is not a human being,
Dt	6.	5	love the LORD your G with all
1Ki	8.	27	will G indeed dwell on the earth?
2Ch	2.	5	for our G is greater than other gods.
Ps	19.	1	heavens are telling the glory of G;
 	22.	1	My G, my G, why have you forsaken
 	46.	10	“Be still, and know that I am G!
 	53.	1	Fools say in their hearts, “There is no G.”
Ecc	12.	13	Fear G, and keep his
Isa	9.	6	Wonderful Counselor, Mighty G,
 	44.	6	besides me there is no g.
Jer	10.	10	But the LORD is the true G;
Mt	1.	23	which means, “G is with us.”
 	6.	24	You cannot serve G and wealth.
Mk	1.	1	news of Jesus Christ, the Son of G.
 	2.	7	Who can forgive sins but G alone?”
Lk	2.	14	“Glory to G in the highest heaven,
 	18.	19	No one is good but G alone.
 	22.	70	“Are you, then, the Son of G?”
Jn	1.	1	was with G, and the Word was G.
 	1.	18	It is G the only Son,
 	3.	16	G so loved the world that he gave his
 	5.	18	calling G his own Father, thereby making himself equal to G.
Ac	5.	29	“We must obey G rather than any
Ro	6.	23	gift of G is eternal life in Christ
2Co	4.	4	Christ, who is the image of G.
Eph	4.	6	one G and Father of all,
Php	2.	6	though he was in the form of G,
Col	1.	19	fullness of G was pleased to dwell,
1Jn	4.	16	G is love, and those who abide
Rev	4.	8	“Holy, holy, holy, the Lord G
GOD’S → GOD

Mt	27.	43	for he said, ‘I am G Son.’ ”
 	27.	54	“Truly this man was G Son!”
GODLINESS → GOD

1Ti	4.	7	Train yourself in g,
2Pe	1.	3	everything needed for life and g,
GODLY → GOD

2Co	7.	10	For g grief produces a repentance
2Pe	2.	9	how to rescue the g from trial,
GODS → GOD

Ex	20.	3	you shall have no other g before me.
1Co	8.	5	so-called g in heaven or on earth—
GOLD

Ps	119.	127	love your commandments more than g,
1Pe	1.	7	being more precious than g that,
Rev	21.	21	and the street of the city is pure g,
GOLGOTHA

Mt	27.	33	G (which means Place of a Skull),
GOMORRAH

Ge	19.	24	LORD rained on Sodom and G sulfur
Jude	1.	7	Sodom and G and the surrounding
GOOD → BEST, BETTER, GOODNESS

Ge	1.	31	and indeed, it was very g.
 	2.	9	tree of the knowledge of g and evil.
2Ch	7.	3	“For he is g, for his steadfast love
Ps	34.	8	taste and see that the LORD is g;
Isa	52.	7	who brings g news, who announces
Mt	5.	45	his sun rise on the evil and on the g,
Mk	10.	18	No one is g but God alone.
Jn	10.	11	“I am the g shepherd.
Ro	12.	21	but overcome evil with g.
Eph	2.	10	created in Christ Jesus for g works,
GOODNESS → GOOD

Ps	23.	6	Surely g and mercy shall follow me
Heb	6.	5	tasted the g of the word of God and
2Pe	1.	5	support your faith with g,
GOSPEL

Mk	8.	35	and for the sake of the g,
Ro	1.	16	For I am not ashamed of the g;
Gal	1.	6	and are turning to a different g—
Php	1.	27	life in a manner worthy of the g
Rev	14.	6	an eternal g to proclaim to those
GRACE → GRACIOUS

Jn	1.	14	father’s only son, full of g and truth.
 	1.	16	we have all received, g upon g.
Ac	15.	11	that we will be saved through the g
Ro	3.	24	are now justified by his g as a gift,
 	11.	6	otherwise g would no longer be g.
2Co	12.	9	“My g is sufficient for you,
Eph	2.	5	by g you have been saved—
Heb	4.	16	approach the throne of g with
Jas	4.	6	But he gives all the more g;
GRACIOUS → GRACE

Ex	34.	6	the LORD, a God merciful and g,
Nu	6.	25	to shine upon you, and be g to you;
Ps	116.	5	G is the LORD, and righteous;
GREAT → GREATER, GREATEST

Ge	1.	16	God made the two g lights—
 	12.	2	I will make of you a g nation,
Dt	10.	17	the g God, mighty and awesome,
La	3.	23	g is your faithfulness.
Mt	4.	16	sat in darkness have seen a g light,
 	20.	26	whoever wishes to be g among you
Heb	2.	3	if we neglect so g a salvation?
 	13.	20	the g shepherd of the sheep,
Rev	12.	9	The g dragon was thrown down,
 	20.	11	I saw a g white throne and the one
GREATER → GREAT

Ex	18.	11	that the LORD is g than all gods,
Mk	12.	31	no other commandment g than these
Jn	14.	12	in fact, will do g works than these,
 	15.	13	No one has g love than this,
GREATEST → GREAT

Mt	22.	38	the g and first commandment.
Lk	9.	48	the least among all of you is the g.”
1Co	13.	13	and the g of these is love.
GREEK

Jn	19.	20	in Hebrew, in Latin, and in G.
Ro	1.	16	to the Jew first and also to the G.
Gal	3.	28	There is no longer Jew or G,
GRIEF → GRIEVE, GRIEVED

2Co	7.	9	your g led to repentance;
GRIEVE → GRIEF

Eph	4.	30	do not g the Holy Spirit of God,
1Th	4.	13	not g as others do who have no hope
GRIEVED → GRIEF

Isa	63.	10	they rebelled and g his holy spirit;
GROUND

Ge	2.	7	formed man from the dust of the g,
Isa	53.	2	and like a root out of dry g;
Mt	13.	5	Other seeds fell on rocky g,
GROW

Col	1.	10	as you g in the knowledge of God.
2Pe	3.	18	But g in the grace and knowledge of
GUARANTEE → GUARANTEED

2Co	5.	5	who has given us the Spirit as a g.
Heb	7.	22	Jesus has also become the g of a
GUARANTEED → GUARANTEE

Ro	4.	16	promise may rest on grace and be g
Heb	6.	17	he g it by an oath,
GUIDE

Ps	48.	14	He will be our g forever.
Isa	58.	11	The LORD will g you continually,
Lk	6.	39	Can a blind person g a blind person?
Jn	16.	13	he will g you into all the truth;
GUILT → GUILTY

Ps	32.	5	and you forgave the g of my sin.
Hos	14.	2	say to him, “Take away all g;
Zec	3.	9	I will remove the g of this land
GUILTY → GUILT

Ex	23.	7	for I will not acquit the g.
Nu	14.	18	but by no means clearing the g,
Mk	3.	29	but is g of an eternal sin”—
H

HADES

Mt	16.	18	and the gates of H will not prevail
Ac	2.	27	not abandon my soul to H,
Rev	1.	18	I have the keys of Death and of H.
 	20.	14	H were thrown into the lake of fire.
HALLOWED

Ge	2.	3	blessed the seventh day and h it,
Mt	6.	9	Father in heaven, h be your name.
HAND → HANDS

Ex	15.	6	Your right h, O LORD, glorious
Dt	19.	21	tooth for tooth, h for h,
Ps	110.	1	says to my lord, “Sit at my right h
Mk	9.	43	If your h causes you to stumble, cut
Lk	20.	42	said to my Lord, “Sit at my right h,
Heb	10.	12	“he sat down at the right h of God,”
Rev	5.	1	saw in the right h of the one seated
HANDS → HAND

Ps	24.	4	who have clean h and pure hearts,
Lk	23.	46	into your h I commend my spirit.”
 	24.	40	he showed them his h and his feet.
Jn	3.	35	has placed all things in his h.
Ac	8.	18	the laying on of the apostles’ h,
Heb	6.	2	laying on of h, resurrection of the
HARD → HARDENED

Jer	32.	17	Nothing is too h for you.
Mt	7.	14	the road is h that leads to life,
 	19.	23	h for a rich person to enter the
HARDENED → HARD

Ex	10.	20	But the LORD h Pharaoh’s heart,
Mk	8.	17	Are your hearts h?
2Co	3.	14	But their minds were h.
HARVEST → HARVESTING

Ge	8.	22	the earth endures, seedtime and h,
Mt	13.	39	h is the end of the age, and the
Rev	14.	15	the h of the earth is fully ripe.”
HARVESTING → HARVEST

Jn	4.	35	see how the fields are ripe for h.
HATE → HATES, HATING

Ps	97.	10	The LORD loves those who h evil;
Ecc	3.	8	a time to love, and a time to h;
Am	5.	15	H evil and love good, and establish
Mt	5.	43	your neighbor and h your enemy.’
Lk	6.	27	do good to those who h you,
HATES → HATE

Pr	6.	16	six things that the LORD h,
HEAD

Mt	8.	20	of Man has nowhere to lay his h.”
Mk	6.	28	brought his h on a platter,
Eph	1.	22	has made him the h over all things
HEAL → HEALED, HEALING, HEALS, HEALTH

Dt	32.	39	and I make alive; I wound and I h;
Ecc	3.	3	a time to kill, and a time to h;
Jn	12.	40	and turn—and I would h them.”
HEALED → HEAL

Isa	53.	5	and by his bruises we are h.
Jas	5.	16	one another, so that you may be h.
1Pe	2.	24	by his wounds you have been h.
HEALING → HEAL

Eze	47.	12	for food, and their leaves for h.”
Mal	4.	2	shall rise, with h in its wings.
1Co	12.	9	another gifts of h by the one Spirit,
Rev	22.	2	leaves of the tree are for the h of
HEALS → HEAL

Ex	15.	26	for I am the LORD who h you.”
Ps	103.	3	iniquity, who h all your diseases,
HEALTH → HEAL

3Jn	1.	2	and that you may be in good h,
HEAR → HEARERS, HEARS

Dt	6.	4	H, O Israel: The LORD is our God,
Mk	12.	29	answered, “The first is, ‘H, O Israel:
Lk	7.	22	the lepers are cleansed, the deaf h,
Heb	3.	7	says, “Today, if you h his voice,
HEARERS → HEAR

Ro	2.	13	For it is not the h of the law who
Jas	1.	22	merely h who deceive themselves.
HEARS → HEAR

Ps	69.	33	For the LORD h the needy,
Pr	15.	29	but he h the prayer of the righteous.
Mt	7.	24	then who h these words of mine
1Jn	5.	14	according to his will, he h us.
HEART → BROKENHEARTED, HEARTS

Dt	6.	5	the LORD your God with all your h,
 	30.	14	in your mouth and in your h for you
Jos	22.	5	all your h and with all your soul.”
1Sa	16.	7	but the LORD looks on the h.”
Ps	51.	10	Create in me a clean h, O God,
Pr	3.	5	Trust in the LORD with all your h,
Jer	9.	26	of Israel is uncircumcised in h.
Eze	36.	26	A new h I will give you,
Mt	5.	8	“Blessed are the pure in h, for they
Mk	12.	30	the Lord your God with all your h,
Ro	2.	29	circumcision is a matter of the h—
HEARTS → HEART

Jer	31.	33	and I will write it on their h;
Jn	14.	1	“Do not let your h be troubled.
Ro	2.	15	law requires is written on their h,
Eph	3.	17	Christ may dwell in your h through
Col	3.	15	the peace of Christ rule in your h,
Heb	10.	16	I will put my laws in their h,
1Jn	3.	20	for God is greater than our h,
Rev	2.	23	the one who searches minds and h,
HEAVEN → HEAVENLY, HEAVENS

Dt	30.	12	“Who will go up to h for us,
Ecc	3.	1	and a time for every matter under h:
Mt	6.	9	Father in h, hallowed be your name.
 	24.	35	H and earth will pass away,
 	26.	64	and coming on the clouds of h.”
Mk	10.	21	and you will have treasure in h;
Lk	24.	51	and was carried up into h.
Ro	10.	6	‘Who will ascend into h?’ ”
Php	3.	20	But our citizenship is in h,
1Th	1.	10	to wait for his Son from h,
Heb	9.	24	but he entered into h itself,
Rev	21.	1	I saw a new h and a new earth;
HEAVENLY → HEAVEN

Mt	5.	48	as your h Father is perfect.
Eph	1.	3	spiritual blessing in the h places,
Heb	3.	1	holy partners in a h calling,
HEAVENS → HEAVEN

Ge	1.	1	when God created the h and
Isa	65.	17	to create new h and a new earth;
Heb	4.	14	priest who has passed through the h,
2Pe	3.	10	the h will pass away with a loud
HEIR → HEIRS

Gal	4.	7	then also an h, through God.
Heb	1.	2	whom he appointed h of all things,
HEIRS → HEIR

Ro	8.	17	h of God and joint h with Christ—
Eph	3.	6	the Gentiles have become fellow h,
1Pe	3.	7	also h of the gracious gift of life—
HELL

Mt	10.	28	both soul and body in h.
Mk	9.	43	to have two hands and to go to h,
2Pe	2.	4	cast them into h and committed
HELP → HELPER, HELPS

Ps	46.	1	a very present h in trouble.
Mk	9.	24	“I believe; h my unbelief!”
Heb	2.	18	able to h those who are being tested.
HELPER → HELP

Ge	2.	18	will make him a h as his partner.”
Ps	30.	10	O LORD, be my h!”
Heb	13.	6	Lord is my h; I will not be afraid.
HELPS → HELP

Ps	37.	40	The LORD h them and rescues
Ro	8.	26	the Spirit h us in our weakness;
HIDDEN → HIDE

Mt	13.	44	is like treasure h in a field,
Mk	4.	22	nothing h, except to be disclosed;
Col	3.	3	your life is h with Christ in God.
Rev	2.	17	the h manna, and I will give a white
HIDE → HIDDEN

Dt	31.	17	I will forsake them and h my face
Ps	13.	1	How long will you h your face
 	17.	8	h me in the shadow of your wings,
HIGH → HIGHEST

Ps	91.	1	live in the shelter of the Most H,
Mk	5.	7	Jesus, Son of the Most H God?
Eph	4.	8	“When he ascended on h he made
Heb	2.	17	a merciful and faithful h priest
 	7.	26	that we should have such a h priest,
HIGHEST → HIGH

1Ki	8.	27	the h heaven cannot contain you,
Mt	21.	9	Hosanna in the h heaven!”
Lk	2.	14	“Glory to God in the h heaven,
HOLINESS → HOLY

Ro	1.	4	according to the spirit of h by
2Co	6.	6	h of spirit, genuine love,
1Ti	2.	15	continue in faith and love and h,
Heb	12.	14	h without which no one will see
HOLY → HOLINESS

Ex	20.	8	the sabbath day, and keep it h.
 	26.	33	the h place from the most h.
Lev	11.	44	and be h, for I am h.
1Sa	2.	2	“There is no H One like the LORD,
Isa	6.	3	“H, h, h is the LORD of hosts;
Mt	1.	18	to be with child from the H Spirit.
 	3.	11	baptize you with the H Spirit and
Mk	1.	24	who you are, the H One of God.”
 	3.	29	against the H Spirit can never have
Lk	3.	22	the H Spirit descended upon him in
Jn	14.	26	But the Advocate, the H Spirit,
Ac	2.	4	were filled with the H Spirit and
Ro	12.	1	living sacrifice, h and acceptable
Eph	4.	30	do not grieve the H Spirit of God,
Heb	6.	4	and have shared in the H Spirit,
1Pe	1.	16	“You shall be h, for I am h.”
1Jn	2.	20	have been anointed by the H One,
Jude	1.	14	with ten thousands of his h ones,
Rev	4.	8	H, h, h, the Lord God the Almighty
 	21.	2	I saw the h city, the new Jerusalem,
HOMETOWN

Mk	6.	4	not without honor, except in their h,
HONEY

Ex	3.	8	a land flowing with milk and h,
Mt	3.	4	and his food was locusts and wild h.
HONOR

Dt	5.	16	H your father and your mother,
Ps	8.	5	and crowned them with glory and h.
Mt	15.	4	For God said, ‘H your father and
Ro	13.	7	h to whom h is due.
Eph	6.	2	“H your father and mother”—
Rev	4.	11	to receive glory and h and power,
HOPE → HOPES

La	3.	21	and therefore I have h:
1Co	13.	13	And now faith, h, and love abide,
Col	1.	27	Christ in you, the h of glory.
1Jn	3.	3	all who have this h in him purify
HOPES → HOPE

1Co	13.	7	believes all things, h all things,
HOSANNA

Mk	11.	10	H in the highest heaven!”
Jn	12.	13	went out to meet him, shouting, “H!
HOSPITABLE → HOSPITALITY

1Ti	3.	2	temperate, sensible, respectable, h,
Tit	1.	8	but he must be h, a lover
1Pe	4.	9	Be h to one another without
HOSPITALITY → HOSPITABLE

Ro	12.	13	of the saints; extend h to strangers.
1Ti	5.	10	has brought up children, shown h,
Heb	13.	2	not neglect to show h to strangers,
HOSTS

Ps	46.	7	The LORD of h is with us;
Isa	48.	2	the LORD of h is his name.
HOUR

Mt	24.	36	about that day and h no one knows,
Jn	2.	4	My h has not yet come.”
 	17.	1	“Father, the h has come;
Rev	3.	10	I will keep you from the h of trial
 	14.	7	for the h of his judgment has come;
HOUSE → HOUSEHOLD, STOREHOUSE

Ex	20.	17	shall not covet your neighbor’s h;
1Ch	22.	1	“Here shall be the h of the LORD
Ezr	1.	5	rebuild the h of the LORD in
Ps	69.	9	zeal for your h that has consumed
Mt	7.	24	like a wise man who built his h
Jn	2.	17	“Zeal for your h will consume me.”
 	14.	2	In my Father’s h there are many
1Pe	2.	5	be built into a spiritual h,
HOUSEHOLD → HOUSE

Jos	24.	15	my h, we will serve the LORD.”
HUMAN → HUMANKIND

Ps	8.	4	are h beings that you are mindful
Mt	15.	9	teaching h precepts as doctrines.’ ”
Ac	5.	29	obey God rather than any h
Php	2.	7	being born in h likeness.
HUMANKIND → HUMAN

Ge	1.	26	“Let us make h in our image,
1Ti	2.	5	one mediator between God and h,
HUMBLE → HUMBLED, HUMBLY, HUMILITY

Ps	25.	9	He leads the h in what is right,
Isa	57.	15	to revive the spirit of the h,
Mt	11.	29	for I am gentle and h in heart,
Jas	4.	10	H yourselves before the Lord,
HUMBLED → HUMBLE

Lk	14.	11	all who exalt themselves will be h,
Php	2.	8	he h himself and became obedient
HUMBLY → HUMBLE

Mic	6.	8	and to walk h with your God?
HUMILITY → HUMBLE

Pr	15.	33	and h goes before honor.
Zep	2.	3	seek righteousness, seek h;
Php	2.	3	in h regard others as better than
HUNGER → HUNGRY

Mt	5.	6	“Blessed are those who h and thirst
Rev	7.	16	will h no more, and thirst no more;
HUNGRY → HUNGER

Ps	146.	7	who gives food to the h.
Jn	6.	35	comes to me will never be h,
Ro	12.	20	“if your enemies are h, feed them;
HUSBAND → HUSBANDS

Isa	54.	5	For your Maker is your h,
Eph	5.	23	h is the head of the wife just as
Rev	21.	2	as a bride adorned for her h.
HUSBANDS → HUSBAND

Eph	5.	25	H, love your wives, just as Christ
Col	3.	18	Wives, be subject to your h,
1Pe	3.	7	H, in the same way, show
I

IDOL → IDOLS

Ex	20.	4	shall not make for yourself an i,
Isa	40.	19	An i?—A workman casts it,
1Co	10.	19	or that an i is anything?
IDOLS → IDOL

Ex	34.	17	You shall not make cast i.
1Co	8.	1	concerning food sacrificed to i:
IMAGE

Ge	1.	26	“Let us make humankind in our i,
1Co	15.	49	the i of the man of heaven.
Col	1.	15	He is the i of the invisible God,
Rev	20.	4	not worshiped the beast or its i
IMMANUEL → EMMANUEL

Isa	7.	14	bear a son, and shall name him I.
IMMORAL → IMMORALITY

1Co	5.	9	not to associate with sexually i
Heb	12.	16	an i and godless person,
IMMORALITY → IMMORAL

2Co	12.	21	sexual i, and licentiousness
Jude	1.	7	indulged in sexual i and pursued
IMMORTAL → IMMORTALITY

Ro	1.	23	the glory of the i God for images
1Ti	1.	17	the King of the ages, i, invisible,
IMMORTALITY → IMMORTAL

1Co	15.	53	and this mortal body must put on i.
1Ti	6.	16	It is he alone who has i and dwells
IMPOSSIBLE

Mt	17.	20	and nothing will be i for you.”
Mk	10.	27	“For mortals it is i, but not for God;
Heb	11.	6	without faith it is i to please God,
INCENSE → FRANKINCENSE

Ex	25.	6	anointing oil and for the fragrant i,
INFANTS

Ps	8.	2	Out of the mouths of babes and i
Mt	21.	16	‘Out of the mouths of i and nursing
1Co	14.	20	i in evil, but in thinking be adults.
INHERIT → INHERITANCE

Ps	37.	11	But the meek shall i the land,
Lk	10.	25	“what must I do to i eternal life?”
1Co	6.	9	wrongdoers will not i the kingdom
Heb	1.	14	sake of those who are to i salvation?
INHERITANCE → INHERIT

Eph	1.	11	In Christ we have also obtained an i,
Heb	9.	15	the promised eternal i,
INIQUITY

Ex	34.	7	forgiving i and transgression and
Ps	103.	3	who forgives all your i,
Isa	53.	6	has laid on him the i of us all.
Tit	2.	14	that he might redeem us from all i
INN

Lk	2.	7	no place for them in the i.
INNOCENT

Pr	6.	17	and hands that shed i blood,
Mt	27.	24	“I am i of this man’s blood;
INSPIRED

Ex	35.	34	And he has i him to teach,
2Ti	3.	16	All scripture is i by God and is
INSTRUCT → INSTRUCTED, INSTRUCTION, INSTRUCTOR

Dt	17.	10	observing everything they i you.
Ne	9.	20	You gave your good spirit to i them,
INSTRUCTED → INSTRUCT

Isa	40.	13	or as his counselor has i him?
Jn	8.	28	these things as the Father i me.
INSTRUCTION → INSTRUCT

Pr	8.	10	Take my i instead of silver,
Ro	15.	4	in former days was written for our i,
1Ti	1.	5	But the aim of such i is love
INSTRUCTOR → INSTRUCT

Mt	23.	10	for you have one i, the Messiah.
INTERCEDES → INTERCESSION

Ro	8.	26	Spirit i with sighs too deep for
INTERCESSION → INTERCEDES

1Sa	2.	25	against the LORD, who can make i?”
Isa	53.	12	and made i for the transgressors.
Heb	7.	25	he always lives to make i for them.
INTERPRET → INTERPRETATION, INTERPRETATIONS

Mt	16.	3	cannot i the signs of the times.
1Co	12.	30	Do all speak in tongues? Do all i?
INTERPRETATION → INTERPRET

1Co	12.	10	to another the i of tongues.
INTERPRETATIONS → INTERPRET

Ge	40.	8	to them, “Do not i belong to God?
INVISIBLE

Col	1.	15	He is the image of the i God,
1Ti	1.	17	To the King of the ages, immortal, i,
ISRAEL → JACOB

Ge	49.	28	All these are the twelve tribes of I,
Ex	28.	11	with the names of the sons of I;
Nu	24.	17	and a scepter shall rise out of I;
Dt	6.	4	Hear, O I: The LORD is our God,
Jer	31.	31	a new covenant with the house of I
Mt	2.	6	who is to shepherd my people I.’ ”
Mk	12.	29	answered, “The first is, ‘Hear, O I:
Ac	1.	6	you will restore the kingdom to I?”
Heb	8.	8	a new covenant with the house of I
Rev	7.	4	out of every tribe of the people of I:
J

JACOB → ISRAEL

Ps	135.	4	the LORD has chosen J for himself,
Mic	7.	20	You will show faithfulness to J
Ro	9.	13	“I have loved J,
JARS

2Co	4.	7	But we have this treasure in clay j,
JEALOUS

Ex	34.	14	whose name is J, is a j God).
Dt	4.	24	God is a devouring fire, a j God.
Ro	10.	19	“I will make you j of those
JERUSALEM

2Sa	5.	5	and at J he reigned over all Israel
2Ki	25.	10	broke down the walls around J.
Ezr	2.	1	they returned to J and Judah,
Ne	2.	17	Come, let us rebuild the wall of J,
Isa	40.	2	Speak tenderly to J,
La	1.	8	J sinned grievously, so she has
Da	9.	25	went out to restore and rebuild J
Mt	23.	37	“J, J, the city that kills the prophets
Gal	4.	25	corresponds to the present J,
Heb	12.	22	of the living God, the heavenly J,
Rev	21.	2	And I saw the holy city, the new J,
JESUS → CHRIST

LIFE: Genealogy (Mt 1.1–17; Lk 3.21–37). Birth announced (Mt 1.18–25; Lk 1.26–45). Birth (Mt 2.1–12; Lk 2.1–40). Escape to Egypt (Mt 2.13–23). As a boy in the temple (Lk 2.41–52). Baptism (Mt 3.13–17; Mk 1.9–11; Lk 3.21–22; Jn 1.32–34). Temptation (Mt 4.1–11; Mk 1.12–13; Lk 4.1–13). Ministry in Galilee (Mt 4.12–18.35; Mk 1.14–9.50; Lk 4.14–13.9; Jn 1.35–2.11; 4; 6), Transfiguration (Mt 17.1–8; Mk 9.2–8; Lk 9.28–36), on the way to Jerusalem (Mt 19–20; Mk 10; Lk 13.10–19.27), in Jerusalem (Mt 21–25; Mk 11–13; Lk 19.28–21.38; Jn 2.12–3.36; 5; 7–12). Last supper (Mt 26.17–35; Mk 14.12–31; Lk 22.1–38; Jn 13–17). Arrest and trial (Mt 26.36–27.31; Mk 14.43–15.20; Lk 22.39–23.25; Jn 18.1–19.16). Crucifixion (Mt 27.32–66; Mk 15.21–47; Lk 23.26–55; Jn 19.28–42). Resurrection and appearances (Mt 28; Mk 16; Lk 24; Jn 20–21; Ac 1.1–11; 7.56; 9.3–6; 1Co 15.1–8; Rev 1.1–20).

MIRACLES. Healings: official’s son (Jn 4.43–54), demoniac in Capernaum (Mk 1.23–26; Lk 4.33–35), Peter’s mother-in-law (Mt 8.14–17; Mk 1.29–31; Lk 4.38–39), leper (Mt 8.2–4; Mk 1.40–45; Lk 5.12–16), paralytic (Mt 9.1–8; Mk 2.1–12; Lk 5.17–26), cripple (Jn 5.1–9), shriveled hand (Mt 12.10–13; Mk 3.1–5; Lk 6.6–11), centurion’s servant (Mt 8.5–13; Lk 7.1–10), widow’s son raised (Lk 7.11–17), demoniac (Mt 12.22–23; Lk 11.14), Gadarene demoniacs (Mt 8.28–34; Mk 5.1–20; Lk 8.26–39), woman’s bleeding and Jairus’ daughter (Mt 9.18–26; Mk 5.21–43; Lk 8.40–56), blind man (Mt 9.27–31), mute man (Mt 9.32–33), Canaanite woman’s daughter (Mt 15.21–28; Mk 7.24–30), deaf man (Mk 7.31–37), blind man (Mk 8.22–26), demoniac boy (Mt 17.14–18; Mk 9.14–29; Lk 9.37–43), ten lepers (Lk 17.11–19), man born blind (Jn 9.1–7), Lazarus raised (Jn 11), crippled woman (Lk 13.11–17), man with dropsy (Lk 14.1–6), two blind men (Mt 20.29–34; Mk 10.46–52; Lk 18.35–43), Malchus’ ear (Lk 22.50–51). Other Miracles: water to wine (Jn 2.1–11), catch of fish (Lk 5.1–11), storm stilled (Mt 8.23–27; Mk 4.37–41; Lk 8.22–25), 5,000 fed (Mt 14.15–21; Mk 6.35–44; Lk 9.10–17; Jn 6.1–14), walking on water (Mt 14.25–33; Mk 6.48–52; Jn 6.15–21), 4,000 fed (Mt 15.32–39; Mk 8.1–9), money from fish (Mt 17.24–27), fig tree cursed (Mt 21.18–22; Mk 11.12–14), catch of fish (Jn 21.1–14).

MAJOR TEACHING: Sermon on the Mount (Mt 5–7; Lk 6.17–49), to Nicodemus (Jn 3), to Samaritan woman (Jn 4), Bread of Life (Jn 6.22–59), at Feast of Tabernacles (Jn 7–8), woes to Pharisees (Mt 23; Lk 11.37–54), Good Shepherd (Jn 10.1–18), Olivet Discourse (Mt 24–25; Mk 13; Lk 21.5–36), Upper Room Discourse (Jn 13–16).

PARABLES: Sower (Mt 13.3–23; Mk 4.3–25; Lk 8.5–18), seed’s growth (Mk 4.26–29), wheat and weeds (Mt 13.24–30, 36–43), mustard seed (Mt 13.31–32; Mk 4.30–32), yeast (Mt 13.33; Lk 13.20–21), hidden treasure (Mt 13.44), valuable pearl (Mt 13.45–46), net (Mt 13.47–51), house owner (Mt 13.52), good Samaritan (Lk 10.25–37), unmerciful servant (Mt 18.15–35), lost sheep (Mt 18.10–14; Lk 15.4–7), lost coin (Lk 15.8–10), prodigal son (Lk 15.11–32), dishonest manager (Lk 16.1–13), rich man and Lazarus (Lk 16.19–31), persistent widow (Lk 18.1–8), Pharisee and tax collector (Lk 18.9–14), payment of workers (Mt 20.1–16), tenants and the vineyard (Mt 21.28–46; Mk 12.1–12; Lk 20.9–19), wedding banquet (Mt 22.1–14), faithful servant (Mt 24.45–51), ten virgins (Mt 25.1–13), talents (Mt 25.1–30; Lk 19.12–27).

DISCIPLES see APOSTLES. Call (Mt 4.18–22; 9.9; Mk 1.16–20; 2.13–14; Lk 5.1–11, 27–28; Jn 1.35–51). Named Apostles (Mk 3.13–19; Lk 6.12–16). Twelve sent out (Mt 10; Mk 6.7–11; Lk 9.1–5). Seventy sent out (Lk 10.1–24). Defection of (Jn 6.60–71; Mt 26.56; Mk 14.50–52). Final commission (Mt 28.16–20; Jn 21.15–23; Ac 1.3–8).

Ac	9.	5	“I am J, whom you are persecuting.
1Co	8.	6	and one Lord, J Christ,
Php	2.	10	name of J every knee should bend,
2Th	2.	1	the coming of our Lord J Christ
1Ti	1.	15	J came into the world to save
Heb	12.	2	to J the pioneer and perfecter of our
 	13.	8	J Christ is the same yesterday and
1Jn	1.	7	the blood of J his Son cleanses us
Rev	1.	1	The revelation of J Christ,
 	22.	20	Amen. Come, Lord J!
JEW → JEWS

Ro	1.	16	to the J first and also to the Greek.
 	2.	29	a person is a J who is one inwardly,
Col	3.	11	there is no longer Greek and J,
JEWEL → JEWELS

Rev	21.	19	of the city are adorned with every j;
JEWELS → JEWEL

Pr	3.	15	She is more precious than j,
Isa	54.	12	your gates of j, and all your wall
Rev	17.	4	adorned with gold and j and pearls,
JEWS → JEW

Est	3.	13	to kill, and to annihilate all J,
Mt	2.	2	who has been born king of the J?
 	27.	11	“Are you the King of the J?”
Ro	3.	29	Or is God the God of J only?
JOINED

Mt	19.	6	what God has j together, let no one
Eph	2.	21	the whole structure is j together
JORDAN

Ge	13.	10	the plain of the J was well watered
Nu	34.	12	the boundary shall go down to the J,
Mt	3.	6	were baptized by him in the river J,
JOY

Ne	8.	10	the j of the LORD is your strength.”
Job	20.	5	j of the godless is but for a moment?
Ps	51.	12	Restore to me the j of your salvation
Pr	21.	15	When justice is done, it is a j to the
Isa	35.	10	everlasting j shall be upon their
La	2.	15	of beauty, the j of all the earth?”
Lk	1.	44	the child in my womb leaped for j.
 	2.	10	bringing you good news of great j
Ro	14.	17	but righteousness and peace and j in
Gal	5.	22	the fruit of the Spirit is love, j,
Heb	12.	2	j that was set before him endured
Jas	1.	2	consider it nothing but j,
JUBILEE

Lev	25.	10	It shall be a j for you:
Nu	36.	4	when the j of the Israelites comes,
JUDEA

Mt	2.	1	Jesus was born in Bethlehem of J,
Lk	3.	1	Pontius Pilate was governor of J,
Ac	1.	8	my witnesses in Jerusalem, in all J
JUDGE → JUDGED, JUDGES, JUDGMENT, JUDGMENTS

1Sa	2.	10	LORD will j the ends of the earth;
Ps	96.	13	for he is coming to j the earth.
Eze	34.	17	I shall j between sheep and sheep,
Lk	6.	37	not j, and you will not be judged;
Jn	7.	24	Do not j by appearances,
Ro	3.	6	then how could God j the world?
1Co	6.	2	that the saints will j the world?
2Ti	4.	1	who is to j the living and the dead,
Rev	20.	4	on them were given authority to j.
JUDGED → JUDGE

1Co	11.	31	if we j ourselves, we would not be j.
Rev	20.	12	dead were j according to their works
JUDGES → JUDGE

Jdg	2.	16	Then the LORD raised up j,
Lk	11.	19	Therefore they will be your j.
JUDGMENT → JUDGE

Ex	6.	6	arm and with mighty acts of j.
Ps	1.	5	wicked will not stand in the j,
Ecc	12.	14	God will bring every deed into j,
Jer	25.	31	he is entering into j with all flesh,
Da	7.	22	j was given for the holy ones of the
Ro	14.	10	we will all stand before the j seat of
2Co	5.	10	all of us must appear before the j
Heb	9.	27	to die once, and after that the j,
Jas	2.	13	mercy triumphs over j.
1Jn	4.	17	may have boldness on the day of j,
Rev	18.	10	For in one hour your j has come.”
JUDGMENTS → JUDGE

Ps	119.	75	LORD, that your j are right,
Ro	11.	33	How unsearchable are his j and
Rev	19.	2	for his j are true and just;
JUST → JUSTICE, JUSTIFICATION, JUSTIFIED, JUSTIFY

Ge	18.	25	Judge of all the earth do what is j?”
1Jn	1.	9	he who is faithful and j will forgive
Rev	15.	3	J and true are your ways, King of
JUSTICE → JUST

Ex	23.	6	not pervert the j due to your poor
Ps	33.	5	He loves righteousness and j;
Isa	30.	18	For the LORD is a God of j;
Jer	9.	24	I act with steadfast love, j,
Hos	12.	6	to your God, hold fast to love and j,
Am	5.	24	But let j roll down like waters,
Lk	11.	42	and neglect j and the love of God;
JUSTIFICATION → JUST

Ro	4.	25	trespasses and was raised for our j.
2Co	3.	9	more does the ministry of j abound
Gal	2.	21	for if j comes through the law,
JUSTIFIED → JUST

Mt	12.	37	for by your words you will be j,
Ro	5.	1	Therefore, since we are j by faith,
 	10.	10	believes with the heart and so is j,
Gal	2.	16	that we might be j by faith in Christ,
Jas	2.	24	is j by works and not by faith alone.
K

KEEP → KEEPER

Ge	17.	9	for you, you shall k my covenant,
Ex	19.	5	obey my voice and k my covenant,
Nu	6.	24	The LORD bless you and k you;
Dt	5.	10	love me and k my commandments.
Ne	1.	5	love him and k his commandments;
Pr	7.	2	k my commandments and live,
Ecc	3.	6	time to k, and a time to throw away;
 	12.	13	Fear God, and k his commandments
Lk	17.	33	those who lose their life will k it.
KEEPER → KEEP

Ge	4.	9	am I my brother’s k?”
Ps	121.	5	The LORD is your k;
KEY → KEYS

Rev	3.	7	true one, who has the k of David,
KEYS → KEY

Mt	16.	19	you the k of the kingdom of heaven,
Rev	1.	18	I have the k of Death and of Hades.
KILL → KILLED, KILLS

Ecc	3.	3	a time to k, and a time to heal;
Mt	10.	28	not fear those who k the body but cannot k the soul;
Mk	14.	1	to arrest Jesus by stealth and k him;
KILLED → KILL

Mk	9.	31	after being k, he will rise again.”
Ac	3.	15	and you k the Author of life,
KILLS → KILL

2Co	3.	6	the letter k, but the Spirit gives life.
KIND → KINDNESS

1Co	13.	4	Love is patient; love is k;
Eph	4.	32	and be k to one another,
KINDNESS → KIND

Pr	31.	26	teaching of k is on her tongue.
Ro	2.	4	k is meant to lead you to repentance
Gal	5.	22	joy, peace, patience, k, generosity,
KING → KINGDOM, KINGS

2Sa	2.	4	there they anointed David k over
Ps	2.	6	set my k on Zion, my holy hill.”
 	10.	16	The LORD is k forever and ever;
Isa	6.	5	have seen the K, the LORD of hosts!
Mt	2.	2	who has been born k of the Jews?
 	27.	37	“This is Jesus, the K of the Jews.”
1Ti	1.	17	To the K of the ages, immortal,
Rev	19.	16	“K of kings and Lord of lords.”
KINGDOM → KING

Ex	19.	6	you shall be for me a priestly k and
2Sa	7.	12	and I will establish his k.
Ps	145.	13	Your k is an everlasting k,
Mt	4.	17	“Repent, for the k of heaven has
 	5.	3	for theirs is the k of heaven.
 	6.	10	Your k come. Your will be done,
Mk	10.	24	how hard it is to enter the k of God!
Lk	17.	21	in fact, the k of God is among you.”
Jn	18.	36	“My k is not from this world.
Ro	14.	17	the k of God is not food and drink
1Co	6.	9	wrongdoers will not inherit the k
1Th	2.	12	calls you into his own k and glory.
Heb	12.	28	receiving a k that cannot be shaken,
Rev	11.	15	world has become the k of our Lord
KINGS → KING

Ps	2.	2	The k of the earth set themselves,
Isa	52.	15	k shall shut their mouths because of
Ac	4.	26	The k of the earth took their stand,
1Ti	6.	15	the King of k and Lord of lords.
Rev	19.	16	“King of k and Lord of lords.”
KISS

Ps	2.	12	k his feet, or he will be angry,
SS	1.	2	Let him k me with the kisses of his
Mt	26.	48	“The one I will k is the man; arrest
2Co	13.	12	Greet one another with a holy k.
KNEE → KNEES

Isa	45.	23	“To me every k shall bow,
Ro	14.	11	says the Lord, every k shall bow to
Php	2.	10	at the name of Jesus every k should
KNEES → KNEE

1Ki	19.	18	the k that have not bowed to Baal,
Eph	3.	14	I bow my k before the Father,
KNOCK → KNOCKING

Lk	11.	9	k, and the door will be opened for
KNOCKING → KNOCK

Rev	3.	20	I am standing at the door, k;
KNOW → FOREKNEW, KNOWLEDGE, KNOWN, KNOWS

Job	19.	25	For I k that my Redeemer lives,
Ps	46.	10	“Be still, and k that I am God!
Jer	31.	34	“K the LORD,” for they shall all k
Mt	6.	3	left hand k what your right hand is
 	22.	34	denied three times that you k me.”
Jn	10.	14	I k my own and my own k me,
1Co	13.	12	I k only in part; then I will k fully,
Heb	8.	11	‘K the Lord,’ for they shall all k me,
1Jn	2.	4	Whoever says, “I have come to k
Rev	3.	3	not k at what hour I will come to
KNOWLEDGE → KNOW

Ge	2.	9	the tree of the k of good and evil.
Pr	1.	7	of the LORD is the beginning of k;
1Co	8.	1	K puffs up, but love builds up.
Eph	3.	19	the love of Christ that surpasses k,
Col	2.	3	the treasures of wisdom and k.
1Jn	2.	20	and all of you have k.
KNOWN → KNOW

Ps	139.	1	you have searched me and k me.
Lk	6.	44	for each tree is k by its own fruit.
KNOWS → KNOW

Ps	94.	11	The LORD k our thoughts,
Mt	6.	8	your Father k what you need before
 	24.	36	about that day and hour no one k,
L

LABOR

Ex	20.	9	Six days you shall l and do all your
LADDER

Ge	28.	12	there was a l set up on the earth,
LAID → LAY

Isa	53.	6	the LORD has l on him the iniquity
Mk	16.	6	Look, there is the place they l him.
1Jn	3.	16	that he l down his life for us—
LAKE

Rev	19.	20	were thrown alive into the l of fire
 	20.	14	This is the second death, the l of fire
LAMB

Ge	22.	8	“God himself will provide the l for
Ex	12.	21	and slaughter the passover l.
Isa	53.	7	like a l that is led to the slaughter,
Mk	14.	12	when the Passover l is sacrificed,
Jn	1.	29	L of God who takes away the sin of
1Co	5.	7	For our paschal l, Christ, has been
1Pe	1.	19	like that of a l without defect or
Rev	5.	12	the L that was slaughtered to
 	21.	23	and its lamp is the L.
LAME

Isa	35.	6	then the l shall leap like a deer,
Zep	3.	19	And I will save the l and gather the
Mt	11.	5	the l walk, the lepers are cleansed,
LAMP → LAMPS, LAMPSTAND, LAMPSTANDS

Ps	119.	105	Your word is a l to my feet and a
Mt	5.	15	lighting a l puts it under the bushel
LAMPS → LAMP

Ex	25.	37	You shall make the seven l for it;
LAMPSTAND → LAMP

Ex	25.	31	You shall make a l of pure gold.
LAMPSTANDS → LAMP

Rev	1.	20	the seven l are the seven churches.
LAND

Ge	1.	10	God called the dry l Earth,
Ex	3.	8	a l flowing with milk and honey,
Nu	13.	2	to spy out the l of Canaan,
Jos	11.	23	So Joshua took the whole l,
2Ki	17.	5	the king of Assyria invaded all the l
 	25.	21	So Judah went into exile out of its l.
2Ch	7.	14	will forgive their sin and heal their l.
Ps	37.	11	But the meek shall inherit the l,
LANGUAGE

Ge	11.	9	LORD confused the l of all the earth;
LAST → EVERLASTING

Isa	44.	6	I am the first and I am the l;
Mt	19.	30	first will be l, and the l will be first.
Heb	1.	2	l days he has spoken to us by a Son,
Rev	1.	17	I am the first and the l,
LAUGH

Ecc	3.	4	a time to weep, and a time to l;
Lk	6.	21	you who weep now, for you will l.
LAW → LAWFUL

Dt	1.	5	Moses undertook to expound this l
 	31.	9	Then Moses wrote down this l,
Jos	1.	8	book of the l shall not depart out of
Ps	1.	2	their delight is in the l of the LORD,
 	119.	97	Oh, how I love your l!
Jer	31.	33	I will put my l within them,
Mt	5.	17	come to abolish the l or the prophets
Lk	24.	44	written about me in the l of Moses,
Ro	6.	14	you are not under l but under grace.
 	10.	4	For Christ is the end of the l so that
Heb	10.	1	Since the l has only a shadow of the
Jas	2.	10	For whoever keeps the whole l but
LAWFUL → LAW

1Co	6.	12	“All things are l for me,”
 	10.	23	“All things are l,” but
LAY → LAID

Mt	28.	6	Come, see the place where he l.
Jn	10.	15	I l down my life for the sheep.
LEAD → LEADS

Isa	11.	6	and a little child shall l them.
LEADS → LEAD

Ps	23.	2	he l me beside still waters;
LEAST

Mt	2.	6	are by no means l among the rulers
 	5.	19	called l in the kingdom of heaven;
Lk	9.	48	l among all of you is the greatest.”
LEAVE → LEFT

Mk	10.	7	this reason a man shall l his father
Heb	13.	5	said, “I will never l you or forsake
LEAVEN

Ex	12.	15	on the first day you shall remove l
LEAVES

Ge	3.	7	and they sewed fig l together
Eze	47.	12	and their l for healing.”
Rev	22.	2	l of the tree are for the healing of
LEFT → LEAVE

Mt	6.	3	your l hand know what your right
Lk	17.	34	one will be taken and the other l.
LEGS

Jn	19.	33	they did not break his l.
LEPER → LEPROUS

Mt	8.	2	and there was a l who came to him
 	26.	6	in the house of Simon the l,
LEPERS → LEPROUS

Lk	7.	22	the lame walk, the l are cleansed,
LEPROUS → LEPER, LEPERS

Ex	4.	6	he took it out, his hand was l,
Nu	12.	10	Miriam had become l,
LETTER

Mt	5.	18	not one l, not one stroke of a l,
2Co	3.	6	the l kills, but the Spirit gives life.
LEVIATHAN

Job	41.	1	you draw out L with a fishhook,
Ps	74.	14	You crushed the heads of L;
LEVITES → LEVITICAL

Nu	1.	53	L shall camp around the tabernacle
Jos	14.	4	no portion was given to the L in the
Ne	8.	9	L who taught the people said to all
LEVITICAL → LEVITES

Heb	7.	11	attainable through the l priesthood
LIAR → LIE

Pr	19.	22	and it is better to be poor than a l.
Jn	8.	44	for he is a l and the father of lies.
LIE → LIAR, LYING

Nu	23.	19	that he should l, or a mortal,
Ps	23.	2	makes me l down in green pastures;
1Jn	2.	21	know that no l comes from the truth.
LIFE → LIVE

Ge	2.	7	into his nostrils the breath of l;
 	2.	9	the tree of l also in the midst of the
 	9.	5	require a reckoning for human l.
Ex	21.	23	then you shall give l for l,
Dt	30.	19	Choose l so that you and your
Isa	53.	10	you make his l an offering for sin,
Da	12.	2	shall awake, some to everlasting l,
Mt	7.	14	and the road is hard that leads to l,
 	10.	39	Those who find their l will lose it,
 	20.	28	to give his l a ransom for many.”
Jn	1.	4	in him was l, and the l was the light
 	3.	15	believes in him may have eternal l.
 	6.	35	said to them, “I am the bread of l.
 	11.	25	“I am the resurrection and the l.
 	14.	6	“I am the way, and the truth, and the l.
Ac	3.	15	and you killed the Author of l,
Ro	5.	21	eternal l through Jesus Christ our
2Co	3.	6	the letter kills, but the Spirit gives l.
Php	4.	3	whose names are in the book of l.
1Jn	5.	20	He is the true God and eternal l.
Rev	2.	8	who was dead and came to l:
 	20.	4	came to l and reigned with Christ
 	20.	12	book was opened, the book of l.
 	22.	2	the tree of l with its twelve kinds
LIGHT → ENLIGHTENED, ENLIGHTENS, LIGHTS

Ge	1.	3	“Let there be l”; and there was l.
Isa	9.	2	in darkness have seen a great l;
 	60.	1	Arise, shine; for your l has come,
Mt	4.	16	in darkness have seen a great l,
 	5.	14	“You are the l of the world.
Jn	1.	9	true l, which enlightens everyone,
 	8.	12	saying, “I am the l of the world.
Ro	13.	12	and put on the armor of l;
2Co	11.	14	Satan disguises himself as an angel of l.
Rev	22.	5	for the Lord God will be their l,
LIGHTS → LIGHT

Ge	1.	16	God made the two great l—
Jas	1.	17	coming down from the Father of l,
LIKENESS

Ge	1.	26	in our image, according to our l;
Ro	8.	3	his own Son in the l of sinful flesh,
Php	2.	7	of a slave, being born in human l.
LION → LIONS

Isa	11.	7	the l shall eat straw like the ox.
Rev	5.	5	See, the L of the tribe of Judah,
LIONS → LION

Da	6.	20	able to deliver you from the l?”
LISTEN

Ex	23.	22	But if you l attentively to his voice
2Ki	17.	40	They would not l, however,
Mk	9.	7	my Son, the Beloved; l to him!”
Lk	16.	31	‘If they do not l to Moses and the
Jas	1.	19	be quick to l, slow to speak,
LIVE → ALIVE, LIFE, LIVES, LIVING

Ge	3.	22	and eat, and l forever”—
Ex	33.	20	for no one shall see me and l.”
Lev	18.	5	by doing so one shall l:
Dt	8.	3	one does not l by bread alone,
Hab	2.	4	but the righteous l by their faith.
Mt	4.	4	‘One does not l by bread alone,
Jn	11.	25	even though they die, will l,
Ro	14.	8	If we l, we l to the Lord,
2Co	5.	15	those who l might l no longer for
LIVES → LIVE

Job	19.	25	For I know that my Redeemer l,
Ro	6.	10	but the life he l, he l to God.
Rev	15.	7	of God, who l forever and ever;
LIVING → LIVE

Ge	2.	7	and the man became a l being.
Dt	5.	26	the voice of the l God speaking out
Jer	2.	13	forsaken me, the fountain of l water,
Zec	14.	8	that day l waters shall flow out from
Mt	16.	16	the Messiah, the Son of the l God.”
Jn	4.	10	he would have given you l water.”
 	6.	51	I am the l bread that came down
Ro	12.	1	present your bodies as a l sacrifice,
Heb	4.	12	the word of God is l and active,
LOAVES

Mk	6.	41	Taking the five l and the two fish,
 	8.	6	and he took the seven l,
LOCUSTS

Ex	10.	4	I will bring l into your country.
Mt	3.	4	and his food was l and wild honey.
Rev	9.	3	from the smoke came l on the earth,
LONG

Ex	20.	12	that your days may be l in the land
Ps	13.	1	How l, O LORD?
Rev	6.	10	how l will it be before you judge
LORD → LORD’S, LORDS

Dt	10.	17	God is God of gods and L of lords,
Ps	110.	1	The LORD says to my l,
Mt	7.	22	many will say to me, ‘L, L,
Mk	1.	3	‘Prepare the way of the L,
 	12.	29	the L our God, the L is one;
Lk	2.	11	who is the Messiah, the L.
Jn	13.	13	You call me Teacher and L—
 	20.	28	“My L and my God!”
Ac	2.	34	‘The L said to my L, “Sit at my
Ro	4.	24	in him who raised Jesus our L
 	10.	12	the same L is L of all and
1Co	8.	6	and one L, Jesus Christ,
2Co	3.	17	Now the L is the Spirit,
Eph	4.	5	one L, one faith, one baptism,
Php	2.	11	that Jesus Christ is L, to the glory
1Pe	3.	15	in your hearts sanctify Christ as L.
Rev	4.	8	“Holy, holy, holy, the L God
 	19.	16	“King of kings and L of lords.”
 	22.	20	Amen. Come, L Jesus!
†LORD → †LORD’S

Ge	2.	7	L God formed man from the dust of
 	13.	4	Abram called on the name of the L.
 	18.	14	Is anything too wonderful for the L?
Ex	15.	3	The L is a warrior; the L is his name.
 	34.	6	and proclaimed, “The L, the L,
Lev	19.	2	for I the L your God am holy.
Nu	6.	24	The L bless you and keep you;
Dt	6.	4	The L is our God, the L alone.
Jos	24.	15	my household, we will serve the L.”
1Sa	2.	2	“There is no Holy One like the L,
Ne	8.	10	the joy of the L is your strength.”
Job	1.	21	the L gave, and the L has taken
Ps	1.	2	their delight is in the law of the L,
 	10.	16	The L is king forever and ever;
 	23.	1	The L is my shepherd, I shall not
 	33.	12	Happy is the nation whose God is the L
 	110.	1	The L says to my lord,
 	150.	6	that breathes praise the L!
Pr	1.	7	fear of the L is the beginning of
 	3.	5	Trust in the L with all your heart,
Isa	6.	3	“Holy, holy, holy is the L of hosts;
 	53.	6	the L has laid on him the iniquity
Jer	31.	34	“Know the L,” for they shall all
La	3.	25	The L is good to those who wait for
Eze	37.	4	O dry bones, hear the word of the L.
 	48.	35	time on shall be, The L is There.
Hos	14.	1	Return, O Israel, to the L your God,
Joel	1.	15	For the day of the L is near,
Am	5.	6	Seek the L and live,
Ob	1.	15	the day of the L is near against all
Na	1.	3	The L is slow to anger but great in
Zep	1.	14	The great day of the L is near,
Zec	14.	9	the L will be one and his name one.
Mal	4.	5	and terrible day of the L comes.
LORD’S → LORD

Mk	12.	11	was the L doing, and it is amazing
Lk	4.	19	to proclaim the year of the L favor.”
Ro	14.	8	or whether we die, we are the L.
1Co	10.	26	the earth and its fullness are the L.”
†LORD’S → †LORD

Dt	32.	9	the L own portion was his people,
Isa	59.	1	the L hand is not too short to save,
Ob	1.	21	and the kingdom shall be the L.
LORDS → LORD

Dt	10.	17	God is God of gods and Lord of l,
Rev	19.	16	“King of kings and Lord of l.”
LOSS → LOST

Php	3.	8	I regard everything as l because of
LOST → LOSS

Ps	119.	176	I have gone astray like a l sheep;
Lk	15.	6	I have found my sheep that was l.’
 	19.	10	came to seek out and to save the l.”
LOTS

Ps	22.	18	and for my clothing they cast l.
Mt	27.	35	among themselves by casting l;
LOVE → BELOVED, LOVED, LOVES

Ex	20.	6	but showing steadfast l to the
 	34.	6	and abounding in steadfast l and
Lev	19.	18	shall l your neighbor as yourself:
Dt	6.	5	You shall l the LORD your God
2Ch	6.	42	Remember your steadfast l
Ne	1.	5	steadfast l with those who l him
Ps	18.	1	I l you, O LORD, my strength.
 	86.	5	abounding in steadfast l to all who
 	119.	97	Oh, how I l your law!
 	136.	1	for his steadfast l endures forever.
Pr	8.	17	I l those who l me,
Ecc	3.	8	a time to l, and a time to hate;
SS	1.	2	For your l is better than wine,
Isa	54.	8	but with everlasting l I will have
La	3.	22	steadfast l of the LORD never ceases,
Hos	11.	4	of human kindness, with bands of l.
Joel	2.	13	and abounding in steadfast l,
Jnh	4.	2	and abounding in steadfast l,
Mt	5.	44	L your enemies and pray
 	6.	24	either hate the one and l the other,
Mk	12.	31	shall l your neighbor as yourself.’
Lk	6.	32	For even sinners l those who l them.
 	10.	27	“You shall l the Lord your God
Jn	12.	25	Those who l their life lose it,
 	13.	34	new commandment, that you l one
 	14.	15	“If you l me, you will keep my
 	15.	13	No one has greater l than this,
Ro	5.	8	But God proves his l for us in that
 	12.	9	Let l be genuine; hate what is evil,
1Co	8.	1	Knowledge puffs up, but l builds up.
 	13.	4	L is patient; l is kind;
 	13.	13	and the greatest of these is l.
Gal	5.	22	the fruit of the Spirit is l, joy,
Eph	3.	19	l of Christ that surpasses knowledge
 	5.	25	Husbands, l your wives,
1Ti	6.	10	For the l of money is a root of all
Heb	10.	24	provoke one another to l and good
 	13.	5	your lives free from the l of money,
2Pe	1.	7	and mutual affection with l.
1Jn	2.	15	not l the world or the things in the
 	3.	1	See what l the Father has given us,
 	5.	3	For the l of God is this,
2Jn	1.	6	And this is l, that we walk according
Jude	1.	21	keep yourselves in the l of God;
Rev	2.	4	abandoned the l you had at first.
LOVED → LOVE

Jer	31.	3	have l you with an everlasting love;
Jn	3.	16	God so l the world that he gave his
 	15.	9	the Father has l me, so I have l you;
 	15.	12	love one another as I have l you.
1Jn	4.	19	We love because he first l us.
LOVES → LOVE

Pr	3.	12	the LORD reproves the one he l,
 	17.	17	A friend l at all times,
Lk	7.	47	to whom little is forgiven, l little.”
Ro	13.	8	who l another has fulfilled the law.
Eph	5.	28	He who l his wife l himself.
Heb	12.	6	Lord disciplines those whom he l,
Rev	1.	5	who l us and freed us from our sins
LOWER → LOWLY

Ps	8.	5	have made them a little l than God,
Heb	2.	7	made them for a little while l than
LOWLY → LOWER

Pr	16.	19	It is better to be of a l spirit
Ro	12.	16	but associate with the l;
LOYALTY

Dt	7.	9	God who maintains covenant l
Ru	3.	10	this last instance of your l
Ps	101.	1	I will sing of l and of justice;
Hos	4.	1	There is no faithfulness or l,
LUKEWARM

Rev	3.	16	because you are l, and neither cold
LUST → LUSTS

Mt	5.	28	looks at a woman with l has already
2Pe	1.	4	that is in the world because of l,
LUSTS → LUST

Ro	1.	24	gave them up in the l of their hearts
LYING → LIE

Pr	6.	17	a l tongue, and hands that shed
M

MADE → MAKE

Ge	1.	31	God saw everything that he had m,
 	2.	22	he m into a woman and brought her
 	6.	6	was sorry that he had m humankind
 	15.	18	the LORD m a covenant with Abram,
Ex	20.	11	For in six days the LORD m heaven
Ps	8.	5	have m them a little lower than God
 	118.	24	This is the day that the LORD has m;
 	139.	14	I am fearfully and wonderfully m.
Ac	2.	36	that God has m him both Lord and
Eph	2.	5	m us alive together with Christ—
MAGDALENE

Mt	27.	56	Among them were Mary M,
MAJESTIC → MAJESTY

Ex	15.	11	Who is like you, m in holiness,
Ps	8.	1	how m is your name in all the earth!
MAJESTY → MAJESTIC

1Ch	29.	11	the glory, the victory, and the m;
Ps	93.	1	The LORD is king, he is robed in m;
2Pe	1.	16	we had been eyewitnesses of his m.
MAKE → MADE, MAKER

Ge	1.	26	“Let us m humankind in our image,
 	2.	18	will m him a helper as his partner.”
Ex	20.	4	You shall not m for yourself an idol,
Nu	6.	25	LORD m his face to shine upon you,
Mt	28.	19	and m disciples of all nations,
MAKER → MAKE

Ge	14.	19	God Most High, m of heaven and
Ps	95.	6	kneel before the LORD, our M!
Isa	54.	5	For your M is your husband,
MALE

Ge	1.	27	m and female he created them.
Lev	20.	13	If a man lies with a m as with a
Rev	12.	5	she gave birth to a son, a m child,
MAN

Ge	2.	7	LORD God formed m from the dust
 	2.	18	not good that the m should be alone;
Mt	9.	6	Son of M has authority on earth to
Lk	6.	5	The Son of M is lord of the sabbath.
Jn	9.	35	“Do you believe in the Son of M?”
1Co	11.	3	that Christ is the head of every m,
Rev	1.	13	I saw one like the Son of M,
MANGER

Lk	2.	12	in bands of cloth and lying in a m.”
MANNA

Ex	16.	31	The house of Israel called it m;
Jn	6.	49	ate the m in the wilderness,
Rev	2.	17	I will give some of the hidden m,
MANY

Mt	22.	14	m are called, but few are chosen.”
Mk	10.	45	and to give his life a ransom for m.”
Ro	12.	5	who are m, are one body in Christ,
MARK

Ge	4.	15	And the LORD put a m on Cain,
Eze	9.	6	but touch no one who has the m.
Rev	19.	20	who had received the m of the beast
MARRIAGE → MARRIED, MARRIES

Mt	22.	30	are given in m, but are like angels
Heb	13.	4	Let m be held in honor by all,
Rev	19.	7	for the m of the Lamb has come,
MARRIED → MARRIAGE

1Ti	3.	2	be above reproach, m only once,
Tit	1.	6	m only once, whose children are
MARRIES → MARRIAGE

Mk	10.	11	and m another commits adultery
Ro	7.	3	if she m another man, she is not an
1Co	7.	28	and if a virgin m, she does not sin.
MASTER → MASTERS, TASKMASTERS

Mal	1.	6	if I am a m, where is the respect due
Jn	15.	20	Servants are not greater than their m
2Pe	2.	1	deny the M who bought them—
MASTERS → MASTER

Mt	6.	24	“No one can serve two m;
MEDIATOR

Gal	3.	19	ordained through angels by a m.
1Ti	2.	5	m between God and humankind,
Heb	8.	6	he is the m of a better covenant,
MEDITATE → MEDITATION

Jos	1.	8	you shall m on it day and night,
Ps	1.	2	on his law they m day and night.
MEDITATION → MEDITATE

Ps	19.	14	of my mouth and the m of my heart
 	119.	97	It is my m all day long.
MEEK → MEEKNESS

Ps	37.	11	But the m shall inherit the land,
Mt	5.	5	“Blessed are the m, for they will
MEEKNESS → MEEK

Col	3.	12	kindness, humility, m, and patience.
Jas	1.	21	with m the implanted word
MEETING

Ex	27.	21	In the tent of m, outside the curtain
 	40.	34	the cloud covered the tent of m,
MELCHIZEDEK

Ge	14.	18	King M of Salem brought out bread
Ps	110.	4	forever according to the order of M.”
Heb	7.	1	This “King M of Salem, priest of
MEMBERS

Ro	7.	23	I see in my m another law at war
1Co	6.	15	that your bodies are m of Christ?
 	12.	18	God arranged the m in the body,
MERCIES → MERCY

La	3.	22	his m never come to an end;
2Co	1.	3	the Father of m and the God of all
MERCIFUL → MERCY

Dt	4.	31	the LORD your God is a m God,
Ps	111.	4	the LORD is gracious and m.
Jer	3.	12	not look on you in anger, for I am m
Mt	5.	7	“Blessed are the m, for they will
Lk	6.	36	Be m, just as your Father is m.
MERCY → MERCIES, MERCIFUL

Ex	25.	17	make a m seat of pure gold;
1Ch	21.	13	of the LORD, for his m is very great;
Hab	3.	2	in wrath may you remember m.
Mt	9.	13	learn what this means, ‘I desire m,
 	23.	23	of the law: justice and m and faith.
Ro	9.	15	“I will have m on whom I have m,
Eph	2.	4	But God, who is rich in m,
Jas	2.	13	m triumphs over judgment.
MESSENGER → MESSAGE

Mt	11.	10	I am sending my m ahead of you,
2Co	12.	7	a m of Satan to torment me,
MESSIAH → CHRIST, MESSIAHS

Mt	16.	16	Peter answered, “You are the M,
Lk	2.	11	a Savior, who is the M, the Lord.
Ac	2.	36	God has made him both Lord and M
Ro	9.	5	according to the flesh, comes the M,
Rev	11.	15	kingdom of our Lord and of his M,
MESSIAHS → MESSIAH

Mk	13.	22	False m and false prophets will
MIDWIVES

Ex	1.	17	But the m feared God; they did not
MIGHT → ALMIGHTY, MIGHTY

2Ch	20.	6	In your hand are power and m,
Zec	4.	6	m, nor by power, but by my spirit,
MIGHTY → MIGHT

Ge	49.	24	by the hands of the M One of Jacob,
Ex	6.	1	by a m hand he will let them go;
Ps	99.	4	M King, lover of justice, you have
Isa	9.	6	Wonderful Counselor, M God,
Rev	18.	8	for m is the Lord God who judges
MILE

Mt	5.	41	one m, go also the second m.
MILK

Ex	3.	8	a land flowing with m and honey,
Heb	5.	12	You need m, not solid food;
MILLSTONE → STONE

Lk	17.	2	better for you if a m were hung
MIND → MINDFUL

Nu	23.	19	mortal, that he should change his m.
Jnh	3.	9	God may relent and change his m;
Mt	22.	37	all your soul, and with all your m.’
1Co	2.	16	who has known the m of the Lord
Php	2.	5	same m be in you that was in Christ
Heb	7.	21	sworn and will not change his m,
MINDFUL → MIND

Ps	8.	4	beings that you are m of them,
Heb	2.	6	beings that you are m of them,
MINISTERS → MINISTRY

2Co	3.	6	to be m of a new covenant,
 	11.	15	if his m also disguise themselves as m
MINISTRY → MINISTERS

2Co	5.	18	has given us the m of reconciliation;
Eph	4.	12	equip the saints for the work of m,
Heb	8.	6	now obtained a more excellent m,
MIRACLES → See also JESUS: MIRACLES

Ps	78.	11	and the m that he had shown them.
Ac	19.	11	did extraordinary m through Paul,
1Co	12.	29	Are all teachers? Do all work m?
Heb	2.	4	signs and wonders and various m,
MOCKED → MOCK

Gal	6.	7	God is not m, for you reap
MOMENT → MOMENTARY

Ps	30.	5	For his anger is but for a m;
Isa	54.	7	For a brief m I abandoned you,
1Co	15.	52	in a m, in the twinkling of an eye,
MOMENTARY → MOMENT

2Co	4.	17	this slight m affliction is preparing
MONEY

Mk	11.	15	the tables of the m changers
1Ti	6.	10	love of m is a root of all kinds
Heb	13.	5	your lives free from the love of m,
MOON → MOONS

Joel	2.	31	to darkness, and the m to blood,
Ac	2.	20	to darkness and the m to blood,
Rev	6.	12	the full m became like blood,
 	21.	23	no need of sun or m to shine on it,
MOONS → MOON

2Ch	8.	13	the new m, and the three annual
Col	2.	16	or of observing festivals, new m,
MORALS

1Co	15.	33	“Bad company ruins good m.”
MORNING

Ge	1.	5	and there was m, the first day.
Ps	30.	5	but joy comes with the m.
La	3.	23	every m; great is your faithfulness.
Lk	24.	22	They were at the tomb early this m,
2Pe	1.	19	the day dawns and the m star rises
Rev	22.	16	of David, the bright m star.”
MOST

Ge	14.	18	he was priest of God M High.
Ex	26.	33	the holy place from the m holy.
Ps	91.	1	live in the shelter of the M High,
Mk	5.	7	Jesus, Son of the M High God?
MOTH

Ps	39.	11	consuming like a m what is dear to
Mt	6.	19	where m and rust consume and
MOTHER

Ge	2.	24	a man leaves his father and his m
 	3.	20	because she was the m of all living.
Ex	20.	12	Honor your father and your m,
Isa	66.	13	As a m comforts her child, so I will
Mt	10.	37	loves father or m more than me is
Jn	19.	27	to the disciple, “Here is your m.”
Eph	5.	31	a man will leave his father and m
Rev	17.	5	m of whores and of earth’s
MOUNT → MOUNTAIN, MOUNTAINS

Ex	19.	20	the LORD descended upon M Sinai,
Ps	78.	68	M Zion, which he loves.
Mk	13.	3	he was sitting on the M of Olives
Rev	14.	1	the Lamb, standing on M Zion!
MOUNTAIN → MOUNT

Isa	2.	2	the m of the LORD’s house shall
Mt	4.	8	a very high m and showed him all
 	17.	20	you will say to this m, ‘Move from
MOUNTAINS → MOUNT

1Co	13.	2	have all faith, so as to remove m,
MOURN → MOURNFUL, MOURNING

Ecc	3.	4	a time to m, and a time to dance;
Mt	5.	4	“Blessed are those who m,
MOURNING → MOURN

Rev	21.	4	m and crying and pain will be no
MOUTH

Dt	8.	3	that comes from the m of the LORD.
Ps	19.	14	Let the words of my m and
Mt	4.	4	every word that comes from the m
Rev	19.	15	From his m comes a sharp sword
MULTIPLY

Ge	1.	28	to them, “Be fruitful and m,
 	9.	7	And you, be fruitful and m,
Dt	6.	3	that you may m greatly in a land
MULTITUDE

Jas	5.	20	and will cover a m of sins.
1Pe	4.	8	for love covers a m of sins.
MURDER → MURDERER

Ex	20.	13	You shall not m.
Hos	4.	2	lying, and m, and stealing and
Mt	5.	21	of ancient times, ‘You shall not m’;
MURDERER → MURDER

Nu	35.	16	the m shall be put to death.
Jn	8.	44	He was a m from the beginning
MUSTARD

Mt	17.	20	have faith the size of a m seed,
Mk	4.	31	It is like a m seed, which,
MYRRH

Mt	2.	11	gifts of gold, frankincense, and m.
Mk	15.	23	offered him wine mixed with m;
MYSTERY

Da	2.	19	m was revealed to Daniel in a vision
Ro	11.	25	I want you to understand this m:
1Co	15.	51	Listen, I will tell you a m!
Eph	3.	4	my understanding of the m of Christ
1Ti	3.	9	must hold fast to the m of the faith
Rev	17.	5	a name, a m: “Babylon the great,
N

NAILING → NAILS

Col	2.	14	He set this aside, n it to the cross.
NAILS → NAILING

Jn	20.	25	put my finger in the mark of the n
NAKED

Ge	2.	25	the man and his wife were both n,
Job	1.	21	“N I came from my mother’s womb, and n shall
NAME → NAMES

Ge	2.	19	every living creature, that was its n.
 	4.	26	people began to invoke the n of
Ex	3.	15	my n forever, and this my title
 	20.	7	wrongful use of the n of the LORD
Ps	9.	10	know your n put their trust in you,
Pr	18.	10	The n of the LORD is a strong tower;
Isa	42.	8	I am the LORD, that is my n;
Eze	20.	9	But I acted for the sake of my n,
Joel	2.	32	on the n of the LORD shall be saved;
Mt	1.	21	a son, and you are to n him Jesus,
 	6.	9	Father in heaven, hallowed be your n.
 	28.	19	baptizing them in the n of the Father
Jn	1.	12	received him, who believed in his n,
 	20.	31	believing you may have life in his n.
Ac	4.	12	for there is no other n under heaven
Php	2.	9	gave him the n that is above every n
Rev	13.	17	n of the beast or the number of its n.
 	19.	13	his n is called The Word of God.
NAMES → NAME

Mt	10.	2	are the n of the twelve apostles:
Rev	21.	14	the twelve n of the twelve apostles
NARROW

Lk	13.	24	“Strive to enter through the n door;
NATION → NATIONS

Ge	12.	2	I will make of you a great n, and
Ex	32.	10	and of you I will make a great n.”
Isa	66.	8	a n be delivered in one moment?
1Pe	2.	9	a holy n, God’s own people,
NATIONS → NATION

Ge	18.	18	the n of the earth shall be blessed in
Am	9.	12	and all the n who are called
Mt	28.	19	and make disciples of all n,
Mk	11.	17	a house of prayer for all the n’?
Ro	4.	18	become “the father of many n,”
Rev	22.	2	the tree are for the healing of the n.
NAZARETH

Mt	2.	23	made his home in a town called N,
Jn	1.	46	Can anything good come out of N?
 	19.	19	“Jesus of N, the King of the Jews.”
NAZIRITE

Nu	6.	2	make a special vow, the vow of a n,
Jdg	13.	5	boy shall be a n to God from birth.
NEAR

Dt	30.	14	No, the word is very n to you;
Isa	55.	6	call upon him while he is n;
Lk	10.	9	‘The kingdom of God has come n
Jas	4.	8	Draw n to God, and he will draw n to
NEED → NEEDY

Mt	6.	8	for your Father knows what you n
Heb	4.	16	and find grace to help in time of n.
NEEDLE

Lk	18.	25	a camel to go through the eye of a n
NEEDY → NEED

1Sa	2.	8	he lifts the n from the ash heap,
Ps	113.	7	and lifts the n from the ash heap,
NEIGHBOR

Lev	19.	18	shall love your n as yourself:
Dt	5.	20	bear false witness against your n.
Mt	19.	19	You shall love your n as yourself.”
NEVER

La	3.	22	steadfast love of the LORD n ceases,
1Co	13.	8	Love n ends. But as for prophecies,
Heb	13.	5	he has said, “I will n leave you or
NEW

Ecc	1.	9	there is nothing n under the sun.
Isa	65.	17	create n heavens and a n earth;
Jer	31.	31	I will make a n covenant with the
La	3.	23	they are n every morning;
Eze	36.	26	A n heart I will give you,
Mt	9.	17	is n wine put into old wineskins;
Lk	22.	20	is the n covenant in my blood.
Jn	13.	34	I give you a n commandment,
2Co	3.	6	to be ministers of a n covenant,
Heb	8.	8	when I will establish a n covenant
2Pe	3.	13	we wait for n heavens and a n earth,
Rev	21.	1	I saw a n heaven and a n earth;
 	21.	5	“See, I am making all things n.”
NEWS

Isa	52.	7	who brings good n, who announces
Mt	11.	5	the poor have good n brought to
Mk	1.	15	repent, and believe in the good n.”
NIGHT → NIGHTS

Ge	1.	5	and the darkness he called N.
1Th	5.	2	Lord will come like a thief in the n.
Rev	22.	5	And there will be no more n;
NIGHTS → NIGHT

Ge	7.	12	on the earth forty days and forty n.
Jnh	1.	17	of the fish three days and three n.
Mt	4.	2	He fasted forty days and forty n,
 	12.	40	for three days and three n the Son
NOISE

Ps	66.	1	Make a joyful n to God, all the earth
2Pe	3.	10	will pass away with a loud n,
NOTHING

Ecc	1.	9	there is n new under the sun.
Jer	32.	17	N is too hard for you.
Mt	17.	20	and n will be impossible for you.”
Jn	15.	5	apart from me you can do n.
NUMBER

Rev	13.	18	Its n is six hundred sixty-six.
O

OATH

Dt	7.	8	and kept the o that he swore to your
Heb	7.	20	This was confirmed with an o;
OBEDIENCE → OBEY

Ro	5.	19	so by the one man’s o the many will
Heb	5.	8	learned o through what he suffered;
OBEDIENT → OBEY

Php	2.	8	and became o to the point of death
OBEY → OBEDIENCE, OBEDIENT

Ex	19.	5	if you o my voice and keep my
Dt	12.	28	Be careful to o all these words that
Mt	28.	20	o everything that I have commanded
Ac	5.	29	“We must o God rather than any
Eph	6.	1	Children, o your parents in the Lord,
1Jn	5.	3	love of God is this, that we o his
OFFENSE

Mk	6.	3	And they took o at him.
Gal	5.	11	o of the cross has been removed.
OFFERING → OFFERINGS

Ge	4.	4	LORD had regard for Abel and his o,
Ps	40.	6	Sacrifice and o you do not desire,
Da	11.	31	shall abolish the regular burnt o
Eph	5.	2	a fragrant o and sacrifice to God.
Heb	10.	14	For by a single o he has perfected
OFFERINGS → OFFERING

Hos	6.	6	of God rather than burnt o.
Mk	12.	33	important than all whole burnt o
OIL

Ex	25.	6	o for the lamps, spices for the anointing o
Ps	23.	5	you anoint my head with o;
Jas	5.	14	anointing them with o in the name
OLD

Mk	2.	22	puts new wine into o wineskins;
Eph	4.	22	your o self, corrupt and deluded by
OLIVE → OLIVES

Zec	4.	3	And by it there are two o trees,
Ro	11.	17	and you, a wild o shoot,
Rev	11.	4	two o trees and the two lampstands
OLIVES → OLIVE

Zec	14.	4	Mount of O shall be split in two
Mt	24.	3	he was sitting on the Mount of O,
OMEGA

Rev	1.	8	“I am the Alpha and the O,”
ONCE → ONE

Ro	6.	10	he died, he died to sin, o for all;
Heb	7.	27	this he did o for all when he offered
 	9.	27	it is appointed for mortals to die o,
ONE → FIRST, ONCE

Ge	2.	24	and they become o flesh.
Zec	14.	9	the LORD will be o and his name o.
Mk	12.	29	the Lord our God, the Lord is o;
Jn	10.	30	The Father and I are o.”
1Co	12.	13	For in the o Spirit we were all baptized
Eph	4.	5	o Lord, o faith, o baptism,
ONLY

Jn	1.	14	the glory as of a father’s o son,
 	3.	16	that he gave his o Son,
1Ti	1.	17	the o God, be honor and glory
1Jn	4.	9	God sent his o Son into the world so
OPPRESSED

Ps	146.	7	who executes justice for the o;
Isa	53.	7	He was o, and he was afflicted,
ORACLES

Ro	3.	2	entrusted with the o of God.
ORDAIN

Ex	29.	9	shall then o Aaron and his sons.
1Ti	5.	22	Do not o anyone hastily,
ORPHAN → ORPHANED, ORPHANS

Ex	22.	22	You shall not abuse any widow or o.
Hos	14.	3	In you the o finds mercy.”
ORPHANED → ORPHAN

Jn	14.	18	will not leave you o; I am coming
ORPHANS → ORPHAN

Jas	1.	27	to care for o and widows in their
OUTSTRETCHED

Ex	6.	6	I will redeem you with an o arm
Ps	136.	12	an o arm, for his steadfast love
Jer	27.	5	by my great power and my o arm
OVERCOME

Jn	1.	5	and the darkness did not o it.
Ro	12.	21	Do not be o by evil, but o evil with
1Jn	2.	14	and you have o the evil one.
OVERSHADOW → OVERSHADOWED

Lk	1.	35	power of the Most High will o you;
OVERSHADOWED → OVERSHADOW

Lk	9.	34	a cloud came and o them;
OWE

Mt	18.	28	he said, ‘Pay what you o.’
Ro	13.	8	O no one anything, except to love
P

PAIN

Ge	3.	16	in p you shall bring forth children,
Rev	21.	4	and crying and p will be no more,
PALM

Jn	12.	13	So they took branches of p trees
Rev	7.	9	robed in white, with p branches in
PARABLE → PARABLES

Ps	78.	2	I will open my mouth in a p;
PARABLES → PARABLE; See also JESUS: PARABLES

Mt	13.	35	I will open my mouth to speak in p;
PARADISE

Lk	23.	43	today you will be with me in P.”
2Co	12.	4	was caught up into P and heard
Rev	2.	7	tree of life that is in the p of God.
PARALYTIC → PARALYZED

Mt	9.	2	saw their faith, he said to the p,
PARALYZED → PARALYTIC

Jn	5.	3	many invalids—blind, lame, and p.
Ac	8.	7	who were p or lame were cured.
PARCHMENTS

2Ti	4.	13	also the books, and above all the p.
PARDON

Ex	34.	9	p our iniquity and our sin,
Isa	55.	7	our God, for he will abundantly p.
PARENTS

Eph	6.	1	Children, obey your p in the Lord,
PARTIALITY

Dt	16.	19	distort justice; you must not show p;
Pr	24.	23	P in judging is not good.
Ro	2.	11	For God shows no p.
Jas	3.	17	without a trace of p or hypocrisy.
PARTNERS

1Co	10.	20	not want you to be p with demons.
Heb	3.	1	holy p in a heavenly calling,
PASS → PASSED, PASSING

Ex	12.	13	when I see the blood, I will p over
 	33.	19	make all my goodness p before you,
Am	5.	17	I will p through the midst of you,
Mt	24.	35	Heaven and earth will p away, but my words will not p
2Pe	3.	10	then the heavens will p away
PASSED → PASS

Ex	12.	27	he p over the houses of the Israelites
2Co	5.	17	everything old has p away;
Rev	21.	4	for the first things have p away.”
PASSING → PASS

1Co	7.	31	present form of this world is p away
1Jn	2.	17	the world and its desire are p away,
PASSIONS

Gal	5.	24	have crucified the flesh with its p
2Ti	2.	22	Shun youthful p and pursue
PASSOVER

Ex	12.	11	It is the p of the LORD.
Dt	16.	1	the month of Abib by keeping the p
Mk	14.	12	when the P lamb is sacrificed,
PASTORS

Eph	4.	11	evangelists, some p and teachers,
PASTURES

Ps	23.	2	He makes me lie down in green p;
PATH → PATHS

Ps	119.	105	lamp to my feet and a light to my p.
PATHS → PATH

Mt	3.	3	of the Lord, make his p straight.’ ”
Heb	12.	13	and make straight p for your feet,
PATIENCE → PATIENT

Mic	2.	7	Is the LORD’s p exhausted?
Ro	2.	4	his kindness and forbearance and p?
Gal	5.	22	fruit of the Spirit is love, joy, peace, p,
2Pe	3.	15	regard the p of our Lord as salvation
PATIENT → PATIENCE

1Co	13.	4	Love is p; love is kind;
PEACE → PEACEMAKERS

Ps	122.	6	Pray for the p of Jerusalem:
Isa	57.	19	P, p, to the far and the near,
Jer	6.	14	saying, “P, p,” when there is no p.
Mic	5.	5	and he shall be the one of p.
Lk	2.	14	on earth p among those whom he
Jn	14.	27	P I leave with you; my p I give
1Co	14.	33	is a God not of disorder but of p.
Gal	5.	22	the fruit of the Spirit is love, joy, p,
Php	4.	7	the p of God, which surpasses all
PEACEMAKERS → PEACE

Mt	5.	9	“Blessed are the p, for they will be
PEARLS

Mt	7.	6	do not throw your p before swine,
PENTECOST

Ac	2.	1	When the day of P had come,
PEOPLE

Ex	5.	1	the God of Israel, ‘Let my p go,
Dt	4.	20	a p of his very own possession,
Ru	1.	16	your p shall be my p,
Ps	29.	11	the LORD bless his p with peace!
Isa	40.	1	Comfort, O comfort my p, says
Mt	1.	21	he will save his p from their sins.”
Heb	8.	10	their God, and they shall be my p.
1Pe	2.	9	a holy nation, God’s own p,
PERFECT → PERFECTER, PERFECTION

2Sa	22.	31	This God—his way is p;
Ps	19.	7	The law of the LORD is p, reviving
Mt	5.	48	Be p, therefore, as your heavenly Father is p.
Ro	12.	2	what is good and acceptable and p.
Heb	7.	19	(for the law made nothing p);
1Jn	4.	18	in love, but p love casts out fear;
PERFECTER → PERFECT

Heb	12.	2	Jesus the pioneer and p of our faith,
PERFECTION → PERFECT

Heb	6.	1	Therefore let us go on toward p,
1Jn	2.	5	the love of God has reached p.
PERISH → PERISHABLE

Est	4.	16	and if I p, I p.”
Ps	1.	6	but the way of the wicked will p.
Jn	3.	16	who believes in him may not p
2Pe	3.	9	with you, not wanting any to p,
PERISHABLE → PERISH

1Co	9.	25	they do it to receive a p wreath,
 	15.	42	What is sown is p, what is raised is
1Pe	1.	23	not of p but of imperishable seed,
PERSECUTE → PERSECUTED, PERSECUTION

Mt	5.	44	and pray for those who p you,
Ac	9.	4	“Saul, Saul, why do you p me?”
Ro	12.	14	Bless those who p you; bless
PERSECUTED → PERSECUTE

2Co	4.	9	p, but not forsaken; struck down,
2Ti	3.	12	godly life in Christ Jesus will be p.
PERSECUTION → PERSECUTE

Mt	13.	21	or p arises on account of the word,
Ro	8.	35	Will hardship, or distress, or p, or
Heb	10.	33	publicly exposed to abuse and p,
PERSEVERANCE → PERSEVERE

Heb	12.	1	let us run with p the race that is set
PERSEVERE → PERSEVERANCE

Da	12.	12	Happy are those who p
Ro	12.	12	be patient in suffering, p in prayer.
PHARAOH → PHARAOH’S

Ex	14.	17	I will gain glory for myself over P
PHARAOH’S → PHARAOH

Ex	7.	3	But I will harden P heart,
Heb	11.	24	refused to be called a son of P
PHARISEE → PHARISEES

Lk	11.	37	a P invited him to dine with him;
Jn	3.	1	a P named Nicodemus,
Ac	5.	34	a P in the council named Gamaliel,
Php	3.	5	as to the law, a P;
PHARISEES → PHARISEE

Mt	5.	20	that of the scribes and P,
 	16.	6	beware of the yeast of the P and
 	23.	13	“But woe to you, scribes and P,
PHILISTINE → PHILISTINES

1Sa	17.	37	save me from the hand of this P.”
PHILISTINES → PHILISTINE

1Sa	5.	1	the P captured the ark of God,
Am	1.	8	the remnant of the P shall perish,
PIERCED

Zec	12.	10	look on the one whom they have p,
Jn	19.	37	look on the one whom they have p.”
Rev	1.	7	even those who p him;
PIG

Dt	14.	8	the p, because it divides the hoof
PILLAR

Ge	19.	26	and she became a p of salt.
Ex	13.	21	and in a p of fire by night,
PIONEER

Heb	2.	10	make the p of their salvation perfect
 	12.	2	Jesus the p and perfecter of our faith
PIT

Rev	20.	3	into the p, and locked and sealed it
PLACE

Jn	14.	3	And if I go and prepare a p for you,
PLAGUE → PLAGUES

Zec	14.	12	the p with which the LORD will
Rev	11.	6	strike the earth with every kind of p,
PLAGUES → PLAGUE

Hos	13.	14	O Death, where are your p?
Rev	15.	1	seven angels with seven p, which
PLANT

Ge	1.	29	I have given you every p yielding
Ecc	3.	2	time to p, and a time to pluck up
PLEASE → PLEASED, PLEASES, PLEASING

Ro	8.	8	who are in the flesh cannot p God.
 	15.	3	For Christ did not p himself;
Heb	11.	6	without faith it is impossible to p God,
PLEASED → PLEASE

Mic	6.	7	Will the LORD be p with thousands
Mt	3.	17	Beloved, with whom I am well p.”
Col	1.	19	the fullness of God was p to dwell,
PLEASES → PLEASE

1Jn	3.	22	commandments and do what p him.
PLEASING → PLEASE

Ps	104.	34	May my meditation be p to him,
Eph	5.	10	to find out what is p to the Lord.
Php	4.	18	a sacrifice acceptable and p to God.
PLOT

Ps	2.	1	and the peoples p in vain?
Na	1.	9	Why do you p against the LORD?
PLOWSHARES

Isa	2.	4	they shall beat their swords into p,
Joel	3.	10	Beat your p into swords, and your
POLLUTED → POLLUTES

Ac	15.	20	from things p by idols and from
Rev	21.	8	the cowardly, the faithless, the p,
POLLUTES → POLLUTED

Nu	35.	33	blood p the land, and no expiation
POOR → POVERTY

Ex	23.	6	not pervert the justice due to your p
1Sa	2.	8	He raises up the p from the dust;
Ps	113.	7	He raises the p from the dust,
Mt	5.	3	“Blessed are the p in spirit,
Mk	10.	21	own, and give the money to the p,
 	12.	42	p widow came and put in two small
2Co	6.	10	as p, yet making many rich;
 	8.	9	yet for your sakes he became p,
Jas	2.	5	Has not God chosen the p in the
PORTION

Dt	32.	9	the LORD’s own p was his people,
La	3.	24	“The LORD is my p,” says my soul,
POSSESSED → POSSESSION

Mt	8.	16	many who were p with demons;
POSSESSION → POSSESSED, POSSESSIONS

Ex	19.	5	treasured p out of all the peoples.
Ps	2.	8	and the ends of the earth your p.
POSSESSIONS → POSSESSION

Lk	12.	15	not consist in the abundance of p.”
1Co	13.	3	If I give away all my p,
POSSIBLE

Mt	19.	26	but for God all things are p.”
 	26.	39	if it is p, let this cup pass from me;
POTTER

Isa	64.	8	we are the clay, and you are our p;
Ro	9.	21	Has the p no right over the clay,
POUR → POURED

Isa	44.	3	I will p my spirit upon your
Eze	39.	29	I p out my spirit upon the house of
Joel	2.	28	I will p out my spirit on all flesh;
Ac	2.	17	I will p out my Spirit upon all flesh,
POURED → POUR

Mt	26.	28	is p out for many for the forgiveness
Ac	2.	33	he has p out this that you both see
Tit	3.	6	This Spirit he p out on us richly
POVERTY → POOR

Mk	12.	44	out of her p has put in everything
2Co	8.	9	by his p you might become rich.
POWER → POWERFUL, POWERS

1Ch	29.	11	O LORD, are the greatness, the p,
Isa	40.	29	He gives p to the faint,
Zec	4.	6	by might, nor by p, but by my spirit,
Mt	22.	29	the scriptures nor the p of God.
Mk	13.	26	coming in clouds’ with great p and
1Co	1.	17	might not be emptied of its p.
Eph	1.	19	the immeasurable greatness of his p
Php	3.	10	Christ and the p of his resurrection
2Pe	1.	3	divine p has given us everything
Rev	19.	1	and glory and p to our God,
 	20.	6	these the second death has no p,
POWERFUL → POWER

Mk	1.	7	one who is more p than I is coming
POWERS → POWER

Ro	8.	38	present, nor things to come, nor p,
Eph	6.	12	against the cosmic p of this present
PRACTICE → PRACTICES

Mt	23.	3	for they do not p what they teach.
PRACTICES → PRACTICE

Ex	23.	24	or worship them, or follow their p,
Col	3.	9	stripped off the old self with its p
PRAISE

Ex	15.	2	this is my God, and I will p him,
Dt	10.	21	He is your p; he is your God,
Ps	150.	6	that breathes p the LORD!
Pr	27.	2	Let another p you, and not your own
 	31.	31	let her works p her in the city gates.
Mt	21.	16	nursing babies you have prepared p
Rev	19.	5	“P our God, all you his servants,
PRAY → PRAYED, PRAYER, PRAYERS

2Ch	7.	14	humble themselves, p, seek my face
Ps	122.	6	P for the peace of Jerusalem:
Mt	5.	44	and p for those who persecute you,
 	6.	5	you p, do not be like the hypocrites;
Lk	11.	1	teach us to p, as John taught his
Ro	8.	26	do not know how to p as we ought,
1Th	5.	17	p without ceasing,
PRAYED → PRAY

Mk	1.	35	to a deserted place, and there he p.
 	14.	35	threw himself on the ground and p
PRAYER → PRAY

Pr	15.	29	but he hears the p of the righteous.
Isa	56.	7	house shall be called a house of p
Mt	21.	13	house shall be called a house of p’;
Mk	11.	24	I tell you, whatever you ask for in p,
Ro	12.	12	patient in suffering, persevere in p.
Jas	5.	16	The p of the righteous is powerful
PRAYERS → PRAY

Heb	5.	7	Jesus offered up p and supplications
Rev	5.	8	which are the p of the saints.
PREACH → PREACHING

Tit	1.	9	able both to p with sound doctrine
PREACHING → PREACH

1Ti	5.	17	those who labor in p and teaching;
PRECEPTS → PRECEPT

Ps	19.	8	the p of the LORD are right,
Mt	15.	9	teaching human p as doctrines.’ ”
PRECIOUS

Ps	72.	14	and p is their blood in his sight.
Pr	3.	15	She is more p than jewels,
Isa	28.	16	a tested stone, a p cornerstone,
1Pe	1.	19	but with the p blood of Christ,
 	2.	6	a cornerstone chosen and p;
2Pe	1.	1	received a faith as p as ours
PREDESTINED

Ro	8.	30	those whom he p he also called;
PREDICTION → PREDICTIONS

Isa	44.	26	and fulfills the p of his messengers;
PREDICTIONS → PREDICT

Jude	1.	17	the p of the apostles of our Lord
PREPARE

Ps	23.	5	You p a table before me in the
Mt	3.	3	‘P the way of the Lord, make his
Jn	14.	2	I have told you that I go to p a place
PRESENCE → PRESENT

Ex	25.	30	the bread of the P on the table
Ps	51.	11	Do not cast me away from your p,
 	139.	7	Or where can I flee from your p?
Jn	17.	5	with the glory that I had in your p
PRESENT → PRESENCE

Ro	6.	13	but p yourselves to God as
1Co	3.	22	or death or the p or the future—
Eph	5.	27	p the church to himself in splendor,
2Ti	2.	15	p yourself to God as one approved
PRICE

Mt	27.	9	the one on whom a p had been set,
1Co	6.	20	For you were bought with a p;
PRIDE → PROUD

Ps	20.	7	our p is in the name of the LORD
Pr	16.	18	P goes before destruction,
Mk	7.	22	licentiousness, envy, slander, p,
1Jn	2.	16	the desire of the eyes, the p in riches
PRIEST → PRIESTHOOD, PRIESTS

Ge	14.	18	he was p of God Most High.
Ps	110.	4	“You are a p forever according to
Mk	14.	63	Then the high p tore his clothes and
Heb	3.	1	apostle and high p of our confession
 	7.	3	the Son of God, he remains a p
PRIESTHOOD → PRIEST

Ex	29.	9	the p shall be theirs by a perpetual
Heb	7.	24	but he holds his p permanently,
1Pe	2.	5	a holy p, to offer spiritual sacrifices
PRIESTS → PRIEST

Ex	28.	1	the Israelites, to serve me as p—
Mk	15.	3	the chief p accused him of many
Heb	7.	27	Unlike the other high p, he has no
Rev	20.	6	they will be p of God and of Christ,
PRINCE → PRINCES

Isa	9.	6	Everlasting Father, P of Peace.
Eze	37.	25	David shall be their p forever.
PRINCES → PRINCE

1Sa	2.	8	to make them sit with p and inherit
Da	8.	25	even rise up against the Prince of p.
PRISONER → PRISONERS

Mk	15.	6	at the festival he used to release a p
Eph	3.	1	that I Paul am a p for Christ Jesus
PRISONERS → PRISONER

Ps	146.	7	The LORD sets the p free;
Isa	61.	1	to the captives, and release to the p;
PRIZE

1Co	9.	24	but only one receives the p?
Php	3.	14	the p of the heavenly call of God in
PROMISE → PROMISED, PROMISES

Ps	105.	42	For he remembered his holy p,
Eph	2.	12	and strangers to the covenants of p,
2Pe	3.	9	The Lord is not slow about his p,
PROMISED → PROMISE

Dt	1.	11	and bless you, as he has p you!
Ac	13.	23	to Israel a Savior, Jesus, as he p;
Eph	1.	13	with the seal of the p Holy Spirit;
Heb	10.	23	for he who has p is faithful.
PROMISES → PROMISE

Jos	21.	45	the good p that the LORD had made
2Co	1.	20	every one of God’s p is a “Yes.”
PROOFS → PROVE

Ac	1.	3	to them by many convincing p,
PROPHECIES → PROPHESY

1Co	13.	8	as for p, they will come to an end;
PROPHECY → PROPHESY

Ac	21.	9	daughters who had the gift of p.
1Co	12.	10	to another p, to another
2Pe	1.	20	that no p of scripture is a matter
PROPHESY → PROPHECIES, PROPHECY, PROPHET, PROPHETS

Joel	2.	28	sons and your daughters shall p,
Mt	7.	22	Lord, did we not p in your name,
1Co	13.	9	only in part, and we p only in part;
Rev	11.	3	my two witnesses authority to p
PROPHET → PROPHESY

Dt	18.	18	a p like you from among their own
Mal	4.	5	the p Elijah before the great and
Lk	4.	24	no p is accepted in the prophet’s
Rev	16.	13	and from the mouth of the false p.
PROPHETS → PROPHESY

Nu	11.	29	that all the LORD’s people were p,
Mt	5.	17	come to abolish the law or the p;
 	22.	40	hang all the law and the p.”
1Co	12.	28	the church first apostles, second p,
Eph	2.	20	the foundation of the apostles and p,
 	4.	11	some p, some evangelists,
Rev	11.	10	these two p had been a torment to
 	18.	20	you saints and apostles and p!
PROSPER → PROSPERITY

Ps	1.	3	In all that they do, they p.
Isa	53.	10	the will of the LORD shall p.
PROSPERITY → PROSPER

Dt	30.	15	have set before you today life and p,
PROSTITUTE → PROSTITUTES

Jos	2.	1	a p whose name was Rahab,
1Co	6.	15	and make them members of a p?
Heb	11.	31	By faith Rahab the p did not perish
PROSTITUTES → PROSTITUTE

Mt	21.	31	the p are going into the kingdom of
PROUD → PRIDE

Ps	94.	2	give to the p what they deserve!
Pr	21.	4	Haughty eyes and a p heart—
Jas	4.	6	God opposes the p, but gives grace
PROVERBS

Pr	1.	1	The p of Solomon son of David,
Ecc	12.	9	and studying and arranging many p.
PROVOKE → PROVOKED

Jer	25.	6	not p me to anger with the work of
Heb	10.	24	how to p one another to love
PROVOKED → PROVOKE

Ps	78.	41	and p the Holy One of Israel.
PRUNES

Jn	15.	2	he p to make it bear more fruit.
PSALMS

Lk	24.	44	and the p must be fulfilled.”
Eph	5.	19	you sing p and hymns and spiritual
PUFFS

1Co	8.	1	Knowledge p up, but love builds up.
PUNISH → PUNISHING, PUNISHMENT

Ex	32.	34	I will p them for their sin.”
1Pe	2.	14	by him to p those who do wrong
PUNISHING → PUNISH

Dt	5.	9	p children for the iniquity of parents
Joel	2.	13	in steadfast love, and relents from p.
PUNISHMENT → PUNISH

Isa	53.	5	was the p that made us whole,
Mt	25.	46	these will go away into eternal p,
1Jn	4.	18	for fear has to do with p,
PURE → PURIFICATION, PURIFIED

2Sa	22.	27	with the p you show yourself p,
Ps	19.	9	the fear of the LORD is p, enduring
Hab	1.	13	Your eyes are too p to behold evil,
Mt	5.	8	“Blessed are the p in heart, for they
Php	4.	8	whatever is p, whatever is pleasing,
Tit	1.	15	To the p all things are p,
1Jn	3.	3	purify themselves, just as he is p.
PURIFICATION → PURE

Heb	1.	3	When he had made p for sins,
PURIFIED → PURE

1Pe	1.	22	p your souls by your obedience to
PURPLE

Ex	25.	4	p, and crimson yarns and fine linen,
Mk	15.	17	And they clothed him in a p cloak;
PURPOSE

Isa	46.	10	saying, “My p shall stand,
Ro	8.	28	who are called according to his p.
2Ti	1.	9	works but according to his own p
Q

QUAILS

Ex	16.	13	In the evening q came up
Nu	11.	31	and it brought q from the sea and
QUARRELED

Ex	17.	7	the Israelites q and tested the LORD,
Nu	20.	3	The people q with Moses and said,
QUEEN

1Ki	10.	1	the q of Sheba heard of the fame of
Rev	18.	7	in her heart she says, ‘I rule as a q;
QUIET

1Ti	2.	2	q and peaceable life in all godliness
1Pe	3.	4	beauty of a gentle and q spirit,
R

RABBI

Jn	1.	38	“R” (which translated means Teacher),
RACE

Ecc	9.	11	the sun the r is not to the swift,
1Co	9.	24	that in a r the runners all compete,
Heb	12.	1	let us run with perseverance the r
1Pe	2.	9	But you are a chosen r, a royal
RAIN → RAINBOW

Ge	7.	4	For in seven days I will send r on
Isa	45.	8	let the skies r down righteousness;
Mt	5.	45	sends r on the righteous and on the
Rev	11.	6	so that no r may fall during the days
RAINBOW → BOW

Rev	4.	3	the throne is a r that looks like an
RAISE → RISE

Jn	2.	19	and in three days I will r it up.”
2Co	4.	14	who raised the Lord Jesus will r us
RAISED → RISE

Mt	17.	23	and on the third day he will be r.”
Ac	2.	24	God r him up, having freed him
Ro	4.	25	and was r for our justification.
1Co	15.	4	r on the third day in accordance
RANSOM

Ps	49.	8	For the r of life is costly, and can
Mt	20.	28	and to give his life a r for many.”
1Ti	2.	6	who gave himself a r for all
REAP

Gal	6.	7	for you r whatever you sow.
Rev	14.	15	for the hour to r has come,
REBUILD → BUILD

Ezr	1.	3	and r the house of the LORD,
Ne	2.	17	let us r the wall of Jerusalem,
Da	9.	25	went out to restore and r Jerusalem
Ac	15.	16	and I will r the dwelling of David,
REBUKE

Pr	27.	5	Better is open r than hidden love.
Zec	3.	2	said to Satan, “The LORD r you,
Mk	8.	32	Peter took him aside and began to r
2Ti	4.	2	convince, r, and encourage,
RECEIVE

Jn	16.	24	Ask and you will r, so that your joy
Ac	2.	38	you will r the gift of the Holy Spirit.
 	20.	35	‘It is more blessed to give than to r.’
Rev	4.	11	to r glory and honor and power,
RECKONED

Ge	15.	6	LORD r it to him as righteousness.
Ro	4.	3	it was r to him as righteousness.”
RECONCILIATION

Ro	5.	11	whom we have now received r.
2Co	5.	18	and has given us the ministry of r;
REDEEM → REDEEMER, REDEMPTION

Ex	6.	6	I will r you with an outstretched
Gal	4.	5	to r those who were under the law,
REDEEMER → REDEEM

Job	19.	25	For I know that my R lives,
Ps	19.	14	O LORD, my rock and my r.
REDEMPTION → REDEEM

Lk	21.	28	because your r is drawing near.”
Eph	1.	7	In him we have r through his blood,
Heb	9.	12	own blood, thus obtaining eternal r.
REFINE

Jer	9.	7	I will now r and test them,
Zec	13.	9	r them as one refines silver,
REFLECTED → REFLECTION

2Co	3.	18	though r in a mirror,
REFLECTION → REFLECTED

1Co	11.	7	since he is the image and r of God;
Heb	1.	3	He is the r of God’s glory
REFUGE

Nu	35.	11	select cities to be cities of r for you,
Ps	2.	12	Happy are all who take r in him.
REGULATIONS

Col	2.	20	Why do you submit to r,
Heb	9.	10	r for the body imposed until the
REIGN

Ex	15.	18	The LORD will r forever and ever.”
Ps	146.	10	The LORD will r forever,
1Co	15.	25	r until he has put all his enemies
2Ti	2.	12	we will also r with him;
Rev	11.	15	and he will r forever and ever.”
 	22.	5	and they will r forever and ever.
REJECTED

Ps	118.	22	The stone that the builders r
Isa	53.	3	He was despised and r by others;
Mt	21.	42	‘The stone that the builders r
REJOICE

Ps	118.	24	let us r and be glad in it.
Zep	3.	17	he will r over you with gladness,
Php	4.	4	R in the Lord always; again I will say, R.
RELENT → RELENTED

Eze	24.	14	I will not spare, I will not r.
Joel	2.	14	whether he will not turn and r,
Jnh	3.	9	God may r and change his mind;
RELENTED → RELENT

1Ch	21.	15	LORD took note and r concerning
Jer	4.	28	I have not r nor will I turn back.
REMEMBER → REMEMBRANCE

Ge	9.	15	I will r my covenant that is between
Ex	20.	8	R the sabbath day, and keep it holy.
Dt	8.	18	But r the LORD your God,
2Ti	2.	8	R Jesus Christ, raised from the dead
Heb	8.	12	and I will r their sins no more.”
REMEMBRANCE → REMEMBER

Lk	22.	19	Do this in r of me.”
REMNANT

Isa	10.	21	A r will return, the r of Jacob,
Jer	50.	20	will pardon the r that I have spared.
Ro	9.	27	only a r of them will be saved;
RENEW → RENEWAL, RENEWED, RENEWING

Isa	40.	31	the LORD shall r their strength,
La	5.	21	r our days as of old—
RENEWAL → RENEW

Mt	19.	28	I tell you, at the r of all things,
RENEWED → RENEW

2Co	4.	16	inner nature is being r day by day.
Eph	4.	23	to be r in the spirit of your minds,
RENEWING → RENEW

Ro	12.	2	transformed by the r of your minds,
REPENT → REPENTANCE

Mt	3.	2	“R, for the kingdom of heaven has
Ac	2.	38	“R, and be baptized every one of
REPENTANCE → REPENT

Mk	1.	4	a baptism of r for the forgiveness
Lk	3.	8	Bear fruits worthy of r.
Ro	2.	4	kindness is meant to lead you to r?
2Co	7.	10	r that leads to salvation and brings
2Pe	3.	9	any to perish, but all to come to r.
REPROVE

Pr	19.	25	r the intelligent, and they will gain
Tit	2.	15	exhort and r with all authority.
Rev	3.	19	r and discipline those whom I love.
REQUIRE

Dt	10.	12	does the LORD your God r of you?
Mic	6.	8	the LORD r of you but to do justice,
RESCUE → RESCUED

Mt	6.	13	but r us from the evil one.
2Pe	2.	9	the Lord knows how to r the godly
RESCUED → RESCUE

Col	1.	13	has r us from the power of darkness
RESIST

Mt	5.	39	I say to you, Do not r an evildoer.
Ro	9.	19	For who can r his will?”
Jas	4.	7	R the devil, and he will flee from
REST → RESTED

Ex	31.	15	seventh day is a sabbath of solemn r
Ps	95.	11	swore, “They shall not enter my r.”
Mt	11.	28	and I will give you r.
Heb	4.	10	those who enter God’s r also cease
RESTED → REST

Ge	2.	2	he r on the seventh day from all the
Ex	20.	11	all that is in them, but r the seventh
RESURRECTION

Mt	22.	30	For in the r they neither marry nor
Mk	12.	18	Sadducees, who say there is no r,
Jn	11.	25	said to her, “I am the r and the life.
1Co	15.	12	you say there is no r of the dead?
Php	3.	10	know Christ and the power of his r
Rev	20.	5	This is the first r.
RETURN

Ge	3.	19	you are dust, and to dust you shall r.
Mal	3.	7	R to me, and I will r to you,
REVEAL → REVEALED, REVELATION

Mt	11.	27	to whom the Son chooses to r him.
REVEALED → REVEAL

Isa	40.	5	the glory of the LORD shall be r,
Mt	16.	17	flesh and blood has not r this to you
Lk	17.	30	on the day that the Son of Man is r.
Ro	1.	17	in it the righteousness of God is r
REVELATION → REVEAL

1Co	14.	6	some r or knowledge or prophecy
Eph	3.	3	was made known to me by r,
REVERE → REVERENCE

Jos	24.	14	“Now therefore r the LORD,
Mal	4.	2	But for you who r my name the sun
REVERENCE → REVERE

Eph	5.	21	subject to one another out of r for
REVILE → REVILED

Ex	22.	28	You shall not r God, or curse
Mt	5.	11	people r you and persecute you
REVILED → REVILE

1Co	4.	12	When r, we bless;
1Pe	4.	14	If you are r for the name of Christ,
REWARD

Ps	19.	11	in keeping them there is great r.
Isa	40.	10	r is with him, and his recompense
Mt	6.	5	I tell you, they have received their r.
Lk	6.	23	for surely your r is great in heaven;
Rev	22.	12	I am coming soon; my r is with me,
RIB

Ge	2.	22	r that the LORD God had taken from
RICH → RICHES

Mt	19.	23	hard for a r person to enter the
2Co	8.	9	by his poverty you might become r.
Eph	2.	4	But God, who is r in mercy,
RICHES → RICH

Lk	8.	14	they are choked by the cares and r
Ro	11.	33	O the depth of the r and wisdom
1Jn	2.	16	the desire of the eyes, the pride in r
RIGHT → BIRTHRIGHT

Ex	15.	6	Your r hand, O LORD, glorious in
Dt	6.	18	Do what is r and good in the sight
Ps	110.	1	says to my lord, “Sit at my r hand
Pr	14.	12	a way that seems r to a person,
Ac	2.	34	said to my Lord, “Sit at my r hand,
Heb	1.	13	“Sit at my r hand until I make your
RIGHTEOUS → RIGHTEOUSNESS

Ps	11.	7	For the LORD is r; he loves r deeds;
Jer	23.	5	I will raise up for David a r Branch,
Eze	3.	20	if the r turn from their righteousness
Hab	2.	4	but the r live by their faith.
Mt	5.	45	rain on the r and on the unrighteous.
Mk	2.	17	come to call not the r but sinners.”
Ro	1.	17	one who is r will live by faith.”
Heb	10.	38	but my r one will live by faith.
1Jn	2.	1	with the Father, Jesus Christ the r;
Rev	19.	8	the fine linen is the r deeds of the
RIGHTEOUSNESS → RIGHTEOUS

Ge	15.	6	the LORD reckoned it to him as r.
Isa	11.	5	R shall be the belt around his waist,
Jer	23.	6	be called: “The LORD is our r.”
Da	9.	24	to bring in everlasting r,
Hos	10.	12	Sow for yourselves r; reap steadfast
Mt	5.	6	those who hunger and thirst for r,
Jn	16.	8	about sin and r and judgment:
Ro	5.	18	act of r leads to justification
Gal	3.	6	and it was reckoned to him as r,”
Eph	6.	14	and put on the breastplate of r.
2Pe	3.	13	heavens and a new earth, where r
RIPE

Jn	4.	35	how the fields are r for harvesting.
Rev	14.	15	the harvest of the earth is fully r.”
RISE → ARISE, RAISE, RAISED, ROSE

Da	12.	13	shall r for your reward at the end of
Mal	4.	2	the sun of righteousness shall r,
Mt	27.	63	‘After three days I will r again.’
1Th	4.	16	and the dead in Christ will r first.
ROAD

Mt	7.	13	and the r is easy that leads to
ROBBERS

Jer	7.	11	become a den of r in your sight?
Mt	21.	13	but you are making it a den of r.”
ROBE

Ex	28.	4	a breastpiece, an ephod, a r,
Jn	19.	5	crown of thorns and the purple r.
Rev	6.	11	They were each given a white r and
 	19.	13	He is clothed in a r dipped in blood,
ROCK

Ex	17.	6	Strike the r, and water will come
Nu	20.	8	you shall bring water out of the r
1Sa	2.	2	there is no R like our God.
Mt	16.	18	and on this r I will build my church,
Mk	15.	46	that had been hewn out of the r.
1Pe	2.	8	and a r that makes them fall.”
ROD

Ps	2.	9	shall break them with a r of iron,
 	23.	4	your r and your staff—they comfort
Pr	13.	24	who spare the r hate their children,
Rev	2.	27	to rule them with an iron r,
ROLL

Mk	16.	3	“Who will r away the stone for us
ROOT

Isa	11.	10	On that day the r of Jesse
 	53.	2	and like a r out of dry ground;
Ro	15.	12	“The r of Jesse shall come,
1Ti	6.	10	For the love of money is a r of all
Rev	5.	5	the tribe of Judah, the R of David,
ROSE → RISE

SS	2.	1	I am a r of Sharon, a lily
1Th	4.	14	believe that Jesus died and r again,
RULE

Eph	1.	21	far above all r and authority and
Col	3.	15	the peace of Christ r in your hearts,
RUMORS

Mt	24.	6	you will hear of wars and r of wars;
RUN

Isa	40.	31	they shall r and not be weary,
Heb	12.	1	let us r with perseverance the race
RUST

Mt	6.	19	where moth and r consume
S

SABBATH

Ex	20.	8	Remember the s day, and keep it holy.
Mk	2.	28	Son of Man is lord even of the s.”
SACRIFICE → SACRIFICED

Ex	12.	27	‘It is the passover s to the LORD,
1Sa	15.	22	Surely, to obey is better than s,
Ps	40.	6	S and offering you do not desire,
Da	9.	27	he shall make s and offering cease;
Hos	6.	6	For I desire steadfast love and not s,
Mt	9.	13	this means, ‘I desire mercy, not s.’
Ro	3.	25	put forward as a s of atonement
Heb	13.	15	let us continually offer a s of praise
1Jn	2.	2	and he is the atoning s for our sins,
SACRIFICED → SACRIFICE

1Co	5.	7	our paschal lamb, Christ, has been s.
 	8.	1	Now concerning food s to idols:
SADDUCEES

Mt	16.	6	the yeast of the Pharisees and S.”
Mk	12.	18	S, who say there is no resurrection,
SAFE → SAFETY

Ps	37.	28	righteous shall be kept s forever,
Pr	18.	10	the righteous run into it and are s.
SAFETY → SAFE

Dt	12.	10	around so that you live in s,
Eze	34.	28	they shall live in s,
SAINTS

Ps	31.	23	Love the LORD, all you his s.
Ro	8.	27	the Spirit intercedes for the s
1Co	6.	2	that the s will judge the world?
Eph	4.	12	equip the s for the work of ministry,
Rev	5.	9	by your blood you ransomed for God s
SALT

Ge	19.	26	back, and she became a pillar of s.
Mt	5.	13	“You are the s of the earth;
SALVATION → SAVE

Ex	15.	2	and he has become my s;
Ps	27.	1	The LORD is my light and my s;
Isa	52.	7	brings good news, who announces s,
Lk	3.	6	all flesh shall see the s of God.’ ”
Ac	4.	12	There is s in no one else,
Php	2.	12	work out your own s with fear
Heb	2.	3	escape if we neglect so great a s?
2Pe	3.	15	regard the patience of our Lord as s.
SAMARITAN

Lk	10.	33	But a S while traveling came near
Jn	4.	7	A S woman came to draw water,
SANCTIFICATION → SANCTIFY

Ro	6.	19	as slaves to righteousness for s.
1Th	4.	3	For this is the will of God, your s:
SANCTIFIED → SANCTIFY

Jn	17.	19	so that they also may be s in truth.
1Co	6.	11	But you were washed, you were s,
SANCTIFY → SANCTIFICATION, SANCTIFIED

Lev	11.	44	s yourselves therefore, and be holy,
Heb	13.	12	to s the people by his own blood.
SANCTUARY

Ex	25.	8	And have them make me a s,
1Ch	22.	19	build the s of the LORD God
Heb	9.	24	Christ did not enter a s made by
SAND

Mt	7.	26	foolish man who built his house on s.
SAT → SIT

Heb	10.	12	“he s down at the right hand of God,
Rev	3.	21	and s down with my Father
SATAN

1Ch	21.	1	S stood up against Israel,
Job	1.	6	and S also came among them.
Zec	3.	2	“The LORD rebuke you, O S!
Mt	4.	10	Jesus said to him, “Away with you, S!
 	16.	23	said to Peter, “Get behind me, S!
2Co	11.	14	S disguises himself as an angel of light.
Rev	12.	9	who is called the Devil and S,
 	20.	7	S will be released from his prison
SAVE → SALVATION, SAVED, SAVIOR

Isa	59.	1	LORD’s hand is not too short to s,
Jer	15.	20	for I am with you to s you
Mt	1.	21	he will s his people from their sins.”
 	16.	25	who want to s their life will lose it,
Lk	19.	10	came to seek out and to s the lost.”
SAVED → SAVE

Isa	45.	22	Turn to me and be s,
Joel	2.	32	on the name of the LORD shall be s;
Mt	10.	22	who endures to the end will be s.
Mk	15.	31	He s others; he cannot save himself.
Ro	10.	13	on the name of the Lord shall be s.”
Eph	2.	8	For by grace you have been s
SAVIOR → SAVE

Isa	49.	26	know that I am the LORD your S,
Hos	13.	4	and besides me there is no s.
1Ti	4.	10	who is the S of all people,
Tit	2.	13	of the glory of our great God and S,
2Pe	3.	18	knowledge of our Lord and S Jesus
SCARLET

Isa	1.	18	your sins are like s, they shall be
Mt	27.	28	stripped him and put a s robe on him
SCEPTER

Ge	49.	10	The s shall not depart from Judah,
Nu	24.	17	and a s shall rise out of Israel;
SCRIBES

Mt	7.	29	having authority, and not as their s.
 	23.	13	“But woe to you, s and Pharisees,
SCRIPTURE → SCRIPTURES

Lk	4.	21	“Today this s has been fulfilled in
Jn	10.	35	and the s cannot be annulled—
1Ti	4.	13	attention to the public reading of s,
2Ti	3.	16	All s is inspired by God and is useful
SCRIPTURES → SCRIPTURE

Mt	22.	29	know neither the s nor the power
Lk	24.	45	their minds to understand the s,
Jn	5.	39	“You search the s because you think
SEA

Ps	95.	5	The s is his, for he made it,
Mic	7.	19	all our sins into the depths of the s.
Rev	4.	6	there is something like a s of glass,
 	21.	1	and the s was no more.
SEAL

2Co	1.	22	by putting his s on us and giving us
Eph	1.	13	the s of the promised Holy Spirit;
Rev	7.	3	our God with a s on their foreheads.
SEASON → SEASONS

Ps	1.	3	which yield their fruit in its s,
Ecc	3.	1	For everything there is a s,
SEASONS → SEASON

1Th	5.	1	Now concerning the times and the s,
SEAT

Ex	25.	17	make a mercy s of pure gold;
Ro	14.	10	stand before the judgment s of God.
2Co	5.	10	must appear before the judgment s
SECRET

Dt	29.	29	The s things belong to the LORD
Ro	2.	16	will judge the s thoughts of all.
SEE → SEEN, SEES, SIGHT

Ex	33.	20	for no one shall s me and live.”
Jn	9.	25	that though I was blind, now I s.”
Rev	1.	7	the clouds; every eye will s him,
SEED → SEEDS, SEEDTIME

Mt	17.	20	have faith the size of a mustard s,
SEEDS → SEED

Mt	13.	8	Other s fell on good soil
Mk	4.	31	the smallest of all the s on earth;
SEEK

1Ch	28.	9	If you s him, he will be found by
Ps	34.	10	those who s the LORD lack no good
Isa	55.	6	S the LORD while he may be found,
Lk	19.	10	came to s out and to save
Heb	11.	6	that he rewards those who s him.
SEEN → SEE

Jn	1.	18	No one has ever s God.
 	14.	9	Whoever has s me has s the Father.
SELF-CONTROL

2Pe	1.	6	with s, and s with endurance,
SEPARATE

Mt	19.	6	joined together, let no one s.”
Ro	8.	35	will s us from the love of Christ?
SERPENT

Ge	3.	1	the s was more crafty than any other
2Co	11.	3	the s deceived Eve by its cunning,
Rev	20.	2	He seized the dragon, that ancient s,
SERVANT

Isa	42.	1	Here is my s, whom I uphold,
 	53.	11	my s, shall make many righteous,
Zec	3.	8	going to bring my s the Branch.
Lk	1.	38	“Here am I, the s of the Lord;
Ac	3.	13	has glorified his s Jesus,
Heb	3.	5	faithful in all God’s house as a s,
SERVE

Jos	24.	15	my household, we will s the LORD.”
1Sa	12.	20	but s the LORD with all your heart;
Mt	6.	24	You cannot s God and wealth.
Mk	10.	45	Son of Man came not to be served but to s,
1Pe	4.	10	s one another with whatever gift
SEVEN → SEVENTH

Ge	7.	2	with you s pairs of all clean animals,
Ex	25.	37	You shall make the s lamps for it;
Jos	6.	4	march around the city s times,
Da	9.	25	prince, there shall be s weeks;
Mt	18.	22	“Not s times, but, I tell you, seventy-seven
Rev	1.	12	turning I saw s golden lampstands,
 	5.	1	and on the back, sealed with s seals;
 	8.	2	I saw the s angels who stand before
 	12.	3	a great red dragon, with s heads and
 	15.	1	s angels with s plagues,
SEVENTH → SEVEN

Ge	2.	2	on the s day God finished the work
Ex	20.	10	the s day is a sabbath to the LORD
Heb	4.	4	God rested on the s day from all his
SEVENTY → SEVENTY-SEVEN

Da	9.	24	S weeks are decreed for your people
SEVENTY-SEVEN → SEVENTY

Mt	18.	22	“Not seven times, but, I tell you, s
SHADOW

Ps	17.	8	hide me in the s of your wings,
 	91.	1	who abide in the s of the Almighty,
SHAME → ASHAMED

Da	12.	2	some to s and everlasting contempt.
1Co	1.	27	foolish in the world to s the wise;
Heb	12.	2	endured the cross, disregarding its s,
1Jn	2.	28	be put to s before him at his coming.
SHARE

Col	1.	12	to s in the inheritance of the saints
Heb	12.	10	in order that we may s his holiness.
Jude	1.	3	to you about the salvation we s,
SHARPENS → SHARPER

Pr	27.	17	Iron s iron, and one person s
SHARPER → SHARPENS

Heb	4.	12	s than any two-edged sword,
SHED

Ge	9.	6	shall that person’s blood be s;
Rev	16.	6	s the blood of saints and prophets,
SHEEP

Isa	53.	6	All we like s have gone astray;
Mt	9.	36	like s without a shepherd.
Jn	10.	7	I am the gate for the s.
 	10.	15	And I lay down my life for the s.
Heb	13.	20	the great shepherd of the s,
1Pe	2.	25	For you were going astray like s,
SHEOL

Ps	139.	8	if I make my bed in S, you are there.
Hos	13.	14	O S, where is your destruction?
SHEPHERD → SHEPHERDS

Ps	23.	1	The LORD is my s, I shall not want.
Isa	40.	11	He will feed his flock like a s;
Mt	2.	6	ruler who is to s my people Israel.’ ”
Jn	10.	11	“I am the good s.
Heb	13.	20	the great s of the sheep,
1Pe	5.	4	And when the chief s appears,
SHEPHERDS → SHEPHERD

Lk	2.	8	there were s living in the fields,
SHIELD

Eph	6.	16	With all of these, take the s of faith,
SHINE → SHINES

Nu	6.	25	LORD make his face to s upon you,
Ps	4.	6	light of your face s on us, O LORD!”
Da	12.	3	Those who are wise shall s like the
Mt	5.	16	let your light s before others,
SHINES → SHINE

Jn	1.	5	The light s in the darkness,
SHORT

Ro	3.	23	sinned and fall s of the glory of God;
SHOW → SHOWED

Ex	33.	18	Moses said, “S me your glory,
Ps	85.	7	S us your steadfast love, O LORD,
Jn	14.	8	said to him, “Lord, s us the Father,
1Co	12.	31	will s you a still more excellent way
SHOWED → SHOW

Jn	20.	20	he s them his hands and his side.
SICK → SICKNESS

Mt	8.	16	and cured all who were s.
Jas	5.	14	Are any among you s?
SICKNESS → SICK

Ex	23.	25	I will take s away from among you.
Mt	4.	23	and curing every disease and every s
SIDE

Jn	19.	34	soldiers pierced his s with a spear,
SIGHT → SEE

Mt	11.	5	blind receive their s, the lame walk,
2Co	5.	7	for we walk by faith, not by s.
SIGN → SIGNS

Mt	24.	3	the s of your coming and of the end
Mk	8.	12	does this generation ask for a s?
SIGNS → SIGN

Ge	1.	14	be for s and for seasons and for days
Mt	16.	3	cannot interpret the s of the times.
Jn	20.	30	Jesus did many other s in the
1Co	1.	22	Jews demand s and Greeks desire
Rev	16.	14	demonic spirits, performing s,
SILENT

Isa	53.	7	a sheep that before its shearers is s,
Mk	14.	61	But he was s and did not answer.
SILVER

Mt	26.	15	They paid him thirty pieces of s.
Ac	3.	6	But Peter said, “I have no s or gold,
SIN → SINNED, SINNER, SINNERS, SINS

Nu	32.	23	and be sure your s will find you out.
2Ch	7.	14	forgive their s and heal their land.
Ps	119.	11	so that I may not s against you.
Isa	53.	12	yet he bore the s of many,
Mt	5.	29	If your right eye causes you to s,
Jn	1.	29	who takes away the s of the world!
Ro	6.	23	For the wages of s is death,
Heb	4.	15	tested as we are, yet without s.
1Jn	1.	7	Jesus his Son cleanses us from all s.
SINAI

Ex	19.	20	the LORD descended upon Mount S,
SING → SONG, SONGS, SUNG

Ps	47.	6	S praises to God, s praises;
1Co	14.	15	I will s praise with the spirit,
Col	3.	16	gratitude in your hearts s psalms,
Rev	5.	9	They s a new song:
SINNED → SIN

Ps	51.	4	Against you, you alone, have I s,
La	5.	7	Our ancestors s; they are no more,
Ro	3.	23	all have s and fall short of the glory
1Jn	1.	10	If we say that we have not s,
SINNER → SIN

Lk	15.	7	over one s who repents than
Jas	5.	20	that whoever brings back a s
SINNERS → SIN

Pr	23.	17	Do not let your heart envy s,
Ro	5.	8	we still were s Christ died for us.
1Ti	1.	15	Jesus came into the world to save s
SINS → SIN

1Sa	2.	25	if someone s against the LORD,
Eze	18.	4	only the person who s that shall die.
Mt	9.	6	has authority on earth to forgive s”—
Lk	11.	4	forgive us our s, for we ourselves
Ac	3.	19	to God so that your s may be wiped
1Co	15.	3	Christ died for our s in accordance
Heb	9.	28	offered once to bear the s of many,
1Jn	1.	9	If we confess our s, he who is faithful
Rev	1.	5	loves us and freed us from our s
SISTER

Pr	7.	4	Say to wisdom, “You are my s,”
Mk	3.	35	the will of God is my brother and s
SIT → SAT

Ps	110.	1	says to my lord, “S at my right hand
Mt	20.	23	to s at my right hand and at my left,
Heb	1.	13	“S at my right hand until I make
SIX

Ex	20.	9	S days you shall labor and do all
Pr	6.	16	are s things that the LORD hates,
SKULL

Mt	27.	33	Golgotha (which means Place of a S)
SLANDER → SLANDERED

Ps	15.	3	who do not s with their tongue,
Pr	10.	18	and whoever utters s is a fool.
Mt	15.	19	fornication, theft, false witness, s.
1Pe	2.	1	all guile, insincerity, envy, and all s.
SLANDERED → SLANDER

1Co	4.	13	when s, we speak kindly.
SLAUGHTER

Isa	53.	7	like a lamb that is led to the s,
Ac	8.	32	“Like a sheep he was led to the s,
SLAVE → SLAVERY

Mk	10.	44	first among you must be s of all.
Jn	8.	34	who commits sin is a s to sin.
Gal	3.	28	there is no longer s or free,
SLAVERY → SLAVE

Gal	5.	1	do not submit again to a yoke of s.
SLEEP → ASLEEP, SLEEPER, SLEEPING

Ps	121.	4	keeps Israel will neither slumber nor s.
Da	12.	2	Many of those who s in the dust of
SLEEPER → SLEEP

Eph	5.	14	“S, awake! Rise from the dead,
SLEEPING → SLEEP

Mt	9.	24	for the girl is not dead but s.”
 	26.	40	to the disciples and found them s;
SLING

1Sa	17.	50	over the Philistine with a s and a stone,
SLOW → SLOWNESS

Ex	34.	6	merciful and gracious, s to anger,
2Pe	3.	9	The Lord is not s about his promise,
SLOWNESS → SLOW

2Pe	3.	9	think of s, but is patient with you,
SNOW

Ps	51.	7	and I shall be whiter than s.
Isa	1.	18	sins are like scarlet, they shall be like s;
Da	7.	9	his clothing was white as s,
Rev	1.	14	as white wool, white as s;
SOBER

1Th	5.	6	but let us keep awake and be s;
2Ti	4.	5	always be s, endure suffering,
SODOM

Ge	19.	24	rained on S and Gomorrah sulfur
Lk	10.	12	it will be more tolerable for S than
Rev	11.	8	city that is prophetically called S
SOLDIERS

Mt	28.	12	give a large sum of money to the s,
Jn	19.	23	When the s had crucified Jesus,
SON → SONS

Ex	4.	23	now I will kill your firstborn s.’ ”
2Sa	7.	14	and he shall be a s to me.
Ps	2.	7	He said to me, “You are my s;
Isa	7.	14	is with child and shall bear a s,
Mt	1.	23	virgin shall conceive and bear a s,
 	3.	17	from heaven said, “This is my S,
 	16.	16	the Messiah, the S of the living God.”
Mk	10.	45	S of Man came not to be served but to
Lk	1.	35	he will be called S of God.
Jn	3.	16	loved the world that he gave his only S,
1Th	1.	10	to wait for his S from heaven,
Heb	1.	2	last days he has spoken to us by a S,
1Jn	4.	9	God sent his only S into the world
Rev	12.	5	she gave birth to a s, a male child,
 	14.	14	the cloud was one like the S of Man,
SONG → SING

Ps	40.	3	He put a new s in my mouth,
Rev	5.	9	They sing a new s: “You are worthy
 	15.	3	and the s of the Lamb:
SONGS → SING

Col	3.	16	hymns, and spiritual s to God.
SONS → SON

Ac	2.	17	s and your daughters shall prophesy,
2Co	6.	18	you shall be my s and daughters,
SOON

Rev	22.	20	says, “Surely I am coming s.”
SOUL → SOULS

Dt	6.	5	all your s, and with all your might.
Jos	22.	5	all your heart and with all your s.”
Mt	10.	28	fear him who can destroy both s and
Heb	4.	12	piercing until it divides s from spirit
Jas	5.	20	will save the sinner’s s from death
3Jn	1.	2	just as it is well with your s.
SOULS → SOUL

Jer	6.	16	walk in it, and find rest for your s.
Mt	11.	29	and you will find rest for your s.
SOWS

Jn	4.	37	‘One s and another reaps.’
2Co	9.	6	who s sparingly will also reap
SPARROWS

Lk	12.	7	you are of more value than many s.
SPEAK → SPEAKING

Ecc	3.	7	time to keep silence, and a time to s;
Mt	13.	13	The reason I s to them in parables is
Ac	2.	4	began to s in other languages,
1Co	12.	30	Do all s in tongues?
SPEAKING → SPEAK

1Co	14.	39	and do not forbid s in tongues;
Eph	4.	15	But s the truth in love,
SPEAR → SPEARS

Jn	19.	34	the soldiers pierced his side with a s,
SPIES → SPY

Nu	13.	32	we have gone through as s
Jos	2.	1	two men secretly from Shittim as s,
SPIRIT → SPIRITS, SPIRITUAL

Ge	6.	3	My s shall not abide in mortals forever,
Nu	11.	25	s rested upon them, they prophesied.
Ps	31.	5	Into your hand I commit my s;
 	51.	17	acceptable to God is a broken s;
Isa	42.	1	I have put my s upon him;
Eze	36.	26	and a new s I will put within you;
Joel	2.	28	I will pour out my s on all flesh;
Mt	1.	18	to be with child from the Holy S.
 	5.	3	“Blessed are the poor in s,
 	26.	41	the s indeed is willing, but the flesh
Mk	1.	8	will baptize you with the Holy S.”
Jn	3.	5	without being born of water and S.
 	4.	24	God is s, and those who worship him must worship in s and truth.”
 	14.	26	But the Advocate, the Holy S,
Ac	2.	4	of them were filled with the Holy S
Ro	8.	26	the S helps us in our weakness;
1Co	12.	4	are varieties of gifts, but the same S;
2Co	3.	6	the letter kills, but the S gives life.
Gal	5.	22	the fruit of the S is love, joy, peace,
Eph	1.	13	the seal of the promised Holy S;
 	5.	18	but be filled with the S,
1Th	5.	19	Do not quench the S.
Heb	4.	12	piercing until it divides soul from s,
1Jn	4.	1	Beloved, do not believe every s,
SPIRITS → SPIRIT

Lk	4.	36	power he commands the unclean s,
Rev	1.	4	seven s who are before his throne,
SPIRITUAL → SPIRIT

1Co	2.	13	interpreting s things to those who are s.
 	12.	1	Now concerning s gifts,
 	14.	1	Pursue love and strive for the s gifts,
Eph	1.	3	every s blessing in the heavenly
1Pe	2.	5	yourselves be built into a s house,
SPIT

Mk	14.	65	began to s on him, to blindfold him,
Rev	3.	16	am about to s you out of my mouth.
SPY → SPIES

Nu	13.	2	men to s out the land of Canaan,
Jos	6.	25	whom Joshua sent to s out Jericho.
STAFF

Ex	4.	4	and it became a s in his hand—
Nu	17.	6	the s of Aaron was among theirs.
Ps	23.	4	your rod and your s—they comfort me.
STAND → STANDING

Ex	14.	13	“Do not be afraid, s firm,
Job	19.	25	at the last he will s upon the earth;
Ps	1.	5	wicked will not s in the judgment,
Mt	12.	25	house divided against itself will s.
Ro	14.	10	all s before the judgment seat of God.
STANDING → STAND

1Co	10.	12	So if you think you are s,
Rev	3.	20	I am s at the door, knocking;
STAR → STARS

Nu	24.	17	a s shall come out of Jacob,
Isa	14.	12	are fallen from heaven, O Day S,
Mt	2.	2	For we observed his s at its rising,
2Pe	1.	19	day dawns and the morning s rises
Rev	9.	1	saw a s that had fallen from heaven
 	22.	16	of David, the bright morning s.”
STARS → STAR

Ge	1.	16	to rule the night—and the s.
Job	38.	7	when the morning s sang together
Rev	1.	16	In his right hand he held seven s,
STATUE

Da	2.	31	there was a great s.
STATUTE → STATUTES

Lev	16.	29	This shall be a s to you forever:
Nu	19.	21	It shall be a perpetual s for them.
STATUTES → STATUTE

Ge	26.	5	commandments, my s, and my laws.
Dt	4.	1	give heed to the s and ordinances
Ne	9.	13	good s and commandments,
Ps	119.	8	I will observe your s;
STEADFAST

Heb	6.	19	a sure and s anchor of the soul,
1Pe	5.	9	Resist him, s in your faith,
STEAL

Ex	20.	15	You shall not s.
Mt	6.	19	and where thieves break in and s;
STILL

Ps	46.	10	“Be s, and know that I am God!
Mk	4.	39	said to the sea, “Peace! Be s!”
STING

1Co	15.	55	Where, O death, is your s?”
STONE → CORNERSTONE, MILLSTONE, STONED, STONES

Ex	31.	18	tablets of s, written with the finger of
1Sa	17.	50	the Philistine with a sling and a s,
Ps	118.	22	The s that the builders rejected has
Isa	28.	16	in Zion a foundation s, a tested s,
Eze	36.	26	from your body the heart of s
Mt	4.	6	will not dash your foot against a s.’ ”
Mk	12.	10	‘The s that the builders rejected has
 	16.	3	“Who will roll away the s for us
Ro	9.	32	have stumbled over the stumbling s,
2Co	3.	3	not on tablets of s but on tablets
STONED → STONE

Ac	14.	19	Then they s Paul and dragged him
Heb	11.	37	s to death, they were sawn in two,
STONES → STONE

Mt	3.	9	God is able from these s to raise
Lk	19.	40	were silent, the s would shout out.”
1Co	3.	12	precious s, wood, hay, straw—
1Pe	2.	5	like living s, let yourselves be built
STRAIGHT

Pr	3.	6	and he will make s your paths.
Isa	40.	3	s in the desert a highway for our God.
Mt	3.	3	way of the Lord, make his paths s.’ ”
Ac	9.	11	Get up and go to the street called S,
STRANGER → STRANGERS

Dt	10.	19	You shall also love the s,
Mt	25.	35	I was a s and you welcomed me,
STRANGERS → STRANGER

Ro	12.	13	extend hospitality to s.
Heb	11.	13	They confessed that they were s
STREAMS

Ps	1.	3	like trees planted by s of water,
 	42.	1	As a deer longs for flowing s,
STRENGTH → STRONG

Ex	15.	2	The LORD is my s and my might,
1Ch	16.	11	Seek the LORD and his s,
Ne	8.	10	for the joy of the LORD is your s.”
Ps	46.	1	God is our refuge and s,
Isa	40.	31	for the LORD shall renew their s,
Mk	12.	30	all your mind, and with all your s.’
STRENGTHEN → STRONG

Ps	119.	28	s me according to your word.
Heb	12.	12	hands and s your weak knees,
STRENGTHENS → STRONG

Php	4.	13	do all things through him who s me.
STRIFE

Pr	23.	29	Who has sorrow? Who has s?
Ro	1.	29	Full of envy, murder, s, deceit,
Gal	5.	20	enmities, s, jealousy, anger,
STRIKE

Ge	3.	15	he will s your head, and you will s
Ex	17.	6	S the rock, and water will come out
Mk	14.	27	‘I will s the shepherd, and the sheep
STRONG → STRENGTH, STRENGTHEN, STRENGTHENS, STRONGHOLD

Dt	31.	6	Be s and bold; have no fear
Jos	1.	6	Be s and courageous; for you shall
Ecc	9.	11	nor the battle to the s, nor bread to
Ro	15.	1	We who are s ought to put up with
1Co	1.	27	in the world to shame the s;
2Co	12.	10	whenever I am weak, then I am s.
Eph	6.	10	be s in the Lord and in the strength
STRONGHOLD → STRONG

Ps	9.	9	The LORD is a s for the oppressed,
Na	1.	7	a s in a day of trouble;
STUDY

Ezr	7.	10	Ezra had set his heart to s the law
Ecc	12.	12	much s is a weariness of the flesh.
STUMBLE → STUMBLING

Mt	18.	9	And if your eye causes you to s,
Ro	9.	33	a stone that will make people s,
STUMBLING → STUMBLE

Mt	16.	23	You are a s block to me;
Ro	11.	9	a s block and a retribution for them;
1Co	8.	9	not somehow become a s block to
SUBDUE

Ge	1.	28	and fill the earth and s it;
SUBJECT

Ro	13.	1	be s to the governing authorities;
Eph	5.	21	s to one another out of reverence
SUBMISSION → SUBMIT

1Ti	2.	11	a woman learn in silence with full s.
Heb	5.	7	was heard because of his reverent s.
SUBMISSIVE → SUBMIT

1Ti	3.	4	keeping his children s and respectful
Tit	2.	5	kind, being s to their husbands,
SUBMIT → SUBMISSION, SUBMISSIVE

Heb	13.	17	Obey your leaders and s to them,
SUCCEED → SUCCESSFUL

Pr	15.	22	but with many advisers they s.
Ecc	10.	10	but wisdom helps one to s.
SUCCESSFUL → SUCCEED

Jos	1.	7	that you may be s wherever you go.
SUDDENLY

Mal	3.	1	Lord whom you seek will s come to
Mk	13.	36	find you asleep when he comes s.
SUFFER → SUFFERED, SUFFERING, SUFFERINGS

Lk	22.	15	this Passover with you before I s;
 	24.	46	the Messiah is to s and to rise from
Heb	9.	26	then he would have had to s again
SUFFERED → SUFFER

1Pe	2.	21	because Christ also s for you,
SUFFERING → SUFFER

Isa	53.	3	a man of s and acquainted with
Mk	8.	31	Son of Man must undergo great s,
SUFFERINGS → SUFFER

Ro	8.	18	the s of this present time are not
SUFFICIENT

2Co	12.	9	“My grace is s for you,
SULFUR

Ge	19.	24	rained on Sodom and Gomorrah s
Ps	11.	6	he will rain coals of fire and s;
Rev	21.	8	in the lake that burns with fire and s,
SUN

Jos	10.	13	And the s stood still,
Ecc	1.	9	there is nothing new under the s.
Mt	5.	45	he makes his s rise on the evil and
Rev	22.	5	they need no light of lamp or s,
SUPPER

Lk	22.	20	he did the same with the cup after s,
Rev	19.	9	to the marriage s of the Lamb.”
SUPPLICATION → SUPPLICATIONS

Eph	6.	18	at all times in every prayer and s.
SUPPLICATIONS → SUPPLICATION

1Ti	2.	1	then, I urge that s, prayers,
Heb	5.	7	Jesus offered up prayers and s,
SURPASSES

Eph	3.	19	the love of Christ that s knowledge,
Php	4.	7	the peace of God, which s all
SUSTAINS

Ps	3.	5	for the LORD s me.
Heb	1.	3	he s all things by his powerful word.
SWALLOW → SWALLOWED

Jnh	1.	17	provided a large fish to s up Jonah;
Mt	23.	24	You strain out a gnat but s a camel!
SWALLOWED → SWALLOW

1Co	15.	54	“Death has been s up in victory.”
SWEAR

Dt	10.	20	and by his name you shall s.
Ps	24.	4	and do not s deceitfully.
Mt	5.	34	Do not s at all, either by heaven,
SWEAT

Ge	3.	19	By the s of your face you shall eat
Lk	22.	44	s became like great drops of blood
SWINE

Mt	7.	6	do not throw your pearls before s,
SWORD → SWORDS

Ge	3.	24	and a s flaming and turning to guard
Mt	10.	34	not come to bring peace, but a s.
Eph	6.	17	the s of the Spirit, which is the word
Heb	4.	12	sharper than any two-edged s,
Rev	1.	16	mouth came a sharp, two-edged s,
SWORDS → SWORD

Isa	2.	4	shall beat their s into plowshares,
Joel	3.	10	Beat your plowshares into s,
SYMPATHIZE → SYMPATHY

Heb	4.	15	unable to s with our weaknesses,
SYMPATHY → SYMPATHIZE

Php	2.	1	any compassion and s,
1Pe	3.	8	all of you, have unity of spirit, s,
SYNAGOGUE → SYNAGOGUES

Lk	4.	16	he went to the s on the sabbath day,
Ac	18.	26	He began to speak boldly in the s;
SYNAGOGUES → SYNAGOGUE

Mt	4.	23	teaching in their s and proclaiming
Jn	18.	20	always taught in s and in the temple,
T

TABERNACLE

Ex	25.	9	concerning the pattern of the t
 	40.	34	the glory of the LORD filled the t.
1Ch	6.	48	for all the service of the t of the house
TABLE → TABLES

Ex	25.	23	You shall make a t of acacia wood,
Ps	23.	5	a t before me in the presence of my
TABLES → TABLE

Mk	11.	15	overturned the t of the money changers
TABLETS

Ex	31.	18	gave him the two t of the covenant,
2Co	3.	3	not on t of stone but on t of human hearts.
TALENT

Mt	25.	25	and hid your t in the ground.
TAX → TAXES

Mt	11.	19	a friend of t collectors and sinners!’
Lk	18.	10	Pharisee and the other a t collector.
TAXES → TAX

Mt	22.	17	Is it lawful to pay t to the emperor,
Ro	13.	7	t to whom t are due,
TEACH → TEACHER, TEACHERS, TEACHING

Dt	6.	1	to t you to observe in the land that
Jer	31.	34	No longer shall they t one another,
Col	3.	16	t and admonish one another in all
1Jn	2.	27	so you do not need anyone to t you.
TEACHER → TEACH

Ecc	1.	1	words of the T, the son of David,
Jn	1.	38	“Rabbi” (which translated means T)
TEACHERS → TEACH

Ps	119.	99	more understanding than all my t,
1Co	12.	28	second prophets, third t;
Eph	4.	11	evangelists, some pastors and t,
Jas	3.	1	Not many of you should become t,
TEACHING → TEACH

Mk	1.	27	A new t—with authority!
TEAR

Rev	7.	17	God will wipe away every t from
TEETH → TOOTH

Mt	8.	12	will be weeping and gnashing of t.”
TEMPLE

2Ch	2.	12	who will build a t for the LORD,
Mt	4.	5	placed him on the pinnacle of the t,
 	12.	6	something greater than the t is here.
1Co	3.	16	you are God’s t and that God’s Spirit
Eph	2.	21	and grows into a holy t in the Lord;
Rev	21.	22	its t is the Lord God the Almighty and
TEMPTATION → TEMPTED

1Ti	6.	9	who want to be rich into t and
Jas	1.	12	Blessed is anyone who endures t.
TEMPTED → TEMPTATION

Mk	1.	13	wilderness forty days, t by Satan;
Gal	6.	1	care that you yourselves are not t.
TEN

Ex	34.	28	the covenant, the t commandments.
TENT

Ex	27.	21	the t of meeting, outside the curtain
2Co	5.	1	the earthly t we live in is destroyed,
TEST → TESTED, TESTING

Dt	6.	16	put the LORD your God to the t,
Lk	4.	12	not put the Lord your God to the t.’
 	10.	25	then a lawyer stood up to t Jesus.
2Co	13.	5	indeed, you fail to meet the t!
1Jn	4.	1	t the spirits to see whether they are
TESTED → TEST

Ge	22.	1	After these things God t Abraham.
Ps	78.	41	They t God again and again,
Heb	4.	15	been t as we are, yet without sin.
TESTIMONY

Mk	14.	59	on this point their t did not agree.
Rev	1.	9	the word of God and the t of Jesus.
TESTING → TEST

1Co	10.	13	No t has overtaken you that is not
Jas	1.	3	t of your faith produces endurance;
THANK → THANKS, THANKSGIVING

2Ch	29.	31	bring sacrifices and t offerings to
Ps	52.	9	I will t you forever,
THANKS → THANK

1Co	11.	24	and when he had given t,
THANKSGIVING → THANK

Ps	50.	14	Offer to God a sacrifice of t,
Php	4.	6	with t let your requests be made known
Rev	7.	12	glory and wisdom and t and honor
THIEF → THIEVES

Ex	22.	1	The t shall make restitution,
Jn	10.	10	The t comes only to steal and kill
1Th	5.	2	day of the Lord will come like a t in
Rev	16.	15	(“See, I am coming like a t!
THIEVES → THIEF

Mt	6.	19	and where t break in and steal;
THINK → THOUGHTS

Ro	12.	3	not to t of yourself more highly than
1Co	10.	12	So if you t you are standing,
THIRD → THREE

Mt	26.	44	and prayed for the t time,
Lk	18.	33	and on the t day he will rise again.”
THIRST → THIRSTY

Mt	5.	6	who hunger and t for righteousness,
Rev	7.	16	will hunger no more, and t no more;
THIRSTY → THIRST

Mt	25.	35	I was t and you gave me something
Jn	6.	35	believes in me will never be t.
Rev	22.	17	And let everyone who is t come.
THORN → THORNS

2Co	12.	7	a t was given me in the flesh,
THORNS → THORN

Jn	19.	2	the soldiers wove a crown of t and
THOUGHTS → THINK

Isa	55.	8	For my t are not your t,
1Co	3.	20	“The Lord knows the t of the wise,
Heb	4.	12	judge the t and intentions of the heart.
THOUSAND

Ps	90.	4	t years in your sight are like yesterday
2Pe	3.	8	one day is like a t years, and a t years
Rev	20.	4	and reigned with Christ a t years.
THREE → THIRD

Mt	18.	20	two or t are gathered in my name,
 	26.	34	you will deny me t times.”
Mk	8.	31	be killed, and after t days rise again.
2Co	12.	8	T times I appealed to the Lord
1Jn	5.	7	There are t that testify:
THRONE

Ps	45.	6	Your t, O God, endures forever
Isa	6.	1	I saw the Lord sitting on a t, high
Mt	19.	28	the Son of Man is seated on the t
Heb	4.	16	approach the t of grace with boldness,
Rev	4.	10	they cast their crowns before the t,
 	20.	11	I saw a great white t and the one
THUMMIM

Ex	28.	30	you shall put the Urim and the T,
THUNDER

Ex	9.	23	and the LORD sent t and hail,
Rev	4.	5	and rumblings and peals of t,
TIME → TIMES

Est	4.	14	dignity for just such a t as this.”
Ecc	3.	1	a t for every matter under heaven:
Da	7.	25	for a t, two times, and half a t.
Ro	5.	6	the right t Christ died for the ungodly.
2Co	6.	2	See, now is the acceptable t;
Gal	4.	4	when the fullness of t had come,
Rev	12.	14	for a t, and times, and half a t.
TIMES → TIME

Mt	16.	3	cannot interpret the signs of the t.
 	18.	22	seven t, but, I tell you, seventy-seven t.
Mk	14.	30	you will deny me three t.”
TITHE

Dt	12.	17	the t of your grain, your wine, and
Mal	3.	10	Bring the full t into the storehouse,
TODAY

Ps	2.	7	my son; t I have begotten you.
Heb	1.	5	my Son; t I have begotten you”?
 	13.	8	Christ is the same yesterday and t
TOMB

Mk	15.	46	laid it in a t that had been hewn out
Lk	24.	2	the stone rolled away from the t,
TOMORROW

Mt	6.	34	“So do not worry about t,
Jas	4.	14	do not even know what t will bring.
TONGUE → TONGUES

Isa	45.	23	shall bow, every t shall swear.”
Php	2.	11	every t should confess that Jesus Christ
TONGUES → TONGUE

Ac	2.	3	Divided t, as of fire, appeared
1Co	12.	10	t, to another the interpretation of t.
TOOTH → TEETH

Ex	21.	24	t for t, hand for hand, foot for foot,
Mt	5.	38	‘An eye for an eye and a t for a t.’
TOWER

Ge	11.	4	and a t with its top in the heavens,
Pr	18.	10	The name of the LORD is a strong t;
TRADITION

Mt	15.	2	disciples break the t of the elders?
Col	2.	8	empty deceit, according to human t,
TRAIN → TRAINING

Pr	22.	6	T children in the right way, and
1Ti	4.	7	T yourself in godliness,
TRAINING → TRAIN

1Ti	4.	8	while physical t is of some value,
2Ti	3.	16	and for t in righteousness,
TRAITOR

Lk	6.	16	and Judas Iscariot, who became a t.
TRANSFIGURED

Mt	17.	2	And he was t before them,
TRANSFORM → TRANSFORMED

Php	3.	21	will t the body of our humiliation
TRANSFORMED → TRANSFORM

Ro	12.	2	be t by the renewing of your minds,
2Co	3.	18	are being t into the same image
TRANSGRESSION → TRANSGRESSIONS

Ex	23.	21	for he will not pardon your t;
Da	9.	24	to finish the t, to put an end to sin,
TRANSGRESSIONS → TRANSGRESSION

Ps	103.	12	so far he removes our t from us.
Isa	53.	5	But he was wounded for our t,
TREASURE → TREASURES

Mt	6.	21	where your t is, there your heart
2Co	4.	7	But we have this t in clay jars,
2Ti	1.	14	Guard the good t entrusted to you,
TREASURES → TREASURE

Col	2.	3	are hidden all the t of wisdom
TREE

Ge	3.	24	to guard the way to the t of life.
Mt	12.	33	for the t is known by its fruit.
Rev	22.	2	the t of life with its twelve kinds
TREMBLING

Ps	2.	11	Serve the LORD with fear, with t
Php	2.	12	your own salvation with fear and t;
TRESPASS → TRESPASSES

Ro	5.	15	But the free gift is not like the t.
TRESPASSES → TRESPASS

Mt	6.	14	For if you forgive others their t,
2Co	5.	19	not counting their t against them,
TRIAL → TRIALS

Lk	11.	4	do not bring us to the time of t.”
2Pe	2.	9	knows how to rescue the godly from t,
Rev	3.	10	I will keep you from the hour of t
TRIALS → TRIAL

Jas	1.	2	whenever you face t of any kind,
1Pe	1.	6	you have had to suffer various t,
TRIBES

Ge	49.	28	All these are the twelve t of Israel,
Ex	24.	4	to the twelve t of Israel.
Mt	19.	28	judging the twelve t of Israel.
Rev	21.	12	inscribed the names of the twelve t
TRIUMPHAL → TRIUMPHS

2Co	2.	14	Christ always leads us in t procession,
TRIUMPHS → TRIUMPHAL

Jas	2.	13	mercy t over judgment.
TROUBLE → TROUBLED

Ps	9.	9	a stronghold in times of t.
Pr	11.	8	The righteous are delivered from t,
Isa	33.	2	our salvation in the time of t.
Mt	6.	34	Today’s t is enough for today.
TROUBLED → TROUBLE

Jn	14.	1	“Do not let your hearts be t.
TRUE → TRUTH

Ps	119.	151	and all your commandments are t.
Jn	1.	9	The t light, which enlightens
1Jn	5.	20	He is the t God and eternal life.
Rev	3.	14	the Amen, the faithful and t witness,
 	19.	11	Its rider is called Faithful and T,
TRUMPET

1Co	15.	52	twinkling of an eye, at the last t.
1Th	4.	16	and with the sound of God’s t,
TRUST → ENTRUSTED, TRUSTED, TRUSTWORTHY

Ps	37.	3	T in the LORD, and do good;
Pr	3.	5	T in the LORD with all your heart,
TRUSTED → TRUST

Da	3.	28	delivered his servants who t in him.
 	6.	23	because he had t in his God.
TRUSTWORTHY → TRUST

Ps	111.	7	and just; all his precepts are t.
Rev	22.	6	“These words are t and true,
TRUTH → TRUE

Pr	23.	23	Buy t, and do not sell it;
Jn	1.	17	grace and t came through Jesus Christ.
 	4.	23	worship the Father in spirit and t,
 	8.	32	and the t will make you free.”
 	14.	6	“I am the way, and the t, and the life.
 	14.	17	This is the Spirit of t,
Eph	4.	15	But speaking the t in love,
2Ti	2.	15	rightly explaining the word of t.
TURNED → TURN

Isa	53.	6	we have all t to our own way,
Ro	3.	12	All have t aside, together they have
TWELVE

Ge	49.	28	All these are the t tribes of Israel,
Mt	10.	1	Jesus summoned his t disciples
Lk	9.	17	t baskets of broken pieces.
Rev	21.	12	inscribed the names of the t tribes
 	22.	2	tree of life with its t kinds of fruit,
TWINKLING

1Co	15.	52	in the t of an eye, at the last trumpet
TWO → TWICE, TWO-EDGED

Ge	1.	16	God made the t great lights—
 	6.	19	bring t of every kind into the ark,
Ex	31.	18	the t tablets of the covenant,
Dt	17.	6	of t or three witnesses the death
Mt	6.	24	“No one can serve t masters;
 	19.	5	and the t shall become one flesh’?
TWO-EDGED → TWO

Heb	4.	12	sharper than any t sword,
Rev	1.	16	his mouth came a sharp, t sword,
U

UNBELIEF → UNBELIEVER, UNBELIEVERS

Mk	6.	6	And he was amazed at their u.
 	9.	24	cried out, “I believe; help my u!”
UNBELIEVER → UNBELIEF

1Co	10.	27	If an u invites you to a meal and
2Co	6.	15	does a believer share with an u?
UNBELIEVERS → UNBELIEF

2Co	6.	14	Do not be mismatched with u.
UNCIRCUMCISED → UNCIRCUMCISION

Ac	7.	51	people, u in heart and ears,
Ro	4.	11	he had by faith while he was still u.
Col	3.	11	circumcised and u, barbarian,
UNCIRCUMCISION → UNCIRCUMCISED

1Co	7.	19	Circumcision is nothing, and u is
Gal	5.	6	neither circumcision nor u counts
UNCLEAN → UNCLEANNESS

Lev	5.	2	when any of you touch any u thing
Isa	52.	11	Touch no u thing;
Mk	3.	11	Whenever the u spirits saw him,
Rev	21.	27	But nothing u will enter it,
UNDERSTAND → UNDERSTANDING

Lk	24.	45	opened their minds to u the scriptures,
Eph	5.	17	but u what the will of the Lord is.
UNDERSTANDING → UNDERSTAND

Ex	36.	1	has given skill and u to know how
Pr	2.	6	from his mouth come knowledge and u
Lk	2.	47	heard him were amazed at his u
Php	4.	7	peace of God, which surpasses all u,
UNGODLY

Ro	5.	6	the right time Christ died for the u.
2Pe	2.	6	example of what is coming to the u;
UNITY

Ps	133.	1	when kindred live together in u!
Eph	4.	3	to maintain the u of the Spirit
UNJUST

Ro	3.	5	That God is u to inflict wrath on us?
Heb	6.	10	For God is not u; he will
UNLEAVENED

Ex	12.	17	shall observe the festival of u bread,
Mt	26.	17	first day of U Bread the disciples
UNRIGHTEOUS → UNRIGHTEOUSNESS

Mt	5.	45	rain on the righteous and on the u.
2Pe	2.	9	u under punishment until the day
UNRIGHTEOUSNESS → UNRIGHTEOUS

Ps	92.	15	and there is no u in him.
1Jn	1.	9	and cleanse us from all u.
URIM

Ex	28.	30	of judgment you shall put the U
USEFUL

2Ti	3.	16	scripture is inspired by God and is u
V

VAIN → VANITY

Ps	2.	1	and the peoples plot in v?
Mt	15.	9	in v do they worship me,
Php	2.	16	that I did not run in v or labor in v.
VALLEY

Ps	23.	4	through the darkest v, I fear no evil;
VANITY → VAIN

Ecc	1.	2	v of vanities! All is v.
VEIL

Ex	34.	33	he put a v on his face;
2Co	3.	15	a v lies over their minds;
VENGEANCE → AVENGE, AVENGER, AVENGING

Ps	94.	1	O LORD, you God of v,
Isa	34.	8	For the LORD has a day of v,
Na	1.	2	the LORD takes v on his adversaries
VICTORY

Pr	21.	31	but the v belongs to the LORD.
1Co	15.	54	Death has been swallowed up in v.”
VINE → VINEYARD

Jn	15.	1	“I am the true v, and my Father is
VINEYARD → VINE

Isa	5.	1	had a v on a very fertile hill.
Mt	21.	33	a landowner who planted a v,
VIOLENCE

Ge	6.	11	and the earth was filled with v.
Isa	53.	9	although he had done no v,
Hab	2.	17	because of human bloodshed and v
VIRGIN

Mt	1.	23	the v shall conceive and bear a son,
Lk	1.	34	“How can this be, since I am a v?”
VISION → VISIONS

Isa	22.	1	oracle concerning the valley of v.
Da	8.	26	As for you, seal up the v,
VISIONS → VISION

Nu	12.	6	make myself known to them in v;
Eze	1.	1	were opened, and I saw v of God.
Da	1.	17	Daniel also had insight into all v
Joel	2.	28	and your young men shall see v.
Ac	2.	17	and your young men shall see v,
VOICE

Heb	3.	7	says, “Today, if you hear his v,
Rev	3.	20	if you hear my v and open the door,
VOID

Ge	1.	2	the earth was a formless v
VOW

Ecc	5.	4	Fulfill what you v.
W

WAGES

Ro	6.	23	For the w of sin is death,
WAIT

Ps	27.	14	W for the LORD; be strong,
1Th	1.	10	to w for his Son from heaven,
WALK

Dt	10.	12	to w in all his ways, to love him,
Ps	23.	4	I w through the darkest valley,
Isa	40.	31	they shall w and not faint.
2Co	5.	7	for we w by faith, not by sight.
WALL

Jos	6.	20	shout, and the w fell down flat;
Ne	2.	17	let us rebuild the w of Jerusalem,
Eph	2.	14	has broken down the dividing w,
WANT

Ps	23.	1	LORD is my shepherd, I shall not w.
WAR → WARRIOR, WARS

Ecc	3.	8	a time for w, and a time for peace.
WARRIOR → WAR

Ex	15.	3	LORD is a w; the LORD
WARS → WAR

Mt	24.	6	you will hear of w and rumors of w;
WASH

Ps	51.	7	w me, and I shall be whiter than snow.
Jn	13.	5	and began to w the disciples’ feet
WATER → WATERS

Jer	2.	13	the fountain of living w,
Eze	36.	25	I will sprinkle clean w upon you,
Mk	1.	8	I have baptized you with w;
Jn	2.	9	tasted the w that had become wine,
 	3.	5	without being born of w and Spirit.
 	4.	10	he would have given you living w.”
1Jn	5.	6	the one who came by w and blood,
Rev	22.	1	showed me the river of the w of life,
WATERS → WATER

Ge	7.	7	the ark to escape the w of the flood.
Isa	55.	1	who thirsts, come to the w;
WAY → WAYS

Ps	1.	6	watches over the w of the righteous,
Pr	22.	6	Train children in the right w,
Mt	3.	3	‘Prepare the w of the Lord,
Jn	14.	6	“I am the w, and the truth, and the life.
1Co	12.	31	show you a still more excellent w.
Heb	10.	20	the new and living w that he opened
WAYS → WAY

Dt	10.	12	to walk in all his w, to love him,
WEAK → WEAKNESS, WEAKNESSES

Mt	26.	41	indeed is willing, but the flesh is w.”
1Co	1.	27	God chose what is w in the world
2Co	12.	10	whenever I am w, then I am strong.
WEAKNESS → WEAK

Ro	8.	26	the Spirit helps us in our w;
WEAKNESSES → WEAK

Heb	4.	15	to sympathize with our w,
WEALTH

Rev	5.	12	receive power and w and wisdom
WEARY

Isa	40.	31	they shall run and not be w,
Heb	12.	3	you may not grow w or lose heart.
WEDDING

Jn	2.	1	there was a w in Cana of Galilee,
WEEKS

Ex	34.	22	You shall observe the festival of w,
Lev	23.	15	you shall count off seven w;
WEEP → WEEPING

Ecc	3.	4	a time to w, and a time to laugh;
Ro	12.	15	w with those who w.
WEEPING → WEEP

Ps	30.	5	W may linger for the night,
Mt	8.	12	will be w and gnashing of teeth.”
WELL

Dt	6.	3	so that it may go w with you,
Mt	3.	17	with whom I am w pleased.”
 	17.	5	I am w pleased; listen to him!”
2Pe	1.	17	with whom I am w pleased.”
WICKED → WICKEDNESS

Ps	1.	5	the w will not stand in the judgment,
Isa	48.	22	no peace,” says the LORD, “for the w.”
Eze	18.	23	any pleasure in the death of the w,
WICKEDNESS → WICKED

Ps	45.	7	you love righteousness and hate w.
Lk	11.	39	inside you are full of greed and w.
WIDOW → WIDOWS

Ex	22.	22	shall not abuse any w or orphan.
Ps	146.	9	he upholds the orphan and the w,
1Ti	5.	4	If a w has children or grandchildren,
WIDOWS → WIDOW

1Ti	5.	3	Honor w who are really w.
Jas	1.	27	to care for orphans and w in their
WIFE → WIVES

Ge	2.	24	and his mother and clings to his w,
Ex	20.	17	shall not covet your neighbor’s w,
Pr	18.	22	who finds a w finds a good thing,
Mt	5.	32	that anyone who divorces his w,
Eph	5.	28	He who loves his w loves himself.
Rev	21.	9	the bride, the w of the Lamb.”
WILDERNESS

Isa	40.	3	the w prepare the way of the LORD,
Mt	3.	3	voice of one crying out in the w:
WILL → WILLING

Ps	40.	8	I delight to do your w, O my God;
Mt	6.	10	Your w be done, on earth as it is in
Lk	22.	42	yet, not my w but yours be done.”
Jn	4.	34	“My food is to do the w of him who
Eph	6.	6	doing the w of God from the heart.
1Jn	5.	14	if we ask anything according to his w,
WILLING → WILL

Mt	26.	41	spirit indeed is w, but the flesh is weak.
Lk	22.	42	if you are w, remove this cup from
WIND

Ecc	1.	14	all is vanity and a chasing after w.
Jn	3.	8	The w blows where it chooses,
Ac	2.	2	a sound like the rush of a violent w,
WINE

Mt	9.	17	is new w put into old wineskins;
Jn	2.	9	tasted the water that had become w,
Eph	5.	18	Do not get drunk with w, for that is
WINGS

Ex	19.	4	and how I bore you on eagles’ w
Ps	17.	8	hide me in the shadow of your w,
Mal	4.	2	shall rise, with healing in its w.
Lk	13.	34	hen gathers her brood under her w,
WIPE

Isa	25.	8	GOD will w away the tears from all
Rev	21.	4	he will w every tear from their eyes.
WISDOM → WISE

1Ki	4.	29	God gave Solomon very great w,
Pr	1.	20	W cries out in the street;
 	9.	10	fear of the LORD is the beginning of w,
Jer	9.	23	Do not let the wise boast in their w,
Mt	13.	54	this man get this w and these deeds
Lk	2.	52	Jesus increased in w and in years,
Ro	11.	33	the depth of the riches and w and
1Co	1.	19	“I will destroy the w of the wise,
Col	2.	3	whom are hidden all the treasures of w
Jas	3.	17	But the w from above is first pure,
Rev	5.	12	wealth and w and might and honor
WISE → WISDOM

Ps	19.	7	are sure, making w the simple;
Pr	3.	7	Do not be w in your own eyes;
Da	12.	3	are w shall shine like the brightness
1Co	1.	26	not many of you were w by human
Eph	5.	15	not as unwise people but as w,
WITHER → WITHERS

Ps	1.	3	and their leaves do not w.
Eze	47.	12	Their leaves will not w nor their
WITHERS → WITHER

Jn	15.	6	is thrown away like a branch and w;
1Pe	1.	24	The grass w, and the flower falls,
WITNESS → EYEWITNESSES, WITNESSES

Dt	19.	15	single w shall not suffice to convict
Rev	1.	5	faithful w, the firstborn of the dead,
WITNESSES → WITNESS

Mt	26.	60	though many false w came forward.
Heb	12.	1	surrounded by so great a cloud of w,
Rev	11.	3	my two w authority to prophesy
WIVES → WIFE

Eph	5.	22	W, be subject to your husbands as
1Pe	3.	1	W, in the same way, accept the
WOMAN → WOMEN

Ge	2.	22	he made into a w and brought her to
 	3.	15	enmity between you and the w,
Ps	113.	9	He gives the barren w a home,
Pr	11.	16	A gracious w gets honor,
 	31.	30	w who fears the LORD is to be praised.
Rev	12.	1	a w clothed with the sun,
WOMEN → WOMAN

Lk	1.	42	“Blessed are you among w,
 	23.	55	w who had come with him from
1Pe	3.	5	that the holy w who hoped in God
WONDERFUL → WONDERS

Ge	18.	14	Is anything too w for the LORD?
Isa	9.	6	named W Counselor, Mighty God,
WONDERS → WONDERFUL

Ex	3.	20	and strike Egypt with all my w that
Ps	136.	4	who alone does great w,
Jn	4.	48	signs and w you will not believe.”
2Th	2.	9	who uses all power, signs, lying w,
WORD → BYWORD, WORDS

Dt	30.	14	No, the w is very near to you;
Ps	119.	105	Your w is a lamp to my feet and
Pr	30.	5	Every w of God proves true;
Isa	40.	8	the w of our God will stand forever.
Jn	1.	1	In the beginning was the W, and the W was with God, and the W was God.
 	1.	14	the W became flesh and lived among
2Ti	2.	15	rightly explaining the w of truth.
Jas	1.	22	But be doers of the w,
Rev	19.	13	his name is called The W of God.
WORDS → WORD

Ex	20.	1	Then God spoke all these w:
Dt	11.	18	put these w of mine in your heart
Mt	24.	35	but my w will not pass away.
WORK → WORKS

Ge	2.	2	the seventh day God finished the w
Ex	20.	10	you shall not do any w—
Php	2.	12	w out your own salvation with fear
2Ti	3.	17	equipped for every good w.
WORKS → WORK

Gal	2.	16	and not by doing the w of the law,
 	5.	19	the w of the flesh are obvious:
Eph	2.	9	not the result of w, so that no one may
1Ti	6.	18	to do good, to be rich in good w,
WORLD

Mt	5.	14	“You are the light of the w.
 	16.	26	gain the whole w but forfeit their life?
Jn	1.	10	yet the w did not know him.
 	3.	16	loved the w that he gave his only Son,
 	8.	12	saying, “I am the light of the w.
1Jn	2.	15	not love the w or the things in the w.
Rev	11.	15	kingdom of the w has become the
WORRY

Mt	6.	25	do not w about your life,
 	10.	19	not w about how you are to speak
WORSHIP

Ex	20.	5	not bow down to them or w them;
Ps	100.	2	W the LORD with gladness;
Mt	4.	9	if you will fall down and w me.”
Jn	4.	24	who w him must w in spirit and truth.”
Ro	12.	1	which is your spiritual w.
WORTHY

2Sa	22.	4	LORD, who is w to be praised,
Eph	4.	1	to lead a life w of the calling
Rev	4.	11	“You are w, our Lord and God,
 	5.	12	W is the Lamb that was slaughtered
WOUNDS

1Pe	2.	24	by his w you have been healed.
WRAPPED

Mk	15.	46	the body, w it in the linen cloth,
Lk	2.	7	w him in bands of cloth,
WRATH

Nu	16.	46	For w has gone out from the LORD;
Ps	2.	5	Then he will speak to them in his w,
Pr	15.	1	A soft answer turns away w,
Zep	1.	15	That day will be a day of w,
Mt	3.	7	you to flee from the w to come?
Ro	1.	18	w of God is revealed from heaven
1Th	1.	10	rescues us from the w that is coming
Rev	6.	17	the great day of their w has come,
WRITE → WRITING, WRITTEN, WROTE

Ex	34.	27	LORD said to Moses: W these words;
Dt	6.	9	w them on the doorposts of your house
Pr	7.	3	w them on the tablet of your heart.
Jer	31.	33	and I will w it on their hearts;
Heb	8.	10	and w them on their hearts,
WRITING → WRITE

Ex	32.	16	and the w was the w of God,
WRITTEN → WRITE

Lk	24.	44	everything w about me in the law
Jn	21.	25	if every one of them were w down,
Rev	21.	27	are w in the Lamb’s book of life.
WRONG → WRONGED

Lk	23.	41	but this man has done nothing w.”
Ac	23.	9	“We find nothing w with this man.
WRONGED → WRONG

1Co	6.	7	Why not rather be w?
WROTE → WRITE

Ex	24.	4	And Moses w down all the words
Y

YEAR → YEARS

Ex	23.	14	Three times in the y you shall hold a
Heb	10.	1	continually offered y after y,
YEARS → YEAR

Ps	90.	4	For a thousand y in your sight are like
Jer	25.	12	Then after seventy y are completed,
Da	9.	2	of Jerusalem, namely, seventy y.
2Pe	3.	8	the Lord one day is like a thousand y,
Rev	20.	2	and bound him for a thousand y,
YEAST

Mt	16.	6	beware of the y of the Pharisees and
Gal	5.	9	A little y leavens the whole batch of
YESTERDAY

Heb	13.	8	Jesus Christ is the same y and today
YOKE

Mt	11.	30	my y is easy, and my burden is light.”
YOUTH → YOUNG

Ecc	12.	1	Remember your creator in the days of your y,
Z

ZEAL

Ps	69.	9	z for your house that has consumed me
Jn	2.	17	“Z for your house will consume me.
Ro	10.	2	testify that they have a z for God,
ZION

2Sa	5.	7	David took the stronghold of Z,
Ps	2.	6	I have set my king on Z, my holy hill.
Isa	28.	16	I am laying in Z a foundation stone,
Mic	4.	2	For out of Z shall go forth instruction,
Zec	9.	9	Rejoice greatly, O daughter Z!
Mt	21.	5	“Tell the daughter of Z,
Ro	11.	26	“Out of Z will come the Deliverer;
1Pe	2.	6	“See, I am laying in Z a stone,
Rev	14.	1	the Lamb, standing on Mount Z!
About the Author
CLIVE STAPLES LEWIS (1898–1963) was one of the intellectual giants of the twentieth century and arguably the most influential Christian writer of his day. He was a Fellow and Tutor in English literature at Oxford University until 1954 when he was unanimously elected to the Chair of Medieval and Renaissance English at Cambridge University, a position he held until his retirement. His major contributions in literary criticism, children’s literature, fantasy literature, and popular theology brought him international renown and acclaim. He wrote more than thirty books, allowing him to reach a vast audience, and his works continue to attract thousands of new readers every year. His most distinguished and popular accomplishments include The Chronicles of Narnia, Out of the Silent Planet, The Four Loves, The Screwtape Letters, and Mere Christianity.

Visit www.AuthorTracker.com for exclusive information on your favorite HarperCollins authors.

Copyright



The C. S. Lewis Bible
New Revised Standard Version
HarperOne
An Imprint of HarperCollinsPublishers

The C. S. Lewis Bible. Copyright © 2010 by HarperCollins Publishers.

All rights reserved under International and Pan-American Copyright Conventions. By payment of the required fees, you have been granted the nonexclusive, nontransferable right to access and read the text of this e-book on-screen. No part of this text may be reproduced, transmitted, downloaded, decompiled, reverse-engineered, or stored in or introduced into any information storage and retrieval system, in any form or by any means, whether electronic or mechanical, now known or hereinafter invented, without the express written permission of HarperCollins e-books.

EPub Edition © MAY 2011 ISBN: 978-0-06-221358-7

All excerpts by C. S. Lewis copyright © 2010 by C. S. Lewis Pte. Ltd. For details about where each reference was drawn from, see page 1455.

The C. S. Lewis Bible is an edition of the Holy Bible, New Revised Standard Version
Visit the NRSV Web site at www.nrsv.net
Visit the C. S. Lewis Web site at www.cslewis.com and the C. S. Lewis blog at www.booksbycslewis.com

New Revised Standard Version Bible, copyright © 1989 Division of Christian Education of the National Council of Churches of Christ in the United States of America.

The NRSV text may be quoted and/or reprinted up to and inclusive of five hundred (500) verses without expressed written permission of the publisher, provided the verses quoted do not amount to a complete book of the Bible or account for 50 percent of the written text of the total work in which they are quoted.

Notice of copyright must appear on the title or copyright page of the work as follows:

“The Scripture quotations contained herein are from the New Revised Standard Version Bible, copyright © 1989, Division of Christian Education of the National Council of Churches of Christ in the U.S.A. Used by permission. All rights reserved.”

When quotations from the NRSV text are used in nonsaleable media such as church bulletins, orders of service, posters, transparencies, or similar media, the initials (NRSV:CE) may be used at the end of each quotation. Quotations and/or reprints in excess of five hundred (500) verses (as well as other permission requests) must be approved in writing by the NRSV Permissions Office, National Council of Churches of Christ in the U.S.A., 475 Riverside Drive, New York, NY, 10115–0050.

The New Revised Standard Version license holder is HarperOne, 353 Sacramento Street, San Francisco, CA 94111–3653.

HarperCollins website: http://www.harpercollins.com

HarperCollins®,®, and HarperOne™ are trademarks of HarperCollins Publishers.

FIRST EDITION

Library of Congress cataloging-in-publication data is available upon request.




About the Publisher
Australia
HarperCollins Publishers (Australia) Pty. Ltd.
Level 13, 201 Elizabeth Street
Sydney, NSW 2000, Australia
http://www.harpercollins.com.au


Canada
HarperCollins Canada
2 Bloor Street East - 20th Floor
Toronto, ON, M4W, 1A8, Canada
http://www.harpercollins.ca


New Zealand
HarperCollins Publishers (New Zealand) Limited
P.O. Box 1
Auckland, New Zealand
http://www.harpercollins.co.nz


United Kingdom
HarperCollins Publishers Ltd.
77-85 Fulham Palace Road
London, W6 8JB, UK
http://www.harpercollins.co.uk


United States
HarperCollins Publishers Inc.
10 East 53rd Street
New York, NY 10022
http://www.harpercollins.com


THE

C. S. Lewis

BIBLE

 

 



 

NEW REVISED STANDARD VERSION

 

 

 

 



Notes and Introductions
Alphabetical List of the Books of the Bible

Abbreviations

Editors and Advisory Board

Preface: Why a C. S. Lewis Bible?, by Douglas Gresham

Introduction: C. S. Lewis and the Bible, by Jerry Root

C. S. Lewis as a Guide for Bible Reading

How to Read The C. S. Lewis Bible

The Spiritual Journey of C. S. Lewis, by Jerry Root

Editor’s Note

To the Reader

ALPHABETICAL LIST
OF THE BOOKS OF THE BIBLE
Acts

Amos

1 Chronicles

2 Chronicles

Colossians

1 Corinthians

2 Corinthians

Daniel

Deuteronomy

Ecclesiastes

Ephesians

Esther

Exodus

Ezekiel

Ezra

Galatians

Genesis

Habakkuk

Haggai

Hebrews

Hosea

Isaiah

James

Jeremiah

Job

Joel

John

1 John

2 John

3 John

Jonah

Joshua

Jude

Judges

1 Kings

2 Kings

Lamentations

Leviticus

Luke

Malachi

Mark

Matthew

Micah

Nahum

Nehemiah

Numbers

Obadiah

1 Peter

2 Peter

Philemon

Philippians

Proverbs

Psalms

Revelation

Romans

Ruth

1 Samuel

2 Samuel

Song of Solomon

1 Thessalonians

2 Thessalonians

1 Timothy

2 Timothy

Titus

Zechariah

Zephaniah

EZRA
Ezra 1

Ezra 2

Ezra 3

Ezra 4

Ezra 5

Ezra 6

Ezra 7

Ezra 8

Ezra 9

Ezra 10

Ezra 1
In the first year of King Cyrus of Persia, in order that the word of the LORD by the mouth of Jeremiah might be accomplished, the LORD stirred up the spirit of King Cyrus of Persia so that he sent a herald throughout all his kingdom, and also in a written edict declared:

2 “Thus says King Cyrus of Persia: The LORD, the God of heaven, has given me all the kingdoms of the earth, and he has charged me to build him a house at Jerusalem in Judah. 3Any of those among you who are of his people—may their God be with them!—are now permitted to go up to Jerusalem in Judah, and rebuild the house of the LORD, the God of Israel—he is the God who is in Jerusalem; 4and let all survivors, in whatever place they reside, be assisted by the people of their place with silver and gold, with goods and with animals, besides freewill offerings for the house of God in Jerusalem.”

5 The heads of the families of Judah and Benjamin, and the priests and the Levites—everyone whose spirit God had stirred—got ready to go up and rebuild the house of the LORD in Jerusalem. 6All their neighbors aided them with silver vessels, with gold, with goods, with animals, and with valuable gifts, besides all that was freely offered. 7King Cyrus himself brought out the vessels of the house of the LORD that Nebuchadnezzar had carried away from Jerusalem and placed in the house of his gods. 8King Cyrus of Persia had them released into the charge of Mithredath the treasurer, who counted them out to Sheshbazzar the prince of Judah. 9And this was the inventory: gold basins, thirty; silver basins, one thousand; knives,[1] twenty-nine; 10gold bowls, thirty; other silver bowls, four hundred ten; other vessels, one thousand; 11the total of the gold and silver vessels was five thousand four hundred. All these Sheshbazzar brought up, when the exiles were brought up from Babylonia to Jerusalem.

Ezra 2
Now these were the people of the province who came from those captive exiles whom King Nebuchadnezzar of Babylon had carried captive to Babylonia; they returned to Jerusalem and Judah, all to their own towns. 2They came with Zerubbabel, Jeshua, Nehemiah, Seraiah, Reelaiah, Mordecai, Bilshan, Mispar, Bigvai, Rehum, and Baanah.

The number of the Israelite people: 3the descendants of Parosh, two thousand one hundred seventy-two. 4Of Shephatiah, three hundred seventy-two. 5Of Arah, seven hundred seventy-five. 6Of Pahath-moab, namely the descendants of Jeshua and Joab, two thousand eight hundred twelve. 7Of Elam, one thousand two hundred fifty-four. 8Of Zattu, nine hundred forty-five. 9Of Zaccai, seven hundred sixty. 10Of Bani, six hundred forty-two. 11Of Bebai, six hundred twenty-three. 12Of Azgad, one thousand two hundred twenty-two. 13Of Adonikam, six hundred sixty-six. 14Of Bigvai, two thousand fifty-six. 15Of Adin, four hundred fifty-four. 16Of Ater, namely of Hezekiah, ninety-eight. 17Of Bezai, three hundred twenty-three. 18Of Jorah, one hundred twelve. 19Of Hashum, two hundred twenty-three. 20Of Gibbar, ninety-five. 21Of Bethlehem, one hundred twenty-three. 22The people of Netophah, fifty-six. 23Of Anathoth, one hundred twenty-eight. 24The descendants of Azmaveth, forty-two. 25Of Kiriatharim, Chephirah, and Beeroth, seven hundred forty-three. 26Of Ramah and Geba, six hundred twenty-one. 27The people of Michmas, one hundred twenty-two. 28Of Bethel and Ai, two hundred twenty-three. 29The descendants of Nebo, fifty-two. 30Of Magbish, one hundred fifty-six. 31Of the other Elam, one thousand two hundred fifty-four. 32Of Harim, three hundred twenty. 33Of Lod, Hadid, and Ono, seven hundred twenty-five. 34Of Jericho, three hundred forty-five. 35Of Senaah, three thousand six hundred thirty.

36 The priests: the descendants of Jedaiah, of the house of Jeshua, nine hundred seventy-three. 37Of Immer, one thousand fifty-two. 38Of Pashhur, one thousand two hundred forty-seven. 39Of Harim, one thousand seventeen.

40 The Levites: the descendants of Jeshua and Kadmiel, of the descendants of Hodaviah, seventy-four. 41The singers: the descendants of Asaph, one hundred twenty-eight. 42The descendants of the gatekeepers: of Shallum, of Ater, of Talmon, of Akkub, of Hatita, and of Shobai, in all one hundred thirty-nine.

43 The temple servants: the descendants of Ziha, Hasupha, Tabbaoth, 44Keros, Siaha, Padon, 45Lebanah, Hagabah, Akkub, 46Hagab, Shamlai, Hanan, 47Giddel, Gahar, Reaiah, 48Rezin, Nekoda, Gazzam, 49Uzza, Paseah, Besai, 50Asnah, Meunim, Nephisim, 51Bakbuk, Hakupha, Harhur, 52Bazluth, Mehida, Harsha, 53Barkos, Sisera, Temah, 54Neziah, and Hatipha.

55 The descendants of Solomon’s servants: Sotai, Hassophereth, Peruda, 56Jaalah, Darkon, Giddel, 57Shephatiah, Hattil, Pochereth-hazzebaim, and Ami.

58 All the temple servants and the descendants of Solomon’s servants were three hundred ninety-two.

59 The following were those who came up from Tel-melah, Tel-harsha, Cherub, Addan, and Immer, though they could not prove their families or their descent, whether they belonged to Israel: 60the descendants of Delaiah, Tobiah, and Nekoda, six hundred fifty-two. 61Also, of the descendants of the priests: the descendants of Habaiah, Hakkoz, and Barzillai (who had married one of the daughters of Barzillai the Gileadite, and was called by their name). 62These looked for their entries in the genealogical records, but they were not found there, and so they were excluded from the priesthood as unclean; 63the governor told them that they were not to partake of the most holy food, until there should be a priest to consult Urim and Thummim.

64 The whole assembly together was forty-two thousand three hundred sixty, 65besides their male and female servants, of whom there were seven thousand three hundred thirty-seven; and they had two hundred male and female singers. 66They had seven hundred thirty-six horses, two hundred forty-five mules, 67four hundred thirty-five camels, and six thousand seven hundred twenty donkeys.

68 As soon as they came to the house of the LORD in Jerusalem, some of the heads of families made freewill offerings for the house of God, to erect it on its site. 69According to their resources they gave to the building fund sixty-one thousand darics of gold, five thousand minas of silver, and one hundred priestly robes.

70 The priests, the Levites, and some of the people lived in Jerusalem and its vicinity;[2] and the singers, the gatekeepers, and the temple servants lived in their towns, and all Israel in their towns.

Ezra 3
When the seventh month came, and the Israelites were in the towns, the people gathered together in Jerusalem. 2Then Jeshua son of Jozadak, with his fellow priests, and Zerubbabel son of Shealtiel with his kin set out to build the altar of the God of Israel, to offer burnt offerings on it, as prescribed in the law of Moses the man of God. 3They set up the altar on its foundation, because they were in dread of the neighboring peoples, and they offered burnt offerings upon it to the LORD, morning and evening. 4And they kept the festival of booths,[3] as prescribed, and offered the daily burnt offerings by number according to the ordinance, as required for each day, 5and after that the regular burnt offerings, the offerings at the new moon and at all the sacred festivals of the LORD, and the offerings of everyone who made a freewill offering to the LORD. 6From the first day of the seventh month they began to offer burnt offerings to the LORD. But the foundation of the temple of the LORD was not yet laid. 7So they gave money to the masons and the carpenters, and food, drink, and oil to the Sidonians and the Tyrians to bring cedar trees from Lebanon to the sea, to Joppa, according to the grant that they had from King Cyrus of Persia.

8 In the second year after their arrival at the house of God at Jerusalem, in the second month, Zerubbabel son of Shealtiel and Jeshua son of Jozadak made a beginning, together with the rest of their people, the priests and the Levites and all who had come to Jerusalem from the captivity. They appointed the Levites, from twenty years old and upward, to have the oversight of the work on the house of the LORD. 9And Jeshua with his sons and his kin, and Kadmiel and his sons, Binnui and Hodaviah[4] along with the sons of Henadad, the Levites, their sons and kin, together took charge of the workers in the house of God.

10 When the builders laid the foundation of the temple of the LORD, the priests in their vestments were stationed to praise the LORD with trumpets, and the Levites, the sons of Asaph, with cymbals, according to the directions of King David of Israel; 11and they sang responsively, praising and giving thanks to the LORD,

“For he is good,

for his steadfast love endures forever toward Israel.”



For reflection: Ezra 3:10–11

Praise is the mode of love which always has some element of joy in it.

—from A Grief Observed



And all the people responded with a great shout when they praised the LORD, because the foundation of the house of the LORD was laid. 12But many of the priests and Levites and heads of families, old people who had seen the first house on its foundations, wept with a loud voice when they saw this house, though many shouted aloud for joy, 13so that the people could not distinguish the sound of the joyful shout from the sound of the people’s weeping, for the people shouted so loudly that the sound was heard far away.

Ezra 4
When the adversaries of Judah and Benjamin heard that the returned exiles were building a temple to the LORD, the God of Israel, 2they approached Zerubbabel and the heads of families and said to them, “Let us build with you, for we worship your God as you do, and we have been sacrificing to him ever since the days of King Esar-haddon of Assyria who brought us here.” 3But Zerubbabel, Jeshua, and the rest of the heads of families in Israel said to them, “You shall have no part with us in building a house to our God; but we alone will build to the LORD, the God of Israel, as King Cyrus of Persia has commanded us.”

4 Then the people of the land discouraged the people of Judah, and made them afraid to build, 5and they bribed officials to frustrate their plan throughout the reign of King Cyrus of Persia and until the reign of King Darius of Persia.

6 In the reign of Ahasuerus, in his accession year, they wrote an accusation against the inhabitants of Judah and Jerusalem.

7 And in the days of Artaxerxes, Bishlam and Mithredath and Tabeel and the rest of their associates wrote to King Artaxerxes of Persia; the letter was written in Aramaic and translated.[5] 8Rehum the royal deputy and Shimshai the scribe wrote a letter against Jerusalem to King Artaxerxes as follows 9(then Rehum the royal deputy, Shimshai the scribe, and the rest of their associates, the judges, the envoys, the officials, the Persians, the people of Erech, the Babylonians, the people of Susa, that is, the Elamites, 10and the rest of the nations whom the great and noble Osnappar deported and settled in the cities of Samaria and in the rest of the province Beyond the River wrote—and now 11this is a copy of the letter that they sent):

“To King Artaxerxes: Your servants, the people of the province Beyond the River, send greeting. And now 12may it be known to the king that the Jews who came up from you to us have gone to Jerusalem. They are rebuilding that rebellious and wicked city; they are finishing the walls and repairing the foundations. 13Now may it be known to the king that, if this city is rebuilt and the walls finished, they will not pay tribute, custom, or toll, and the royal revenue will be reduced. 14Now because we share the salt of the palace and it is not fitting for us to witness the king’s dishonor, therefore we send and inform the king, 15so that a search may be made in the annals of your ancestors. You will discover in the annals that this is a rebellious city, hurtful to kings and provinces, and that sedition was stirred up in it from long ago. On that account this city was laid waste. 16We make known to the king that, if this city is rebuilt and its walls finished, you will then have no possession in the province Beyond the River.”

17 The king sent an answer: “To Rehum the royal deputy and Shimshai the scribe and the rest of their associates who live in Samaria and in the rest of the province Beyond the River, greeting. And now 18the letter that you sent to us has been read in translation before me. 19So I made a decree, and someone searched and discovered that this city has risen against kings from long ago, and that rebellion and sedition have been made in it. 20Jerusalem has had mighty kings who ruled over the whole province Beyond the River, to whom tribute, custom, and toll were paid. 21Therefore issue an order that these people be made to cease, and that this city not be rebuilt, until I make a decree. 22Moreover, take care not to be slack in this matter; why should damage grow to the hurt of the king?”

23 Then when the copy of King Artaxerxes’ letter was read before Rehum and the scribe Shimshai and their associates, they hurried to the Jews in Jerusalem and by force and power made them cease. 24At that time the work on the house of God in Jerusalem stopped and was discontinued until the second year of the reign of King Darius of Persia.

Ezra 5
Now the prophets, Haggai[6] and Zechariah son of Iddo, prophesied to the Jews who were in Judah and Jerusalem, in the name of the God of Israel who was over them. 2Then Zerubbabel son of Shealtiel and Jeshua son of Jozadak set out to rebuild the house of God in Jerusalem; and with them were the prophets of God, helping them.

3 At the same time Tattenai the governor of the province Beyond the River and Shethar-bozenai and their associates came to them and spoke to them thus, “Who gave you a decree to build this house and to finish this structure?” 4They[7] also asked them this, “What are the names of the men who are building this building?” 5But the eye of their God was upon the elders of the Jews, and they did not stop them until a report reached Darius and then answer was returned by letter in reply to it.

6 The copy of the letter that Tattenai the governor of the province Beyond the River and Shethar-bozenai and his associates the envoys who were in the province Beyond the River sent to King Darius; 7they sent him a report, in which was written as follows: “To Darius the king, all peace! 8May it be known to the king that we went to the province of Judah, to the house of the great God. It is being built of hewn stone, and timber is laid in the walls; this work is being done diligently and prospers in their hands. 9Then we spoke to those elders and asked them, ‘Who gave you a decree to build this house and to finish this structure?’ 10We also asked them their names, for your information, so that we might write down the names of the men at their head. 11This was their reply to us: ‘We are the servants of the God of heaven and earth, and we are rebuilding the house that was built many years ago, which a great king of Israel built and finished. 12But because our ancestors had angered the God of heaven, he gave them into the hand of King Nebuchadnezzar of Babylon, the Chaldean, who destroyed this house and carried away the people to Babylonia. 13However, King Cyrus of Babylon, in the first year of his reign, made a decree that this house of God should be rebuilt. 14Moreover, the gold and silver vessels of the house of God, which Nebuchadnezzar had taken out of the temple in Jerusalem and had brought into the temple of Babylon, these King Cyrus took out of the temple of Babylon, and they were delivered to a man named Sheshbazzar, whom he had made governor. 15He said to him, “Take these vessels; go and put them in the temple in Jerusalem, and let the house of God be rebuilt on its site.” 16Then this Sheshbazzar came and laid the foundations of the house of God in Jerusalem; and from that time until now it has been under construction, and it is not yet finished.’ 17And now, if it seems good to the king, have a search made in the royal archives there in Babylon, to see whether a decree was issued by King Cyrus for the rebuilding of this house of God in Jerusalem. Let the king send us his pleasure in this matter.”

Ezra 6
Then King Darius made a decree, and they searched the archives where the documents were stored in Babylon. 2But it was in Ecbatana, the capital in the province of Media, that a scroll was found on which this was written: “A record. 3In the first year of his reign, King Cyrus issued a decree: Concerning the house of God at Jerusalem, let the house be rebuilt, the place where sacrifices are offered and burnt offerings are brought;[8] its height shall be sixty cubits and its width sixty cubits, 4with three courses of hewn stones and one course of timber; let the cost be paid from the royal treasury. 5Moreover, let the gold and silver vessels of the house of God, which Nebuchadnezzar took out of the temple in Jerusalem and brought to Babylon, be restored and brought back to the temple in Jerusalem, each to its place; you shall put them in the house of God.”

6 “Now you, Tattenai, governor of the province Beyond the River, Shethar-bozenai, and you, their associates, the envoys in the province Beyond the River, keep away; 7let the work on this house of God alone; let the governor of the Jews and the elders of the Jews rebuild this house of God on its site. 8Moreover I make a decree regarding what you shall do for these elders of the Jews for the rebuilding of this house of God: the cost is to be paid to these people, in full and without delay, from the royal revenue, the tribute of the province Beyond the River. 9Whatever is needed—young bulls, rams, or sheep for burnt offerings to the God of heaven, wheat, salt, wine, or oil, as the priests in Jerusalem require—let that be given to them day by day without fail, 10so that they may offer pleasing sacrifices to the God of heaven, and pray for the life of the king and his children. 11Furthermore I decree that if anyone alters this edict, a beam shall be pulled out of the house of the perpetrator, who then shall be impaled on it. The house shall be made a dunghill. 12May the God who has established his name there overthrow any king or people that shall put forth a hand to alter this, or to destroy this house of God in Jerusalem. I, Darius, make a decree; let it be done with all diligence.”

13 Then, according to the word sent by King Darius, Tattenai, the governor of the province Beyond the River, Shethar-bozenai, and their associates did with all diligence what King Darius had ordered. 14So the elders of the Jews built and prospered, through the prophesying of the prophet Haggai and Zechariah son of Iddo. They finished their building by command of the God of Israel and by decree of Cyrus, Darius, and King Artaxerxes of Persia; 15and this house was finished on the third day of the month of Adar, in the sixth year of the reign of King Darius.

16 The people of Israel, the priests and the Levites, and the rest of the returned exiles, celebrated the dedication of this house of God with joy. 17They offered at the dedication of this house of God one hundred bulls, two hundred rams, four hundred lambs, and as a sin offering for all Israel, twelve male goats, according to the number of the tribes of Israel. 18Then they set the priests in their divisions and the Levites in their courses for the service of God at Jerusalem, as it is written in the book of Moses.

19 On the fourteenth day of the first month the returned exiles kept the passover. 20For both the priests and the Levites had purified themselves; all of them were clean. So they killed the passover lamb for all the returned exiles, for their fellow priests, and for themselves. 21It was eaten by the people of Israel who had returned from exile, and also by all who had joined them and separated themselves from the pollutions of the nations of the land to worship the LORD, the God of Israel. 22With joy they celebrated the festival of unleavened bread seven days; for the LORD had made them joyful, and had turned the heart of the king of Assyria to them, so that he aided them in the work on the house of God, the God of Israel.

Ezra 7
After this, in the reign of King Artaxerxes of Persia, Ezra son of Seraiah, son of Azariah, son of Hilkiah, 2son of Shallum, son of Zadok, son of Ahitub, 3son of Amariah, son of Azariah, son of Meraioth, 4son of Zerahiah, son of Uzzi, son of Bukki, 5son of Abishua, son of Phinehas, son of Eleazar, son of the chief priest Aaron— 6this Ezra went up from Babylonia. He was a scribe skilled in the law of Moses that the LORD the God of Israel had given; and the king granted him all that he asked, for the hand of the LORD his God was upon him.

7 Some of the people of Israel, and some of the priests and Levites, the singers and gatekeepers, and the temple servants also went up to Jerusalem, in the seventh year of King Artaxerxes. 8They came to Jerusalem in the fifth month, which was in the seventh year of the king. 9On the first day of the first month the journey up from Babylon was begun, and on the first day of the fifth month he came to Jerusalem, for the gracious hand of his God was upon him. 10For Ezra had set his heart to study the law of the LORD, and to do it, and to teach the statutes and ordinances in Israel.

11 This is a copy of the letter that King Artaxerxes gave to the priest Ezra, the scribe, a scholar of the text of the commandments of the LORD and his statutes for Israel: 12“Artaxerxes, king of kings, to the priest Ezra, the scribe of the law of the God of heaven: Peace.[9] And now 13I decree that any of the people of Israel or their priests or Levites in my kingdom who freely offers to go to Jerusalem may go with you. 14For you are sent by the king and his seven counselors to make inquiries about Judah and Jerusalem according to the law of your God, which is in your hand, 15and also to convey the silver and gold that the king and his counselors have freely offered to the God of Israel, whose dwelling is in Jerusalem, 16with all the silver and gold that you shall find in the whole province of Babylonia, and with the freewill offerings of the people and the priests, given willingly for the house of their God in Jerusalem. 17With this money, then, you shall with all diligence buy bulls, rams, and lambs, and their grain offerings and their drink offerings, and you shall offer them on the altar of the house of your God in Jerusalem. 18Whatever seems good to you and your colleagues to do with the rest of the silver and gold, you may do, according to the will of your God. 19The vessels that have been given you for the service of the house of your God, you shall deliver before the God of Jerusalem. 20And whatever else is required for the house of your God, which you are responsible for providing, you may provide out of the king’s treasury.

21 “I, King Artaxerxes, decree to all the treasurers in the province Beyond the River: Whatever the priest Ezra, the scribe of the law of the God of heaven, requires of you, let it be done with all diligence, 22up to one hundred talents of silver, one hundred cors of wheat, one hundred baths[10] of wine, one hundred baths[10] of oil, and unlimited salt. 23Whatever is commanded by the God of heaven, let it be done with zeal for the house of the God of heaven, or wrath will come upon the realm of the king and his heirs. 24We also notify you that it shall not be lawful to impose tribute, custom, or toll on any of the priests, the Levites, the singers, the doorkeepers, the temple servants, or other servants of this house of God.

25 “And you, Ezra, according to the God-given wisdom you possess, appoint magistrates and judges who may judge all the people in the province Beyond the River who know the laws of your God; and you shall teach those who do not know them. 26All who will not obey the law of your God and the law of the king, let judgment be strictly executed on them, whether for death or for banishment or for confiscation of their goods or for imprisonment.”

27 Blessed be the LORD, the God of our ancestors, who put such a thing as this into the heart of the king to glorify the house of the LORD in Jerusalem, 28and who extended to me steadfast love before the king and his counselors, and before all the king’s mighty officers. I took courage, for the hand of the LORD my God was upon me, and I gathered leaders from Israel to go up with me.

DO EVERYTHING TO THE GLORY OF GOD
Most men must glorify God by doing to His glory something which is not per se an act of glorifying but which becomes so by being offered. If, as I now hope, cultural activities are innocent and even useful, then they also (like the sweeping of the room in Herbert’s poem) can be done to the Lord. The work of a charwoman and the work of a poet become spiritual in the same way and on the same condition.

—from “Christianity and Culture,” Christian Reflections

For reflection  Ezra 7:23

Ezra 8
These are their family heads, and this is the genealogy of those who went up with me from Babylonia, in the reign of King Artaxerxes: 2Of the descendants of Phinehas, Gershom. Of Ithamar, Daniel. Of David, Hattush, 3of the descendants of Shecaniah. Of Parosh, Zechariah, with whom were registered one hundred fifty males. 4Of the descendants of Pahath-moab, Eliehoenai son of Zerahiah, and with him two hundred males. 5Of the descendants of Zattu,[11] Shecaniah son of Jahaziel, and with him three hundred males. 6Of the descendants of Adin, Ebed son of Jonathan, and with him fifty males. 7Of the descendants of Elam, Jeshaiah son of Athaliah, and with him seventy males. 8Of the descendants of Shephatiah, Zebadiah son of Michael, and with him eighty males. 9Of the descendants of Joab, Obadiah son of Jehiel, and with him two hundred eighteen males. 10Of the descendants of Bani,[12] Shelomith son of Josiphiah, and with him one hundred sixty males. 11Of the descendants of Bebai, Zechariah son of Bebai, and with him twenty-eight males. 12Of the descendants of Azgad, Johanan son of Hakkatan, and with him one hundred ten males. 13Of the descendants of Adonikam, those who came later, their names being Eliphelet, Jeuel, and Shemaiah, and with them sixty males. 14Of the descendants of Bigvai, Uthai and Zaccur, and with them seventy males.

15 I gathered them by the river that runs to Ahava, and there we camped three days. As I reviewed the people and the priests, I found there none of the descendants of Levi. 16Then I sent for Eliezer, Ariel, Shemaiah, Elnathan, Jarib, Elnathan, Nathan, Zechariah, and Meshullam, who were leaders, and for Joiarib and Elnathan, who were wise, 17and sent them to Iddo, the leader at the place called Casiphia, telling them what to say to Iddo and his colleagues the temple servants at Casiphia, namely, to send us ministers for the house of our God. 18Since the gracious hand of our God was upon us, they brought us a man of discretion, of the descendants of Mahli son of Levi son of Israel, namely Sherebiah, with his sons and kin, eighteen; 19also Hashabiah and with him Jeshaiah of the descendants of Merari, with his kin and their sons, twenty; 20besides two hundred twenty of the temple servants, whom David and his officials had set apart to attend the Levites. These were all mentioned by name.

21 Then I proclaimed a fast there, at the river Ahava, that we might deny ourselves[13] before our God, to seek from him a safe journey for ourselves, our children, and all our possessions. 22For I was ashamed to ask the king for a band of soldiers and cavalry to protect us against the enemy on our way, since we had told the king that the hand of our God is gracious to all who seek him, but his power and his wrath are against all who forsake him. 23So we fasted and petitioned our God for this, and he listened to our entreaty.

24 Then I set apart twelve of the leading priests: Sherebiah, Hashabiah, and ten of their kin with them. 25And I weighed out to them the silver and the gold and the vessels, the offering for the house of our God that the king, his counselors, his lords, and all Israel there present had offered; 26I weighed out into their hand six hundred fifty talents of silver, and one hundred silver vessels worth . . . talents,[14] and one hundred talents of gold, 27twenty gold bowls worth a thousand darics, and two vessels of fine polished bronze as precious as gold. 28And I said to them, “You are holy to the LORD, and the vessels are holy; and the silver and the gold are a freewill offering to the LORD, the God of your ancestors. 29Guard them and keep them until you weigh them before the chief priests and the Levites and the heads of families in Israel at Jerusalem, within the chambers of the house of the LORD.” 30So the priests and the Levites took over the silver, the gold, and the vessels as they were weighed out, to bring them to Jerusalem, to the house of our God.

31 Then we left the river Ahava on the twelfth day of the first month, to go to Jerusalem; the hand of our God was upon us, and he delivered us from the hand of the enemy and from ambushes along the way. 32We came to Jerusalem and remained there three days. 33On the fourth day, within the house of our God, the silver, the gold, and the vessels were weighed into the hands of the priest Meremoth son of Uriah, and with him was Eleazar son of Phinehas, and with them were the Levites, Jozabad son of Jeshua and Noadiah son of Binnui. 34The total was counted and weighed, and the weight of everything was recorded.

35 At that time those who had come from captivity, the returned exiles, offered burnt offerings to the God of Israel, twelve bulls for all Israel, ninety-six rams, seventy-seven lambs, and as a sin offering twelve male goats; all this was a burnt offering to the LORD. 36They also delivered the king’s commissions to the king’s satraps and to the governors of the province Beyond the River; and they supported the people and the house of God.

Ezra 9
After these things had been done, the officials approached me and said, “The people of Israel, the priests, and the Levites have not separated themselves from the peoples of the lands with their abominations, from the Canaanites, the Hittites, the Perizzites, the Jebusites, the Ammonites, the Moabites, the Egyptians, and the Amorites. 2For they have taken some of their daughters as wives for themselves and for their sons. Thus the holy seed has mixed itself with the peoples of the lands, and in this faithlessness the officials and leaders have led the way.” 3When I heard this, I tore my garment and my mantle, and pulled hair from my head and beard, and sat appalled. 4Then all who trembled at the words of the God of Israel, because of the faithlessness of the returned exiles, gathered around me while I sat appalled until the evening sacrifice.

5 At the evening sacrifice I got up from my fasting, with my garments and my mantle torn, and fell on my knees, spread out my hands to the LORD my God, 6and said,

“O my God, I am too ashamed and embarrassed to lift my face to you, my God, for our iniquities have risen higher than our heads, and our guilt has mounted up to the heavens. 7From the days of our ancestors to this day we have been deep in guilt, and for our iniquities we, our kings, and our priests have been handed over to the kings of the lands, to the sword, to captivity, to plundering, and to utter shame, as is now the case. 8But now for a brief moment favor has been shown by the LORD our God, who has left us a remnant, and given us a stake in his holy place, in order that he[15] may brighten our eyes and grant us a little sustenance in our slavery. 9For we are slaves; yet our God has not forsaken us in our slavery, but has extended to us his steadfast love before the kings of Persia, to give us new life to set up the house of our God, to repair its ruins, and to give us a wall in Judea and Jerusalem.



For reflection: Ezra 9:8

There is always something left, a “remnant,” a “leaven,” “the Trojan few, the leavings of Achilles’ spear.” Good is hard to preserve: but it is also terribly hard to eradicate completely.

—from “Williams and the Arthuriad,” Arthurian Torso



10 “And now, our God, what shall we say after this? For we have forsaken your commandments, 11which you commanded by your servants the prophets, saying, ‘The land that you are entering to possess is a land unclean with the pollutions of the peoples of the lands, with their abominations. They have filled it from end to end with their uncleanness. 12Therefore do not give your daughters to their sons, neither take their daughters for your sons, and never seek their peace or prosperity, so that you may be strong and eat the good of the land and leave it for an inheritance to your children forever.’ 13After all that has come upon us for our evil deeds and for our great guilt, seeing that you, our God, have punished us less than our iniquities deserved and have given us such a remnant as this, 14shall we break your commandments again and intermarry with the peoples who practice these abominations? Would you not be angry with us until you destroy us without remnant or survivor? 15O LORD, God of Israel, you are just, but we have escaped as a remnant, as is now the case. Here we are before you in our guilt, though no one can face you because of this.”

Ezra 10
While Ezra prayed and made confession, weeping and throwing himself down before the house of God, a very great assembly of men, women, and children gathered to him out of Israel; the people also wept bitterly. 2Shecaniah son of Jehiel, of the descendants of Elam, addressed Ezra, saying, “We have broken faith with our God and have married foreign women from the peoples of the land, but even now there is hope for Israel in spite of this. 3So now let us make a covenant with our God to send away all these wives and their children, according to the counsel of my lord and of those who tremble at the commandment of our God; and let it be done according to the law. 4Take action, for it is your duty, and we are with you; be strong, and do it.” 5Then Ezra stood up and made the leading priests, the Levites, and all Israel swear that they would do as had been said. So they swore.



For reflection: Ezra 10:1–4

Every uncorrected error and unrepented sin is, in its own right, a fountain of fresh error and fresh sin flowing on to the end of time.

—from The Problem of Pain



6 Then Ezra withdrew from before the house of God, and went to the chamber of Jehohanan son of Eliashib, where he spent the night.[16] He did not eat bread or drink water, for he was mourning over the faithlessness of the exiles. 7They made a proclamation throughout Judah and Jerusalem to all the returned exiles that they should assemble at Jerusalem, 8and that if any did not come within three days, by order of the officials and the elders all their property should be forfeited, and they themselves banned from the congregation of the exiles.

9 Then all the people of Judah and Benjamin assembled at Jerusalem within the three days; it was the ninth month, on the twentieth day of the month. All the people sat in the open square before the house of God, trembling because of this matter and because of the heavy rain. 10Then Ezra the priest stood up and said to them, “You have trespassed and married foreign women, and so increased the guilt of Israel. 11Now make confession to the LORD the God of your ancestors, and do his will; separate yourselves from the peoples of the land and from the foreign wives.” 12Then all the assembly answered with a loud voice, “It is so; we must do as you have said. 13But the people are many, and it is a time of heavy rain; we cannot stand in the open. Nor is this a task for one day or for two, for many of us have transgressed in this matter. 14Let our officials represent the whole assembly, and let all in our towns who have taken foreign wives come at appointed times, and with them the elders and judges of every town, until the fierce wrath of our God on this account is averted from us.” 15Only Jonathan son of Asahel and Jahzeiah son of Tikvah opposed this, and Meshullam and Shabbethai the Levites supported them.

16 Then the returned exiles did so. Ezra the priest selected men,[17] heads of families, according to their families, each of them designated by name. On the first day of the tenth month they sat down to examine the matter. 17By the first day of the first month they had come to the end of all the men who had married foreign women.

18 There were found of the descendants of the priests who had married foreign women, of the descendants of Jeshua son of Jozadak and his brothers: Maaseiah, Eliezer, Jarib, and Gedaliah. 19They pledged themselves to send away their wives, and their guilt offering was a ram of the flock for their guilt. 20Of the descendants of Immer: Hanani and Zebadiah. 21Of the descendants of Harim: Maaseiah, Elijah, Shemaiah, Jehiel, and Uzziah. 22Of the descendants of Pashhur: Elioenai, Maaseiah, Ishmael, Nethanel, Jozabad, and Elasah.

23 Of the Levites: Jozabad, Shimei, Kelaiah (that is, Kelita), Pethahiah, Judah, and Eliezer. 24Of the singers: Eliashib. Of the gatekeepers: Shallum, Telem, and Uri.

25 And of Israel: of the descendants of Parosh: Ramiah, Izziah, Malchijah, Mijamin, Eleazar, Hashabiah,[18] and Benaiah. 26Of the descendants of Elam: Mattaniah, Zechariah, Jehiel, Abdi, Jeremoth, and Elijah. 27Of the descendants of Zattu: Elioenai, Eliashib, Mattaniah, Jeremoth, Zabad, and Aziza. 28Of the descendants of Bebai: Jehohanan, Hananiah, Zabbai, and Athlai. 29Of the descendants of Bani: Meshullam, Malluch, Adaiah, Jashub, Sheal, and Jeremoth. 30Of the descendants of Pahath-moab: Adna, Chelal, Benaiah, Maaseiah, Mattaniah, Bezalel, Binnui, and Manasseh. 31Of the descendants of Harim: Eliezer, Isshijah, Malchijah, Shemaiah, Shimeon, 32Benjamin, Malluch, and Shemariah. 33Of the descendants of Hashum: Mattenai, Mattattah, Zabad, Eliphelet, Jeremai, Manasseh, and Shimei. 34Of the descendants of Bani: Maadai, Amram, Uel, 35Benaiah, Bedeiah, Cheluhi, 36Vaniah, Meremoth, Eliashib, 37Mattaniah, Mattenai, and Jaasu. 38Of the descendants of Binnui:[19] Shimei, 39Shelemiah, Nathan, Adaiah, 40Machnadebai, Shashai, Sharai, 41Azarel, Shelemiah, Shemariah, 42Shallum, Amariah, and Joseph. 43Of the descendants of Nebo: Jeiel, Mattithiah, Zabad, Zebina, Jaddai, Joel, and Benaiah. 44All these had married foreign women, and they sent them away with their children.[20]

[1]  Vg: Meaning of Heb uncertain

[2]  1 Esdras 5.46: Heb lacks lived in Jerusalem and its vicinity

[3]  Or tabernacles; Heb succoth

[4]  Compare 2.40; Neh 7.43; 1 Esdras 5.58: Heb sons of Judah

[5]  Heb adds in Aramaic, indicating that 4.8– 6.18 is in Aramaic. Another interpretation is The letter was written in the Aramaic script and set forth in the Aramaic language

[6]  Aram adds the prophet

[7]  Gk Syr: Aram We

[8]  Meaning of Aram uncertain

[9]  Syr Vg 1 Esdras 8.9: Aram Perfect

[10]  A Heb measure of volume

[11]  Gk 1 Esdras 8.32: Heb lacks of Zattu

[12]  Gk 1 Esdras 8.36: Heb lacks Bani

[13]  Or might fast

[14]  The number of talents is lacking

[15]  Heb our God

[16]  1 Esdras 9.2: Heb where he went

[17]  1 Esdras 9.16: Syr: Heb And there were selected Ezra,

[18]  1 Esdras 9.26 Gk: Heb Malchijah

[19]  Gk: Heb Bani, Binnui

[20]  1 Esdras 9.36; meaning of Heb uncertain

ECCLESIASTES
Ecclesiastes 1

Ecclesiastes 2

Ecclesiastes 3

Ecclesiastes 4

Ecclesiastes 5

Ecclesiastes 6

Ecclesiastes 7

Ecclesiastes 8

Ecclesiastes 9

Ecclesiastes 10

Ecclesiastes 11

Ecclesiastes 12

Ecclesiastes 1
The words of the Teacher,[1] the son of David, king in Jerusalem.

 2 Vanity of vanities, says the Teacher,[1]

vanity of vanities! All is vanity.

 3 What do people gain from all the toil

at which they toil under the sun?

 4 A generation goes, and a generation comes,

but the earth remains forever.

 5 The sun rises and the sun goes down,

and hurries to the place where it rises.

 6 The wind blows to the south,

and goes around to the north;

round and round goes the wind,

and on its circuits the wind returns.

 7 All streams run to the sea,

but the sea is not full;

to the place where the streams flow,

there they continue to flow.

 8 All things[2] are wearisome;

more than one can express;

the eye is not satisfied with seeing,

or the ear filled with hearing.

 9 What has been is what will be,

and what has been done is what will be done;

there is nothing new under the sun.

10 Is there a thing of which it is said,

“See, this is new”?

It has already been,

in the ages before us.

11 The people of long ago are not remembered,

nor will there be any remembrance

of people yet to come

by those who come after them.

12 I, the Teacher,[1] when king over Israel in Jerusalem, 13applied my mind to seek and to search out by wisdom all that is done under heaven; it is an unhappy business that God has given to human beings to be busy with. 14I saw all the deeds that are done under the sun; and see, all is vanity and a chasing after wind.[3]

15 What is crooked cannot be made straight,

and what is lacking cannot be counted.

16 I said to myself, “I have acquired great wisdom, surpassing all who were over Jerusalem before me; and my mind has had great experience of wisdom and knowledge.” 17And I applied my mind to know wisdom and to know madness and folly. I perceived that this also is but a chasing after wind.[3]

18 For in much wisdom is much vexation,

“NOTHING NEW UNDER THE SUN”
SCREWTAPE’S TWIST ON THE TRUTH:
The horror of the Same Old Thing is one of the most valuable passions we have produced in the human heart—an endless source of heresies in religion, folly in counsel, infidelity in marriage, and inconstancy in friendship. The humans live in time, and experience reality successively. To experience much of it, therefore, they must experience many different things; in other words, they must experience change. And since they need change, the Enemy (being a hedonist at heart) has made change pleasurable to them, just as He has made eating pleasurable. But since He does not wish them to make change, any more than eating, an end in itself, He has balanced the love of change in them by a love of permanence. He has contrived to gratify both tastes together in the very world He has made, by that union of change and permanence which we call Rhythm. He gives them the seasons, each season different yet every year the same, so that spring is always felt as a novelty yet always as the recurrence of an immemorial theme. . . .

Now just as we pick out and exaggerate the pleasure of eating to produce gluttony, so we pick out this natural pleasantness of change and twist it into a demand for absolute novelty.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Ecclesiastes 1:1–10

and those who increase knowledge increase sorrow.

Ecclesiastes 2
I said to myself, “Come now, I will make a test of pleasure; enjoy yourself.” But again, this also was vanity. 2I said of laughter, “It is mad,” and of pleasure, “What use is it?” 3I searched with my mind how to cheer my body with wine—my mind still guiding me with wisdom—and how to lay hold on folly, until I might see what was good for mortals to do under heaven during the few days of their life. 4I made great works; I built houses and planted vineyards for myself; 5I made myself gardens and parks, and planted in them all kinds of fruit trees. 6I made myself pools from which to water the forest of growing trees. 7I bought male and female slaves, and had slaves who were born in my house; I also had great possessions of herds and flocks, more than any who had been before me in Jerusalem. 8I also gathered for myself silver and gold and the treasure of kings and of the provinces; I got singers, both men and women, and delights of the flesh, and many concubines.[4]

9 So I became great and surpassed all who were before me in Jerusalem; also my wisdom remained with me. 10Whatever my eyes desired I did not keep from them; I kept my heart from no pleasure, for my heart found pleasure in all my toil, and this was my reward for all my toil. 11Then I considered all that my hands had done and the toil I had spent in doing it, and again, all was vanity and a chasing after wind,[5] and there was nothing to be gained under the sun.

12 So I turned to consider wisdom and madness and folly; for what can the one do who comes after the king? Only what has already been done. 13Then I saw that wisdom excels folly as light excels darkness.

14 The wise have eyes in their head,

but fools walk in darkness.

Yet I perceived that the same fate befalls all of them. 15Then I said to myself, “What happens to the fool will happen to me also; why then have I been so very wise?” And I said to myself that this also is vanity. 16For there is no enduring remembrance of the wise or of fools, seeing that in the days to come all will have been long forgotten. How can the wise die just like fools? 17So I hated life, because what is done under the sun was grievous to me; for all is vanity and a chasing after wind.[5]

18 I hated all my toil in which I had toiled under the sun, seeing that I must leave it to those who come after me 19—and who knows whether they will be wise or foolish? Yet they will be master of all for which I toiled and used my wisdom under the sun. This also is vanity. 20So I turned and gave my heart up to despair concerning all the toil of my labors under the sun, 21because sometimes one who has toiled with wisdom and knowledge and skill must leave all to be enjoyed by another who did not toil for it. This also is vanity and a great evil. 22What do mortals get from all the toil and strain with which they toil under the sun? 23For all their days are full of pain, and their work is a vexation; even at night their minds do not rest. This also is vanity.

“I WILL MAKE A TEST OF PLEASURE”
SCREWTAPE’S CORRUPTION:
Never forget that when we are dealing with any pleasure in its healthy and normal and satisfying form, we are, in a sense, on the Enemy’s ground. I know we have won many a soul through pleasure. All the same, it is His invention, not ours. He made the pleasures: all our research so far has not enabled us to produce one. All we can do is to encourage the humans to take the pleasures which our Enemy has produced, at times, or in ways, or in degrees, which He has forbidden. Hence we always try to work away from the natural condition of any pleasure to that in which it is least natural, least redolent of its Maker, and least pleasurable. An ever increasing craving for an ever diminishing pleasure is the formula. It is more certain; and it’s better style. To get the man’s soul and give him nothing in return—that is what really gladdens Our Father’s heart.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Ecclesiastes 2:1–10

24 There is nothing better for mortals than to eat and drink, and find enjoyment in their toil. This also, I saw, is from the hand of God; 25for apart from him[6] who can eat or who can have enjoyment? 26For to the one who pleases him God gives wisdom and knowledge and joy; but to the sinner he gives the work of gathering and heaping, only to give to one who pleases God. This also is vanity and a chasing after wind.[7]

“APART FROM HIM, WHO CAN EAT OR WHO CAN HAVE ENJOYMENT?”
SCREWTAPE GLOATS TO A YOUNGER DEMON:
You will find that anything or nothing is sufficient to attract his wandering attention. You no longer need a good book, which he really likes, to keep him from his prayers or his work or his sleep; a column of advertisements in yesterday’s paper will do. You can make him waste his time not only in conversation he enjoys with people whom he likes, but in conversations with those he cares nothing about on subjects that bore him. You can make him do nothing at all for long periods. You can keep him up late at night, not roistering, but staring at a dead fire in a cold room. All the healthy and out-going activities which we want him to avoid can be inhibited and nothing given in return, so that at least he may say, as one of my own patients said on his arrival down here, “I now see that I spent most of my life in doing neither what I ought nor what I liked.”

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Ecclesiastes 2:24–26

Ecclesiastes 3
For everything there is a season, and a time for every matter under heaven:

 2 a time to be born, and a time to die;

a time to plant, and a time to pluck up what is planted;

 3 a time to kill, and a time to heal;

a time to break down, and a time to build up;

 4 a time to weep, and a time to laugh;

a time to mourn, and a time to dance;

 5 a time to throw away stones, and a time to gather stones together;

a time to embrace, and a time to refrain from embracing;

 6 a time to seek, and a time to lose;

a time to keep, and a time to throw away;

 7 a time to tear, and a time to sew;

a time to keep silence, and a time to speak;

 8 a time to love, and a time to hate;

a time for war, and a time for peace.

9 What gain have the workers from their toil? 10I have seen the business that God has given to everyone to be busy with. 11He has made everything suitable for its time; moreover he has put a sense of past and future into their minds, yet they cannot find out what God has done from the beginning to the end. 12I know that there is nothing better for them than to be happy and enjoy themselves as long as they live; 13moreover, it is God’s gift that all should eat and drink and take pleasure in all their toil. 14I know that whatever God does endures forever; nothing can be added to it, nor anything taken from it; God has done this, so that all should stand in awe before him. 15That which is, already has been; that which is to be, already is; and God seeks out what has gone by.[8]

16 Moreover I saw under the sun that in the place of justice, wickedness was there, and in the place of righteousness, wickedness was there as well. 17I said in my heart, God will judge the righteous and the wicked, for he has appointed a time for every matter, and for every work. 18I said in my heart with regard to human beings that God is testing them to show that they are but animals. 19For the fate of humans and the fate of animals is the same; as one dies, so dies the other. They all have the same breath, and humans have no advantage over the animals; for all is vanity. 20All go to one place; all are from the dust, and all turn to dust again. 21Who knows whether the human spirit goes upward and the spirit of animals goes downward to the earth? 22So I saw that there is nothing better than that all should enjoy their work, for that is their lot; who can bring them to see what will be after them?

Ecclesiastes 4
Again I saw all the oppressions that are practiced under the sun. Look, the tears of the oppressed—with no one to comfort them! On the side of their oppressors there was power—with no one to comfort them. 2And I thought the dead, who have already died, more fortunate than the living, who are still alive; 3but better than both is the one who has not yet been, and has not seen the evil deeds that are done under the sun.

4 Then I saw that all toil and all skill in work come from one person’s envy of another. This also is vanity and a chasing after wind.[9]

 5 Fools fold their hands

and consume their own flesh.

 6 Better is a handful with quiet

than two handfuls with toil,

and a chasing after wind.[9]

“A TIME FOR EVERY MATTER”
SCREWTAPE COMPLAINS:
The humans live in time but our Enemy destines them to eternity. He therefore, I believe, wants them to attend chiefly to two things, to eternity itself, and to that point of time which they call the Present. For the Present is the point at which time touches eternity. Of the present moment, and of it only, humans have an experience analogous to the experience which our Enemy has of reality as a whole; in it alone freedom and actuality are offered them. He would therefore have them continually concerned either with eternity (which means being concerned with Him) or with the Present—either meditating on their eternal union with, or separation from, Himself, or else obeying the present voice of conscience, bearing the present cross, receiving the present grace, giving thanks for the present pleasure.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Ecclesiastes 3:1–11

7 Again, I saw vanity under the sun: 8the case of solitary individuals, without sons or brothers; yet there is no end to all their toil, and their eyes are never satisfied with riches. “For whom am I toiling,” they ask, “and depriving myself of pleasure?” This also is vanity and an unhappy business.

9 Two are better than one, because they have a good reward for their toil. 10For if they fall, one will lift up the other; but woe to one who is alone and falls and does not have another to help. 11Again, if two lie together, they keep warm; but how can one keep warm alone? 12And though one might prevail against another, two will withstand one. A threefold cord is not quickly broken.

13 Better is a poor but wise youth than an old but foolish king, who will no longer take advice. 14One can indeed come out of prison to reign, even though born poor in the kingdom. 15I saw all the living who, moving about under the sun, follow that[10] youth who replaced the king;[11] 16there was no end to all those people whom he led. Yet those who come later will not rejoice in him. Surely this also is vanity and a chasing after wind.[12]

Ecclesiastes 5
[13] Guard your steps when you go to the house of God; to draw near to listen is better than the sacrifice offered by fools; for they do not know how to keep from doing evil.[14] 2[15] Never be rash with your mouth, nor let your heart be quick to utter a word before God, for God is in heaven, and you upon earth; therefore let your words be few.

3 For dreams come with many cares, and a fool’s voice with many words.

4 When you make a vow to God, do not delay fulfilling it; for he has no pleasure in fools. Fulfill what you vow. 5It is better that you should not vow than that you should vow and not fulfill it. 6Do not let your mouth lead you into sin, and do not say before the messenger that it was a mistake; why should God be angry at your words, and destroy the work of your hands?

7 With many dreams come vanities and a multitude of words;[16] but fear God.

8 If you see in a province the oppression of the poor and the violation of justice and right, do not be amazed at the matter; for the high official is watched by a higher, and there are yet higher ones over them. 9But all things considered, this is an advantage for a land: a king for a plowed field.[16]

10 The lover of money will not be satisfied with money; nor the lover of wealth, with gain. This also is vanity.

11 When goods increase, those who eat them increase; and what gain has their owner but to see them with his eyes?

12 Sweet is the sleep of laborers, whether they eat little or much; but the surfeit of the rich will not let them sleep.

13 There is a grievous ill that I have seen under the sun: riches were kept by their owners to their hurt, 14and those riches were lost in a bad venture; though they are parents of children, they have nothing in their hands. 15As they came from their mother’s womb, so they shall go again, naked as they came; they shall take nothing for their toil, which they may carry away with their hands. 16This also is a grievous ill: just as they came, so shall they go; and what gain do they have from toiling for the wind? 17Besides, all their days they eat in darkness, in much vexation and sickness and resentment.

18 This is what I have seen to be good: it is fitting to eat and drink and find enjoyment in all the toil with which one toils under the sun the few days of the life God gives us; for this is our lot. 19Likewise all to whom God gives wealth and possessions and whom he enables to enjoy them, and to accept their lot and find enjoyment in their toil—this is the gift of God. 20For they will scarcely brood over the days of their lives, because God keeps them occupied with the joy of their hearts.

Ecclesiastes 6
There is an evil that I have seen under the sun, and it lies heavy upon humankind: 2those to whom God gives wealth, possessions, and honor, so that they lack nothing of all that they desire, yet God does not enable them to enjoy these things, but a stranger enjoys them. This is vanity; it is a grievous ill. 3A man may beget a hundred children, and live many years; but however many are the days of his years, if he does not enjoy life’s good things, or has no burial, I say that a stillborn child is better off than he. 4For it comes into vanity and goes into darkness, and in darkness its name is covered; 5moreover it has not seen the sun or known anything; yet it finds rest rather than he. 6Even though he should live a thousand years twice over, yet enjoy no good—do not all go to one place?

7 All human toil is for the mouth, yet the appetite is not satisfied. 8For what advantage have the wise over fools? And what do the poor have who know how to conduct themselves before the living? 9Better is the sight of the eyes than the wandering of desire; this also is vanity and a chasing after wind.[17]

10 Whatever has come to be has already been named, and it is known what human beings are, and that they are not able to dispute with those who are stronger. 11The more words, the more vanity, so how is one the better? 12For who knows what is good for mortals while they live the few days of their vain life, which they pass like a shadow? For who can tell them what will be after them under the sun?

Ecclesiastes 7
A good name is better than precious ointment,

and the day of death, than the day of birth.

 2 It is better to go to the house of mourning

than to go to the house of feasting;

for this is the end of everyone,

and the living will lay it to heart.

 3 Sorrow is better than laughter,

for by sadness of countenance the heart is made glad.

 4 The heart of the wise is in the house of mourning;

but the heart of fools is in the house of mirth.

 5 It is better to hear the rebuke of the wise

than to hear the song of fools.

 6 For like the crackling of thorns under a pot,

so is the laughter of fools;

this also is vanity.

 7 Surely oppression makes the wise foolish,

and a bribe corrupts the heart.

 8 Better is the end of a thing than its beginning;

the patient in spirit are better than the proud in spirit.

 9 Do not be quick to anger,

for anger lodges in the bosom of fools.

10 Do not say, “Why were the former days better than these?”

For it is not from wisdom that you ask this.

11 Wisdom is as good as an inheritance,

an advantage to those who see the sun.

12 For the protection of wisdom is like the protection of money,

and the advantage of knowledge is that wisdom gives life to the one who possesses it.

13 Consider the work of God;

who can make straight what he has made crooked?

14 In the day of prosperity be joyful, and in the day of adversity consider; God has made the one as well as the other, so that mortals may not find out anything that will come after them.

15 In my vain life I have seen everything; there are righteous people who perish in their righteousness, and there are wicked people who prolong their life in their evildoing. 16Do not be too righteous, and do not act too wise; why should you destroy yourself? 17Do not be too wicked, and do not be a fool; why should you die before your time? 18It is good that you should take hold of the one, without letting go of the other; for the one who fears God shall succeed with both.

19 Wisdom gives strength to the wise more than ten rulers that are in a city.

20 Surely there is no one on earth so righteous as to do good without ever sinning.

21 Do not give heed to everything that people say, or you may hear your servant cursing you; 22your heart knows that many times you have yourself cursed others.

23 All this I have tested by wisdom; I said, “I will be wise,” but it was far from me. 24That which is, is far off, and deep, very deep; who can find it out? 25I turned my mind to know and to search out and to seek wisdom and the sum of things, and to know that wickedness is folly and that foolishness is madness. 26I found more bitter than death the woman who is a trap, whose heart is snares and nets, whose hands are fetters; one who pleases God escapes her, but the sinner is taken by her. 27See, this is what I found, says the Teacher,[18] adding one thing to another to find the sum, 28which my mind has sought repeatedly, but I have not found. One man among a thousand I found, but a woman among all these I have not found. 29See, this alone I found, that God made human beings straightforward, but they have devised many schemes.

“TAKE HOLD OF ONE, WITHOUT LETTING GO OF THE OTHER”
SCREWTAPE MANIPULATES A DRY SPELL:
But there is an even better way of exploiting the trough; I mean through the patient’s own thoughts about it. . . . Your job is to make him acquiesce in the present low temperature of his spirit and gradually become content with it, persuading himself that it is not so low after all. In a week or two you will be making him doubt whether the first days of his Christianity were not, perhaps, a little excessive. Talk to him about “moderation in all things.” If you can once get him to the point of thinking that “religion is all very well up to a point,” you can feel quite happy about his soul. A moderated religion is as good for us as no religion at all—and more amusing.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Ecclesiastes 7:15–18

Ecclesiastes 8
Who is like the wise man?

And who knows the interpretation of a thing?

Wisdom makes one’s face shine,

and the hardness of one’s countenance is changed.

2 Keep[19] the king’s command because of your sacred oath. 3Do not be terrified; go from his presence, do not delay when the matter is unpleasant, for he does whatever he pleases. 4For the word of the king is powerful, and who can say to him, “What are you doing?” 5Whoever obeys a command will meet no harm, and the wise mind will know the time and way. 6For every matter has its time and way, although the troubles of mortals lie heavy upon them. 7Indeed, they do not know what is to be, for who can tell them how it will be? 8No one has power over the wind[20] to restrain the wind,[20] or power over the day of death; there is no discharge from the battle, nor does wickedness deliver those who practice it. 9All this I observed, applying my mind to all that is done under the sun, while one person exercises authority over another to the other’s hurt.

10 Then I saw the wicked buried; they used to go in and out of the holy place, and were praised in the city where they had done such things.[21] This also is vanity. 11Because sentence against an evil deed is not executed speedily, the human heart is fully set to do evil. 12Though sinners do evil a hundred times and prolong their lives, yet I know that it will be well with those who fear God, because they stand in fear before him, 13but it will not be well with the wicked, neither will they prolong their days like a shadow, because they do not stand in fear before God.

14 There is a vanity that takes place on earth, that there are righteous people who are treated according to the conduct of the wicked, and there are wicked people who are treated according to the conduct of the righteous. I said that this also is vanity. 15So I commend enjoyment, for there is nothing better for people under the sun than to eat, and drink, and enjoy themselves, for this will go with them in their toil through the days of life that God gives them under the sun.

16 When I applied my mind to know wisdom, and to see the business that is done on earth, how one’s eyes see sleep neither day nor night, 17then I saw all the work of God, that no one can find out what is happening under the sun. However much they may toil in seeking, they will not find it out; even though those who are wise claim to know, they cannot find it out.

“TOIL IN SEEKING”
SCREWTAPE’S DEVIOUS GUIDANCE:
Do remember, the only thing that matters is the extent to which you separate the man from the Enemy. It does not matter how small the sins are provided that their cumulative effect is to edge the man away from the Light and out into the Nothing. Murder is no better than cards if cards can do the trick. Indeed the safest road to Hell is the gradual one—the gentle slope, soft underfoot, without sudden turnings, without milestones, without signposts.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Ecclesiastes 8:16–17

Ecclesiastes 9
All this I laid to heart, examining it all, how the righteous and the wise and their deeds are in the hand of God; whether it is love or hate one does not know. Everything that confronts them 2is vanity,[22] since the same fate comes to all, to the righteous and the wicked, to the good and the evil,[23] to the clean and the unclean, to those who sacrifice and those who do not sacrifice. As are the good, so are the sinners; those who swear are like those who shun an oath. 3This is an evil in all that happens under the sun, that the same fate comes to everyone. Moreover, the hearts of all are full of evil; madness is in their hearts while they live, and after that they go to the dead. 4But whoever is joined with all the living has hope, for a living dog is better than a dead lion. 5The living know that they will die, but the dead know nothing; they have no more reward, and even the memory of them is lost. 6Their love and their hate and their envy have already perished; never again will they have any share in all that happens under the sun.



For reflection: Ecclesiastes 9:3–6

SCREWTAPE OBSERVES:

Despair is a greater sin than any of the sins which provoke it.

—from The Screwtape Letters



7 Go, eat your bread with enjoyment, and drink your wine with a merry heart; for God has long ago approved what you do. 8Let your garments always be white; do not let oil be lacking on your head. 9Enjoy life with the wife whom you love, all the days of your vain life that are given you under the sun, because that is your portion in life and in your toil at which you toil under the sun. 10Whatever your hand finds to do, do with your might; for there is no work or thought or knowledge or wisdom in Sheol, to which you are going.

11 Again I saw that under the sun the race is not to the swift, nor the battle to the strong, nor bread to the wise, nor riches to the intelligent, nor favor to the skillful; but time and chance happen to them all. 12For no one can anticipate the time of disaster. Like fish taken in a cruel net, and like birds caught in a snare, so mortals are snared at a time of calamity, when it suddenly falls upon them.

13 I have also seen this example of wisdom under the sun, and it seemed great to me. 14There was a little city with few people in it. A great king came against it and besieged it, building great siegeworks against it. 15Now there was found in it a poor wise man, and he by his wisdom delivered the city. Yet no one remembered that poor man. 16So I said, “Wisdom is better than might; yet the poor man’s wisdom is despised, and his words are not heeded.”

17 The quiet words of the wise are more to be heeded

than the shouting of a ruler among fools.

18 Wisdom is better than weapons of war,

but one bungler destroys much good.

Ecclesiastes 10
Dead flies make the perfumer’s ointment give off a foul odor;

so a little folly outweighs wisdom and honor.

 2 The heart of the wise inclines to the right,

but the heart of a fool to the left.

 3 Even when fools walk on the road, they lack sense,

and show to everyone that they are fools.

 4 If the anger of the ruler rises against you, do not leave your post,

for calmness will undo great offenses.

5 There is an evil that I have seen under the sun, as great an error as if it proceeded from the ruler: 6folly is set in many high places, and the rich sit in a low place. 7I have seen slaves on horseback, and princes walking on foot like slaves.

 8 Whoever digs a pit will fall into it;

and whoever breaks through a wall will be bitten by a snake.

 9 Whoever quarries stones will be hurt by them;

and whoever splits logs will be endangered by them.

10 If the iron is blunt, and one does not whet the edge,

then more strength must be exerted;

but wisdom helps one to succeed.

11 If the snake bites before it is charmed,

there is no advantage in a charmer.

12 Words spoken by the wise bring them favor,

but the lips of fools consume them.

13 The words of their mouths begin in foolishness,

and their talk ends in wicked madness;

14 yet fools talk on and on.

No one knows what is to happen,

and who can tell anyone what the future holds?

15 The toil of fools wears them out,

for they do not even know the way to town.

16 Alas for you, O land, when your king is a servant,[24]

and your princes feast in the morning!

17 Happy are you, O land, when your king is a nobleman,

and your princes feast at the proper time—

for strength, and not for drunkenness!

18 Through sloth the roof sinks in,

and through indolence the house leaks.

19 Feasts are made for laughter;

wine gladdens life,

and money meets every need.

20 Do not curse the king, even in your thoughts,

or curse the rich, even in your bedroom;

for a bird of the air may carry your voice,

or some winged creature tell the matter.

Ecclesiastes 11
Send out your bread upon the waters,

for after many days you will get it back.

 2 Divide your means seven ways, or even eight,

for you do not know what disaster may happen on earth.

 3 When clouds are full,

they empty rain on the earth;

“THOSE WHO LIVE MANY YEARS”
SCREWTAPE CYNICALLY EXAMINES:
The long, dull, monotonous years of middle-aged prosperity or middle-aged adversity are excellent campaigning weather. You see, it is so hard for these creatures to persevere. The routine of adversity, the gradual decay of youthful loves and youthful hopes, the quiet despair (hardly felt as pain) of ever overcoming the chronic temptations with which we have again and again defeated them, the drabness which we create in their lives and the inarticulate resentment with which we teach them to respond to it—all this provides admirable opportunities of wearing out a soul by attrition. If, on the other hand, the middle years prove prosperous, our position is even stronger. Prosperity knits a man to the World. He feels that he is “finding his place in it,” while really it is finding its place in him. His increasing reputation, his widening circle of acquaintances, his sense of importance, the growing pressure of absorbing and agreeable work, build up in him a sense of being really at home in earth, which is just what we want. You will notice that the young are generally less unwilling to die than the middle-aged and the old.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Ecclesiastes 11:8–9

whether a tree falls to the south or to the north,

in the place where the tree falls, there it will lie.

 4 Whoever observes the wind will not sow;

and whoever regards the clouds will not reap.

5 Just as you do not know how the breath comes to the bones in the mother’s womb, so you do not know the work of God, who makes everything.

6 In the morning sow your seed, and at evening do not let your hands be idle; for you do not know which will prosper, this or that, or whether both alike will be good.

7 Light is sweet, and it is pleasant for the eyes to see the sun.

8 Even those who live many years should rejoice in them all; yet let them remember that the days of darkness will be many. All that comes is vanity.

9 Rejoice, young man, while you are young, and let your heart cheer you in the days of your youth. Follow the inclination of your heart and the desire of your eyes, but know that for all these things God will bring you into judgment.

10 Banish anxiety from your mind, and put away pain from your body; for youth and the dawn of life are vanity.

ADVANCING TOWARDS TRUTH
Certainly it seems to me that from having had to reach what is really the Voice of God in the cursing Psalms through all the horrible distortions of the human medium, I have gained something I might not have gained from a flawless, ethical exposition. The shadows have indicated (at least to my heart) something more about the light. Nor would I (now) willingly spare from my Bible something in itself so anti-religious as the nihilism of Ecclesiastes. We get there a clear, cold picture of man’s life without God. That statement is itself part of God’s word. We need to have heard it. Even to have assimilated Ecclesiastes and no other book in the Bible would be to have advanced further towards truth than some men do.

—from Reflections on the Psalms

For reflection  Ecclesiastes 12:13

Ecclesiastes 12
Remember your creator in the days of your youth, before the days of trouble come, and the years draw near when you will say, “I have no pleasure in them”; 2before the sun and the light and the moon and the stars are darkened and the clouds return with[25] the rain; 3in the day when the guards of the house tremble, and the strong men are bent, and the women who grind cease working because they are few, and those who look through the windows see dimly; 4when the doors on the street are shut, and the sound of the grinding is low, and one rises up at the sound of a bird, and all the daughters of song are brought low; 5when one is afraid of heights, and terrors are in the road; the almond tree blossoms, the grasshopper drags itself along[26] and desire fails; because all must go to their eternal home, and the mourners will go about the streets; 6before the silver cord is snapped,[27] and the golden bowl is broken, and the pitcher is broken at the fountain, and the wheel broken at the cistern, 7and the dust returns to the earth as it was, and the breath[28] returns to God who gave it. 8Vanity of vanities, says the Teacher;[29] all is vanity.

9 Besides being wise, the Teacher[29] also taught the people knowledge, weighing and studying and arranging many proverbs. 10The Teacher[29] sought to find pleasing words, and he wrote words of truth plainly.

11 The sayings of the wise are like goads, and like nails firmly fixed are the collected sayings that are given by one shepherd.[30] 12Of anything beyond these, my child, beware. Of making many books there is no end, and much study is a weariness of the flesh.

13 The end of the matter; all has been heard. Fear God, and keep his commandments; for that is the whole duty of everyone. 14For God will bring every deed into judgment, including[31] every secret thing, whether good or evil.

[1]  Heb Qoheleth, traditionally rendered Preacher

[2]  Or words

[3]  Or a feeding on wind. See Hos 12.1

[4]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[5]  Or a feeding on wind. See Hos 12.1

[6]  Gk Syr: Heb apart from me

[7]  Or a feeding on wind. See Hos 12.1

[8]  Heb what is pursued

[9]  Or a feeding on wind. See Hos 12.1

[10]  Heb the second

[11]  Heb him

[12]  Or a feeding on wind. See Hos 12.1

[13]  Ch 4.17 in Heb

[14]  Cn: Heb they do not know how to do evil

[15]  Ch 5.1 in Heb

[16]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[17]  Or a feeding on wind. See Hos 12.1

[18]  Qoheleth, traditionally rendered Preacher

[19]  Heb I keep

[20]  Or breath

[21]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[22]  Syr Compare Gk: Heb Everything that confronts them 2is everything

[23]  Gk Syr Vg: Heb lacks and the evil

[24]  Or a child

[25]  Or after ; Heb ‘ahar

[26]  Or is a burden

[27]  Syr Vg Compare Gk: Heb is removed

[28]  Or the spirit

[29]  Qoheleth, traditionally rendered Preacher

[30]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[31]  Or into the judgment on

SONG OF SOLOMON
Song of Solomon 1

Song of Solomon 2

Song of Solomon 3

Song of Solomon 4

Song of Solomon 5

Song of Solomon 6

Song of Solomon 7

Song of Solomon 8

Song of Solomon 1
The Song of Songs, which is Solomon’s.

 2 Let him kiss me with the kisses of his mouth!

For your love is better than wine,

 3      your anointing oils are fragrant,

your name is perfume poured out;

therefore the maidens love you.

 4 Draw me after you, let us make haste.

The king has brought me into his chambers.

We will exult and rejoice in you;

we will extol your love more than wine;

rightly do they love you.

 5 I am black and beautiful,

O daughters of Jerusalem,

like the tents of Kedar,

like the curtains of Solomon.

 6 Do not gaze at me because I am dark,

because the sun has gazed on me.

My mother’s sons were angry with me;

they made me keeper of the vineyards,

but my own vineyard I have not kept!

 7 Tell me, you whom my soul loves,

where you pasture your flock,

where you make it lie down at noon;

for why should I be like one who is veiled

beside the flocks of your companions?

 8 If you do not know,

O fairest among women,

follow the tracks of the flock,

and pasture your kids

beside the shepherds’ tents.

 9 I compare you, my love,

to a mare among Pharaoh’s chariots.

10 Your cheeks are comely with ornaments,

your neck with strings of jewels.

11 We will make you ornaments of gold,

studded with silver.

12 While the king was on his couch,

my nard gave forth its fragrance.

13 My beloved is to me a bag of myrrh

that lies between my breasts.

14 My beloved is to me a cluster of henna blossoms

in the vineyards of En-gedi.

15 Ah, you are beautiful, my love;

BEING IN LOVE
What we call “being in love” is a glorious state, and, in several ways, good for us. It helps to make us generous and courageous, it opens our eyes not only to the beauty of the beloved but to all beauty, and it subordinates (especially at first) our merely animal sexuality; in that sense, love is the great conqueror of lust. No one in his senses would deny that being in love is far better than either common sensuality or cold self-centredness. But, as I said before, “the most dangerous thing you can do is to take any one impulse of our own nature and set it up as the thing you ought to follow at all costs.” Being in love is a good thing, but it is not the best thing. There are many things below it, but there are also things above it. You cannot make it the basis of a whole life. It is a noble feeling, but it is still a feeling. Now no feeling can be relied on to last in its full intensity, or even to last at all. Knowledge can last, principles can last, habits can last; but feelings come and go. And in fact, whatever people say, the state called “being in love” usually does not last. If the old fairy-tale ending “They lived happily ever after” is taken to mean “They felt for the next fifty years exactly as they felt the day before they were married,” then it says what probably never was nor ever would be true, and would be highly undesirable if it were. Who could bear to live in that excitement for even five years? What would become of your work, your appetite, your sleep, your friendships? But, of course, ceasing to be “in love” need not mean ceasing to love. Love in this second sense—love as distinct from “being in love”—is not merely a feeling. It is a deep unity, maintained by the will and deliberately strengthened by habit; reinforced by (in Christian marriages) the grace which both partners ask, and receive, from God. They can have this love for each other even at those moments when they do not like each other; as you love yourself when you do not like yourself. They can retain this love even when each would easily, if they allowed themselves, be “in love” with someone else. “Being in love” first moved them to promise fidelity: this quieter love enables them to keep the promise. It is on this love that the engine of marriage is run: being in love was the explosion that started it.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Song of Solomon 1:1–17

ah, you are beautiful;

your eyes are doves.

16 Ah, you are beautiful, my beloved,

truly lovely.

Our couch is green;

17      the beams of our house are cedar,

our rafters[1] are pine.

Song of Solomon 2
I am a rose[2] of Sharon,

a lily of the valleys.

 2 As a lily among brambles,

so is my love among maidens.

 3 As an apple tree among the trees of the wood,

so is my beloved among young men.

With great delight I sat in his shadow,

and his fruit was sweet to my taste.

 4 He brought me to the banqueting house,

and his intention toward me was love.

 5 Sustain me with raisins,

refresh me with apples;

for I am faint with love.

 6 O that his left hand were under my head,

and that his right hand embraced me!

 7 I adjure you, O daughters of Jerusalem,

by the gazelles or the wild does:

do not stir up or awaken love

until it is ready!

 8 The voice of my beloved!

Look, he comes,

leaping upon the mountains,

bounding over the hills.

 9 My beloved is like a gazelle

or a young stag.

Look, there he stands

behind our wall,

gazing in at the windows,

looking through the lattice.

10 My beloved speaks and says to me:

“Arise, my love, my fair one,

and come away;

11 for now the winter is past,

the rain is over and gone.

12 The flowers appear on the earth;

the time of singing has come,

and the voice of the turtledove

is heard in our land.

13 The fig tree puts forth its figs,

and the vines are in blossom;

they give forth fragrance.

Arise, my love, my fair one,

and come away.

14 O my dove, in the clefts of the rock,

in the covert of the cliff,

let me see your face,

let me hear your voice;

for your voice is sweet,

and your face is lovely.

15 Catch us the foxes,

the little foxes,

that ruin the vineyards—

for our vineyards are in blossom.”

16 My beloved is mine and I am his;

he pastures his flock among the lilies.

17 Until the day breathes

and the shadows flee,

turn, my beloved, be like a gazelle

or a young stag on the cleft mountains.[3]

Song of Solomon 3
Upon my bed at night

I sought him whom my soul loves;

I sought him, but found him not;

I called him, but he gave no answer.[4]

 2 “I will rise now and go about the city,

in the streets and in the squares;

I will seek him whom my soul loves.”

I sought him, but found him not.

 3 The sentinels found me,

as they went about in the city.

“Have you seen him whom my soul loves?”

 4 Scarcely had I passed them,

when I found him whom my soul loves.

I held him, and would not let him go

until I brought him into my mother’s house,

and into the chamber of her that conceived me.

 5 I adjure you, O daughters of Jerusalem,

by the gazelles or the wild does:

do not stir up or awaken love

until it is ready!

 6 What is that coming up from the wilderness,

like a column of smoke,

perfumed with myrrh and frankincense,

with all the fragrant powders of the merchant?

 7 Look, it is the litter of Solomon!

Around it are sixty mighty men

of the mighty men of Israel,

 8 all equipped with swords

and expert in war,

each with his sword at his thigh

because of alarms by night.

 9 King Solomon made himself a palanquin

from the wood of Lebanon.

10 He made its posts of silver,

its back of gold, its seat of purple;

its interior was inlaid with love.[5]

Daughters of Jerusalem,

11      come out.

Look, O daughters of Zion,

at King Solomon,

at the crown with which his mother crowned him

on the day of his wedding,

on the day of the gladness of his heart.

Song of Solomon 4
How beautiful you are, my love,

how very beautiful!

Your eyes are doves

behind your veil.

Your hair is like a flock of goats,

moving down the slopes of Gilead.

 2 Your teeth are like a flock of shorn ewes

that have come up from the washing,

all of which bear twins,

and not one among them is bereaved.

 3 Your lips are like a crimson thread,

and your mouth is lovely.

Your cheeks are like halves of a pomegranate

behind your veil.

 4 Your neck is like the tower of David,

built in courses;

on it hang a thousand bucklers,

all of them shields of warriors.

 5 Your two breasts are like two fawns,

twins of a gazelle,

that feed among the lilies.

 6 Until the day breathes

and the shadows flee,

I will hasten to the mountain of myrrh

and the hill of frankincense.

 7 You are altogether beautiful, my love;

there is no flaw in you.

 8 Come with me from Lebanon, my bride;

come with me from Lebanon.

Depart[6] from the peak of Amana,

from the peak of Senir and Hermon,

from the dens of lions,

from the mountains of leopards.

 9 You have ravished my heart, my sister, my bride,

you have ravished my heart with a glance of your eyes,

with one jewel of your necklace.

10 How sweet is your love, my sister, my bride!

how much better is your love than wine,

and the fragrance of your oils than any spice!

11 Your lips distill nectar, my bride;

honey and milk are under your tongue;

the scent of your garments is like the scent of Lebanon.

12 A garden locked is my sister, my bride,

a garden locked, a fountain sealed.

13 Your channel[5] is an orchard of pomegranates

with all choicest fruits,

henna with nard,

14 nard and saffron, calamus and cinnamon,

with all trees of frankincense,

myrrh and aloes,

with all chief spices—

15 a garden fountain, a well of living water,

and flowing streams from Lebanon.



For reflection: Song of Solomon 4:1–15

A man’s love for a woman is not mercenary because he wants to marry her, nor his love for poetry mercenary because he wants to read it, nor his love of exercise less disinterested because he wants to run and leap and walk. Love, by definition, seeks to enjoy its object.

—from The Problem of Pain



16 Awake, O north wind,

and come, O south wind!

Blow upon my garden

that its fragrance may be wafted abroad.

Let my beloved come to his garden,

and eat its choicest fruits.

Song of Solomon 5
I come to my garden, my sister, my bride;

I gather my myrrh with my spice,

I eat my honeycomb with my honey,

I drink my wine with my milk.

Eat, friends, drink,

and be drunk with love.

 2 I slept, but my heart was awake.

Listen! my beloved is knocking.

“Open to me, my sister, my love,

my dove, my perfect one;

for my head is wet with dew,

my locks with the drops of the night.”

 3 I had put off my garment;

how could I put it on again?

I had bathed my feet;

how could I soil them?

 4 My beloved thrust his hand into the opening,

and my inmost being yearned for him.

 5 I arose to open to my beloved,

and my hands dripped with myrrh,

my fingers with liquid myrrh,

upon the handles of the bolt.

 6 I opened to my beloved,

but my beloved had turned and was gone.

My soul failed me when he spoke.

I sought him, but did not find him;

I called him, but he gave no answer.

 7 Making their rounds in the city

the sentinels found me;

they beat me, they wounded me,

they took away my mantle,

those sentinels of the walls.

 8 I adjure you, O daughters of Jerusalem,

if you find my beloved,

tell him this:

I am faint with love.

 9 What is your beloved more than another beloved,

O fairest among women?

What is your beloved more than another beloved,

that you thus adjure us?

10 My beloved is all radiant and ruddy,

distinguished among ten thousand.

11 His head is the finest gold;

his locks are wavy,

black as a raven.

12 His eyes are like doves

beside springs of water,

bathed in milk,

fitly set.[7]

13 His cheeks are like beds of spices,

yielding fragrance.

His lips are lilies,

distilling liquid myrrh.

14 His arms are rounded gold,

set with jewels.

His body is ivory work,[7]

encrusted with sapphires.[8]

15 His legs are alabaster columns,

set upon bases of gold.

His appearance is like Lebanon,

choice as the cedars.

16 His speech is most sweet,

and he is altogether desirable.

This is my beloved and this is my friend,

O daughters of Jerusalem.

Song of Solomon 6
Where has your beloved gone,

O fairest among women?

Which way has your beloved turned,

that we may seek him with you?

 2 My beloved has gone down to his garden,

to the beds of spices,

to pasture his flock in the gardens,

and to gather lilies.

 3 I am my beloved’s and my beloved is mine;

he pastures his flock among the lilies.

 4 You are beautiful as Tirzah, my love,

comely as Jerusalem,

terrible as an army with banners.

 5 Turn away your eyes from me,

for they overwhelm me!

Your hair is like a flock of goats,

moving down the slopes of Gilead.

 6 Your teeth are like a flock of ewes,

that have come up from the washing;

all of them bear twins,

and not one among them is bereaved.

 7 Your cheeks are like halves of a pomegranate

behind your veil.

 8 There are sixty queens and eighty concubines,

and maidens without number.

 9 My dove, my perfect one, is the only one,

the darling of her mother,

flawless to her that bore her.

The maidens saw her and called her happy;

the queens and concubines also, and they praised her.

10 “Who is this that looks forth like the dawn,

fair as the moon, bright as the sun,

terrible as an army with banners?”

11 I went down to the nut orchard,

to look at the blossoms of the valley,

to see whether the vines had budded,

whether the pomegranates were in bloom.

12 Before I was aware, my fancy set me

in a chariot beside my prince.[9]

13[10] Return, return, O Shulammite!

Return, return, that we may look upon you.

Why should you look upon the Shulammite,

as upon a dance before two armies?[11]

Song of Solomon 7
How graceful are your feet in sandals,

O queenly maiden!

Your rounded thighs are like jewels,

the work of a master hand.

 2 Your navel is a rounded bowl

that never lacks mixed wine.

Your belly is a heap of wheat,

encircled with lilies.

 3 Your two breasts are like two fawns,

twins of a gazelle.

 4 Your neck is like an ivory tower.

Your eyes are pools in Heshbon,

by the gate of Bath-rabbim.

Your nose is like a tower of Lebanon,

overlooking Damascus.

 5 Your head crowns you like Carmel,

and your flowing locks are like purple;

a king is held captive in the tresses.[12]

 6 How fair and pleasant you are,

O loved one, delectable maiden![13]

 7 You are stately[14] as a palm tree,

and your breasts are like its clusters.

 8 I say I will climb the palm tree

and lay hold of its branches.

O may your breasts be like clusters of the vine,

and the scent of your breath like apples,

 9 and your kisses[15] like the best wine

that goes down[16] smoothly,

gliding over lips and teeth.[17]

10 I am my beloved’s,

and his desire is for me.

11 Come, my beloved,

let us go forth into the fields,

and lodge in the villages;

12 let us go out early to the vineyards,

and see whether the vines have budded,

whether the grape blossoms have opened

and the pomegranates are in bloom.

There I will give you my love.

13 The mandrakes give forth fragrance,

and over our doors are all choice fruits,

new as well as old,

which I have laid up for you, O my beloved.

Song of Solomon 8
O that you were like a brother to me,

who nursed at my mother’s breast!

If I met you outside, I would kiss you,

and no one would despise me.

 2 I would lead you and bring you

into the house of my mother,

and into the chamber of the one who bore me.[18]

I would give you spiced wine to drink,

the juice of my pomegranates.

 3 O that his left hand were under my head,

and that his right hand embraced me!

 4 I adjure you, O daughters of Jerusalem,

do not stir up or awaken love

until it is ready!

 5 Who is that coming up from the wilderness,

leaning upon her beloved?

Under the apple tree I awakened you.

There your mother was in labor with you;

there she who bore you was in labor.

 6 Set me as a seal upon your heart,

as a seal upon your arm;

for love is strong as death,

passion fierce as the grave.

Its flashes are flashes of fire,

a raging flame.

 7 Many waters cannot quench love,

neither can floods drown it.

If one offered for love

all the wealth of one’s house,

it would be utterly scorned.

 8 We have a little sister,

and she has no breasts.

What shall we do for our sister,

on the day when she is spoken for?

 9 If she is a wall,

we will build upon her a battlement of silver;

but if she is a door,

we will enclose her with boards of cedar.

10 I was a wall,

and my breasts were like towers;

then I was in his eyes

as one who brings[19] peace.

11 Solomon had a vineyard at Baal-hamon;

he entrusted the vineyard to keepers;

each one was to bring for its fruit a thousand pieces of silver.

12 My vineyard, my very own, is for myself;

you, O Solomon, may have the thousand,

and the keepers of the fruit two hundred!

13 O you who dwell in the gardens,

my companions are listening for your voice;

let me hear it.

14 Make haste, my beloved,

and be like a gazelle

or a young stag

upon the mountains of spices!

WITH OR WITHOUT SHAME?
They tell you sex has become a mess because it was hushed up. But for the last twenty years it has not been. It has been chattered about all day long. Yet it is still in a mess. If hushing up had been the cause of the trouble, ventilation would have set it right. But it has not. I think it is the other way round. I think the human race originally hushed it up because it had become such a mess. Modern people are always saying, “Sex is nothing to be ashamed of.” They may mean two things. They may mean “There is nothing to be ashamed of in the fact that the human race reproduces itself in a certain way, nor in the fact that it gives pleasure.” If they mean that, they are right. Christianity says the same. It is not the thing, nor the pleasure, that is the trouble. The old Christian teachers said that if man had never fallen, sexual pleasure, instead of being less than it is now, would actually have been greater. I know some muddleheaded Christians have talked as if Christianity thought that sex, or the body, or pleasure, were bad in themselves. But they were wrong. Christianity is almost the only one of the great religions which thoroughly approves of the body—which believes that matter is good, that God Himself once took on a human body, that some kind of body is going to be given to us even in Heaven and is going to be an essential part of our happiness, our beauty and our energy. Christianity has glorified marriage more than any other religion: and nearly all the greatest love poetry in the world has been produced by Christians. If anyone says that sex, in itself, is bad, Christianity contradicts him at once. But, of course, when people say, “Sex is nothing to be ashamed of,” they may mean “the state into which the sexual instinct has now got is nothing to be ashamed of.”

If they mean that, I think they are wrong. I think it is everything to be ashamed of. There is nothing to be ashamed of in enjoying your food: there would be everything to be ashamed of if half the world made food the main interest of their lives and spent their time looking at pictures of food and dribbling and smacking their lips. I do not say you and I are individually responsible for the present situation. Our ancestors have handed over to us organisms which are warped in this respect: and we grow up surrounded by propaganda in favour of unchastity. There are people who want to keep our sex instinct inflamed in order to make money out of us. Because, of course, a man with an obsession is a man who has very little sales-resistance. God knows our situation; He will not judge us as if we had no difficulties to overcome. What matters is the sincerity and perseverance of our will to overcome them.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Song of Solomon 1–8

[1]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[2]  Heb crocus

[3]  Or on the mountains of Bether ; meaning of Heb uncertain

[4]  Gk: Heb lacks this line

[5]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[6]  Or Look

[7]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[8]  Heb lapis lazuli

[9]  Cn: Meaning of Heb uncertain

[10]  Ch 7.1 in Heb

[11]  Or dance of Mahanaim

[12]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[13]  Syr: Heb in delights

[14]  Heb This your stature is

[15]  Heb palate

[16]  Heb down for my lover

[17]  Gk Syr Vg: Heb lips of sleepers

[18]  Gk Syr: Heb my mother; she (or you) will teach me

[19]  Or finds

HABAKKUK
Habakkuk 1

Habakkuk 2

Habakkuk 3

Habakkuk 1
The oracle that the prophet Habakkuk saw.

 2 O LORD, how long shall I cry for help,

and you will not listen?

Or cry to you “Violence!”

and you will not save?

 3 Why do you make me see wrongdoing

and look at trouble?

Destruction and violence are before me;

strife and contention arise.

 4 So the law becomes slack

and justice never prevails.

The wicked surround the righteous—

therefore judgment comes forth perverted.

 5 Look at the nations, and see!

Be astonished! Be astounded!

For a work is being done in your days

that you would not believe if you were told.

 6 For I am rousing the Chaldeans,

that fierce and impetuous nation,

who march through the breadth of the earth

to seize dwellings not their own.

 7 Dread and fearsome are they;

their justice and dignity proceed from themselves.

 8 Their horses are swifter than leopards,

more menacing than wolves at dusk;

their horses charge.

Their horsemen come from far away;

they fly like an eagle swift to devour.

 9 They all come for violence,

with faces pressing[1] forward;

they gather captives like sand.

10 At kings they scoff,

and of rulers they make sport.

They laugh at every fortress,

and heap up earth to take it.

11 Then they sweep by like the wind;

they transgress and become guilty;

their own might is their god!

12 Are you not from of old,

O LORD my God, my Holy One?

You[2] shall not die.

O LORD, you have marked them for judgment;

and you, O Rock, have established them for punishment.

13 Your eyes are too pure to behold evil,

and you cannot look on wrongdoing;

why do you look on the treacherous,

and are silent when the wicked swallow

those more righteous than they?

14 You have made people like the fish of the sea,

like crawling things that have no ruler.

15 The enemy[3] brings all of them up with a hook;

he drags them out with his net,

he gathers them in his seine;

so he rejoices and exults.

16 Therefore he sacrifices to his net

and makes offerings to his seine;

for by them his portion is lavish,

and his food is rich.

17 Is he then to keep on emptying his net,

and destroying nations without mercy?



For reflection: Habakkuk 1:1–17

Believe in God and you will have to face hours when it seems obvious that this material world is the only reality; disbelieve in Him and you must face hours when this material world seems to shout at you that it is not all.

—from “Religion: Reality or Substitute?” Christian Reflections



Habakkuk 2
I will stand at my watchpost,

and station myself on the rampart;

I will keep watch to see what he will say to me,

and what he[4] will answer concerning my complaint.

 2 Then the LORD answered me and said:

Write the vision;

make it plain on tablets,

so that a runner may read it.

 3 For there is still a vision for the appointed time;

it speaks of the end, and does not lie.

If it seems to tarry, wait for it;

it will surely come, it will not delay.

 4 Look at the proud!

Their spirit is not right in them,

but the righteous live by their faith.[5]

 5 Moreover, wealth[6] is treacherous;

the arrogant do not endure.

They open their throats wide as Sheol;

like Death they never have enough.

They gather all nations for themselves,

and collect all peoples as their own.

6 Shall not everyone taunt such people and, with mocking riddles, say about them,

“Alas for you who heap up what is not your own!”

How long will you load yourselves with goods taken in pledge?

 7 Will not your own creditors suddenly rise,

and those who make you tremble wake up?

Then you will be booty for them.

 8 Because you have plundered many nations,

all that survive of the peoples shall plunder you—

because of human bloodshed, and violence to the earth,

to cities and all who live in them.

 9 “Alas for you who get evil gain for your house,

setting your nest on high

to be safe from the reach of harm!”

10 You have devised shame for your house

by cutting off many peoples;

you have forfeited your life.

11 The very stones will cry out from the wall,

and the plaster[7] will respond from the woodwork.

12 “Alas for you who build a town by bloodshed,

and found a city on iniquity!”

13 Is it not from the LORD of hosts

that peoples labor only to feed the flames,

and nations weary themselves for nothing?

14 But the earth will be filled

with the knowledge of the glory of the LORD,

as the waters cover the sea.

15 “Alas for you who make your neighbors drink,

pouring out your wrath[8] until they are drunk,

in order to gaze on their nakedness!”

16 You will be sated with contempt instead of glory.

Drink, you yourself, and stagger![9]

The cup in the LORD’s right hand

will come around to you,

and shame will come upon your glory!

17 For the violence done to Lebanon will overwhelm you;

the destruction of the animals will terrify you—[10]

because of human bloodshed and violence to the earth,

to cities and all who live in them.

18 What use is an idol

once its maker has shaped it—

a cast image, a teacher of lies?

For its maker trusts in what has been made,

though the product is only an idol that cannot speak!

19 Alas for you who say to the wood, “Wake up!”

to silent stone, “Rouse yourself!”

Can it teach?

See, it is gold and silver plated,

and there is no breath in it at all.

20 But the LORD is in his holy temple;

let all the earth keep silence before him!

Habakkuk 3
A prayer of the prophet Habakkuk according to Shigionoth.

 2 O LORD, I have heard of your renown,

and I stand in awe, O LORD, of your work.

In our own time revive it;

in our own time make it known;

in wrath may you remember mercy.

 3 God came from Teman,

the Holy One from Mount Paran.

Selah

His glory covered the heavens,

and the earth was full of his praise.

 4 The brightness was like the sun;

rays came forth from his hand,

where his power lay hidden.

 5 Before him went pestilence,

TURNING TOWARDS GOD
Where the real God is present the shadows of that God do not appear; that which the shadows resembled does. The Hebrews throughout their history were being constantly headed off from the worship of Nature-gods; not because the Nature-gods were in all respects unlike the God of Nature but because, at best, they were merely like, and it was the destiny of that nation to be turned away from likenesses to the thing itself.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Habakkuk 2:18–20

YET I WILL REJOICE IN THE LORD
SCREWTAPE REVEALS HIS ENEMY’S INTENTIONS:
You must have often wondered why the Enemy does not make more use of His power to be sensibly present to human souls in any degree He chooses and at any moment. But you now see that the Irresistible and the Indisputable are the two weapons which the very nature of His scheme forbids Him to use. Merely to override a human will (as His felt presence in any but the faintest and most mitigated degree would certainly do) would be for Him useless. He cannot ravish. He can only woo. For His ignoble idea is to eat the cake and have it; the creatures are to be one with Him, but yet themselves; merely to cancel them, or assimilate them, will not serve. He is prepared to do a little overriding at the beginning. He will set them off with communications of His presence which, though faint, seem great to them, with emotional sweetness, and easy conquest over temptation. Sooner or later He withdraws, if not in fact, at least from their conscious experience, all those supports and incentives. He leaves the creature to stand up on its own legs—to carry out from the will alone duties which have lost all relish. It is during such trough periods, much more than during the peak periods, that it is growing into the sort of creature He wants it to be. Hence the prayers offered in the state of dryness are those which please Him best. We can drag our patients along by continual tempting, because we design them only for the table, and the more their will is interfered with the better. He cannot “tempt” to virtue as we do to vice. He wants them to learn to walk and must therefore take away His hand; and if only the will to walk is really there He is pleased even with their stumbles. Do not be deceived, Wormwood. Our cause is never more in danger than when a human, no longer desiring, but still intending, to do our Enemy’s will, looks round upon a universe from which every trace of Him seems to have vanished, and asks why he has been forsaken, and still obeys.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Habakkuk 3:16–19

and plague followed close behind.

 6 He stopped and shook the earth;

he looked and made the nations tremble.

The eternal mountains were shattered;

along his ancient pathways

the everlasting hills sank low.

 7 I saw the tents of Cushan under affliction;

the tent-curtains of the land of Midian trembled.

 8 Was your wrath against the rivers,[11] O LORD?

Or your anger against the rivers,[11]

or your rage against the sea,[12]

when you drove your horses,

your chariots to victory?

 9 You brandished your naked bow,

sated[13] were the arrows at your command.[14]

Selah

You split the earth with rivers.

10 The mountains saw you, and writhed;

a torrent of water swept by;

the deep gave forth its voice.

The sun[15] raised high its hands;

11 the moon[16] stood still in its exalted place,

at the light of your arrows speeding by,

at the gleam of your flashing spear.

12 In fury you trod the earth,

in anger you trampled nations.

13 You came forth to save your people,

to save your anointed.

You crushed the head of the wicked house,

laying it bare from foundation to roof.[14]

Selah

14 You pierced with their[17] own arrows the head[18] of his warriors,[19]

who came like a whirlwind to scatter us,[20]

gloating as if ready to devour the poor who were in hiding.

15 You trampled the sea with your horses,

churning the mighty waters.

16 I hear, and I tremble within;

my lips quiver at the sound.

Rottenness enters into my bones,

and my steps tremble[21] beneath me.

I wait quietly for the day of calamity

to come upon the people who attack us.

17 Though the fig tree does not blossom,

and no fruit is on the vines;

though the produce of the olive fails,

and the fields yield no food;

though the flock is cut off from the fold,

and there is no herd in the stalls,

18 yet I will rejoice in the LORD;

I will exult in the God of my salvation.

19 GOD, the Lord, is my strength;

he makes my feet like the feet of a deer,

and makes me tread upon the heights.[22]

To the leader: with stringed[23] instruments.

[1]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[2]  Ancient Heb tradition: MT We

[3]  Heb He

[4]  Syr: Heb I

[5]  Or faithfulness

[6]  Other Heb Mss read wine

[7]  Or beam

[8]  Or poison

[9]  Q Ms Gk: MT be uncircumcised

[10]  Gk Syr: Meaning of Heb uncertain

[11]  Or against River

[12]  Or against Sea

[13]  Cn: Heb oaths

[14]  Meaning of Heb uncertain

[15]  Heb It

[16]  Heb sun, moon

[17]  Heb his

[18]  Or leader

[19]  Vg Compare Gk Syr: Meaning of Heb uncertain

[20]  Heb me

[21]  Cn Compare Gk: Meaning of Heb uncertain

[22]  Heb my heights

[23]  Heb my stringed

THE LETTER OF PAUL TO THE
EPHESIANS
Ephesians 1

Ephesians 2

Ephesians 3

Ephesians 4

Ephesians 5

Ephesians 6

Ephesians 1
Paul, an apostle of Christ Jesus by the will of God,

To the saints who are in Ephesus and are faithful[1] in Christ Jesus:

2 Grace to you and peace from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ.

3 Blessed be the God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, who has blessed us in Christ with every spiritual blessing in the heavenly places, 4just as he chose us in Christ[2] before the foundation of the world to be holy and blameless before him in love. 5He destined us for adoption as his children through Jesus Christ, according to the good pleasure of his will, 6to the praise of his glorious grace that he freely bestowed on us in the Beloved. 7In him we have redemption through his blood, the forgiveness of our trespasses, according to the riches of his grace 8that he lavished on us. With all wisdom and insight 9he has made known to us the mystery of his will, according to his good pleasure that he set forth in Christ, 10as a plan for the fullness of time, to gather up all things in him, things in heaven and things on earth. 11In Christ we have also obtained an inheritance,[3] having been destined according to the purpose of him who accomplishes all things according to his counsel and will, 12so that we, who were the first to set our hope on Christ, might live for the praise of his glory. 13In him you also, when you had heard the word of truth, the gospel of your salvation, and had believed in him, were marked with the seal of the promised Holy Spirit; 14this[4] is the pledge of our inheritance toward redemption as God’s own people, to the praise of his glory.

15 I have heard of your faith in the Lord Jesus and your love[5] toward all the saints, and for this reason 16I do not cease to give thanks for you as I remember you in my prayers. 17I pray that the God of our Lord Jesus Christ, the Father of glory, may give you a spirit of wisdom and revelation as you come to know him, 18so that, with the eyes of your heart enlightened, you may know what is the hope to which he has called you, what are the riches of his glorious inheritance among the saints, 19and what is the immeasurable greatness of his power for us who believe, according to the working of his great power. 20God[6] put this power to work in Christ when he raised him from the dead and seated him at his right hand in the heavenly places, 21far above all rule and authority and power and dominion, and above every name that is named, not only in this age but also in the age to come. 22And he has put all things under his feet and has made him the head over all things for the church, 23which is his body, the fullness of him who fills all in all.

Ephesians 2
You were dead through the trespasses and sins 2in which you once lived, following the course of this world, following the ruler of the power of the air, the spirit that is now at work among those who are disobedient. 3All of us once lived among them in the passions of our flesh, following the desires of flesh and senses, and we were by nature children of wrath, like everyone else. 4But God, who is rich in mercy, out of the great love with which he loved us 5even when we were dead through our trespasses, made us alive together with Christ[7]—by grace you have been saved— 6and raised us up with him and seated us with him in the heavenly places in Christ Jesus, 7so that in the ages to come he might show the immeasurable riches of his grace in kindness toward us in Christ Jesus. 8For by grace you have been saved through faith, and this is not your own doing; it is the gift of God— 9not the result of works, so that no one may boast. 10For we are what he has made us, created in Christ Jesus for good works, which God prepared beforehand to be our way of life.

11 So then, remember that at one time you Gentiles by birth,[8] called “the uncircumcision” by those who are called “the circumcision”—a physical circumcision made in the flesh by human hands— 12remember that you were at that time without Christ, being aliens from the commonwealth of Israel, and strangers to the covenants of promise, having no hope and without God in the world. 13But now in Christ Jesus you who once were far off have been brought near by the blood of Christ. 14For he is our peace; in his flesh he has made both groups into one and has broken down the dividing wall, that is, the hostility between us. 15He has abolished the law with its commandments and ordinances, that he might create in himself one new humanity in place of the two, thus making peace, 16and might reconcile both groups to God in one body [9] through the cross, thus putting to death that hostility through it.[10] 17So he came and proclaimed peace to you who were far off and peace to those who were near; 18for through him both of us have access in one Spirit to the Father. 19So then you are no longer strangers and aliens, but you are citizens with the saints and also members of the household of God, 20built upon the foundation of the apostles and prophets, with Christ Jesus himself as the cornerstone.[11] 21In him the whole structure is joined together and grows into a holy temple in the Lord; 22in whom you also are built together spiritually[12] into a dwelling place for God.

Ephesians 3
This is the reason that I Paul am a prisoner for[13] Christ Jesus for the sake of you Gentiles— 2for surely you have already heard of the commission of God’s grace that was given me for you, 3and how the mystery was made known to me by revelation, as I wrote above in a few words, 4a reading of which will enable you to perceive my understanding of the mystery of Christ. 5In former generations this mystery[14] was not made known to humankind, as it has now been revealed to his holy apostles and prophets by the Spirit: 6that is, the Gentiles have become fellow heirs, members of the same body, and sharers in the promise in Christ Jesus through the gospel.

7 Of this gospel I have become a servant according to the gift of God’s grace that was given me by the working of his power. 8Although I am the very least of all the saints, this grace was given to me to bring to the Gentiles the news of the boundless riches of Christ, 9and to make everyone see[15] what is the plan of the mystery hidden for ages in [16] God who created all things; 10so that through the church the wisdom of God in its rich variety might now be made known to the rulers and authorities in the heavenly places. 11This was in accordance with the eternal purpose that he has carried out in Christ Jesus our Lord, 12in whom we have access to God in boldness and confidence through faith in him.[17] 13I pray therefore that you[18] may not lose heart over my sufferings for you; they are your glory.

CREATED FOR GOOD WORKS
The Christian is in a different position from other people who are trying to be good. They hope, by being good, to please God if there is one; or—if they think there is not—at least they hope to deserve approval from good men. But the Christian thinks any good he does comes from the Christ-life inside him. He does not think God will love us because we are good, but that God will make us good because He loves us.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Ephesians 2:10

14 For this reason I bow my knees before the Father,[19] 15from whom every family[20] in heaven and on earth takes its name. 16I pray that, according to the riches of his glory, he may grant that you may be strengthened in your inner being with power through his Spirit, 17and that Christ may dwell in your hearts through faith, as you are being rooted and grounded in love. 18I pray that you may have the power to comprehend, with all the saints, what is the breadth and length and height and depth, 19and to know the love of Christ that surpasses knowledge, so that you may be filled with all the fullness of God.

20 Now to him who by the power at work within us is able to accomplish abundantly far more than all we can ask or imagine, 21to him be glory in the church and in Christ Jesus to all generations, forever and ever. Amen.

Ephesians 4
I therefore, the prisoner in the Lord, beg you to lead a life worthy of the calling to which you have been called, 2with all humility and gentleness, with patience, bearing with one another in love, 3making every effort to maintain the unity of the Spirit in the bond of peace. 4There is one body and one Spirit, just as you were called to the one hope of your calling, 5one Lord, one faith, one baptism, 6one God and Father of all, who is above all and through all and in all.

7 But each of us was given grace according to the measure of Christ’s gift. 8Therefore it is said,

“When he ascended on high he made captivity itself a captive;

he gave gifts to his people.”

9(When it says, “He ascended,” what does it mean but that he had also descended[21] into the lower parts of the earth? 10He who descended is the same one who ascended far above all the heavens, so that he might fill all things.) 11The gifts he gave were that some would be apostles, some prophets, some evangelists, some pastors and teachers, 12to equip the saints for the work of ministry, for building up the body of Christ, 13until all of us come to the unity of the faith and of the knowledge of the Son of God, to maturity, to the measure of the full stature of Christ. 14We must no longer be children, tossed to and fro and blown about by every wind of doctrine, by people’s trickery, by their craftiness in deceitful scheming. 15But speaking the truth in love, we must grow up in every way into him who is the head, into Christ, 16from whom the whole body, joined and knit together by every ligament with which it is equipped, as each part is working properly, promotes the body’s growth in building itself up in love.

A BODY KNIT TOGETHER
The society into which the Christian is called at baptism is not a collective but a Body. It is in fact that Body of which the family is an image on the natural level. If anyone came to it with the misconception that membership of the Church was membership in a debased modern sense—a massing together of persons as if they were pennies or counters—he would be corrected at the threshold by the discovery that the head of this Body is so unlike the inferior members that they share no predicate with Him save by analogy. We are summoned from the outset to combine as creatures with our Creator, as mortals with immortal, as redeemed sinners with sinless Redeemer. His presence, the interaction between Him and us, must always be the overwhelmingly dominant factor in the life we are to lead within the Body, and any conception of Christian fellowship which does not mean primarily fellowship with Him is out of court. After that it seems almost trivial to trace further down the diversity of operations to the unity of the Spirit. But it is very plainly there. There are priests divided from the laity, catechumens divided from those who are in full fellowship. There is authority of husbands over wives and parents over children. There is, in forms too subtle for official embodiment, a continual interchange of complementary ministrations. We are all constantly teaching and learning, forgiving and being forgiven, representing Christ to man when we intercede, and man to Christ when others intercede for us. The sacrifice of selfish privacy which is daily demanded of us is daily repaid a hundredfold in the true growth of personality which the life of the Body encourages. Those who are members of one another become as diverse as the hand and the ear. That is why the worldlings are so monotonously alike compared with the almost fantastic variety of the saints. Obedience is the road to freedom, humility the road to pleasure, unity the road to personality.

—from “Membership,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Ephesians 4:7–16

17 Now this I affirm and insist on in the Lord: you must no longer live as the Gentiles live, in the futility of their minds. 18They are darkened in their understanding, alienated from the life of God because of their ignorance and hardness of heart. 19They have lost all sensitivity and have abandoned themselves to licentiousness, greedy to practice every kind of impurity. 20That is not the way you learned Christ! 21For surely you have heard about him and were taught in him, as truth is in Jesus. 22You were taught to put away your former way of life, your old self, corrupt and deluded by its lusts, 23and to be renewed in the spirit of your minds, 24and to clothe yourselves with the new self, created according to the likeness of God in true righteousness and holiness.



For reflection: Ephesians 4:22–24

We were considering the Christian idea of “putting on Christ” . . . What I want to make clear is that this is not one among many jobs a Christian has to do . . . It is the whole of Christianity.

—from Mere Christianity



25 So then, putting away falsehood, let all of us speak the truth to our neighbors, for we are members of one another. 26Be angry but do not sin; do not let the sun go down on your anger, 27and do not make room for the devil. 28Thieves must give up stealing; rather let them labor and work honestly with their own hands, so as to have something to share with the needy. 29Let no evil talk come out of your mouths, but only what is useful for building up,[22] as there is need, so that your words may give grace to those who hear. 30And do not grieve the Holy Spirit of God, with which you were marked with a seal for the day of redemption. 31Put away from you all bitterness and wrath and anger and wrangling and slander, together with all malice, 32and be kind to one another, tenderhearted, forgiving one another, as

Ephesians 5
God in Christ has forgiven you.[23] 1Therefore be imitators of God, as beloved children, 2and live in love, as Christ loved us[24] and gave himself up for us, a fragrant offering and sacrifice to God.

3 But fornication and impurity of any kind, or greed, must not even be mentioned among you, as is proper among saints. 4Entirely out of place is obscene, silly, and vulgar talk; but instead, let there be thanksgiving. 5Be sure of this, that no fornicator or impure person, or one who is greedy (that is, an idolater), has any inheritance in the kingdom of Christ and of God.

6 Let no one deceive you with empty words, for because of these things the wrath of God comes on those who are disobedient. 7Therefore do not be associated with them. 8For once you were darkness, but now in the Lord you are light. Live as children of light— 9for the fruit of the light is found in all that is good and right and true. 10Try to find out what is pleasing to the Lord. 11Take no part in the unfruitful works of darkness, but instead expose them. 12For it is shameful even to mention what such people do secretly; 13but everything exposed by the light becomes visible, 14for everything that becomes visible is light. Therefore it says,

“Sleeper, awake!

Rise from the dead,

and Christ will shine on you.”

15 Be careful then how you live, not as unwise people but as wise, 16making the most of the time, because the days are evil. 17So do not be foolish, but understand what the will of the Lord is. 18Do not get drunk with wine, for that is debauchery; but be filled with the Spirit, 19as you sing psalms and hymns and spiritual songs among yourselves, singing and making melody to the Lord in your hearts, 20giving thanks to God the Father at all times and for everything in the name of our Lord Jesus Christ.

21 Be subject to one another out of reverence for Christ.

22 Wives, be subject to your husbands as you are to the Lord. 23For the husband is the head of the wife just as Christ is the head of the church, the body of which he is the Savior. 24Just as the church is subject to Christ, so also wives ought to be, in everything, to their husbands.

25 Husbands, love your wives, just as Christ loved the church and gave himself up for her, 26in order to make her holy by cleansing her with the washing of water by the word, 27so as to present the church to himself in splendor, without a spot or wrinkle or anything of the kind—yes, so that she may be holy and without blemish. 28In the same way, husbands should love their wives as they do their own bodies. He who loves his wife loves himself. 29For no one ever hates his own body, but he nourishes and tenderly cares for it, just as Christ does for the church, 30because we are members of his body.[25] 31“For this reason a man will leave his father and mother and be joined to his wife, and the two will become one flesh.” 32This is a great mystery, and I am applying it to Christ and the church. 33Each of you, however, should love his wife as himself, and a wife should respect her husband.

Ephesians 6
Children, obey your parents in the Lord,[26] for this is right. 2“Honor your father and mother”—this is the first commandment with a promise: 3“so that it may be well with you and you may live long on the earth.”

4 And, fathers, do not provoke your children to anger, but bring them up in the discipline and instruction of the Lord.

5 Slaves, obey your earthly masters with fear and trembling, in singleness of heart, as you obey Christ; 6not only while being watched, and in order to please them, but as slaves of Christ, doing the will of God from the heart. 7Render service with enthusiasm, as to the Lord and not to men and women, 8knowing that whatever good we do, we will receive the same again from the Lord, whether we are slaves or free.

9 And, masters, do the same to them. Stop threatening them, for you know that both of you have the same Master in heaven, and with him there is no partiality.

HUSBANDS, LOVE YOUR WIVES
Christian writers (notably Milton) have sometimes spoken of the husband’s headship with a complacency to make the blood run cold. We must go back to our Bibles. The husband is the head of the wife just in so far as he is to her what Christ is to the Church. He is to love her as Christ loved the Church—read on—and give his life for her (Eph. V, 25). This headship, then, is most fully embodied not in the husband we should all wish to be but in him whose marriage is most like a crucifixion; whose wife receives most and gives least, is most unworthy of him—is in her own mere nature—least lovable.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  Ephesians 5:25–28

10 Finally, be strong in the Lord and in the strength of his power. 11Put on the whole armor of God, so that you may be able to stand against the wiles of the devil. 12For our[27] struggle is not against enemies of blood and flesh, but against the rulers, against the authorities, against the cosmic powers of this present darkness, against the spiritual forces of evil in the heavenly places. 13Therefore take up the whole armor of God, so that you may be able to withstand on that evil day, and having done everything, to stand firm. 14Stand therefore, and fasten the belt of truth around your waist, and put on the breastplate of righteousness. 15As shoes for your feet put on whatever will make you ready to proclaim the gospel of peace. 16With all of these,[28] take the shield of faith, with which you will be able to quench all the flaming arrows of the evil one. 17Take the helmet of salvation, and the sword of the Spirit, which is the word of God.

STAND AGAINST TEMPTATION
You may remember I said that the first step towards humility was to realise that one is proud. I want to add now that the next step is to make some serious attempt to practise the Christian virtues. A week is not enough. Things often go swimmingly for the first week. Try six weeks. By that time, having, as far as one can see, fallen back completely or even fallen lower than the point one began from, one will have discovered some truths about oneself. No man knows how bad he is till he has tried very hard to be good. A silly idea is current that good people do not know what temptation means. This is an obvious lie. Only those who try to resist temptation know how strong it is. After all, you find out the strength of the German army by fighting against it, not by giving in. You find out the strength of a wind by trying to walk against it, not by lying down. A man who gives in to temptation after five minutes simply does not know what it would have been like an hour later. That is why bad people, in one sense, know very little about badness. They have lived a sheltered life by always giving in. We never find out the strength of the evil impulse inside us until we try to fight it: and Christ, because He was the only man who never yielded to temptation, is also the only man who knows to the full what temptation means—the only complete realist.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Ephesians 6:10–18

18 Pray in the Spirit at all times in every prayer and supplication. To that end keep alert and always persevere in supplication for all the saints. 19Pray also for me, so that when I speak, a message may be given to me to make known with boldness the mystery of the gospel,[29] 20for which I am an ambassador in chains. Pray that I may declare it boldly, as I must speak.

21 So that you also may know how I am and what I am doing, Tychicus will tell you everything. He is a dear brother and a faithful minister in the Lord. 22I am sending him to you for this very purpose, to let you know how we are, and to encourage your hearts.

23 Peace be to the whole community,[30] and love with faith, from God the Father and the Lord Jesus Christ. 24Grace be with all who have an undying love for our Lord Jesus Christ.[31]

[1]  Other ancient authorities lack in Ephesus, reading saints who are also faithful

[2]  Gk in him

[3]  Or been made a heritage

[4]  Other ancient authorities read who

[5]  Other ancient authorities lack and your love

[6]  Gk He

[7]  Other ancient authorities read in Christ

[8]  Gk in the flesh

[9]  Or reconcile both of us in one body for God

[10]  Or in him, or in himself

[11]  Or keystone

[12]  Gk in the Spirit

[13]  Or of

[14]  Gk it

[15]  Other ancient authorities read to bring to light

[16]  Or by

[17]  Or the faith of him

[18]  Or I

[19]  Other ancient authorities add of our Lord Jesus Christ

[20]  Gk fatherhood

[21]  Other ancient authorities add first

[22]  Other ancient authorities read building up faith

[23]  Other ancient authorities read us

[24]  Other ancient authorities read you

[25]  Other ancient authorities add of his flesh and of his bones

[26]  Other ancient authorities lack in the Lord

[27]  Other ancient authorities read your

[28]  Or In all circumstances

[29]  Other ancient authorities lack of the gospel

[30]  Gk to the brothers

[31]  Other ancient authorities add Amen

THE LETTER OF PAUL TO
TITUS
Titus 1

Titus 2

Titus 3

Titus 1
Paul, a servant[1] of God and an apostle of Jesus Christ, for the sake of the faith of God’s elect and the knowledge of the truth that is in accordance with godliness, 2in the hope of eternal life that God, who never lies, promised before the ages began— 3in due time he revealed his word through the proclamation with which I have been entrusted by the command of God our Savior,

4 To Titus, my loyal child in the faith we share:

Grace[2] and peace from God the Father and Christ Jesus our Savior.

5 I left you behind in Crete for this reason, so that you should put in order what remained to be done, and should appoint elders in every town, as I directed you: 6someone who is blameless, married only once,[3] whose children are believers, not accused of debauchery and not rebellious. 7For a bishop,[4] as God’s steward, must be blameless; he must not be arrogant or quick-tempered or addicted to wine or violent or greedy for gain; 8but he must be hospitable, a lover of goodness, prudent, upright, devout, and self-controlled. 9He must have a firm grasp of the word that is trustworthy in accordance with the teaching, so that he may be able both to preach with sound doctrine and to refute those who contradict it.

10 There are also many rebellious people, idle talkers and deceivers, especially those of the circumcision; 11they must be silenced, since they are upsetting whole families by teaching for sordid gain what it is not right to teach. 12It was one of them, their very own prophet, who said,

“Cretans are always liars, vicious brutes, lazy gluttons.”

13That testimony is true. For this reason rebuke them sharply, so that they may become sound in the faith, 14not paying attention to Jewish myths or to commandments of those who reject the truth. 15To the pure all things are pure, but to the corrupt and unbelieving nothing is pure. Their very minds and consciences are corrupted. 16They profess to know God, but they deny him by their actions. They are detestable, disobedient, unfit for any good work.

Titus 2
But as for you, teach what is consistent with sound doctrine. 2Tell the older men to be temperate, serious, prudent, and sound in faith, in love, and in endurance.

DEFENDING THE FAITH
Each of us has his individual emphasis: each holds, in addition to the Faith, many opinions which seem to him to be consistent with it and true and important. And so perhaps they are. But as apologists it is not our business to defend them. We are defending Christianity; not “my religion.” When we mention our personal opinions we must always make quite clear the difference between them and the Faith itself.

—from “Christian Apologetics,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Titus 1:9

3 Likewise, tell the older women to be reverent in behavior, not to be slanderers or slaves to drink; they are to teach what is good, 4so that they may encourage the young women to love their husbands, to love their children, 5to be self-controlled, chaste, good managers of the household, kind, being submissive to their husbands, so that the word of God may not be discredited.

6 Likewise, urge the younger men to be self-controlled. 7Show yourself in all respects a model of good works, and in your teaching show integrity, gravity, 8and sound speech that cannot be censured; then any opponent will be put to shame, having nothing evil to say of us.

9 Tell slaves to be submissive to their masters and to give satisfaction in every respect; they are not to talk back, 10not to pilfer, but to show complete and perfect fidelity, so that in everything they may be an ornament to the doctrine of God our Savior.

11 For the grace of God has appeared, bringing salvation to all,[5] 12training us to renounce impiety and worldly passions, and in the present age to live lives that are self-controlled, upright, and godly, 13while we wait for the blessed hope and the manifestation of the glory of our great God and Savior,[6] Jesus Christ. 14He it is who gave himself for us that he might redeem us from all iniquity and purify for himself a people of his own who are zealous for good deeds.

15 Declare these things; exhort and reprove with all authority.[7] Let no one look down on you.

Titus 3
Remind them to be subject to rulers and authorities, to be obedient, to be ready for every good work, 2to speak evil of no one, to avoid quarreling, to be gentle, and to show every courtesy to everyone. 3For we ourselves were once foolish, disobedient, led astray, slaves to various passions and pleasures, passing our days in malice and envy, despicable, hating one another. 4But when the goodness and loving kindness of God our Savior appeared, 5he saved us, not because of any works of righteousness that we had done, but according to his mercy, through the water[8] of rebirth and renewal by the Holy Spirit. 6This Spirit he poured out on us richly through Jesus Christ our Savior, 7so that, having been justified by his grace, we might become heirs according to the hope of eternal life. 8The saying is sure.

I desire that you insist on these things, so that those who have come to believe in God may be careful to devote themselves to good works; these things are excellent and profitable to everyone. 9But avoid stupid controversies, genealogies, dissensions, and quarrels about the law, for they are unprofitable and worthless. 10After a first and second admonition, have nothing more to do with anyone who causes divisions, 11since you know that such a person is perverted and sinful, being self-condemned.

12 When I send Artemas to you, or Tychicus, do your best to come to me at Nicopolis, for I have decided to spend the winter there. 13Make every effort to send Zenas the lawyer and Apollos on their way, and see that they lack nothing. 14And let people learn to devote themselves to good works in order to meet urgent needs, so that they may not be unproductive.

15 All who are with me send greetings to you. Greet those who love us in the faith.

Grace be with all of you.[9]

AIM AT HEAVEN
Hope is one of the Theological virtues. This means that a continual looking forward to the eternal world is not (as some modern people think) a form of escapism or wishful thinking, but one of the things a Christian is meant to do. It does not mean that we are to leave the present world as it is. If you read history you will find that the Christians who did most for the present world were just those who thought most of the next. The Apostles themselves, who set on foot the conversion of the Roman Empire, the great men who built up the Middle Ages, the English Evangelicals who abolished the Slave Trade, all left their mark on Earth, precisely because their minds were occupied with Heaven. It is since Christians have largely ceased to think of the other world that they have become so ineffective in this. Aim at Heaven and you will get earth “thrown in”: aim at earth and you will get neither. It seems a strange rule, but something like it can be seen at work in other matters. Health is a great blessing, but the moment you make health one of your main, direct objects you start becoming a crank and imagining there is something wrong with you. You are only likely to get health provided you want other things more—food, games, work, fun, open air. In the same way, we shall never save civilisation as long as civilisation is our main object. We must learn to want something else even more.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Titus 2:11–14

[1]  Gk slave

[2]  Other ancient authorities read Grace, mercy,

[3]  Gk husband of one wife

[4]  Or an overseer

[5]  Or has appeared to all, bringing salvation

[6]  Or of the great God and our Savior

[7]  Gk commandment

[8]  Gk washing

[9]  Other ancient authorities add Amen

3 JOHN
1 The elder to the beloved Gaius, whom I love in truth.

2 Beloved, I pray that all may go well with you and that you may be in good health, just as it is well with your soul. 3I was overjoyed when some of the friends[1] arrived and testified to your faithfulness to the truth, namely how you walk in the truth. 4I have no greater joy than this, to hear that my children are walking in the truth.

5 Beloved, you do faithfully whatever you do for the friends,[1] even though they are strangers to you; 6they have testified to your love before the church. You will do well to send them on in a manner worthy of God; 7for they began their journey for the sake of Christ,[2] accepting no support from non-believers.[3] 8Therefore we ought to support such people, so that we may become co-workers with the truth.



For reflection: 3 John 4

If you continue to love Jesus, nothing much can go wrong with you, and I hope you may always do so.

—from a letter to Ruth Broady, October 26, 1963



9 I have written something to the church; but Diotrephes, who likes to put himself first, does not acknowledge our authority. 10So if I come, I will call attention to what he is doing in spreading false charges against us. And not content with those charges, he refuses to welcome the friends,[1] and even prevents those who want to do so and expels them from the church.

11 Beloved, do not imitate what is evil but imitate what is good. Whoever does good is from God; whoever does evil has not seen God. 12Everyone has testified favorably about Demetrius, and so has the truth itself. We also testify for him,[4] and you know that our testimony is true.

13 I have much to write to you, but I would rather not write with pen and ink; 14instead I hope to see you soon, and we will talk together face to face.

15 Peace to you. The friends send you their greetings. Greet the friends there, each by name.

[1]  Gk brothers

[2]  Gk for the sake of the name

[3]  Gk the Gentiles

[4]  Gk lacks for him

THE
REVELATION
TO JOHN
Revelation 1

Revelation 2

Revelation 3

Revelation 4

Revelation 5

Revelation 6

Revelation 7

Revelation 8

Revelation 9

Revelation 10

Revelation 11

Revelation 12

Revelation 13

Revelation 14

Revelation 15

Revelation 16

Revelation 17

Revelation 18

Revelation 19

Revelation 20

Revelation 21

Revelation 22

Revelation 1
The revelation of Jesus Christ, which God gave him to show his servants[1] what must soon take place; he made[2] it known by sending his angel to his servant[3] John, 2who testified to the word of God and to the testimony of Jesus Christ, even to all that he saw.

3 Blessed is the one who reads aloud the words of the prophecy, and blessed are those who hear and who keep what is written in it; for the time is near.

4 John to the seven churches that are in Asia:

Grace to you and peace from him who is and who was and who is to come, and from the seven spirits who are before his throne, 5and from Jesus Christ, the faithful witness, the firstborn of the dead, and the ruler of the kings of the earth.

To him who loves us and freed[4] us from our sins by his blood, 6and made[2] us to be a kingdom, priests serving[5] his God and Father, to him be glory and dominion forever and ever. Amen.

 7 Look! He is coming with the clouds;

every eye will see him,

even those who pierced him;

and on his account all the tribes of the earth will wail.

So it is to be. Amen.

8 “I am the Alpha and the Omega,” says the Lord God, who is and who was and who is to come, the Almighty.

9 I, John, your brother who share with you in Jesus the persecution and the kingdom and the patient endurance, was on the island called Patmos because of the word of God and the testimony of Jesus.[6] 10I was in the spirit[7] on the Lord’s day, and I heard behind me a loud voice like a trumpet 11saying, “Write in a book what you see and send it to the seven churches, to Ephesus, to Smyrna, to Pergamum, to Thyatira, to Sardis, to Philadelphia, and to Laodicea.”

12 Then I turned to see whose voice it was that spoke to me, and on turning I saw seven golden lampstands, 13and in the midst of the lampstands I saw one like the Son of Man, clothed with a long robe and with a golden sash across his chest. 14His head and his hair were white as white wool, white as snow; his eyes were like a flame of fire, 15his feet were like burnished bronze, refined as in a furnace, and his voice was like the sound of many waters. 16In his right hand he held seven stars, and from his mouth came a sharp, two-edged sword, and his face was like the sun shining with full force.

17 When I saw him, I fell at his feet as though dead. But he placed his right hand on me, saying, “Do not be afraid; I am the first and the last, 18and the living one. I was dead, and see, I am alive forever and ever; and I have the keys of Death and of Hades. 19Now write what you have seen, what is, and what is to take place after this. 20As for the mystery of the seven stars that you saw in my right hand, and the seven golden lampstands: the seven stars are the angels of the seven churches, and the seven lampstands are the seven churches.

Revelation 2
“To the angel of the church in Ephesus write: These are the words of him who holds the seven stars in his right hand, who walks among the seven golden lampstands:

2 “I know your works, your toil and your patient endurance. I know that you cannot tolerate evildoers; you have tested those who claim to be apostles but are not, and have found them to be false. 3I also know that you are enduring patiently and bearing up for the sake of my name, and that you have not grown weary. 4But I have this against you, that you have abandoned the love you had at first. 5Remember then from what you have fallen; repent, and do the works you did at first. If not, I will come to you and remove your lampstand from its place, unless you repent. 6Yet this is to your credit: you hate the works of the Nicolaitans, which I also hate. 7Let anyone who has an ear listen to what the Spirit is saying to the churches. To everyone who conquers, I will give permission to eat from the tree of life that is in the paradise of God.

8 “And to the angel of the church in Smyrna write: These are the words of the first and the last, who was dead and came to life:

9 “I know your affliction and your poverty, even though you are rich. I know the slander on the part of those who say that they are Jews and are not, but are a synagogue of Satan. 10Do not fear what you are about to suffer. Beware, the devil is about to throw some of you into prison so that you may be tested, and for ten days you will have affliction. Be faithful until death, and I will give you the crown of life. 11Let anyone who has an ear listen to what the Spirit is saying to the churches. Whoever conquers will not be harmed by the second death.

12 “And to the angel of the church in Pergamum write: These are the words of him who has the sharp two-edged sword:

13 “I know where you are living, where Satan’s throne is. Yet you are holding fast to my name, and you did not deny your faith in me[8] even in the days of Antipas my witness, my faithful one, who was killed among you, where Satan lives. 14But I have a few things against you: you have some there who hold to the teaching of Balaam, who taught Balak to put a stumbling block before the people of Israel, so that they would eat food sacrificed to idols and practice fornication. 15So you also have some who hold to the teaching of the Nicolaitans. 16Repent then. If not, I will come to you soon and make war against them with the sword of my mouth. 17Let anyone who has an ear listen to what the Spirit is saying to the churches. To everyone who conquers I will give some of the hidden manna, and I will give a white stone, and on the white stone is written a new name that no one knows except the one who receives it.

18 “And to the angel of the church in Thyatira write: These are the words of the Son of God, who has eyes like a flame of fire, and whose feet are like burnished bronze:

19 “I know your works—your love, faith, service, and patient endurance. I know that your last works are greater than the first. 20But I have this against you: you tolerate that woman Jezebel, who calls herself a prophet and is teaching and beguiling my servants[9] to practice fornication and to eat food sacrificed to idols. 21I gave her time to repent, but she refuses to repent of her fornication. 22Beware, I am throwing her on a bed, and those who commit adultery with her I am throwing into great distress, unless they repent of her doings; 23and I will strike her children dead. And all the churches will know that I am the one who searches minds and hearts, and I will give to each of you as your works deserve. 24But to the rest of you in Thyatira, who do not hold this teaching, who have not learned what some call ‘the deep things of Satan,’ to you I say, I do not lay on you any other burden; 25only hold fast to what you have until I come. 26To everyone who conquers and continues to do my works to the end,

A NEW NAME
This is the ultimate law—the seed dies to live, the bread must be cast upon the waters, he that loses his soul will save it. But the life of the seed, the finding of the bread, the recovery of the soul, are as real as the preliminary sacrifice. Hence it is truly said of heaven “in heaven there is no ownership. If any there took upon him to call anything his own, he would straightway be thrust out into hell and become an evil spirit.” But it is also said “To him that overcometh I will give a white stone, and in the stone a new name written, which no man knoweth saving he that receiveth it.” What can be more a man’s own than this new name which even in eternity remains a secret between God and him? And what shall we take this secrecy to mean? Surely, that each of the redeemed shall forever know and praise some one aspect of the Divine beauty better than any other creature can. Why else were individuals created, but that God, loving all infinitely, should love each differently? And this difference, so far from impairing, floods with meaning the love of all blessed creatures for one another, the communion of the saints. If all experienced God in the same way and returned Him an identical worship, the song of the Church triumphant would have no symphony, it would be like an orchestra in which all the instruments played the same note.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Revelation 2:17

I will give authority over the nations;

27 to rule[10] them with an iron rod,

as when clay pots are shattered—

28even as I also received authority from my Father. To the one who conquers I will also give the morning star. 29Let anyone who has an ear listen to what the Spirit is saying to the churches.

TAKING RESPONSIBILITY
If ever the book which I am not going to write is written, it must be the full confession by Christendom of Christendom’s specific contribution to the sum of human cruelty and treachery. Large areas of “the World” will not hear us till we have publicly disowned much of our past. Why should they? We have shouted the name of Christ and enacted the service of Moloch.

—from The Four Loves

For reflection  Revelation 2:19–23

Revelation 3
“And to the angel of the church in Sardis write: These are the words of him who has the seven spirits of God and the seven stars:

“I know your works; you have a name of being alive, but you are dead. 2Wake up, and strengthen what remains and is on the point of death, for I have not found your works perfect in the sight of my God. 3Remember then what you received and heard; obey it, and repent. If you do not wake up, I will come like a thief, and you will not know at what hour I will come to you. 4Yet you have still a few persons in Sardis who have not soiled their clothes; they will walk with me, dressed in white, for they are worthy. 5If you conquer, you will be clothed like them in white robes, and I will not blot your name out of the book of life; I will confess your name before my Father and before his angels. 6Let anyone who has an ear listen to what the Spirit is saying to the churches.

7 “And to the angel of the church in Philadelphia write:

These are the words of the holy one, the true one,

who has the key of David,

who opens and no one will shut,

who shuts and no one opens:

8 “I know your works. Look, I have set before you an open door, which no one is able to shut. I know that you have but little power, and yet you have kept my word and have not denied my name. 9I will make those of the synagogue of Satan who say that they are Jews and are not, but are lying—I will make them come and bow down before your feet, and they will learn that I have loved you. 10Because you have kept my word of patient endurance, I will keep you from the hour of trial that is coming on the whole world to test the inhabitants of the earth. 11I am coming soon; hold fast to what you have, so that no one may seize your crown. 12If you conquer, I will make you a pillar in the temple of my God; you will never go out of it. I will write on you the name of my God, and the name of the city of my God, the new Jerusalem that comes down from my God out of heaven, and my own new name. 13Let anyone who has an ear listen to what the Spirit is saying to the churches.

14 “And to the angel of the church in Laodicea write: The words of the Amen, the faithful and true witness, the origin[11] of God’s creation:

15 “I know your works; you are neither cold nor hot. I wish that you were either cold or hot. 16So, because you are lukewarm, and neither cold nor hot, I am about to spit you out of my mouth. 17For you say, ‘I am rich, I have prospered, and I need nothing.’ You do not realize that you are wretched, pitiable, poor, blind, and naked. 18Therefore I counsel you to buy from me gold refined by fire so that you may be rich; and white robes to clothe you and to keep the shame of your nakedness from being seen; and salve to anoint your eyes so that you may see. 19I reprove and discipline those whom I love. Be earnest, therefore, and repent. 20Listen! I am standing at the door, knocking; if you hear my voice and open the door, I will come in to you and eat with you, and you with me. 21To the one who conquers I will give a place with me on my throne, just as I myself conquered and sat down with my Father on his throne. 22Let anyone who has an ear listen to what the Spirit is saying to the churches.”



For reflection: Revelation 3:16

Jesus Christ did not say “Go into all the world and tell the world that it is quite right.” The Gospel is something completely different. In fact, it is directly opposed to the world.

—from “Cross-Examination,” God in the Dock



Revelation 4
After this I looked, and there in heaven a door stood open! And the first voice, which I had heard speaking to me like a trumpet, said, “Come up here, and I will show you what must take place after this.” 2At once I was in the spirit,[12] and there in heaven stood a throne, with one seated on the throne! 3And the one seated there looks like jasper and carnelian, and around the throne is a rainbow that looks like an emerald. 4Around the throne are twenty-four thrones, and seated on the thrones are twenty-four elders, dressed in white robes, with golden crowns on their heads. 5Coming from the throne are flashes of lightning, and rumblings and peals of thunder, and in front of the throne burn seven flaming torches, which are the seven spirits of God; 6and in front of the throne there is something like a sea of glass, like crystal.

STANDING AT THE DOOR, KNOCKING
It is good for us to know love; and best for us to know the love of the best object, God. But to know it as a love in which we were primarily the wooers and God the wooed, in which we sought and He was found, in which His conformity to our needs, not ours to His, came first, would be to know it in a form false to the very nature of things. For we are only creatures: our role must always be that of patient to agent, female to male, mirror to light, echo to voice. Our highest activity must be response, not initiative. To experience the love of God in a true, and not an illusory form, is therefore to experience it as our surrender to His demand, our conformity to His desire: to experience it in the opposite way is, as it were, a solecism against the grammar of being.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Revelation 3:19–20

Around the throne, and on each side of the throne, are four living creatures, full of eyes in front and behind: 7the first living creature like a lion, the second living creature like an ox, the third living creature with a face like a human face, and the fourth living creature like a flying eagle. 8And the four living creatures, each of them with six wings, are full of eyes all around and inside. Day and night without ceasing they sing,

“Holy, holy, holy,

the Lord God the Almighty,

who was and is and is to come.”

9And whenever the living creatures give glory and honor and thanks to the one who is seated on the throne, who lives forever and ever, 10the twenty-four elders fall before the one who is seated on the throne and worship the one who lives forever and ever; they cast their crowns before the throne, singing,

11 “You are worthy, our Lord and God,

to receive glory and honor and power,

for you created all things,

and by your will they existed and were created.”

Revelation 5
Then I saw in the right hand of the one seated on the throne a scroll written on the inside and on the back, sealed[13] with seven seals; 2and I saw a mighty angel proclaiming with a loud voice, “Who is worthy to open the scroll and break its seals?” 3And no one in heaven or on earth or under the earth was able to open the scroll or to look into it. 4And I began to weep bitterly because no one was found worthy to open the scroll or to look into it. 5Then one of the elders said to me, “Do not weep. See, the Lion of the tribe of Judah, the Root of David, has conquered, so that he can open the scroll and its seven seals.”

NOT JUST GOLD AND HARPS
There is no need to be worried by facetious people who try to make the Christian hope of “Heaven” ridiculous by saying they do not want “to spend eternity playing harps.” The answer to such people is that if they cannot understand books written for grown-ups, they should not talk about them. All the scriptural imagery (harps, crowns, gold, etc.) is, of course, a merely symbolical attempt to express the inexpressible. Musical instruments are mentioned because for many people (not all) music is the thing known in the present life which most strongly suggests ecstasy and infinity. Crowns are mentioned to suggest the fact that those who are united with God in eternity share His splendour and power and joy. Gold is mentioned to suggest the timelessness of Heaven (gold does not rust) and the preciousness of it. People who take these symbols literally might as well think that when Christ told us to be like doves, He meant that we were to lay eggs.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Revelation 4:1–11

6 Then I saw between the throne and the four living creatures and among the elders a Lamb standing as if it had been slaughtered, having seven horns and seven eyes, which are the seven spirits of God sent out into all the earth. 7He went and took the scroll from the right hand of the one who was seated on the throne. 8When he had taken the scroll, the four living creatures and the twenty-four elders fell before the Lamb, each holding a harp and golden bowls full of incense, which are the prayers of the saints. 9They sing a new song:

SAINTS FROM EVERY TRIBE
This signature on each soul may be a product of heredity and environment, but that only means that heredity and environment are among the instruments whereby God creates a soul. I am considering not how, but why, He makes each soul unique. If He had no use for all these differences, I do not see why He should have created more souls than one. Be sure that the ins and outs of individuality are no mystery to Him; and one day they will no longer be a mystery to you. The mould in which a key is made would be a strange thing, if you had never seen a key: and the key itself a strange thing if you had never seen a lock. Your soul has a curious shape because it is a hollow made to fit a particular swelling in the infinite contours of the Divine substance, or a key to unlock one of the doors in the house with many mansions. For it is not humanity in the abstract that is to be saved, but you—you, the individual reader, John Stubbs or Janet Smith. Blessed and fortunate creature, your eyes shall behold Him and not another’s. All that you are, sins apart, is destined, if you will let God have His good way, to utter satisfaction. The Brocken spectre “looked to every man like his first love,” because she was a cheat. But God will look to every soul like its first love because He is its first love. Your place in heaven will seem to be made for you and you alone, because you were made for it—made for it stitch by stitch as a glove is made for a hand.

—from The Problem of Pain

For reflection  Revelation 5:1–10

“You are worthy to take the scroll

and to open its seals,

for you were slaughtered and by your blood you ransomed for God

saints from[14] every tribe and language and people and nation;

10 you have made them to be a kingdom and priests serving[15] our God,

and they will reign on earth.”

11 Then I looked, and I heard the voice of many angels surrounding the throne and the living creatures and the elders; they numbered myriads of myriads and thousands of thousands, 12singing with full voice,

“Worthy is the Lamb that was slaughtered

to receive power and wealth and wisdom and might

and honor and glory and blessing!”

13Then I heard every creature in heaven and on earth and under the earth and in the sea, and all that is in them, singing,

“To the one seated on the throne and to the Lamb

be blessing and honor and glory and might

forever and ever!”

14And the four living creatures said, “Amen!” And the elders fell down and worshiped.

Revelation 6
Then I saw the Lamb open one of the seven seals, and I heard one of the four living creatures call out, as with a voice of thunder, “Come!”[16] 2I looked, and there was a white horse! Its rider had a bow; a crown was given to him, and he came out conquering and to conquer.

3 When he opened the second seal, I heard the second living creature call out, “Come!”[16] 4And out came[17] another horse, bright red; its rider was permitted to take peace from the earth, so that people would slaughter one another; and he was given a great sword.

5 When he opened the third seal, I heard the third living creature call out, “Come!”[16] I looked, and there was a black horse! Its rider held a pair of scales in his hand, 6and I heard what seemed to be a voice in the midst of the four living creatures saying, “A quart of wheat for a day’s pay,[18] and three quarts of barley for a day’s pay,[18] but do not damage the olive oil and the wine!”

7 When he opened the fourth seal, I heard the voice of the fourth living creature call out, “Come!”[16] 8I looked and there was a pale green horse! Its rider’s name was Death, and Hades followed with him; they were given authority over a fourth of the earth, to kill with sword, famine, and pestilence, and by the wild animals of the earth.

9 When he opened the fifth seal, I saw under the altar the souls of those who had been slaughtered for the word of God and for the testimony they had given; 10they cried out with a loud voice, “Sovereign Lord, holy and true, how long will it be before you judge and avenge our blood on the inhabitants of the earth?” 11They were each given a white robe and told to rest a little longer, until the number would be complete both of their fellow servants[19] and of their brothers and sisters,[20] who were soon to be killed as they themselves had been killed.

12 When he opened the sixth seal, I looked, and there came a great earthquake; the sun became black as sackcloth, the full moon became like blood, 13and the stars of the sky fell to the earth as the fig tree drops its winter fruit when shaken by a gale. 14The sky vanished like a scroll rolling itself up, and every mountain and island was removed from its place. 15Then the kings of the earth and the magnates and the generals and the rich and the powerful, and everyone, slave and free, hid in the caves and among the rocks of the mountains, 16calling to the mountains and rocks, “Fall on us and hide us from the face of the one seated on the throne and from the wrath of the Lamb; 17for the great day of their wrath has come, and who is able to stand?”

Revelation 7
After this I saw four angels standing at the four corners of the earth, holding back the four winds of the earth so that no wind could blow on earth or sea or against any tree. 2I saw another angel ascending from the rising of the sun, having the seal of the living God, and he called with a loud voice to the four angels who had been given power to damage earth and sea, 3saying, “Do not damage the earth or the sea or the trees, until we have marked the servants[19] of our God with a seal on their foreheads.”

4 And I heard the number of those who were sealed, one hundred forty-four thousand, sealed out of every tribe of the people of Israel:

5 From the tribe of Judah twelve thousand sealed,

from the tribe of Reuben twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Gad twelve thousand,

6 from the tribe of Asher twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Naphtali twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Manasseh twelve thousand,

7 from the tribe of Simeon twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Levi twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Issachar twelve thousand,

8 from the tribe of Zebulun twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Joseph twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Benjamin twelve thousand sealed.

9 After this I looked, and there was a great multitude that no one could count, from every nation, from all tribes and peoples and languages, standing before the throne and before the Lamb, robed in white, with palm branches in their hands. 10They cried out in a loud voice, saying,

WHAT IT MEANS TO LIVE FOREVER
Christianity asserts that every individual human being is going to live for ever, and this must be either true or false. Now there are a good many things which would not be worth bothering about if I were going to live only seventy years, but which I had better bother about very seriously if I am going to live for ever. Perhaps my bad temper or my jealousy are gradually getting worse—so gradually that the increase in seventy years will not be very noticeable. But it might be absolute hell in a million years: in fact, if Christianity is true, Hell is the precisely correct technical term for what it would be. And immortality makes this other difference, which, by the by, has a connection with the difference between totalitarianism and democracy. If individuals live only seventy years, then a state, or a nation, or a civilisation, which may last for a thousand years, is more important than an individual. But if Christianity is true, then the individual is not only more important but incomparably more important, for he is everlasting and the life of a state or a civilisation, compared with his, is only a moment.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Revelation 7:13–17

“Salvation belongs to our God who is seated on the throne, and to the Lamb!”

11And all the angels stood around the throne and around the elders and the four living creatures, and they fell on their faces before the throne and worshiped God, 12singing,

“Amen! Blessing and glory and wisdom

and thanksgiving and honor

and power and might

be to our God forever and ever! Amen.”

13 Then one of the elders addressed me, saying, “Who are these, robed in white, and where have they come from?” 14I said to him, “Sir, you are the one that knows.” Then he said to me, “These are they who have come out of the great ordeal; they have washed their robes and made them white in the blood of the Lamb.

15 For this reason they are before the throne of God,

and worship him day and night within his temple,

and the one who is seated on the throne will shelter them.

16 They will hunger no more, and thirst no more;

the sun will not strike them,

nor any scorching heat;

17 for the Lamb at the center of the throne will be their shepherd,

and he will guide them to springs of the water of life,

and God will wipe away every tear from their eyes.”

Revelation 8
When the Lamb opened the seventh seal, there was silence in heaven for about half an hour. 2And I saw the seven angels who stand before God, and seven trumpets were given to them.

3 Another angel with a golden censer came and stood at the altar; he was given a great quantity of incense to offer with the prayers of all the saints on the golden altar that is before the throne. 4And the smoke of the incense, with the prayers of the saints, rose before God from the hand of the angel. 5Then the angel took the censer and filled it with fire from the altar and threw it on the earth; and there were peals of thunder, rumblings, flashes of lightning, and an earthquake.

6 Now the seven angels who had the seven trumpets made ready to blow them.

7 The first angel blew his trumpet, and there came hail and fire, mixed with blood, and they were hurled to the earth; and a third of the earth was burned up, and a third of the trees were burned up, and all green grass was burned up.

8 The second angel blew his trumpet, and something like a great mountain, burning with fire, was thrown into the sea. 9A third of the sea became blood, a third of the living creatures in the sea died, and a third of the ships were destroyed.

10 The third angel blew his trumpet, and a great star fell from heaven, blazing like a torch, and it fell on a third of the rivers and on the springs of water. 11The name of the star is Wormwood. A third of the waters became wormwood, and many died from the water, because it was made bitter.

12 The fourth angel blew his trumpet, and a third of the sun was struck, and a third of the moon, and a third of the stars, so that a third of their light was darkened; a third of the day was kept from shining, and likewise the night.

13 Then I looked, and I heard an eagle crying with a loud voice as it flew in midheaven, “Woe, woe, woe to the inhabitants of the earth, at the blasts of the other trumpets that the three angels are about to blow!”

Revelation 9
And the fifth angel blew his trumpet, and I saw a star that had fallen from heaven to earth, and he was given the key to the shaft of the bottomless pit; 2he opened the shaft of the bottomless pit, and from the shaft rose smoke like the smoke of a great furnace, and the sun and the air were darkened with the smoke from the shaft. 3Then from the smoke came locusts on the earth, and they were given authority like the authority of scorpions of the earth. 4They were told not to damage the grass of the earth or any green growth or any tree, but only those people who do not have the seal of God on their foreheads. 5They were allowed to torture them for five months, but not to kill them, and their torture was like the torture of a scorpion when it stings someone. 6And in those days people will seek death but will not find it; they will long to die, but death will flee from them.

7 In appearance the locusts were like horses equipped for battle. On their heads were what looked like crowns of gold; their faces were like human faces, 8their hair like women’s hair, and their teeth like lions’ teeth; 9they had scales like iron breastplates, and the noise of their wings was like the noise of many chariots with horses rushing into battle. 10They have tails like scorpions, with stingers, and in their tails is their power to harm people for five months. 11They have as king over them the angel of the bottomless pit; his name in Hebrew is Abaddon,[21] and in Greek he is called Apollyon.[22]

12 The first woe has passed. There are still two woes to come.

13 Then the sixth angel blew his trumpet, and I heard a voice from the four[23] horns of the golden altar before God, 14saying to the sixth angel who had the trumpet, “Release the four angels who are bound at the great river Euphrates.” 15So the four angels were released, who had been held ready for the hour, the day, the month, and the year, to kill a third of humankind. 16The number of the troops of cavalry was two hundred million; I heard their number. 17And this was how I saw the horses in my vision: the riders wore breastplates the color of fire and of sapphire[24] and of sulfur; the heads of the horses were like lions’ heads, and fire and smoke and sulfur came out of their mouths. 18By these three plagues a third of humankind was killed, by the fire and smoke and sulfur coming out of their mouths. 19For the power of the horses is in their mouths and in their tails; their tails are like serpents, having heads; and with them they inflict harm.

20 The rest of humankind, who were not killed by these plagues, did not repent of the works of their hands or give up worshiping demons and idols of gold and silver and bronze and stone and wood, which cannot see or hear or walk. 21And they did not repent of their murders or their sorceries or their fornication or their thefts.

Revelation 10
And I saw another mighty angel coming down from heaven, wrapped in a cloud, with a rainbow over his head; his face was like the sun, and his legs like pillars of fire. 2He held a little scroll open in his hand. Setting his right foot on the sea and his left foot on the land, 3he gave a great shout, like a lion roaring. And when he shouted, the seven thunders sounded. 4And when the seven thunders had sounded, I was about to write, but I heard a voice from heaven saying, “Seal up what the seven thunders have said, and do not write it down.” 5Then the angel whom I saw standing on the sea and the land

raised his right hand to heaven

 6      and swore by him who lives forever and ever,

who created heaven and what is in it, the earth and what is in it, and the sea and what is in it: “There will be no more delay, 7but in the days when the seventh angel is to blow his trumpet, the mystery of God will be fulfilled, as he announced to his servants[25] the prophets.”

8 Then the voice that I had heard from heaven spoke to me again, saying, “Go, take the scroll that is open in the hand of the angel who is standing on the sea and on the land.” 9So I went to the angel and told him to give me the little scroll; and he said to me, “Take it, and eat; it will be bitter to your stomach, but sweet as honey in your mouth.” 10So I took the little scroll from the hand of the angel and ate it; it was sweet as honey in my mouth, but when I had eaten it, my stomach was made bitter.

11 Then they said to me, “You must prophesy again about many peoples and nations and languages and kings.”

Revelation 11
Then I was given a measuring rod like a staff, and I was told, “Come and measure the temple of God and the altar and those who worship there, 2but do not measure the court outside the temple; leave that out, for it is given over to the nations, and they will trample over the holy city for forty-two months. 3And I will grant my two witnesses authority to prophesy for one thousand two hundred sixty days, wearing sackcloth.”

4 These are the two olive trees and the two lampstands that stand before the Lord of the earth. 5And if anyone wants to harm them, fire pours from their mouth and consumes their foes; anyone who wants to harm them must be killed in this manner. 6They have authority to shut the sky, so that no rain may fall during the days of their prophesying, and they have authority over the waters to turn them into blood, and to strike the earth with every kind of plague, as often as they desire.

7 When they have finished their testimony, the beast that comes up from the bottomless pit will make war on them and conquer them and kill them, 8and their dead bodies will lie in the street of the great city that is prophetically[26] called Sodom and Egypt, where also their Lord was crucified. 9For three and a half days members of the peoples and tribes and languages and nations will gaze at their dead bodies and refuse to let them be placed in a tomb; 10and the inhabitants of the earth will gloat over them and celebrate and exchange presents, because these two prophets had been a torment to the inhabitants of the earth.

11 But after the three and a half days, the breath[27] of life from God entered them, and they stood on their feet, and those who saw them were terrified. 12Then they[28] heard a loud voice from heaven saying to them, “Come up here!” And they went up to heaven in a cloud while their enemies watched them. 13At that moment there was a great earthquake, and a tenth of the city fell; seven thousand people were killed in the earthquake, and the rest were terrified and gave glory to the God of heaven.

14 The second woe has passed. The third woe is coming very soon.

15 Then the seventh angel blew his trumpet, and there were loud voices in heaven, saying,

“The kingdom of the world has become the kingdom of our Lord

and of his Messiah,[29]

and he will reign forever and ever.”

16 Then the twenty-four elders who sit on their thrones before God fell on their faces and worshiped God, 17singing,

“We give you thanks, Lord God Almighty,

who are and who were,

for you have taken your great power

and begun to reign.

18 The nations raged,

but your wrath has come,

and the time for judging the dead,

for rewarding your servants,[30] the prophets

and saints and all who fear your name,

both small and great,

and for destroying those who destroy the earth.”

19 Then God’s temple in heaven was opened, and the ark of his covenant was seen within his temple; and there were flashes of lightning, rumblings, peals of thunder, an earthquake, and heavy hail.

Revelation 12
A great portent appeared in heaven: a woman clothed with the sun, with the moon under her feet, and on her head a crown of twelve stars. 2She was pregnant and was crying out in birth pangs, in the agony of giving birth. 3Then another portent appeared in heaven: a great red dragon, with seven heads and ten horns, and seven diadems on his heads. 4His tail swept down a third of the stars of heaven and threw them to the earth. Then the dragon stood before the woman who was about to bear a child, so that he might devour her child as soon as it was born. 5And she gave birth to a son, a male child, who is to rule[31] all the nations with a rod of iron. But her child was snatched away and taken to God and to his throne; 6and the woman fled into the wilderness, where she has a place prepared by God, so that there she can be nourished for one thousand two hundred sixty days.

7 And war broke out in heaven; Michael and his angels fought against the dragon. The dragon and his angels fought back, 8but they were defeated, and there was no longer any place for them in heaven. 9The great dragon was thrown down, that ancient serpent, who is called the Devil and Satan, the deceiver of the whole world—he was thrown down to the earth, and his angels were thrown down with him.

10 Then I heard a loud voice in heaven, proclaiming,

“Now have come the salvation and the power

and the kingdom of our God

and the authority of his Messiah,[29]

for the accuser of our comrades[32] has been thrown down,

who accuses them day and night before our God.

11 But they have conquered him by the blood of the Lamb

and by the word of their testimony,

for they did not cling to life even in the face of death.

12 Rejoice then, you heavens

and those who dwell in them!

But woe to the earth and the sea,

for the devil has come down to you

with great wrath,

because he knows that his time is short!”

13 So when the dragon saw that he had been thrown down to the earth, he pursued[33] the woman who had given birth to the male child. 14But the woman was given the two wings of the great eagle, so that she could fly from the serpent into the wilderness, to her place where she is nourished for a time, and times, and half a time. 15Then from his mouth the serpent poured water like a river after the woman, to sweep her away with the flood. 16But the earth came to the help of the woman; it opened its mouth and swallowed the river that the dragon had poured from his mouth. 17Then the dragon was angry with the woman, and went off to make war on the rest of her children, those who keep the commandments of God and hold the testimony of Jesus.



For reflection: Revelation 12:10–12

All the loneliness, anger, hatreds, envies and itchings . . . if rolled into one single experience and put into the scale against the least moment of joy that is felt by the least in Heaven would have no weight that could be registered at all.

—from The Great Divorce



18 Then the dragon[34] took his stand on the

Revelation 13
sand of the seashore. 1And I saw a beast rising out of the sea, having ten horns and seven heads; and on its horns were ten diadems, and on its heads were blasphemous names. 2And the beast that I saw was like a leopard, its feet were like a bear’s, and its mouth was like a lion’s mouth. And the dragon gave it his power and his throne and great authority. 3One of its heads seemed to have received a death-blow, but its mortal wound[35] had been healed. In amazement the whole earth followed the beast. 4They worshiped the dragon, for he had given his authority to the beast, and they worshiped the beast, saying, “Who is like the beast, and who can fight against it?”

5 The beast was given a mouth uttering haughty and blasphemous words, and it was allowed to exercise authority for forty-two months. 6It opened its mouth to utter blasphemies against God, blaspheming his name and his dwelling, that is, those who dwell in heaven. 7Also it was allowed to make war on the saints and to conquer them.[36] It was given authority over every tribe and people and language and nation, 8and all the inhabitants of the earth will worship it, everyone whose name has not been written from the foundation of the world in the book of life of the Lamb that was slaughtered.[37]

9 Let anyone who has an ear listen:

BECOMING THE ENEMY
Where the tide flows towards increasing State control, Christianity, with its claims in one way personal and in the other way ecumenical and both ways antithetical to omnicompetent government, must always in fact (though not for a long time yet in words) be treated as an enemy. Like learning, like the family, like any ancient and liberal profession, like the common law, it gives the individual a standing ground against the State. Hence Rousseau, the father of the totalitarians, said wisely enough, from his own point of view, of Christianity, je ne connais rien de plus contrarie a l’esprit social [I know nothing more opposed to the social spirit]. . . . What a society has, that, be sure, and nothing else will it hand on to its young. The work is urgent, for men perish around us.

—from “On the Transmission of Christianity,” God in the Dock

For reflection  Revelation 13:1–9

10 If you are to be taken captive,

into captivity you go;

if you kill with the sword,

with the sword you must be killed.

Here is a call for the endurance and faith of the saints.

11 Then I saw another beast that rose out of the earth; it had two horns like a lamb and it spoke like a dragon. 12It exercises all the authority of the first beast on its behalf, and it makes the earth and its inhabitants worship the first beast, whose mortal wound[38] had been healed. 13It performs great signs, even making fire come down from heaven to earth in the sight of all; 14and by the signs that it is allowed to perform on behalf of the beast, it deceives the inhabitants of earth, telling them to make an image for the beast that had been wounded by the sword[39] and yet lived; 15and it was allowed to give breath[40] to the image of the beast so that the image of the beast could even speak and cause those who would not worship the image of the beast to be killed. 16Also it causes all, both small and great, both rich and poor, both free and slave, to be marked on the right hand or the forehead, 17so that no one can buy or sell who does not have the mark, that is, the name of the beast or the number of its name. 18This calls for wisdom: let anyone with understanding calculate the number of the beast, for it is the number of a person. Its number is six hundred sixty-six.[41]

Revelation 14
Then I looked, and there was the Lamb, standing on Mount Zion! And with him were one hundred forty-four thousand who had his name and his Father’s name written on their foreheads. 2And I heard a voice from heaven like the sound of many waters and like the sound of loud thunder; the voice I heard was like the sound of harpists playing on their harps, 3and they sing a new song before the throne and before the four living creatures and before the elders. No one could learn that song except the one hundred forty-four thousand who have been redeemed from the earth. 4It is these who have not defiled themselves with women, for they are virgins; these follow the Lamb wherever he goes. They have been redeemed from humankind as first fruits for God and the Lamb, 5and in their mouth no lie was found; they are blameless.

6 Then I saw another angel flying in midheaven, with an eternal gospel to proclaim to those who live[42] on the earth—to every nation and tribe and language and people. 7He said in a loud voice, “Fear God and give him glory, for the hour of his judgment has come; and worship him who made heaven and earth, the sea and the springs of water.”

8 Then another angel, a second, followed, saying, “Fallen, fallen is Babylon the great! She has made all nations drink of the wine of the wrath of her fornication.”

9 Then another angel, a third, followed them, crying with a loud voice, “Those who worship the beast and its image, and receive a mark on their foreheads or on their hands, 10they will also drink the wine of God’s wrath, poured unmixed into the cup of his anger, and they will be tormented with fire and sulfur in the presence of the holy angels and in the presence of the Lamb. 11And the smoke of their torment goes up forever and ever. There is no rest day or night for those who worship the beast and its image and for anyone who receives the mark of its name.”

12 Here is a call for the endurance of the saints, those who keep the commandments of God and hold fast to the faith of[43] Jesus.

13 And I heard a voice from heaven saying, “Write this: Blessed are the dead who from now on die in the Lord.” “Yes,” says the Spirit, “they will rest from their labors, for their deeds follow them.”

14 Then I looked, and there was a white cloud, and seated on the cloud was one like the Son of Man, with a golden crown on his head, and a sharp sickle in his hand! 15Another angel came out of the temple, calling with a loud voice to the one who sat on the cloud, “Use your sickle and reap, for the hour to reap has come, because the harvest of the earth is fully ripe.” 16So the one who sat on the cloud swung his sickle over the earth, and the earth was reaped.

GOOD AND EVIL IN RETROSPECT
AN EXPLANATION OF TIME:
S on,” he said, “ye cannot in your present state understand eternity. . . . But ye can get some likeness of it if ye say that both good and evil, when they are full grown, become retrospective. Not only this valley but all their earthly past will have been Heaven to those who are saved. Not only the twilight in that town, but all their life on Earth too, will then be seen by the damned to have been Hell. That is what mortals misunderstand. They say of some temporal suffering, ‘No future bliss can make up for it,’ not knowing that Heaven, once attained, will work backwards and turn even that agony into a glory. And of some sinful pleasure they say ‘Let me have but this and I’ll take the consequences’: little dreaming how damnation will spread back and back into their past and contaminate the pleasure of the sin. Both processes begin even before death. The good man’s past begins to change so that his forgiven sins and remembered sorrows take on the quality of Heaven: the bad man’s past already conforms to his badness and is filled only with dreariness. And that is why, at the end of all things, when the sun rises here and the twilight turns to blackness down there, the Blessed will say ‘We have never lived anywhere except in Heaven,’ and the Lost, ‘We were always in Hell.’ And both will speak truly.”

—from The Great Divorce

For reflection  Revelation 14:13–20

17 Then another angel came out of the temple in heaven, and he too had a sharp sickle. 18Then another angel came out from the altar, the angel who has authority over fire, and he called with a loud voice to him who had the sharp sickle, “Use your sharp sickle and gather the clusters of the vine of the earth, for its grapes are ripe.” 19So the angel swung his sickle over the earth and gathered the vintage of the earth, and he threw it into the great wine press of the wrath of God. 20And the wine press was trodden outside the city, and blood flowed from the wine press, as high as a horse’s bridle, for a distance of about two hundred miles.[44]

Revelation 15
Then I saw another portent in heaven, great and amazing: seven angels with seven plagues, which are the last, for with them the wrath of God is ended.

2 And I saw what appeared to be a sea of glass mixed with fire, and those who had conquered the beast and its image and the number of its name, standing beside the sea of glass with harps of God in their hands. 3And they sing the song of Moses, the servant[45] of God, and the song of the Lamb:

“Great and amazing are your deeds,

Lord God the Almighty!

Just and true are your ways,

King of the nations![46]

RUTHLESS NOISE
SCREWTAPE’S INTENTIONS:
Music and silence—how I detest them both! How thankful we should be that ever since Our Father entered Hell—though longer ago than humans, reckoning in light years, could express—no square inch of infernal space and no moment of infernal time has been surrendered to either of those abominable forces, but all has been occupied by Noise—Noise, the grand dynamism, the audible expression of all that is exultant, ruthless, and virile—Noise which alone defends us from silly qualms, despairing scruples and impossible desires. We will make the whole universe a noise in the end. We have already made great strides in this direction as regards the Earth. The melodies and silences of Heaven will be shouted down in the end. But I admit we are not yet loud enough, or anything like it.

—from The Screwtape Letters

For reflection  Revelation 15:2–3

 4 Lord, who will not fear

and glorify your name?

For you alone are holy.

All nations will come

and worship before you,

for your judgments have been revealed.”

5 After this I looked, and the temple of the tent[47] of witness in heaven was opened, 6and out of the temple came the seven angels with the seven plagues, robed in pure bright linen,[48] with golden sashes across their chests. 7Then one of the four living creatures gave the seven angels seven golden bowls full of the wrath of God, who lives forever and ever; 8and the temple was filled with smoke from the glory of God and from his power, and no one could enter the temple until the seven plagues of the seven angels were ended.

Revelation 16
Then I heard a loud voice from the temple telling the seven angels, “Go and pour out on the earth the seven bowls of the wrath of God.”

2 So the first angel went and poured his bowl on the earth, and a foul and painful sore came on those who had the mark of the beast and who worshiped its image.

3 The second angel poured his bowl into the sea, and it became like the blood of a corpse, and every living thing in the sea died.

4 The third angel poured his bowl into the rivers and the springs of water, and they became blood. 5And I heard the angel of the waters say,

“You are just, O Holy One, who are and were,

for you have judged these things;

 6 because they shed the blood of saints and prophets,

you have given them blood to drink.

It is what they deserve!”

7And I heard the altar respond,

“Yes, O Lord God, the Almighty,

your judgments are true and just!”

8 The fourth angel poured his bowl on the sun, and it was allowed to scorch people with fire; 9they were scorched by the fierce heat, but they cursed the name of God, who had authority over these plagues, and they did not repent and give him glory.

10 The fifth angel poured his bowl on the throne of the beast, and its kingdom was plunged into darkness; people gnawed their tongues in agony, 11and cursed the God of heaven because of their pains and sores, and they did not repent of their deeds.

12 The sixth angel poured his bowl on the great river Euphrates, and its water was dried up in order to prepare the way for the kings from the east. 13And I saw three foul spirits like frogs coming from the mouth of the dragon, from the mouth of the beast, and from the mouth of the false prophet. 14These are demonic spirits, performing signs, who go abroad to the kings of the whole world, to assemble them for battle on the great day of God the Almighty. 15(“See, I am coming like a thief! Blessed is the one who stays awake and is clothed,[49] not going about naked and exposed to shame.”) 16And they assembled them at the place that in Hebrew is called Harmagedon.

17 The seventh angel poured his bowl into the air, and a loud voice came out of the temple, from the throne, saying, “It is done!” 18And there came flashes of lightning, rumblings, peals of thunder, and a violent earthquake, such as had not occurred since people were upon the earth, so violent was that earthquake. 19The great city was split into three parts, and the cities of the nations fell. God remembered great Babylon and gave her the wine-cup of the fury of his wrath. 20And every island fled away, and no mountains were to be found; 21and huge hailstones, each weighing about a hundred pounds,[50] dropped from heaven on people, until they cursed God for the plague of the hail, so fearful was that plague.

Revelation 17
Then one of the seven angels who had the seven bowls came and said to me, “Come, I will show you the judgment of the great whore who is seated on many waters, 2with whom the kings of the earth have committed fornication, and with the wine of whose fornication the inhabitants of the earth have become drunk.” 3So he carried me away in the spirit[51] into a wilderness, and I saw a woman sitting on a scarlet beast that was full of blasphemous names, and it had seven heads and ten horns. 4The woman was clothed in purple and scarlet, and adorned with gold and jewels and pearls, holding in her hand a golden cup full of abominations and the impurities of her fornication; 5and on her forehead was written a name, a mystery: “Babylon the great, mother of whores and of earth’s abominations.” 6And I saw that the woman was drunk with the blood of the saints and the blood of the witnesses to Jesus.

When I saw her, I was greatly amazed. 7But the angel said to me, “Why are you so amazed? I will tell you the mystery of the woman, and of the beast with seven heads and ten horns that carries her. 8The beast that you saw was, and is not, and is about to ascend from the bottomless pit and go to destruction. And the inhabitants of the earth, whose names have not been written in the book of life from the foundation of the world, will be amazed when they see the beast, because it was and is not and is to come.

THE DOCTRINE
OF THE SECOND COMING
In King Lear (III:vii) there is a man who is such a minor character that Shakespeare has not given him even a name: he is merely “First Servant.” All the characters around him—Regan, Cornwall, and Edmund—have fine long-term plans. They think they know how the story is going to end, and they are quite wrong. The servant has no such delusions. He has no notion how the play is going to go. But he understands the present scene. He sees an abomination (the blinding of old Gloucester) taking place. He will not stand it. His sword is out and pointed at his master’s breast in a moment: then Regan stabs him dead from behind. That is his whole part: eight lines all told. But if it were real life and not a play, that is the part it would be best to have acted.

The doctrine of the Second Coming teaches us that we do not and cannot know when the world drama will end. The curtain may be rung down at any moment: say, before you have finished reading this paragraph. This seems to some people intolerably frustrating. So many things would be interrupted. Perhaps you were going to get married next month, perhaps you were going to get a raise next week: you may be on the verge of a great scientific discovery; you may be maturing great social and political reforms. Surely no good and wise God would be so very unreasonable as to cut all this short? Not now of all moments!

But we think thus because we keep on assuming that we know the play. We do not know the play. We do not even know whether we are in Act I or Act V. We do not know who are the major and who the minor characters. The Author knows. The audience, if there is an audience (if angels and archangels and all the company of heaven fill the pit and the stalls) may have an inkling. But we, never seeing the play from outside, never meeting any characters except the tiny minority who are “on” in the same scenes as ourselves, wholly ignorant of the future and very imperfectly informed about the past, cannot tell at what moment the end ought to come. That it will come when it ought, we may be sure; but we waste our time in guessing when that will be. That it has a meaning we may be sure, but we cannot see it. When it is over, we may be told. We are led to expect that the Author will have something to say to each of us on the part that each of us has played. The playing it well is what matters infinitely.

The doctrine of the Second Coming, then, is not to be rejected because it conflicts with our favorite modern mythology. It is, for that very reason, to be the more valued and made more frequently the subject of meditation. It is the medicine our condition especially needs.

—from “The World’s Last Night,” The World’s Last Night and Other Essays

For reflection  Revelation 16:1–21

9 “This calls for a mind that has wisdom: the seven heads are seven mountains on which the woman is seated; also, they are seven kings, 10of whom five have fallen, one is living, and the other has not yet come; and when he comes, he must remain only a little while. 11As for the beast that was and is not, it is an eighth but it belongs to the seven, and it goes to destruction. 12And the ten horns that you saw are ten kings who have not yet received a kingdom, but they are to receive authority as kings for one hour, together with the beast. 13These are united in yielding their power and authority to the beast; 14they will make war on the Lamb, and the Lamb will conquer them, for he is Lord of lords and King of kings, and those with him are called and chosen and faithful.”

15 And he said to me, “The waters that you saw, where the whore is seated, are peoples and multitudes and nations and languages. 16And the ten horns that you saw, they and the beast will hate the whore; they will make her desolate and naked; they will devour her flesh and burn her up with fire. 17For God has put it into their hearts to carry out his purpose by agreeing to give their kingdom to the beast, until the words of God will be fulfilled. 18The woman you saw is the great city that rules over the kings of the earth.”

Revelation 18
After this I saw another angel coming down from heaven, having great authority; and the earth was made bright with his splendor. 2He called out with a mighty voice,

“Fallen, fallen is Babylon the great!

It has become a dwelling place of demons,

a haunt of every foul spirit,

a haunt of every foul bird,

a haunt of every foul and hateful beast.[52]

 3 For all the nations have drunk[53]

of the wine of the wrath of her fornication,

and the kings of the earth have committed fornication with her,

and the merchants of the earth have grown rich from the power[54] of her luxury.”

4 Then I heard another voice from heaven saying,

“Come out of her, my people,

so that you do not take part in her sins,

and so that you do not share in her plagues;

 5 for her sins are heaped high as heaven,

and God has remembered her iniquities.

 6 Render to her as she herself has rendered,

and repay her double for her deeds;

mix a double draught for her in the cup she mixed.

 7 As she glorified herself and lived luxuriously,

so give her a like measure of torment and grief.

Since in her heart she says,

‘I rule as a queen;

I am no widow,

and I will never see grief,’

 8 therefore her plagues will come in a single day—

pestilence and mourning and famine—

and she will be burned with fire;

for mighty is the Lord God who judges her.”



For reflection: Revelation 18:4–8

For human beings there is often an escape from this Hell, but there is never more than one—the way of humiliation, repentance, and (where possible) restitution.

—from A Preface to “Paradise Lost”



9 And the kings of the earth, who committed fornication and lived in luxury with her, will weep and wail over her when they see the smoke of her burning; 10they will stand far off, in fear of her torment, and say,

“Alas, alas, the great city,

Babylon, the mighty city!

For in one hour your judgment has come.”

11 And the merchants of the earth weep and mourn for her, since no one buys their cargo anymore, 12cargo of gold, silver, jewels and pearls, fine linen, purple, silk and scarlet, all kinds of scented wood, all articles of ivory, all articles of costly wood, bronze, iron, and marble, 13cinnamon, spice, incense, myrrh, frankincense, wine, olive oil, choice flour and wheat, cattle and sheep, horses and chariots, slaves—and human lives.[55]

14 “The fruit for which your soul longed

has gone from you,

and all your dainties and your splendor

are lost to you,

never to be found again!”

15The merchants of these wares, who gained wealth from her, will stand far off, in fear of her torment, weeping and mourning aloud,

16 “Alas, alas, the great city,

clothed in fine linen,

in purple and scarlet,

adorned with gold,

with jewels, and with pearls!

17 For in one hour all this wealth has been laid waste!”

And all shipmasters and seafarers, sailors and all whose trade is on the sea, stood far off 18and cried out as they saw the smoke of her burning,

“What city was like the great city?”

19And they threw dust on their heads, as they wept and mourned, crying out,

“Alas, alas, the great city,

where all who had ships at sea

grew rich by her wealth!

For in one hour she has been laid waste.”

20 Rejoice over her, O heaven, you saints and apostles and prophets! For God has given judgment for you against her.

21 Then a mighty angel took up a stone like a great millstone and threw it into the sea, saying,

“With such violence Babylon the great city

will be thrown down,

and will be found no more;

22 and the sound of harpists and minstrels and of flutists and trumpeters

will be heard in you no more;

and an artisan of any trade

will be found in you no more;

and the sound of the millstone

will be heard in you no more;

23 and the light of a lamp

will shine in you no more;

and the voice of bridegroom and bride

will be heard in you no more;

for your merchants were the magnates of the earth,

and all nations were deceived by your sorcery.

24 And in you[56] was found the blood of prophets and of saints,

and of all who have been slaughtered on earth.”

Revelation 19
After this I heard what seemed to be the loud voice of a great multitude in heaven, saying,

“Hallelujah!

Salvation and glory and power to our God,

 2      for his judgments are true and just;

he has judged the great whore

who corrupted the earth with her fornication,

and he has avenged on her the blood of his servants.”[57]

3Once more they said,

“Hallelujah!

The smoke goes up from her forever and ever.”

4And the twenty-four elders and the four living creatures fell down and worshiped God who is seated on the throne, saying,

“Amen. Hallelujah!”

5 And from the throne came a voice saying,

“Praise our God,

all you his servants,[57]

and all who fear him,

small and great.”

6Then I heard what seemed to be the voice of a great multitude, like the sound of many waters and like the sound of mighty thunderpeals, crying out,

“Hallelujah!

For the Lord our God

the Almighty reigns.

 7 Let us rejoice and exult

and give him the glory,

for the marriage of the Lamb has come,

and his bride has made herself ready;

 8 to her it has been granted to be clothed

with fine linen, bright and pure”—

for the fine linen is the righteous deeds of the saints.

9 And the angel said[58] to me, “Write this: Blessed are those who are invited to the marriage supper of the Lamb.” And he said to me, “These are true words of God.” 10Then I fell down at his feet to worship him, but he said to me, “You must not do that! I am a fellow servant[59] with you and your comrades[60] who hold the testimony of Jesus.[61] Worship God! For the testimony of Jesus  [61] is the spirit of prophecy.”

11 Then I saw heaven opened, and there was a white horse! Its rider is called Faithful and True, and in righteousness he judges and makes war. 12His eyes are like a flame of fire, and on his head are many diadems; and he has a name inscribed that no one knows but himself. 13He is clothed in a robe dipped in[62] blood, and his name is called The Word of God. 14And the armies of heaven, wearing fine linen, white and pure, were following him on white horses. 15From his mouth comes a sharp sword with which to strike down the nations, and he will rule[63] them with a rod of iron; he will tread the wine press of the fury of the wrath of God the Almighty. 16On his robe and on his thigh he has a name inscribed, “King of kings and Lord of lords.”

17 Then I saw an angel standing in the sun, and with a loud voice he called to all the birds that fly in midheaven, “Come, gather for the great supper of God, 18to eat the flesh of kings, the flesh of captains, the flesh of the mighty, the flesh of horses and their riders—flesh of all, both free and slave, both small and great.” 19Then I saw the beast and the kings of the earth with their armies gathered to make war against the rider on the horse and against his army. 20And the beast was captured, and with it the false prophet who had performed in its presence the signs by which he deceived those who had received the mark of the beast and those who worshiped its image. These two were thrown alive into the lake of fire that burns with sulfur. 21And the rest were killed by the sword of the rider on the horse, the sword that came from his mouth; and all the birds were gorged with their flesh.

Revelation 20
Then I saw an angel coming down from heaven, holding in his hand the key to the bottomless pit and a great chain. 2He seized the dragon, that ancient serpent, who is the Devil and Satan, and bound him for a thousand years, 3and threw him into the pit, and locked and sealed it over him, so that he would deceive the nations no more, until the thousand years were ended. After that he must be let out for a little while.

4 Then I saw thrones, and those seated on them were given authority to judge. I also saw the souls of those who had been beheaded for their testimony to Jesus[64] and for the word of God. They had not worshiped the beast or its image and had not received its mark on their foreheads or their hands. They came to life and reigned with Christ a thousand years. 5(The rest of the dead did not come to life until the thousand years were ended.) This is the first resurrection. 6Blessed and holy are those who share in the first resurrection. Over these the second death has no power, but they will be priests of God and of Christ, and they will reign with him a thousand years.

7 When the thousand years are ended, Satan will be released from his prison 8and will come out to deceive the nations at the four corners of the earth, Gog and Magog, in order to gather them for battle; they are as numerous as the sands of the sea. 9They marched up over the breadth of the earth and surrounded the camp of the saints and the beloved city. And fire came down from heaven[65] and consumed them. 10And the devil who had deceived them was thrown into the lake of fire and sulfur, where the beast and the false prophet were, and they will be tormented day and night forever and ever.

DIVINE JUSTICE
God in His mercy made

The fixèd pains of Hell.

That misery might be stayed,

God in His mercy made

Eternal bounds and bade

Its waves no further swell.

God in His mercy made

The fixèd pains of Hell.

—from The Pilgrim’s Regress

For reflection  Revelation 20:10–15

11 Then I saw a great white throne and the one who sat on it; the earth and the heaven fled from his presence, and no place was found for them. 12And I saw the dead, great and small, standing before the throne, and books were opened. Also another book was opened, the book of life. And the dead were judged according to their works, as recorded in the books. 13And the sea gave up the dead that were in it, Death and Hades gave up the dead that were in them, and all were judged according to what they had done. 14Then Death and Hades were thrown into the lake of fire. This is the second death, the lake of fire; 15and anyone whose name was not found written in the book of life was thrown into the lake of fire.

Revelation 21
Then I saw a new heaven and a new earth; for the first heaven and the first earth had passed away, and the sea was no more. 2And I saw the holy city, the new Jerusalem, coming down out of heaven from God, prepared as a bride adorned for her husband. 3And I heard a loud voice from the throne saying,

“See, the home[66] of God is among mortals.

He will dwell[67] with them;

they will be his peoples,[68]

and God himself will be with them;[69]

 4 he will wipe every tear from their eyes.

Death will be no more;

mourning and crying and pain will be no more,

for the first things have passed away.”

REDEEMING NATURE
If the redemption of Man is the beginning of Nature’s redemption as a whole, must we then conclude after all that Man is the most important thing in Nature? If I had to answer “Yes” to this question I should not be embarrassed. Supposing Man to be the only rational animal in the universe, then (as has been shown) his small size and the small size of the globe he inhabits would not make it ridiculous to regard him as the hero of the cosmic drama: Jack after all is the smallest character in Jack the Giant-Killer. Nor do I think it in the least improbable that Man is in fact the only rational creature in this spatio-temporal Nature. That is just the sort of lonely pre-eminence—just the disproportion between picture and frame—which all that I know of Nature’s “selectiveness” would lead me to anticipate. But I do not need to assume that it actually exists. Let Man be only one among a myriad of rational species, and let him be the only one that has fallen. Because he has fallen, for him God does the great deed; just as in the parable it is the one lost sheep for whom the shepherd hunts. Let Man’s pre-eminence or solitude be one not of superiority but of misery and evil: then, all the more, Man will be the very species into which Mercy will descend. For this prodigal the fatted calf, or, to speak more suitably, the eternal Lamb, is killed. But once the Son of God, drawn hither not by our merits but by our unworthiness, has put on human nature, then our species (whatever it may have been before) does become in one sense the central fact in all Nature: our species, rising after its long descent, will drag all Nature up with it because in our species the Lord of Nature is now included. And it would be all of a piece with what we already know if ninety and nine righteous races inhabiting distant planets that circle distant suns, and needing no redemption on their own account, were remade and glorified by the glory which had descended into our race. For God is not merely mending, not simply restoring a status quo. Redeemed humanity is to be something more glorious than unfallen humanity would have been, more glorious than any unfallen race now is (if at this moment the night sky conceals any such). The greater the sin, the greater the mercy: the deeper the death the brighter the rebirth. And this super-added glory will, with true vicariousness, exalt all creatures and those who have never fallen will thus bless Adam’s fall.

—from Miracles

For reflection  Revelation 21:1–5

5 And the one who was seated on the throne said, “See, I am making all things new.” Also he said, “Write this, for these words are trustworthy and true.” 6Then he said to me, “It is done! I am the Alpha and the Omega, the beginning and the end. To the thirsty I will give water as a gift from the spring of the water of life. 7Those who conquer will inherit these things, and I will be their God and they will be my children. 8But as for the cowardly, the faithless,[70] the polluted, the murderers, the fornicators, the sorcerers, the idolaters, and all liars, their place will be in the lake that burns with fire and sulfur, which is the second death.”

9 Then one of the seven angels who had the seven bowls full of the seven last plagues came and said to me, “Come, I will show you the bride, the wife of the Lamb.” 10And in the spirit[71] he carried me away to a great, high mountain and showed me the holy city Jerusalem coming down out of heaven from God. 11It has the glory of God and a radiance like a very rare jewel, like jasper, clear as crystal. 12It has a great, high wall with twelve gates, and at the gates twelve angels, and on the gates are inscribed the names of the twelve tribes of the Israelites; 13on the east three gates, on the north three gates, on the south three gates, and on the west three gates. 14And the wall of the city has twelve foundations, and on them are the twelve names of the twelve apostles of the Lamb.

THE GLORY OF GOD IS HEAVEN’S LIGHT
I think all Christians would agree with me if I said that though Christianity seems at the first to be all about morality, all about duties and rules and guilt and virtue, yet it leads you on, out of all that, into something beyond. One has a glimpse of a country where they do not talk of those things, except perhaps as a joke. Every one there is filled full with what we should call goodness as a mirror is filled with light. But they do not call it goodness. They do not call it anything. They are too busy looking at the source from which it comes.

—from Mere Christianity

For reflection  Revelation 21:21–23

15 The angel[72] who talked to me had a measuring rod of gold to measure the city and its gates and walls. 16The city lies foursquare, its length the same as its width; and he measured the city with his rod, fifteen hundred miles;[73] its length and width and height are equal. 17He also measured its wall, one hundred forty-four cubits[74] by human measurement, which the angel was using. 18The wall is built of jasper, while the city is pure gold, clear as glass. 19The foundations of the wall of the city are adorned with every jewel; the first was jasper, the second sapphire, the third agate, the fourth emerald, 20the fifth onyx, the sixth carnelian, the seventh chrysolite, the eighth beryl, the ninth topaz, the tenth chrysoprase, the eleventh jacinth, the twelfth amethyst. 21And the twelve gates are twelve pearls, each of the gates is a single pearl, and the street of the city is pure gold, transparent as glass.

THE RIVER OF THE WATER OF LIFE
The faint, far-off results of those energies which God’s creative rapture implanted in matter when He made the worlds are what we now call physical pleasures; and even thus filtered, they are too much for our present management. What would it be to taste at the fountainhead that stream of which even these lower reaches prove so intoxicating? Yet that, I believe, is what lies before us. As St. Augustine said, the rapture of the saved soul will “flow over” into the glorified body.

—from “The Weight of Glory,” The Weight of Glory

For reflection  Revelation 22:1–7

22 I saw no temple in the city, for its temple is the Lord God the Almighty and the Lamb. 23And the city has no need of sun or moon to shine on it, for the glory of God is its light, and its lamp is the Lamb. 24The nations will walk by its light, and the kings of the earth will bring their glory into it. 25Its gates will never be shut by day—and there will be no night there. 26People will bring into it the glory and the honor of the nations. 27But nothing unclean will enter it, nor anyone who practices abomination or falsehood, but only those who are written in the Lamb’s book of life.

Revelation 22
Then the angel [75] showed me the river of the water of life, bright as crystal, flowing from the throne of God and of the Lamb 2through the middle of the street of the city. On either side of the river is the tree of life[76] with its twelve kinds of fruit, producing its fruit each month; and the leaves of the tree are for the healing of the nations. 3Nothing accursed will be found there any more. But the throne of God and of the Lamb will be in it, and his servants[77] will worship him; 4they will see his face, and his name will be on their foreheads. 5And there will be no more night; they need no light of lamp or sun, for the Lord God will be their light, and they will reign forever and ever.

6 And he said to me, “These words are trustworthy and true, for the Lord, the God of the spirits of the prophets, has sent his angel to show his servants[77] what must soon take place.”

7 “See, I am coming soon! Blessed is the one who keeps the words of the prophecy of this book.”

8 I, John, am the one who heard and saw these things. And when I heard and saw them, I fell down to worship at the feet of the angel who showed them to me; 9but he said to me, “You must not do that! I am a fellow servant[78] with you and your comrades[79] the prophets, and with those who keep the words of this book. Worship God!”

HE IS COMING SOON
The times we live in are, as you say, grave: whether “graver than all others in history” I do not know. But the evil that is closest always seems to be the most serious: for as with the eye so with the heart, it is a matter of one’s own perspective. However, if our times are indeed the worst, if That Day is indeed now approaching, what remains but that we should rejoice because our redemption is now nearer and say with St. John: “Amen; come quickly, Lord Jesus.”

Meanwhile our only security is that The Day may find us working each one in his own station and especially (giving up dissensions) fulfilling that supreme command that we love one another.

—from a letter to Don Giovanni Calabria, July 14, 1952

For reflection  Revelation 22:20

10 And he said to me, “Do not seal up the words of the prophecy of this book, for the time is near. 11Let the evildoer still do evil, and the filthy still be filthy, and the righteous still do right, and the holy still be holy.”

12 “See, I am coming soon; my reward is with me, to repay according to everyone’s work. 13I am the Alpha and the Omega, the first and the last, the beginning and the end.”

14 Blessed are those who wash their robes,[80] so that they will have the right to the tree of life and may enter the city by the gates. 15Outside are the dogs and sorcerers and fornicators and murderers and idolaters, and everyone who loves and practices falsehood.

16 “It is I, Jesus, who sent my angel to you with this testimony for the churches. I am the root and the descendant of David, the bright morning star.”

17 The Spirit and the bride say, “Come.”

And let everyone who hears say, “Come.”

And let everyone who is thirsty come.

Let anyone who wishes take the water of life as a gift.

18 I warn everyone who hears the words of the prophecy of this book: if anyone adds to them, God will add to that person the plagues described in this book; 19if anyone takes away from the words of the book of this prophecy, God will take away that person’s share in the tree of life and in the holy city, which are described in this book.

20 The one who testifies to these things says, “Surely I am coming soon.”

Amen. Come, Lord Jesus!

21 The grace of the Lord Jesus be with all the saints. Amen.[81]



For reflection: Revelation 22:21

There is nothing now between us and Him.

—from Perelandra



[1]  Gk slaves

[2]  Gk and he made

[3]  Gk slave

[4]  Other ancient authorities read washed

[5]  Gk priests to

[6]  Or testimony to Jesus

[7]  Or in the Spirit

[8]  Or deny my faith

[9]  Gk slaves

[10]  Or to shepherd

[11]  Or beginning

[12]  Or in the Spirit

[13]  Or written on the inside, and sealed on the back

[14]  Gk ransomed for God from

[15]  Gk priests to

[16]  Or “Go!”

[17]  Or went

[18]  Gk a denarius

[19]  Gk slaves

[20]  Gk brothers

[21]  That is, Destruction

[22]  That is, Destroyer

[23]  Other ancient authorities lack four

[24]  Gk hyacinth

[25]  Gk slaves

[26]  Or allegorically; Gk spiritually

[27]  Or the spirit

[28]  Other ancient authorities read I

[29]  Gk Christ

[30]  Gk slaves

[31]  Or to shepherd

[32]  Gk brothers

[33]  Or persecuted

[34]  Gk Then he; other ancient authorities read Then I stood

[35]  Gk the plague of its death

[36]  Other ancient authorities lack this sentence

[37]  Or written in the book of life of the Lamb that was slaughtered from the foundation of the world

[38]  Gk whose plague of its death

[39]  Or that had received the plague of the sword

[40]  Or spirit

[41]  Other ancient authorities read six hundred sixteen

[42]  Gk sit

[43]  Or to their faith in

[44]  Gk one thousand six hundred stadia

[45]  Gk slave

[46]  Other ancient authorities read the ages

[47]  Or tabernacle

[48]  Other ancient authorities read stone

[49]  Gk and keeps his robes

[50]  Gk weighing about a talent

[51]  Or in the Spirit

[52]  Other ancient authorities lack the words a haunt of every foul beast and attach the words and hateful to the previous line so as to read a haunt of every foul and hateful bird

[53]  Other ancient authorities read She has made all nations drink

[54]  Or resources

[55]  Or chariots, and human bodies and souls

[56]  Gk her

[57]  Gk slaves

[58]  Gk he said

[59]  Gk slave

[60]  Gk brothers

[61]  Or to Jesus

[62]  Other ancient authorities read sprinkled with

[63]  Or will shepherd

[64]  Or for the testimony of Jesus

[65]  Other ancient authorities read from God, out of heaven, or out of heaven from God

[66]  Gk the tabernacle

[67]  Gk will tabernacle

[68]  Other ancient authorities read people

[69]  Other ancient authorities add and be their God

[70]  Or the unbelieving

[71]  Or in the Spirit

[72]  Gk He

[73]  Gk twelve thousand stadia

[74]  That is, almost seventy-five yards

[75]  Gk he

[76]  Or the Lamb. 2In the middle of the street of the city, and on either side of the river, is the tree of life

[77]  Gk slaves

[78]  Gk slave

[79]  Gk brothers

[80]  Other ancient authorities read do his commandments

[81]  Other ancient authorities lack all; others lack the saints; others lack Amen

BLOODSHED → BLOOD, SHED

Isa	5.	7	he expected justice, but saw b;
Eze	35.	6	you did not hate b, b shall pursue
Hab	2.	8	because of human b, and violence
BLOT

Ge	6.	7	“I will b out from the earth
Ex	32.	32	b me out of the book that you have
Ps	51.	1	mercy b out my transgressions.
Rev	3.	5	not b your name out of the book of
BOAST → BOASTERS, BOASTING

Ps	34.	2	My soul makes its b in the LORD;
Pr	27.	1	Do not b about tomorrow,
Jer	9.	24	but let those who b b in this,
Ro	2.	23	You that b in the law,
1Co	1.	31	the one who boasts, b in the Lord.”
2Co	11.	30	If I must b, I will b of the things that
Gal	6.	14	never b of anything except the cross
Eph	2.	9	of works, so that no one may b.
BOASTERS → BOAST

2Co	11.	13	For such b are false apostles,
2Ti	3.	2	b, arrogant, abusive, disobedient to
BOASTING → BOAST

1Co	5.	6	Your b is not a good thing.
1Th	2.	19	or crown of b before our Lord Jesus
BODIES → BODY

Ro	12.	1	present your b as a living sacrifice,
1Co	6.	15	that your b are members of Christ?
Heb	10.	22	and our b washed with pure water.
BODILY → BODY

Lk	3.	22	upon him in b form like a dove.
Col	2.	9	the whole fullness of deity dwells b,
BODY → BODIES, BODILY

Mic	6.	7	fruit of my b for the sin of my soul?
Mt	6.	22	“The eye is the lamp of the b.
Mk	14.	22	and said, “Take; this is my b.”
Lk	12.	4	do not fear those who kill the b,
Jn	2.	21	speaking of the temple of his b.
1Co	15.	44	It is sown a physical b, it is raised a spiritual b.
2Co	5.	8	from the b and at home with the Lord.
Eph	4.	4	There is one b and one Spirit,
BOLD → BOLDNESS

Dt	31.	6	Be strong and b; have no fear
Pr	28.	1	the righteous are as b as a lion.
BOLDNESS → BOLD

Eph	3.	12	whom we have access to God in b
Heb	4.	16	approach the throne of grace with b,
1Jn	4.	17	may have b on the day of judgment,
BONE → BONES

Ge	2.	23	“This at last is b of my bones and
Eze	37.	7	came together, b to its b.
BONES → BONE

Ex	12.	46	you shall not break any of its b.
Ps	34.	20	He keeps all their b; not one of
Jn	19.	36	“None of his b shall be broken.”
BOOK → BOOKS

Ex	17.	14	“Write this as a reminder in a b and
Dt	31.	24	writing down in a b the words of
Jos	1.	8	This b of the law shall not depart
Ps	69.	28	be blotted out of the b of the living;
Rev	1.	11	“Write in a b what you see and
 	21.	27	who are written in the Lamb’s b
BOOKS → BOOK

Ecc	12.	12	Of making many b there is no end,
Da	7.	10	in judgment, and the b were opened.
Jn	21.	25	world itself could not contain the b
BOOTHS

Lev	23.	34	the festival of b to the LORD.
Ezr	3.	4	kept the festival of b, as prescribed,
Zec	14.	16	and to keep the festival of b.
BORE → BEAR

Isa	53.	12	yet he b the sin of many,
Mt	8.	17	our infirmities and b our diseases.”
1Pe	2.	24	He himself b our sins in his body
BORN → BEAR

Ecc	3.	2	a time to be b, and a time to die;
Isa	9.	6	For a child has been b for us,
 	66.	8	Shall a land be b in one day?
Lk	2.	11	is b this day in the city of David
Jn	3.	7	‘You must be b from above.’
1Pe	1.	23	You have been b anew,
1Jn	4.	7	everyone who loves is b of God
BORROW → BORROWER

Dt	28.	12	to many nations, but you will not b.
Ps	37.	21	The wicked b, and do not pay back,
Mt	5.	42	anyone who wants to b from you.
BORROWER → BORROW

Pr	22.	7	the b is the slave of the lender.
BOUGHT → BUY

1Co	6.	20	For you were b with a price;
2Pe	2.	1	even deny the Master who b them—
BOW → RAINBOW

Ge	9.	13	I have set my b in the clouds,
Ex	20.	5	You shall not b down to them or
Ps	95.	6	O come, let us worship and b down,
Isa	45.	23	“To me every knee shall b,
Ro	14.	11	every knee shall b to me,
BOWLS

Rev	16.	1	the seven b of the wrath of God.”
BRANCH → BRANCHES

Isa	4.	2	On that day the b of the LORD shall
 	11.	1	and a b shall grow out of his roots.
Jer	23.	5	raise up for David a righteous B,
Zec	3.	8	going to bring my servant the B.
Jn	15.	2	every b in me that bears no fruit.
BRANCHES → BRANCH

Ro	11.	21	if God did not spare the natural b,
BREAD

Ge	3.	19	sweat of your face you shall eat b
Ex	12.	8	with unleavened b and bitter herbs.
 	25.	30	set the b of the Presence on the table
Dt	8.	3	that one does not live by b alone,
Ecc	11.	1	Send out your b upon the waters,
Mt	6.	11	Give us this day our daily b.
Lk	4.	4	‘One does not live by b alone.’ ”
Jn	6.	35	said to them, “I am the b of life.
1Co	11.	26	For as often as you eat this b and
BREAK → BREAKING, BROKEN, BROKENHEARTED

Mt	6.	19	where thieves b in and steal;
Jn	19.	33	they did not b his legs.
BREASTPIECE → BREASTPLATE

Ex	28.	15	You shall make a b of judgment,
BREASTPLATE → BREASTPIECE

Isa	59.	17	He put on righteousness like a b,
Eph	6.	14	and put on the b of righteousness.
BREATH

Ge	2.	7	into his nostrils the b of life;
 	6.	17	all flesh in which is the b of life;
Job	7.	7	“Remember that my life is a b;
Ecc	12.	7	the b returns to God who gave it.
2Th	2.	8	will destroy with the b of his mouth,
BRIBE

Dt	16.	19	for a b blinds the eyes of the wise
Pr	6.	35	and refuses a b no matter how great.
BRIDE → BRIDEGROOM

Isa	62.	5	the bridegroom rejoices over the b,
Rev	21.	9	the b, the wife of the Lamb.”
BRIDEGROOM → BRIDE

Mt	9.	15	as long as the b is with them,
Jn	3.	29	He who has the bride is the b.
BRIGHT

Mt	17.	5	suddenly a b cloud overshadowed
Rev	15.	6	robed in pure b linen,
 	22.	16	of David, the b morning star.”
BROKE → BREAK

Ex	32.	19	tablets from his hands and b them
2Ch	36.	19	b down the wall of Jerusalem,
Jer	31.	32	a covenant that they b,
Mt	14.	19	and blessed and b the loaves,
1Co	11.	24	he b it and said, “This is my body
BROKEN → BREAK

Ne	1.	3	the wall of Jerusalem is b down,
Ps	51.	17	acceptable to God is a b spirit;
Mt	15.	37	they took up the b pieces left over,
Lk	20.	18	who falls on that stone will be b
Ro	11.	20	were b off because of their unbelief,
BROKENHEARTED → BREAK, HEART

Ps	147.	3	He heals the b, and binds up their
Isa	61.	1	the oppressed, to bind up the b,
BRONZE

Nu	21.	9	look at the serpent of b and live.
Dt	28.	23	The sky over your head shall be b,
Da	10.	6	legs like the gleam of burnished b,
Rev	1.	15	his feet were like burnished b,
BROTHER → BROTHER’S, BROTHERS

Ge	4.	8	Cain rose up against his b Abel,
Mt	5.	24	first be reconciled to your b or
 	10.	21	B will betray b to death,
BROTHER’S → BROTHER

Dt	25.	7	has no desire to marry his b widow,
Mk	6.	18	lawful for you to have your b wife.”
BROTHERS → BROTHER

Ge	9.	25	lowest of slaves shall he be to his b.
 	37.	11	So his b were jealous of him,
Mk	3.	33	“Who are my mother and my b?”
Lk	22.	32	turned back, strengthen your b.”
Heb	2.	11	not ashamed to call them b and
BUILD → BUILDER, BUILDERS, BUILDING, BUILDS, BUILT, REBUILD

Ge	11.	4	“Come, let us b ourselves a city,
Ps	127.	1	those who b it labor in vain.
Mt	16.	18	and on this rock I will b my church,
 	27.	40	destroy the temple and b it in three
1Co	3.	10	must choose with care how to b
 	10.	23	are lawful,” but not all things b up.
BUILDER → BUILD

Heb	3.	4	but the b of all things is God.)
 	11.	10	whose architect and b is God.
BUILDERS → BUILD

Ps	118.	22	The stone that the b rejected has
Mk	12.	10	‘The stone that the b rejected has
1Pe	2.	7	“The stone that the b rejected has
BUILDING → BUILD

1Co	3.	9	you are God’s field, God’s b.
2Co	5.	1	we have a b from God,
Eph	4.	12	for b up the body of Christ,
BUILDS → BUILD

Ps	127.	1	Unless the LORD b the house,
Pr	14.	1	The wise woman b her house,
1Co	8.	1	Knowledge puffs up, but love b up.
BUILT → BUILD

1Ki	6.	14	Solomon b the house, and finished
Ne	7.	1	the wall had been b and I had set up
Pr	9.	1	Wisdom has b her house,
Da	9.	25	sixty-two weeks it shall be b again
Eph	2.	20	b upon the foundation of the
BULL → BULLS

Ps	50.	9	will not accept a b from your house,
BULLS → BULL

Ps	22.	12	b encircle me, strong b of Bashan
Isa	1.	11	I do not delight in the blood of b,
Heb	10.	4	it is impossible for the blood of b
BURDEN → BURDENS, BURDENSOME

Ps	55.	22	Cast your b on the LORD,
Mt	11.	30	my yoke is easy, and my b is light.”
BURDENS → BURDEN

Ex	6.	6	free you from the b of the Egyptians
Lk	11.	46	you load people with b hard to bear,
Gal	6.	2	Bear one another’s b, and
BURDENSOME → BURDEN

1Jn	5.	3	And his commandments are not b,
BURIED → BURY

Ro	6.	4	have been b with him by baptism
1Co	15.	4	he was b, and that he was raised on
BURN → BURNED, BURNT

Ex	21.	25	b for b, wound for wound,
Mal	4.	1	the day that comes shall b them up,
Lk	3.	17	but the chaff he will b with
BURNED → BURN

Ex	3.	3	and see why the bush is not b up.”
Jn	15.	6	thrown into the fire, and b.
1Co	3.	15	If the work is b up, the builder
BURNT → BURN

Ex	40.	6	You shall set the altar of b offering
Lev	1.	3	If the offering is a b offering from
1Sa	15.	22	LORD as great delight in b offerings
Ps	51.	16	if I were to give a b offering,
Da	8.	11	it took the regular b offering away
Hos	6.	6	the knowledge of God rather than b
Mic	6.	6	Shall I come before him with b
Mk	12.	33	more important than all whole b
BURY → BURIED

Lk	9.	60	“Let the dead b their own dead;
BUSH

Ex	3.	2	he looked, and the b was blazing,
Jnh	4.	6	The LORD God appointed a b,
C

CALAMITIES → CALAMITY

1Sa	10.	19	who saves you from all your c and
2Co	6.	4	in afflictions, hardships, c,
 	12.	10	and c for the sake of Christ;
CALAMITY → CALAMITIES

Da	9.	13	all this c has come upon us.
Hab	3.	16	wait quietly for the day of c to come
CALF

Ex	32.	4	and cast an image of a c;
Lk	15.	23	And get the fatted c and kill it,
CALL → CALLED, CALLING

1Ch	16.	8	to the LORD, c on his name,
Ps	61.	2	From the end of the earth I c to you,
Pr	8.	1	Does not wisdom c, and does
Isa	65.	24	Before they c I will answer,
Mt	9.	13	to c not the righteous but sinners.”
Lk	6.	46	“Why do you c me ‘Lord, Lord,’
Jn	15.	15	I do not c you servants any longer,
Php	3.	14	goal for the prize of the heavenly c
CALLED → CALL

2Sa	22.	7	In my distress I c upon the LORD;
Isa	43.	1	I have c you by name, you are mine.
1Co	7.	15	It is to peace that God has c you.
Eph	1.	18	the hope to which he has c you,
1Jn	3.	1	that we should be c children of God;
CALLING → CALL

Ro	11.	29	and the c of God are irrevocable.
Eph	4.	1	lead a life worthy of the c to which
CAMEL

Mt	23.	24	strain out a gnat but swallow a c!
Mk	10.	25	c to go through the eye of a needle
CANAAN

Ge	9.	25	“Cursed be C; lowest of slaves
Nu	13.	2	“Send men to spy out the land of C,
1Ch	16.	18	“To you I will give the land of C
CAPTIVE → CAPTIVITY

2Ki	15.	29	he carried the people c to Assyria.
 	24.	16	king of Babylon brought c to
Ro	7.	23	making me c to the law of sin
Eph	4.	8	he made captivity itself a c;
CAPTIVITY → CAPTIVE

Dt	28.	41	for they shall go into c.
Ezr	8.	35	those who had come from c,
CARE → CAREFUL, CARES, CARING

Ps	8.	4	mortals that you c for them?
Heb	2.	6	or mortals, that you c for them?
Jas	1.	27	to c for orphans and widows in
CAREFUL → CARE

Dt	4.	23	So be c not to forget the covenant
Jos	1.	8	you may be c to act in accordance
Eph	5.	15	Be c then how you live,
CARES → CARE

1Pe	5.	7	on him, because he c for you.
CARPENTER’S

Mt	13.	55	Is not this the c son?
CASE

Isa	41.	21	Set forth your c, says the LORD;
Lk	12.	58	make an effort to settle the c,
Jn	18.	38	“I find no c against him.
CAST

Ex	34.	17	You shall not make c idols.
Ps	22.	18	and for my clothing they c lots.
 	55.	22	C your burden on the LORD,
Mk	3.	23	“How can Satan c out Satan?
Jn	19.	24	and for my clothing they c lots.”
1Pe	5.	7	C all your anxiety on him,
CATTLE

Ge	1.	25	and the c of every kind,
Ps	50.	10	the c on a thousand hills.
CELEBRATE

Lev	23.	37	shall c as times of holy convocation,
1Co	5.	8	Therefore, let us c the festival,
CENSER

Lev	10.	1	Nadab and Abihu, each took his c,
Eze	8.	11	Each had his c in his hand,
Rev	8.	3	Another angel with a golden c came
CENTURION

Mt	8.	5	he entered Capernaum, a c came to
Lk	23.	47	the c saw what had taken place,
Ac	10.	1	a man named Cornelius, a c
CERTIFICATE

Dt	24.	1	so he writes her a c of divorce,
Mt	5.	31	let him give her a c of divorce.’
Mk	10.	4	a man to write a c of dismissal
CHAFF

Ps	1.	4	like c that the wind drives away.
Lk	3.	17	c he will burn with unquenchable
CHAINS

Eph	6.	20	for which I am an ambassador in c.
Heb	11.	36	and even c and imprisonment.
2Pe	2.	4	them to c of deepest darkness
CHANGE → CHANGERS

Ex	32.	12	c your mind and do not bring
Nu	23.	19	a mortal, that he should c his mind.
1Sa	15.	29	will not recant or c his mind;
Jer	18.	8	I will c my mind about the disaster
Jas	1.	17	is no variation or shadow due to c.
CHANGERS → CHANGE

Mk	11.	15	overturned the tables of the money c
Jn	2.	15	poured out the coins of the money c
CHARGE

Mt	25.	21	I will put you in c of many things;
Mk	15.	26	The inscription of the c against him
Ro	8.	33	will bring any c against God’s elect?
1Co	9.	18	I may make the gospel free of c,
CHARM

Pr	31.	30	C is deceitful, and beauty is vain,
CHASTISEMENT → CHASTISES

La	4.	6	the c of my people has been greater
CHASTISES → CHASTISEMENT

Heb	12.	6	and c every child whom he accepts.
CHEEK

Ps	3.	7	you strike all my enemies on the c;
Mt	5.	39	if anyone strikes you on the right c,
CHEERFUL

Pr	15.	13	A glad heart makes a c countenance,
 	17.	22	A c heart is a good medicine,
2Co	9.	7	for God loves a c giver.
Jas	5.	13	Are any c? They should sing songs
CHERUB → CHERUBIM

2Ch	3.	11	touched the wing of the other c;
Ps	18.	10	He rode on a c, and flew;
Eze	10.	14	the first face was that of the c,
 	28.	14	an anointed c as guardian I placed
CHERUBIM → CHERUB

Ge	3.	24	the garden of Eden he placed the c,
Ex	25.	18	You shall make two c of gold;
Ps	80.	1	You who are enthroned upon the c,
Heb	9.	5	the c of glory overshadowing the
CHIEF

Ps	118.	22	has become the c cornerstone.
Mk	15.	3	the c priests accused him of many
1Pe	5.	4	And when the c shepherd appears,
CHILD → CHILDBEARING, CHILDREN

Isa	11.	6	and a little c shall lead them.
 	49.	15	Can a woman forget her nursing c,
Hos	11.	1	When Israel was a c, I loved him,
Mt	1.	18	with c from the Holy Spirit.
Mk	10.	15	the kingdom of God as a little c
Lk	2.	12	you will find a c wrapped in bands
1Co	13.	11	When I was a c, I spoke like a c,
Rev	12.	4	that he might devour her c as soon
CHILDBEARING → CHILD, BEAR

Ge	3.	16	greatly increase your pangs in c;
1Ti	2.	15	Yet she will be saved through c,
CHILDREN → CHILD

Pr	22.	6	Train c in the right way, and when
Mt	3.	9	stones to raise up c to Abraham.
Lk	18.	16	“Let the little c come to me,
Jn	1.	12	he gave power to become c of God,
Ro	8.	14	by the Spirit of God are c of God.
Eph	6.	4	do not provoke your c to anger,
Heb	12.	7	God is treating you as c;
1Jn	3.	10	The c of God and the c of the devil
CHOOSE → CHOOSES, CHOSE, CHOSEN

Dt	30.	19	C life so that you and your
Jos	24.	15	c this day whom you will serve,
Jn	15.	16	You did not c me but I chose you.
CHOOSES → CHOOSE

Ro	9.	18	he has mercy on whomever he c,
CHOSE → CHOOSE

Mk	13.	20	for the sake of the elect, whom he c,
1Co	1.	27	God c what is foolish in the world
CHOSEN → CHOOSE

Isa	42.	1	my servant, whom I uphold, my c,
Mt	22.	14	For many are called, but few are c.”
Ro	11.	5	there is a remnant, c by grace.
1Pe	2.	6	a cornerstone c and precious;
 	2.	9	are a c race, a royal priesthood,
CHRIST → CHRISTIAN, CHRISTIANS, JESUS, MESSIAH

Jn	4.	25	Messiah is coming” (who is called C).
Ro	5.	6	right time C died for the ungodly.
 	8.	35	will separate us from the love of C?
1Co	1.	23	but we proclaim C crucified,
 	3.	11	that foundation is Jesus C.
 	11.	1	Be imitators of me, as I am of C.
Gal	5.	1	For freedom C has set us free.
Eph	4.	15	into him who is the head, into C,
Php	1.	21	to me, living is C and dying is gain.
 	2.	11	should confess that Jesus C is Lord,
Col	1.	27	C in you, the hope of glory.
Rev	20.	4	reigned with C a thousand years.
CHRISTIAN → CHRIST

Ac	26.	28	persuading me to become a C?”
1Pe	4.	16	Yet if any of you suffers as a C,
CHRISTIANS → CHRIST

Ac	11.	26	the disciples were first called “C.”
CHURCH

Mt	16.	18	on this rock I will build my c,
Ac	8.	1	persecution began against the c
1Co	12.	28	appointed in the c first apostles,
 	14.	4	those who prophesy build up the c.
Col	1.	18	He is the head of the body, the c;
CIRCUMCISE → CIRCUMCISED, CIRCUMCISION

Ge	17.	11	shall c the flesh of your foreskins,
Dt	10.	16	C, then, the foreskin of your heart,
Lk	1.	59	the eighth day they came to c the
Jn	7.	22	and you c a man on the sabbath.
CIRCUMCISED → CIRCUMCISE

Ge	17.	10	Every male among you shall be c.
Gal	6.	13	c do not themselves obey the law,
Col	2.	11	also you were c with a spiritual
CIRCUMCISION → CIRCUMCISE

Ro	2.	29	real c is a matter of the heart—
Gal	5.	6	For in Christ Jesus neither c
CITIES → CITY

Jos	20.	2	‘Appoint the c of refuge,
Rev	16.	19	and the c of the nations fell.
CITIZENSHIP

Php	3.	20	But our c is in heaven,
CITY → CITIES

1Ch	11.	7	it was called the c of David.
Ps	127.	1	Unless the LORD guards the c,
Mt	5.	14	A c built on a hill cannot be hid.
Heb	12.	22	Zion and to the c of the living God,
Rev	21.	2	I saw the holy c, the new Jerusalem,
CLAY

Isa	45.	9	Does the c say to the one who
Jer	18.	6	Just like the c in the potter’s hand,
Ro	9.	21	Has the potter no right over the c,
2Co	4.	7	But we have this treasure in c jars,
CLEAN → CLEANSE, CLEANSING

Ge	7.	2	seven pairs of all c animals,
Lev	10.	10	and between the unclean and the c;
Ps	51.	7	with hyssop, and I shall be c;
Mk	7.	19	(Thus he declared all foods c.)
Heb	10.	22	with our hearts sprinkled c from
CLEANSE → CLEAN

Ps	51.	2	and c me from my sin.
1Jn	1.	9	c us from all unrighteousness.
CLEANSING → CLEAN

Eph	5.	26	by c her with the washing of water
2Pe	1.	9	is forgetful of the c of past sins.
CLOTH

Isa	64.	6	righteous deeds are like a filthy c.
Lk	2.	7	and wrapped him in bands of c,
CLOTHE → CLOTHED, CLOTHING

Col	3.	14	Above all, c yourselves with love,
1Pe	5.	5	you must c yourselves with humility
CLOTHED → CLOTHE

2Co	5.	2	longing to be c with our heavenly
Gal	3.	27	have c yourselves with Christ.
Rev	12.	1	a woman c with the sun,
CLOTHING → CLOTHE

Ps	22.	18	and for my c they cast lots.
Mt	25.	36	I was naked and you gave me c,
Jn	19.	24	and for my c they cast lots.”
CLOUD → CLOUDS

Ex	13.	21	went in front of them in a pillar of c
Mk	9.	7	Then a c overshadowed them,
Lk	21.	27	‘the Son of Man coming in a c’
Heb	12.	1	by so great a c of witnesses,
Rev	14.	14	on the c was one like the Son of Man,
CLOUDS → CLOUD

Ge	9.	13	I have set my bow in the c,
Da	7.	13	being coming with the c of heaven.
Mt	24.	30	‘the Son of Man coming on the c of
1Th	4.	17	be caught up in the c together with
Rev	1.	7	He is coming with the c;
COIN

Mt	17.	27	open its mouth, you will find a c;
 	22.	19	Show me the c used for the tax.”
Lk	15.	9	I have found the c that I had lost.’
COLLECTOR → COLLECTORS

Mt	10.	3	Thomas and Matthew the tax c;
Lk	18.	10	one a Pharisee and the other a tax c.
 	19.	2	he was a chief tax c and was rich.
COLLECTORS → COLLECTOR

Mt	5.	46	Do not even the tax c do the same?
 	11.	19	a friend of tax c and sinners!’
COLT

Ge	49.	11	his donkey’s c to the choice vine,
Zec	9.	9	and riding on a donkey, on a c,
Jn	12.	15	coming, sitting on a donkey’s c!”
COME → COMES, COMING

Mt	6.	10	Your kingdom c. Your will be done,
Lk	7.	20	‘Are you the one who is to c,
1Co	16.	22	Our Lord, c!
Rev	1.	4	who is and who was and who is to c,
 	22.	20	Amen. C, Lord Jesus!
COMES → COME

Ps	118.	26	who c in the name of the LORD.
Lk	19.	38	“Blessed is the king who c in the
Jn	14.	6	No one c to the Father except through
COMFORT → COMFORTED, COMFORTS

Ps	23.	4	your rod and your staff—they c me.
Isa	40.	1	C, O c my people, says your God.
COMFORTED → COMFORT

Ps	86.	17	LORD, have helped me and c me.
Isa	49.	13	For the LORD has c his people,
Mt	5.	4	those who mourn, for they will be c.
COMFORTS → COMFORT

Isa	66.	13	As a mother c her child, so I will
COMING → COME

Mal	3.	2	But who can endure the day of his c,
Heb	10.	37	is c will come and will not delay;
2Pe	3.	4	“Where is the promise of his c?
Rev	22.	20	“Surely I am c soon.”
COMMAND → COMMANDED, COMMANDING, COMMANDMENT, COMMANDMENTS

Ex	34.	11	Observe what I c you today.
Jdg	2.	2	But you have not obeyed my c.
COMMANDED → COMMAND

Mt	28.	20	to obey everything that I have c you.
Jn	14.	31	but I do as the Father has c me,
COMMANDING → COMMAND

Dt	4.	40	c you today for your own well-being
 	30.	11	c you today is not too hard for you,
COMMANDMENT → COMMAND

Dt	6.	1	Now this is the c—the statutes
Ps	19.	8	c of the LORD is clear,
Mt	22.	38	This is the greatest and first c.
Ro	7.	12	and the c is holy and just and good.
Gal	5.	14	law is summed up in a single c,
1Jn	3.	23	this is his c, that we should believe
COMMANDMENTS → COMMAND

Ex	20.	6	those who love me and keep my c.
Dt	4.	13	to observe, that is, the ten c;
Ps	119.	66	for I believe in your c.
Pr	10.	8	The wise of heart will heed c,
Ecc	12.	13	Fear God, and keep his c;
Mt	22.	40	On these two c hang all the law and
Jn	14.	15	If you love me, you will keep my c.
1Co	7.	19	obeying the c of God is everything.
1Jn	5.	3	And his c are not burdensome,
Rev	14.	12	those who keep the c of God and
COMMON

Lev	10.	10	between the holy and the c,
Eze	22.	26	between the holy and the c,
Ac	2.	44	and had all things in c;
COMMUNION

2Co	13.	13	the c of the Holy Spirit be with
COMPANY

1Co	15.	33	“Bad c ruins good morals.”
COMPASSION → COMPASSIONATE

Dt	32.	36	will vindicate his people, have c
Ps	103.	13	As a father has c for his children,
Hos	11.	8	my c grows warm and tender.
Mt	14.	14	had c for them and cured their sick.
Ro	9.	15	I will have c on whom I have c.”
Col	3.	12	clothe yourselves with c, kindness,
COMPASSIONATE → COMPASSION

Ex	22.	27	I will listen, for I am c.
Jas	5.	11	how the Lord is c and merciful.
COMPLAIN → COMPLAINING, COMPLAINT

Nu	14.	27	shall this wicked congregation c
Jer	2.	29	Why do you c against me?
1Co	10.	10	And do not c as some of them did,
COMPLAINING → COMPLAIN

Ex	16.	7	heard your c against the LORD.
1Pe	4.	9	hospitable to one another without c.
COMPLAINT → COMPLAIN

Ps	142.	2	I pour out my c before him;
Hab	2.	1	he will answer concerning my c.
Col	3.	13	if anyone has a c against another,
COMPLETE → COMPLETED

Jn	4.	34	him who sent me and to c his work.
Rev	6.	11	until the number would be c
COMPLETED → COMPLETE

Jer	25.	12	Then after seventy years are c,
Da	11.	36	until the period of wrath is c,
CONCEIT → CONCEITED

Php	2.	3	nothing from selfish ambition or c,
1Ti	3.	6	he may be puffed up with c and fall
CONCEITED → CONCEIT

Gal	5.	26	Let us not become c, competing
1Ti	6.	4	is c, understanding nothing,
CONCEIVE

Mt	1.	23	the virgin shall c and bear a son,
Lk	1.	31	you will c in your womb and bear
CONDEMN → CONDEMNATION, CONDEMNED

Lk	11.	31	of this generation and c them,
Jn	3.	17	not send the Son into the world to c
Ro	8.	34	Who is to c?
1Jn	3.	21	Beloved, if our hearts do not c us,
CONDEMNATION → CONDEMN

Mk	12.	40	They will receive the greater c.”
Ro	5.	18	one man’s trespass led to c for all,
1Ti	3.	6	fall into the c of the devil.
Jas	5.	12	so that you may not fall under c.
CONDEMNED → CONDEMN

Mt	12.	37	and by your words you will be c.”
Lk	24.	20	handed him over to be c to death
Jn	3.	18	Those who believe in him are not c;
 	16.	11	the ruler of this world has been c.
1Co	11.	32	disciplined so that we may not be c
CONDUCT

1Pe	1.	15	be holy yourselves in all your c;
CONFESS → CONFESSES, CONFESSION

Lev	5.	5	you shall c the sin that you have
Ps	38.	18	c my iniquity; I am sorry for my sin.
Php	2.	11	should c that Jesus Christ is Lord,
1Jn	1.	9	If we c our sins, he who is faithful
Rev	3.	5	will c your name before my Father
CONFESSES → CONFESS

Ro	10.	10	c with the mouth and so is saved.
1Jn	2.	23	who c the Son has the Father also.
CONFESSION → CONFESS

Da	9.	4	to the LORD my God and made c,
1Ti	6.	12	for which you made the good c in
Heb	4.	14	let us hold fast to our c.
CONFIDENCE

Ps	118.	8	LORD than to put c in mortals.
Php	3.	3	and have no c in the flesh—
Heb	10.	19	we have c to enter the sanctuary
CONFORMED

Ro	8.	29	predestined to be c to the image of
 	12.	2	Do not be c to this world,
Php	3.	21	may be c to the body of his glory,
1Pe	1.	14	do not be c to the desires that you
CONFUSE

Ge	11.	7	go down, and c their language there,
CONGREGATION

Ps	1.	5	nor sinners in the c of the righteous;
Heb	2.	12	the midst of the c I will praise you.”
CONQUER → CONQUERED, CONQUERORS, CONQUERS

Rev	17.	14	and the Lamb will c them,
 	21.	7	who c will inherit these things,
CONQUERED → CONQUER

Jn	16.	33	take courage; I have c the world!”
Heb	11.	33	who through faith c kingdoms,
1Jn	2.	13	because you have c the evil one.
Rev	15.	2	who had c the beast and its image
CONQUERORS → CONQUER

Ro	8.	37	all these things we are more than c
CONQUERS → CONQUER

1Jn	5.	4	victory that c the world, our faith.
Rev	2.	7	To everyone who c, I will give
CONSCIENCE

Ro	2.	15	their own c also bears witness;
1Co	8.	7	and their c, being weak, is defiled.
1Ti	1.	5	a good c, and sincere faith.
Heb	9.	14	purify our c from dead works to
1Pe	3.	21	as an appeal to God for a good c,
CONSIDER

1Sa	12.	24	for c what great things he has done
Ps	107.	43	and c the steadfast love of the LORD.
Lk	12.	27	C the lilies, how they grow:
CONSOLATION

Lk	2.	25	looking forward to the c of Israel,
2Co	1.	3	of mercies and the God of all c,
CONSPIRED

Da	6.	6	So the presidents and satraps c
Mt	26.	4	they c to arrest Jesus by stealth
CONSUME → CONSUMED, CONSUMING

Ex	32.	12	c them from the face of the earth’?
Nu	16.	21	so that I may c them in a moment.
Mt	6.	19	where moth and rust c and where
Jn	2.	17	“Zeal for your house will c me.”
CONSUMED → CONSUME

Ex	3.	2	bush was blazing, yet it was not c.
Ps	69.	9	zeal for your house that has c me;
Zep	3.	8	all the earth shall be c.
Gal	5.	15	that you are not c by one another.
CONSUMING → CONSUME

Heb	12.	29	for indeed our God is a c fire.
CONTEMPT

Da	12.	2	some to shame and everlasting c.
Mk	9.	12	sufferings and be treated with c?
Heb	6.	6	and are holding him up to c.
CONTENT → CONTENTMENT

2Co	12.	10	Therefore I am c with weaknesses,
Php	4.	11	learned to be c with whatever I have
Heb	13.	5	and be c with what you have;
CONTENTMENT → CONTENT

1Ti	6.	6	gain in godliness combined with c;
CONTRITE

Ps	51.	17	broken and c heart, O God, you
Isa	57.	15	who are c and humble in spirit,
CONVERT

Mt	23.	15	sea and land to make a single c,
1Ti	3.	6	He must not be a recent c,
CONVICT → CONVICTION

Dt	19.	15	to c a person of any crime
Jude	1.	15	to c everyone of all the deeds of
CONVICTION → CONVICT

Heb	11.	1	the c of things not seen.
CONVINCE → CONVINCED, CONVINCING

Ac	28.	23	and trying to c them about Jesus
2Ti	4.	2	c, rebuke, and encourage,
CONVINCED → CONVINCE

Lk	16.	31	neither will they be c even if
Ro	8.	38	For I am c that neither death, nor
2Co	5.	14	we are c that one has died for all;
CONVINCING → CONVINCE

Ac	1.	3	to them by many c proofs,
COPPER

Mk	12.	42	and put in two small c coins,
CORNERSTONE → STONE

Ps	118.	22	rejected has become the chief c.
Isa	28.	16	a tested stone, a precious c, a sure
Zec	10.	4	Out of them shall come the c,
Lk	20.	17	builders rejected has become the c’?
Eph	2.	20	with Christ Jesus himself as the c.
1Pe	2.	6	laying in Zion a stone, a c chosen
CORRECT → CORRECTING, CORRECTION

Ps	141.	5	let the faithful c me.
CORRECTING → CORRECT

2Ti	2.	25	c opponents with gentleness.
CORRECTION → CORRECT

Jer	5.	3	but they refused to take c.
2Ti	3.	16	c, and for training in righteousness,
CORRUPT → CORRUPTION

Ge	6.	11	Now the earth was c in God’s sight,
Ac	2.	40	yourselves from this c generation.”
Eph	4.	22	your old self, c and deluded
CORRUPTION → CORRUPT

Ac	2.	31	nor did his flesh experience c.’
2Pe	1.	4	you may escape from the c
COST

1Ch	21.	24	burnt offerings that c me nothing.”
Lk	14.	28	not first sit down and estimate the c,
COUNCIL → COUNCILS

Jer	23.	18	who has stood in the c of the LORD
Mt	26.	59	the whole c were looking for false
COUNCILS → COUNCIL

Mk	13.	9	for they will hand you over to c;
COUNSEL → COUNSELOR, COUNSELORS

Ps	2.	2	and the rulers take c together,
 	33.	11	The c of the LORD stands forever,
Isa	28.	29	he is wonderful in c, and excellent
COUNSELOR → COUNSEL

Isa	9.	6	and he is named Wonderful C,
Ro	11.	34	Or who has been his c?”
COUNSELORS → COUNSEL

Pr	11.	14	in an abundance of c there is safety.
 	24.	6	in abundance of c there is victory.
COUNTENANCE

Nu	6.	26	the LORD lift up his c upon you,
Ps	89.	15	O LORD, in the light of your c;
Pr	15.	13	A glad heart makes a cheerful c,
COURAGE → COURAGEOUS

1Ch	22.	13	Be strong and of good c.
Jn	16.	33	But take c; I have conquered
COURAGEOUS → COURAGE

Jos	1.	6	Be strong and c; for you shall put
Da	10.	19	Be strong and c!”
1Co	16.	13	stand firm in your faith, be c,
COURT → COURTS

Ex	27.	9	shall make the c of the tabernacle.
Pr	25.	8	do not hastily bring into c;
Mt	5.	25	while you are on the way to c
1Co	6.	6	believer goes to c against a believer
COURTS → COURT

Ps	84.	10	in your c is better than a thousand
 	96.	8	an offering, and come into his c.
COVENANT → COVENANTS

Ge	6.	18	But I will establish my c with you;
 	9.	9	I am establishing my c with you
 	15.	18	the LORD made a c with Abram,
Ex	19.	5	you obey my voice and keep my c,
 	24.	7	Then he took the book of the c,
 	40.	3	put in it the ark of the c,
Jdg	2.	1	‘I will never break my c with you.
1Ki	8.	23	keeping c and steadfast love
Ps	105.	8	He is mindful of his c forever,
Isa	61.	8	I will make an everlasting c with
Jer	31.	31	when I will make a new c with
Eze	16.	60	establish with you an everlasting c.
Mal	3.	1	The messenger of the c in whom
Lk	22.	20	is the new c in my blood.
1Co	11.	25	“This cup is the new c in my blood.
2Co	3.	6	be ministers of a new c, not of letter
Heb	7.	22	become the guarantee of a better c.
 	12.	24	the mediator of a new c,
Rev	11.	19	the ark of his c was seen within his
COVENANTS → COVENANT

Ro	9.	4	the adoption, the glory, the c,
Gal	4.	24	an allegory: these women are two c.
COVET

Ex	20.	17	shall not c your neighbor’s house;
Ro	7.	7	had not said, “You shall not c.”
Jas	4.	2	you c something and cannot obtain
CRAFTINESS → CRAFTY

Ro	1.	29	of envy, murder, strife, deceit, c,
1Co	3.	19	“He catches the wise in their c,”
CRAFTY → CRAFTINESS

Ge	3.	1	serpent was more c than any other
CRAVING

Nu	11.	4	rabble among them had a strong c;
Ps	78.	30	But before they had satisfied their c,
CREATE → CREATED, CREATION, CREATOR

Ps	51.	10	C in me a clean heart, O God,
Isa	65.	17	to c new heavens and a new earth;
Eph	2.	15	c in himself one new humanity
CREATED → CREATE

Ge	1.	1	In the beginning when God c the
 	1.	27	So God c humankind in his image,
Dt	32.	6	Is not he your father, who c you,
Pr	8.	22	The LORD c me at the beginning
Mal	2.	10	Has not one God c us?
1Co	11.	9	Neither was man c for the sake of
Eph	2.	10	c in Christ Jesus for good works,
Col	1.	16	all things have been c through him
1Ti	4.	4	For everything c by God is good,
Rev	4.	11	you c all things, and by your will
CREATION → CREATE

Ge	2.	3	all the work that he had done in c.
Mk	10.	6	But from the beginning of c,
Ro	8.	19	the c waits with eager longing for
2Co	5.	17	anyone is in Christ, there is a new c:
Col	1.	15	invisible God, the firstborn of all c;
CREATOR → CREATE

Ecc	12.	1	Remember your c in the days of
Ro	1.	25	served the creature rather than the C
1Pe	4.	19	to a faithful C,
CREATURE → CREATURES

Ge	2.	19	the man called every living c,
CREATURES → CREATURE

Lev	11.	2	these are the c that you may eat.
Ps	104.	24	the earth is full of your c.
CRIED → CRY

Ps	22.	5	To you they c, and were saved;
Mt	27.	46	Jesus c with a loud voice,
CRIMINAL → CRIMINALS

Jn	18.	30	“If this man were not a c,
2Ti	2.	9	the point of being chained like a c.
1Pe	4.	15	suffer as a murderer, a thief, a c,
CRIMINALS → CRIMINAL

Lk	23.	32	Two others also, who were c,
CROOKED

Dt	32.	5	a perverse and c generation.
Ps	18.	26	the c you show yourself perverse.
Ecc	1.	15	What is c cannot be made straight,
Lk	3.	5	and the c shall be made straight,
CROSS

Dt	31.	3	your God himself will c over before
Mk	15.	30	and come down from the c!”
Lk	14.	27	the c and follow me cannot be my
1Co	1.	18	the c is foolishness to those who are
Gal	6.	14	never boast of anything except the c
Php	2.	8	of death—even death on a c.
Col	1.	20	peace through the blood of his c.
Heb	12.	2	was set before him endured the c,
CROW

Lk	22.	34	the cock will not c this day,
CROWD → CROWDS

Mk	8.	2	“I have compassion for the c,
 	14.	43	a c with swords and clubs,
CROWDS → CROWD

Mt	7.	28	c were astounded at his teaching,
CROWN → CROWNED, CROWNS

Lev	8.	9	the golden ornament, the holy c,
Jn	19.	2	soldiers wove a c of thorns and put
Php	4.	1	my joy and c, stand firm in the Lord
2Ti	4.	8	there is reserved for me the c
1Pe	5.	4	the c of glory that never fades away.
Rev	6.	2	Its rider had a bow; a c was given
 	14.	14	with a golden c on his head,
CROWNED → CROWN

Ps	8.	5	and c them with glory and honor.
2Ti	2.	5	no one is c without competing
Heb	2.	9	now c with glory and honor
CROWNS → CROWN

Rev	4.	10	they cast their c before the throne,
CRUCIFIED → CRUCIFY

Mt	27.	22	All of them said, “Let him be c!”
Lk	24.	7	c, and on the third day rise again.”
Ac	4.	10	whom you c, whom God raised
Ro	6.	6	We know that our old self was c
1Co	1.	23	but we proclaim Christ c,
Gal	2.	19	I have been c with Christ;
CRUCIFY → CRUCIFIED, CRUCIFYING

Lk	23.	21	they kept shouting, “C, c him!”
Jn	19.	15	asked them, “Shall I c your King?”
CRUCIFYING → CRUCIFY

Heb	6.	6	they are c again the Son of God
CRUSH

Mt	21.	44	it will c anyone on whom it falls.”
Ro	16.	20	will shortly c Satan under your feet.
CRY → CRIED, CRYING

Pr	130.	1	Out of the depths I c to you,
Hab	1.	2	how long shall I c for help,
Mk	15.	37	Then Jesus gave a loud c
CRYING → CRY

Mk	1.	3	the voice of one c out in the
Rev	21.	4	c and pain will be no more,
CUP

Ps	23.	5	my head with oil; my c overflows.
Mt	26.	39	if it is possible, let this c pass
Mk	10.	38	you able to drink the c that I drink,
Lk	22.	17	he took a c, and after giving thanks
1Co	11.	25	c is the new covenant in my blood.
Rev	14.	10	unmixed into the c of his anger,
CURED

Mt	8.	16	and c all who were sick.
Ac	5.	16	and they were all c.
CURSE → ACCURSED, CURSED, CURSES

Ge	8.	21	“I will never again c the ground
 	12.	3	the one who curses you I will c;
Job	2.	9	C God, and die.”
Ps	109.	28	Let them c, but you will bless.
Mal	4.	6	come and strike the land with a c.
Mk	14.	71	he began to c, and he swore an oath,
Lk	6.	28	bless those who c you, pray
Ro	12.	14	bless and do not c them.
Gal	3.	13	redeemed us from the c of the law by becoming a c for us—
CURSED → CURSE

Ge	3.	17	c is the ground because of you;
 	27.	29	C be everyone who curses you,
Nu	23.	8	can I curse whom God has not c?
Mk	11.	21	fig tree that you c has withered.”
Gal	3.	10	“C is everyone who does not
Rev	16.	9	but they c the name of God,
CURSES → CURSE

Lev	24.	15	who c God shall bear the sin.
CURTAIN

Ex	26.	31	You shall make a c of blue, purple,
2Ch	3.	14	And Solomon made the c of blue
Lk	23.	45	the c of the temple was torn in two.
Heb	10.	20	that he opened for us through the c
CUT

Ge	9.	11	never again shall all flesh be c off
Ps	37.	9	For the wicked shall be c off,
Isa	53.	8	c off from the land of the living,
Mt	3.	10	does not bear good fruit is c down
Mk	9.	43	hand causes you to stumble, c it off;
Ro	11.	22	otherwise you also will be c off.
D

DAILY → DAY

Mt	6.	11	Give us this day our d bread.
Lk	9.	23	take up their cross d and follow me.
DANCE → DANCED

Ps	150.	4	Praise him with tambourine and d;
Ecc	3.	4	a time to mourn, and a time to d;
Lk	7.	32	the flute for you, and you did not d;
DANCED → DANCE

2Sa	6.	14	David d before the LORD with all
Mt	14.	6	the daughter of Herodias d before
DARK → DARKEST, DARKNESS

Ps	139.	12	even the darkness is not d to you;
Lk	12.	3	whatever you have said in the d will
2Pe	1.	19	as to a lamp shining in a d place,
DARKEST → DARK

Ps	23.	4	though I walk through the d valley,
DARKNESS → DARK

Ge	1.	2	the earth was a formless void and d
Ex	10.	22	was dense d in all the land of Egypt
Isa	9.	2	walked in d have seen a great light;
Joel	2.	31	The sun shall be turned to d,
Mt	4.	16	who sat in d have seen a great light,
Jn	1.	5	light shines in the d, and the d did not
Col	1.	13	from the power of d and transferred
1Jn	1.	5	God is light and in him there is no d
DAUGHTER → DAUGHTERS

Mic	7.	6	the d rises up against her mother,
Lk	12.	53	against d and d against mother,
DAUGHTERS → DAUGHTER

Ge	6.	4	of God went in to the d of humans,
Joel	2.	28	sons and your d shall prophesy,
Ac	2.	17	sons and your d shall prophesy,
2Co	6.	18	and you shall be my sons and d,
DAWN → DAWNS

Isa	14.	12	from heaven, O Day Star, son of D!
Hos	6.	3	his appearing is as sure as the d;
DAWNS → DAWN

Ps	97.	11	Light d for the righteous,
2Pe	1.	19	until the day d and the morning star
DAY → DAILY, DAYS

Ge	1.	5	God called the light D, and
Ex	13.	21	of them in a pillar of cloud by d,
 	20.	8	Remember the sabbath d, and keep
Ps	1.	2	his law they meditate d and night.
 	118.	24	is the d that the LORD has made;
Joel	1.	15	For the d of the LORD is near,
Zec	14.	1	See, a d is coming for the LORD,
Mal	3.	2	who can endure the d of his coming,
Mt	25.	13	you know neither the d nor the hour.
Lk	11.	3	Give us each d our daily bread.
 	24.	46	to rise from the dead on the third d,
Jn	6.	40	I will raise them up on the last d.”
Ro	14.	5	Some judge one d to be better than
1Th	5.	2	very well that the d of the Lord
2Pe	3.	8	one d is like a thousand years,
 	3.	10	d of the Lord will come like a thief,
1Jn	4.	17	have boldness on the d of judgment,
Rev	16.	14	for battle on the great d of God
DAYS → DAY

Ge	1.	14	and for seasons and for d and years,
Ex	24.	18	on the mountain for forty d and
1Ki	19.	8	that food forty d and forty nights
Ps	90.	10	The d of our life are seventy years,
Eph	5.	16	of the time, because the d are evil.
2Ti	3.	1	in the last d distressing times will
DEACON → DEACONS

Ro	16.	1	a d of the church at Cenchreae,
DEACONS → DEACON

1Ti	3.	8	D likewise must be serious, not
DEAD → DEATH, DIE, DIED, DYING

Mt	8.	22	and let the d bury their own d.”
Mk	12.	27	God not of the d, but of the living;
Lk	24.	5	look for the living among the d?
Ro	6.	11	must consider yourselves d to sin
Eph	2.	1	You were d through the trespasses
Rev	1.	5	witness, the firstborn of the d,
 	20.	12	And the d were judged according to
DEAF

Ex	4.	11	Who makes them mute or d,
Isa	29.	18	On that day the d shall hear the
Lk	7.	22	the lepers are cleansed, the d hear,
DEATH → DEAD

Dt	30.	19	that I have set before you life and d,
Isa	25.	7	he will swallow up d forever.
Hos	13.	14	O D, where are your plagues?
Lk	1.	79	in darkness and in the shadow of d,
Jn	5.	24	but has passed from d to life.
Ro	6.	23	For the wages of sin is d,
1Co	15.	55	“Where, O d, is your victory?
Heb	2.	14	through d he might destroy the one who has the power of d,
1Jn	3.	14	that we have passed from d to life
Rev	1.	18	I have the keys of D and of Hades.
 	20.	14	D and Hades were thrown into the lake
 	21.	4	D will be no more;
DEBTS

Mt	6.	12	And forgive us our d, as we
DECEIT → DECEITFUL, DECEIVE

Dt	32.	4	A faithful God, without d,
Isa	53.	9	and there was no d in his mouth.
Ro	1.	29	Full of envy, murder, strife, d,
1Pe	2.	22	and no d was found in his mouth.”
DECEITFUL → DECEIT

1Ti	4.	1	by paying attention to d spirits
DECEIVE → DECEIT

Eph	5.	6	Let no one d you with empty words,
1Jn	1.	8	that we have no sin, we d ourselves,
Rev	20.	8	to d the nations at the four corners
DECREES

Dt	6.	2	and keep all his d and his
Ps	19.	7	the d of the LORD are sure,
 	119.	2	Happy are those who keep his d,
DEDICATION

2Ch	7.	9	the d of the altar seven days and
Ezr	6.	16	the d of this house of God with joy.
DEED → DEEDS

Ecc	12.	14	will bring every d into judgment,
Mt	19.	16	good d must I do to have eternal life
Col	3.	17	And whatever you do, in word or d,
DEEDS → DEED

Jer	50.	29	Repay her according to her d;
Lk	23.	41	getting what we deserve for our d,
Ro	2.	6	repay according to each one’s d:
Rev	15.	3	“Great and amazing are your d,
 	19.	8	the righteous d of the saints.
DEEP → DEPTH, DEPTHS

Ge	1.	2	darkness covered the face of the d,
 	7.	11	the fountains of the great d burst
Ro	8.	26	with sighs too d for words.
DEFEND

Ps	72.	4	May he d the cause of the poor of
Pr	31.	9	d the rights of the poor and needy.
DEFILE

Lev	11.	43	you shall not d yourselves
Nu	35.	34	You shall not d the land
Mk	7.	15	things that come out are what d.”
DEITY

Col	2.	9	whole fullness of d dwells bodily,
DELAY

Dt	7.	10	He does not d but repays
Ps	70.	5	my deliverer; O LORD, do not d!
Heb	10.	37	will come and will not d;
DELIGHT

1Sa	15.	22	“Has the LORD as great d in burnt
Ps	1.	2	their d is in the law of the LORD,
 	40.	8	I d to do your will, O my God;
Pr	8.	30	I was daily his d, rejoicing before
Ro	7.	22	For I d in the law of God in my
DELIVER → DELIVERANCE, DELIVERER, DELIVERS

Ex	3.	8	to d them from the Egyptians,
Da	3.	17	able to d us from the furnace
 	6.	20	able to d you from the lions?”
Mt	27.	43	let God d him now,
DELIVERANCE → DELIVER

Ex	14.	13	and see the d that the LORD will
Ps	3.	8	D belongs to the LORD;
Php	1.	19	this will turn out for my d.
DELIVERER → DELIVER

Ps	140.	7	O LORD, my Lord, my strong d,
Ro	11.	26	“Out of Zion will come the D;
DEMON → DEMONIACS, DEMONIC, DEMONS

Mt	11.	18	and they say, ‘He has a d’;
 	17.	18	Jesus rebuked the d, and it came out
Jn	8.	48	you are a Samaritan and have a d?”
 	10.	21	not the words of one who has a d.
DEMONIACS → DEMON

Mt	4.	24	d, epileptics, and paralytics, and he
 	8.	28	two d coming out of the tombs met
DEMONIC → DEMON

Rev	16.	14	These are d spirits, performing signs
DEMONS → DEMON

Dt	32.	17	They sacrificed to d, not God,
Lk	11.	18	that I cast out the d by Beelzebul.
1Co	10.	20	not want you to be partners with d.
1Ti	4.	1	deceitful spirits and teachings of d,
Jas	2.	19	Even the d believe—and shudder.
Rev	9.	20	their hands or give up worshiping d
DEN

Jer	7.	11	a d of robbers in your sight?
Da	6.	7	shall be thrown into a d of lions.
Mk	11.	17	you have made it a d of robbers.”
DENARIUS

Mk	12.	15	Bring me a d and let me see it.”
DENIED → DENY

Mt	26.	70	But he d it before all of them,
1Ti	5.	8	has d the faith and is worse than
Rev	3.	8	my word and have not d my name.
DENIES → DENY

Lk	12.	9	but whoever d me before others
1Jn	2.	22	liar but the one who d that Jesus
DENY → DENIED, DENIES

Mt	16.	24	let them d themselves and take up
2Ti	2.	12	if we d him, he will also d us;
2Pe	2.	1	d the Master who bought them—
DEPRAVED → DEPRAVITY

1Ti	6.	5	among those who are d in mind
2Pe	2.	10	who indulge their flesh in d lust,
DEPRAVITY → DEPRAVED

Lev	20.	14	that there may be no d among you.
DEPTH → DEEP

Mt	13.	5	since they had no d of soil.
Ro	11.	33	O the d of the riches and wisdom
Eph	3.	18	and length and height and d,
DEPTHS → DEEP

Ps	130.	1	Out of the d I cry to you,
1Co	2.	10	even the d of God.
DESCENDANTS

Ge	15.	18	saying, “To your d I give this land,
Dt	4.	37	he chose their d after them.
Isa	44.	3	I will pour my spirit upon your d,
Ro	9.	7	Abraham’s children are his true d;
Gal	3.	7	who believe are the d of Abraham.
DESERT

Ps	106.	14	and put God to the test in the d;
Isa	40.	3	make straight in the d a highway
Mk	8.	4	with bread here in the d?”
DESERVE

Pr	14.	14	and the good, what their deeds d.
Lk	23.	15	he has done nothing to d death.
Ac	26.	31	man is doing nothing to d death
Rev	2.	23	give to each of you as your works d.
DESIRE → DESIRES

Ge	3.	16	your d shall be for your husband,
Ps	20.	4	May he grant you your heart’s d,
Hos	6.	6	I d steadfast love and not sacrifice,
Mt	9.	13	learn what this means, ‘I d mercy,
1Jn	2.	16	the d of the flesh, the d of the eyes,
DESIRES → DESIRE

1Ti	2.	4	who d everyone to be saved
2Ti	4.	3	teachers to suit their own d,
DESOLATE → DESOLATES

Da	11.	31	the abomination that makes d.
DESOLATES → DESOLATE

Da	9.	27	shall be an abomination that d,
DESPISE → DESPISED

Job	5.	17	not d the discipline of the Almighty.
Pr	1.	7	fools d wisdom and instruction.
Lk	16.	13	devoted to the one and d the other.
DESPISED → DESPISE

Isa	53.	3	He was d and rejected by others;
1Co	1.	28	God chose what is low and d in the
DESTINED

Eph	1.	5	He d us for adoption as his children
1Th	5.	9	For God has d us not for wrath but
1Pe	1.	11	to the sufferings d for Christ
DESTROY → DESTROYED, DESTRUCTION

Ge	6.	13	to d them along with the earth.
Mt	10.	28	rather fear him who can d both soul
Jn	10.	10	comes only to steal and kill and d.
Jas	4.	12	who is able to save and to d.
1Jn	3.	8	to d the works of the devil.
DESTROYED → DESTROY

Da	6.	26	His kingdom shall never be d,
1Co	15.	26	The last enemy to be d is death.
DESTRUCTION → DESTROY

Pr	16.	18	Pride goes before d, and a haughty
Mt	7.	13	and the road is easy that leads to d,
DEVIL

Mt	4.	1	wilderness to be tempted by the d.
Lk	8.	12	d comes and takes away the word
Jn	8.	44	You are from your father the d,
Eph	4.	27	and do not make room for the d.
 	6.	11	to stand against the wiles of the d.
1Ti	3.	6	fall into the condemnation of the d.
Heb	2.	14	the power of death, that is, the d,
Jas	4.	7	Resist the d, and he will flee from
1Pe	5.	8	lion your adversary the d prowls
1Jn	3.	8	to destroy the works of the d.
Jude	1.	9	Michael contended with the d
Rev	12.	9	who is called the D and Satan,
 	20.	2	that ancient serpent, who is the D
DIE → DEAD

Ge	2.	17	eat of it you shall d.”
 	3.	4	to the woman, “You will not d;
Ru	1.	17	Where you d, I will d—
Ecc	3.	2	a time to be born, and a time to d;
Isa	22.	13	eat and drink, for tomorrow we d.”
Jer	31.	30	But all shall d for their own sins;
Mt	26.	35	“Even though I must d with you,
Jn	11.	26	and believes in me will never d.
Ro	14.	8	if we d, we d to the Lord;
1Co	15.	32	eat and drink, for tomorrow we d.”
Heb	9.	27	appointed for mortals to d once,
DIED → DEAD

Ro	5.	6	right time Christ d for the ungodly.
1Co	15.	3	Christ d for our sins in accordance
Gal	2.	19	the law I d to the law,
DIFFERENT

2Co	11.	4	or a d gospel from the one you
Gal	1.	6	and are turning to a d gospel—
DISAPPOINT

Ro	5.	5	and hope does not d us,
DISCIPLE → DISCIPLES

Mt	10.	24	“A d is not above the teacher,
Lk	14.	26	even life itself, cannot be my d.
DISCIPLES → DISCIPLE

Mt	26.	56	all the d deserted him and fled.
 	28.	19	therefore and make d of all nations,
Lk	6.	13	he called his d and chose twelve of
Jn	8.	31	in my word, you are truly my d;
Ac	11.	26	the d were first called “Christians.”
DISCIPLINE → DISCIPLINED

Job	5.	17	not despise the d of the Almighty.
Ps	94.	12	Happy are those whom you d,
Eph	6.	4	in the d and instruction of the Lord.
Heb	12.	5	not regard lightly the d of the Lord,
DISCIPLINED → DISCIPLINE

1Co	11.	32	d so that we may not be condemned
DISEASE → DISEASES

Mt	4.	23	of the kingdom and curing every d
 	9.	35	curing every d and every sickness.
DISEASES → DISEASE

Ex	15.	26	d that I brought upon the Egyptians;
Ps	103.	3	your iniquity, who heals all your d,
Isa	53.	4	our infirmities and carried our d;
Mt	8.	17	took our infirmities and bore our d.”
DISMAYED

Dt	1.	21	do not fear or be d.”
Jos	1.	9	do not be frightened or d,
DISOBEDIENT → DISOBEY

Ne	9.	26	they were d and rebelled
Ro	10.	21	I have held out my hands to a d
Tit	3.	3	ourselves were once foolish, d,
DISOBEY → DISOBEDIENT

Lev	26.	27	But if, despite this, you d me,
1Pe	2.	8	stumble because they d the word,
DISTINCTION → DISTINCTIONS

Ex	8.	23	I will make a d between my people
Lev	11.	47	make a d between the unclean and
Eze	22.	26	have made no d between the holy
DISTINCTIONS → DISTINCTION

Jas	2.	4	you not made d among yourselves,
DISTRESS → DISTRESSED

2Sa	22.	7	In my d I called upon the LORD;
Ps	81.	7	In d you called, and I rescued you;
Lk	21.	23	For there will be great d on the earth
Ro	8.	35	Will hardship, or d, or persecution,
DISTRESSED → DISTRESS

La	1.	20	See, O LORD, how d I am;
DISTRIBUTED

Ac	4.	35	it was d to each as any had need.
Heb	2.	4	gifts of the Holy Spirit, d according
DIVIDED

Lev	11.	3	Any animal that has d hoofs
Ps	136.	13	who d the Red Sea in two,
Lk	11.	18	If Satan also is d against himself,
DIVINE

Ro	1.	20	his eternal power and d nature,
2Pe	1.	4	become participants of the d nature.
DIVORCE → DIVORCED

Dt	24.	1	so he writes her a certificate of d,
Isa	50.	1	Where is your mother’s bill of d
Jer	3.	8	sent her away with a decree of d;
Mal	2.	16	For I hate d, says the LORD,
Mt	5.	31	let him give her a certificate of d.’
 	19.	3	a man to d his wife for any cause?”
1Co	7.	11	the husband should not d his wife.
DIVORCED → DIVORCE

Lev	21.	7	neither shall they marry a woman d
Mt	5.	32	whoever marries a d woman
DOCTOR

Lk	4.	23	this proverb, ‘D, cure yourself!’
DOCTRINE → DOCTRINES

Eph	4.	14	blown about by every wind of d,
1Ti	1.	3	not to teach any different d,
2Ti	4.	3	people will not put up with sound d,
Tit	1.	9	able both to preach with sound d
DOCTRINES → DOCTRINE

Mk	7.	7	teaching human precepts as d.’
DOERS

Jas	1.	22	But be d of the word,
DOGS

Mt	7.	6	“Do not give what is holy to d;
DOMINION

Ge	1.	26	and let them have d over
Ps	22.	28	For d belongs to the LORD,
Da	7.	14	His d is an everlasting d
Rev	1.	6	to him be glory and d forever
DONKEY

Zec	9.	9	humble and riding on a d,
Mt	21.	5	humble, and mounted on a d,
DOOR → DOORPOSTS

Mt	7.	7	knock, and the d will be opened
Lk	13.	24	Strive to enter through the narrow d
Rev	3.	20	I am standing at the d, knocking;
DOORPOSTS → DOOR

Ex	12.	7	the blood and put it on the two d
DOUBT → DOUBTED, DOUBTING

Mt	14.	31	of little faith, why did you d?”
Jn	20.	27	Do not d but believe.”
DOUBTED → DOUBT

Mt	28.	17	they worshiped him; but some d.
DOUBTING → DOUBT

Jas	1.	6	But ask in faith, never d,
DOVE

Ge	8.	8	Then he sent out the d from him,
Mk	1.	10	Spirit descending like a d on him.
DRAGON

Isa	27.	1	and he will kill the d that
Rev	12.	3	a great red d, with seven heads and
 	20.	2	seized the d, that ancient serpent,
DRANK → DRINK

Ex	24.	11	beheld God, and they ate and d.
Mk	14.	23	and all of them d from it.
1Co	10.	4	all d the same spiritual drink.
DRAW

Jas	4.	8	D near to God, and he will d near
DREAM → DREAMS

Joel	2.	28	your old men shall d dreams,
Ac	2.	17	and your old men shall d dreams.
DREAMS → DREAM

Nu	12.	6	I speak to them in d.
DRIED → DRY

Ge	8.	13	the waters were d up from the earth;
Jos	5.	1	had d up the waters of the Jordan
Isa	51.	10	Was it not you who d up the sea,
DRINK → DRANK, DRUNK, DRUNKARD, DRUNKENNESS

Ex	32.	6	the people sat down to eat and d,
Ecc	9.	7	and d your wine with a merry heart;
Isa	22.	13	eat and d, for tomorrow we die.”
Mt	20.	22	to d the cup that I am about to d?”
Jn	18.	11	not to d the cup that the Father has
Ro	14.	17	kingdom of God is not food and d
1Co	12.	13	we were all made to d of one Spirit.
Rev	14.	10	also d the wine of God’s wrath,
DRUNK → DRINK

Jn	2.	10	after the guests have become d.
Ac	2.	15	these are not d, as you suppose,
Eph	5.	18	Do not get d with wine,
DRUNKARD → DRINK

Mt	11.	19	they say, ‘Look, a glutton and a d,
1Co	5.	11	is an idolater, reviler, d, or robber.
1Ti	3.	3	not a d, not violent but gentle,
DRUNKENNESS → DRINK

Gal	5.	21	d, carousing, and things like these.
DRY → DRIED

Ge	1.	9	and let the d land appear.”
Ex	14.	16	may go into the sea on d ground.
Eze	37.	4	d bones, hear the word of the LORD.
DUST

Ge	2.	7	LORD God formed man from the d
1Sa	2.	8	He raises up the poor from the d;
Ps	103.	14	he remembers that we are d.
Ecc	3.	20	from the d, and all turn to d again.
Mt	10.	14	shake off the d from your feet
1Co	15.	47	man was from the earth, a man of d;
DWELL → DWELLING, DWELLS

Ex	25.	8	so that I may d among them.
1Ki	8.	27	But will God indeed d on the earth?
Ps	23.	6	and I shall d in the house of
Eph	3.	17	that Christ may d in your hearts
Col	1.	19	fullness of God was pleased to d,
Rev	21.	3	He will d with them as their God;
DWELLING → DWELL

Ps	90.	1	our d place in all generations.
Jn	14.	2	my Father’s house there are many d
2Co	5.	2	to be clothed with our heavenly d—
Eph	2.	22	spiritually into a d place for God.
DWELLS → DWELL

Jn	14.	10	but the Father who d in me
Ro	7.	17	but sin that d within me.
1Co	3.	16	and that God’s Spirit d in you?
Col	2.	9	whole fullness of deity d bodily,
E

EAGLES

Isa	40.	31	shall mount up with wings like e,
EAR

Isa	64.	4	has heard, no e has perceived,
Lk	22.	51	he touched his e and healed him.
1Co	2.	9	“What no eye has seen, nor e heard,
EARTH

Ge	1.	1	God created the heavens and the e,
 	6.	11	the e was corrupt in God’s sight,
Isa	6.	3	the whole e is full of his glory.”
 	65.	17	to create new heavens and a new e;
Mt	5.	5	meek, for they will inherit the e.
 	24.	35	Heaven and e will pass away,
2Pe	3.	13	wait for new heavens and a new e,
Rev	21.	1	I saw a new heaven and a new e;
EAST

Ge	2.	8	planted a garden in Eden, in the e;
Ps	103.	12	as far as the e is from the west,
Mt	2.	1	wise men from the E came to
EASY

Mt	11.	30	For my yoke is e, and my burden is
EAT → ATE, EATS

Ge	2.	16	freely e of every tree of the garden;
Lev	11.	4	you shall not e the following:
Mt	26.	26	to the disciples, and said, “Take, e;
Ac	10.	13	“Get up, Peter; kill and e.”
1Co	10.	31	whether you e or drink, or whatever
Rev	3.	20	I will come in to you and e with you
EATS → EAT

Jn	6.	51	e of this bread will live forever;
1Co	11.	27	e the bread or drinks the cup of the
EDEN

Ge	2.	8	a garden in E, in the east;
EGYPT

Ge	47.	27	Israel settled in the land of E,
Hos	11.	1	and out of E I called my son.
Mt	2.	15	“Out of E I have called my son.”
Rev	11.	8	prophetically called Sodom and E,
ELDER → ELDERS

1Ti	5.	19	any accusation against an e except
1Pe	5.	1	as an e myself and a witness of the
ELDERS → ELDER

Ex	24.	1	and seventy of the e of Israel,
Mt	27.	12	accused by the chief priests and e,
Mk	7.	3	thus observing the tradition of the e;
1Ti	5.	17	the e who rule well be considered
Jas	5.	14	e of the church and have them pray
1Pe	5.	5	must accept the authority of the e.
Rev	4.	4	on the thrones are twenty-four e,
ELECT → ELECTION

Mt	24.	22	sake of the e those days will be cut
Mk	13.	22	to lead astray, if possible, the e.
ELECTION → ELECT

Ro	9.	11	God’s purpose of e might continue,
2Pe	1.	10	eager to confirm your call and e,
ELEVEN

Mt	28.	16	Now the e disciples went to Galilee,
Ac	1.	26	and he was added to the e apostles.
EMMANUEL → IMMANUEL

Mt	1.	23	and they shall name him E,”
ENCOURAGE → ENCOURAGEMENT

1Th	4.	18	e one another with these words.
1Pe	5.	12	written this short letter to e you
ENCOURAGEMENT → ENCOURAGE

Ro	15.	5	God of steadfastness and e grant
Php	2.	1	If then there is any e in Christ,
END

Ge	6.	13	determined to make an e of all flesh,
Pr	14.	12	but its e is the way to death.
Ecc	12.	12	making many books there is no e,
Mt	24.	13	But the one who endures to the e
 	28.	20	always, to the e of the age.”
Ro	10.	4	For Christ is the e of the law so
Rev	22.	13	the beginning and the e.”
ENDURANCE → ENDURE

Ro	5.	3	knowing that suffering produces e,
1Ti	6.	11	godliness, faith, love, e,
Heb	10.	36	For you need e, so that when you
Jas	1.	3	the testing of your faith produces e;
2Pe	1.	6	and self-control with e,
ENDURE → ENDURANCE, ENDURED, ENDURES

Mal	3.	2	who can e the day of his coming,
1Co	10.	13	so that you may be able to e it.
2Ti	2.	12	if we e, we will also reign with him;
ENDURED → ENDURE

Heb	12.	2	that was set before him e the cross,
ENDURES → ENDURE

1Co	13.	7	hopes all things, e all things.
1Pe	1.	25	but the word of the Lord e forever.”
ENEMIES → ENEMY

Mt	5.	44	But I say to you, Love your e and
Ro	5.	10	For if while we were e,
ENEMY → ENEMIES, ENMITY

Mt	13.	39	the e who sowed them is the devil;
1Co	15.	26	The last e to be destroyed is death.
ENGAGED

Mt	1.	18	mother Mary had been e to Joseph,
ENJOYMENT

Ecc	8.	15	So I commend e, for there is nothing
1Ti	6.	17	with everything for our e.
ENLIGHTENED → LIGHT

Ro	10.	2	a zeal for God, but it is not e.
Eph	1.	18	with the eyes of your heart e,
Heb	6.	4	those who have once been e,
ENLIGHTENS → LIGHT

Jn	1.	9	The true light, which e everyone,
ENMITY → ENEMY

Ge	3.	15	put e between you and the woman,
Jas	4.	4	with the world is e with God?
ENTER → ENTRY

Mt	7.	13	“E through the narrow gate;
Mk	10.	15	as a little child will never e it.”
Jn	3.	5	no one can e the kingdom of God
Rev	21.	27	But nothing unclean will e it,
ENTRUSTED → TRUST

Lk	12.	48	the one to whom much has been e,
2Ti	1.	12	guard until that day what I have e
Jude	1.	3	the faith that was once for all e
ENVY

Pr	23.	17	Do not let your heart e sinners,
Mk	7.	22	deceit, licentiousness, e, slander,
Ro	1.	29	Full of e, murder, strife, deceit,
EPHOD

Ex	28.	6	They shall make the e of gold,
EQUAL → EQUALITY

Isa	40.	25	you compare me, or who is my e?
 	46.	5	will you liken me and make me e,
Jn	5.	18	thereby making himself e to God.
EQUALITY → EQUAL

Php	2.	6	not regard e with God as something
ERROR

Lev	5.	18	for the e that you committed
Ro	1.	27	the due penalty for their e.
1Jn	4.	6	of truth and the spirit of e.
ESTABLISH → ESTABLISHED

Eze	16.	60	e with you an everlasting covenant.
Heb	8.	8	when I will e a new covenant with
ESTABLISHED → ESTABLISH

2Sa	7.	16	your throne shall be e forever.
Ps	89.	2	your steadfast love is e forever;
 	103.	19	The LORD has e his throne in the
ETERNAL → ETERNITY

Mt	25.	46	but the righteous into e life.”
Mk	10.	17	what must I do to inherit e life?”
Jn	3.	16	may not perish but may have e life.
Ro	5.	21	e life through Jesus Christ our Lord.
2Co	4.	17	an e weight of glory beyond all
Heb	5.	9	the source of e salvation for all who
1Jn	5.	13	may know that you have e life.
ETERNITY → ETERNAL

Isa	57.	15	high and lofty one who inhabits e,
2Pe	3.	18	glory both now and to the day of e.
EUNUCH

Ac	8.	27	Now there was an Ethiopian e,
EVANGELIST → EVANGELISTS

2Ti	4.	5	do the work of an e, carry out your
EVANGELISTS → EVANGELIST

Eph	4.	11	some e, some pastors and teachers,
EVERLASTING → LAST

Ge	9.	16	remember the e covenant between
Ps	90.	2	from e to e you are God.
Isa	9.	6	E Father, Prince of Peace.
Jer	31.	3	I have loved you with an e love;
Da	4.	3	His kingdom is an e kingdom,
EVIL

Ge	2.	9	tree of the knowledge of good and e.
Jdg	2.	11	Then the Israelites did what was e
Ps	23.	4	the darkest valley, I fear no e;
Pr	8.	13	fear of the LORD is hatred of e.
Mt	6.	13	but rescue us from the e one.
 	12.	35	e person brings e things out of an e
Lk	11.	13	who are e, know how to give good
Jn	17.	15	to protect them from the e one.
Ro	12.	17	Do not repay anyone e for e,
Eph	5.	16	of the time, because the days are e.
1Ti	6.	10	of money is a root of all kinds of e,
1Jn	5.	18	and the e one does not touch them.
2Jn	1.	11	to welcome is to participate in the e
3Jn	1.	11	do not imitate what is e but imitate
EXALT → EXALTED

Lk	14.	11	who e themselves will be humbled,
Jas	4.	10	before the Lord, and he will e you.
EXALTED → EXALT

Ps	57.	5	Be e, O God, above the heavens.
Php	2.	9	highly e him and gave him the name
EXAMPLES

1Co	10.	6	these things occurred as e for us,
1Pe	5.	3	but be e to the flock.
EXCELLENCE → EXCELLENT

Php	4.	8	if there is any e and if there is
EXCELLENT → EXCELLENCE

Isa	28.	29	in counsel, and e in wisdom.
1Co	12.	31	I will show you a still more e way.
Heb	1.	4	the name he has inherited is more e
EXCUSE

Jn	15.	22	they have no e for their sin.
Ro	1.	20	So they are without e;
EXHORT

Tit	2.	15	e and reprove with all authority.
Heb	3.	13	But e one another every day,
EXILE

2Ki	25.	11	carried into e the rest of the people
Ezr	6.	21	of Israel who had returned from e,
EYE → EYES, EYEWITNESSES

Ex	21.	24	e for e, tooth for tooth,
Ps	17.	8	Guard me as the apple of the e;
Mt	5.	29	If your right e causes you to sin,
 	5.	38	An e for an e and a tooth for
 	7.	3	see the speck in your neighbor’s e,
Mk	10.	25	to go through the e of a needle
1Co	15.	52	in the twinkling of an e, at the last
Rev	1.	7	the clouds; every e will see him,
EYES → EYE

Ge	3.	7	Then the e of both were opened,
Ps	121.	1	I lift up my e to the hills—
Pr	3.	7	Do not be wise in your own e;
Mt	9.	30	And their e were opened.
Eph	1.	18	with the e of your heart enlightened,
1Pe	3.	12	e of the Lord are on the righteous,
1Jn	2.	16	of the flesh, the desire of the e,
Rev	21.	4	he will wipe every tear from their e.
EYEWITNESSES → EYE, WITNESS

Lk	1.	2	who from the beginning were e
2Pe	1.	16	but we had been e of his majesty.
F

FACE

Ge	32.	30	“For I have seen God f to f,
Nu	6.	25	LORD make his f to shine upon
 	12.	8	With him I speak f to f—
Ps	4.	6	Let the light of your f shine on us,
Isa	54.	8	wrath for a moment I hid my f
Eze	39.	29	I will never again hide my f from
Lk	9.	29	the appearance of his f changed,
FADE → FADES

Ps	37.	2	for they will soon f like the grass,
Isa	64.	6	We all f like a leaf,
FADES → FADE

Isa	40.	7	The grass withers, the flower f,
1Pe	5.	4	crown of glory that never f away.
FAINT

Ps	142.	3	When my spirit is f, you know
Isa	40.	31	they shall walk and not f.
FAITH → FAITHFUL, FAITHFULNESS

Isa	7.	9	If you do not stand firm in f,
Hab	2.	4	but the righteous live by their f.
Mt	17.	20	have f the size of a mustard seed,
Ac	3.	16	and the f that is through Jesus
Ro	3.	28	that a person is justified by f apart
1Co	13.	13	And now f, hope, and love abide,
Eph	4.	5	one Lord, one f, one baptism,
Heb	11.	1	f is the assurance of things hoped
Jas	2.	17	f by itself, if it has no works,
1Jn	5.	4	that conquers the world, our f.
Rev	2.	13	and you did not deny your f in me
FAITHFUL → FAITH

Dt	32.	4	A f God, without deceit, just and
Ps	4.	3	LORD has set apart the f for
Mt	24.	45	“Who then is the f and wise slave,
1Th	5.	24	The one who calls you is f,
Heb	10.	23	for he who has promised is f.
1Jn	1.	9	f and just will forgive us our sins
Rev	19.	11	Its rider is called F and True,
FAITHFULNESS → FAITH

Ex	34.	6	abounding in steadfast love and f,
Jos	24.	14	and serve him in sincerity and in f;
Isa	11.	5	and f the belt around his loins.
La	3.	23	new every morning; great is your f.
Gal	5.	22	patience, kindness, generosity, f,
FALL → FELL

Pr	16.	18	and a haughty spirit before a f.
Ro	9.	33	a rock that will make them f,
1Co	10.	12	watch out that you do not f.
FALSE

Dt	5.	20	Neither shall you bear f witness
Mk	13.	22	F messiahs and f prophets will
Heb	6.	18	impossible that God would prove f,
2Pe	2.	1	there will be f teachers among you,
Rev	20.	10	where the beast and the f prophet
FAMILY

Pr	6.	19	and one who sows discord in a f.
Gal	6.	10	especially for those of the f of faith.
Eph	3.	15	from whom every f in heaven and
1Pe	2.	17	Love the f of believers.
FAST

Isa	58.	5	Is such the f that I choose,
Mt	6.	16	“And whenever you f,
FATHER → FATHER’S

Ge	2.	24	a man leaves his f and his mother
Ex	20.	12	Honor your f and your mother,
Ps	89.	26	cry to me, ‘You are my F, my God,
Isa	9.	6	Mighty God, Everlasting F, Prince
Mt	6.	9	Our F in heaven, hallowed be your
 	28.	19	the name of the F and of the Son and
Jn	5.	18	but was also calling God his own F,
 	14.	6	comes to the F except through me.
Gal	4.	6	into our hearts, crying, “Abba! F!”
Rev	3.	5	confess your name before my F
FATHER’S → FATHER

Lk	2.	49	that I must be in my F house?”
Jn	1.	14	the glory as of a f only son,
 	14.	2	F house there are many dwelling
FAVOR

Ps	30.	5	his f is for a lifetime.
Isa	49.	8	In a time of f I have answered you,
Lk	4.	19	proclaim the year of the Lord’s f.”
FEAR → AFRAID

Dt	6.	13	The LORD your God you shall f;
Ps	19.	9	the f of the LORD is pure,
 	23.	4	the darkest valley, I f no evil;
Pr	1.	7	f of the LORD is the beginning
Ecc	12.	13	F God, and keep his commandments
Mt	10.	28	rather f him who can destroy both
Mk	5.	36	“Do not f, only believe.”
1Pe	3.	14	Do not f what they f,
1Jn	4.	18	but perfect love casts out f;
Rev	14.	7	“F God and give him glory,
FEET

Ps	119.	105	Your word is a lamp to my f
Lk	24.	39	Look at my hands and my f;
Jn	13.	5	and began to wash the disciples’ f
1Co	15.	25	put all his enemies under his f.
FELLOWSHIP

Ac	2.	42	to the apostles’ teaching and f,
2Co	6.	14	Or what f is there between light and
1Jn	1.	3	and truly our f is with the Father
FEMALE

Ge	1.	27	male and f he created them.
Mk	10.	6	‘God made them male and f.’
Gal	3.	28	there is no longer male and f;
FESTIVAL → FESTIVALS

Ex	23.	14	in the year you shall hold a f for me.
1Co	5.	8	Therefore, let us celebrate the f,
FESTIVALS → FESTIVAL

Lev	23.	2	the appointed f of the LORD
Ne	10.	33	the new moons, the appointed f,
Col	2.	16	of food and drink or of observing f,
FEW

Mt	22.	14	many are called, but f are chosen.”
Lk	13.	23	“Lord, will only a f be saved?”
FIG

Ge	3.	7	and they sewed f leaves together
Hab	3.	17	Though the f tree does not blossom,
Mt	24.	32	“From the f tree learn its lesson:
FILL → FILLED, FULL, FULLNESS

Ge	1.	28	and f the earth and subdue it;
Jer	23.	24	Do I not f heaven and earth?
Eph	4.	10	so that he might f all things.)
FILLED → FILL

Lk	1.	15	will be f with the Holy Spirit.
Ac	2.	4	were f with the Holy Spirit and
Eph	5.	18	but be f with the Spirit,
FIND

Dt	4.	29	you will f him if you search after
Jer	29.	13	you search for me, you will f me;
Mt	16.	25	lose their life for my sake will f it.
FINISHED

Ge	2.	2	on the seventh day God f the work
Jn	19.	30	the wine, he said, “It is f.”
FIRE → FIERY

Ex	13.	21	and in a pillar of f by night,
Da	3.	25	walking in the middle of the f,
Mal	3.	2	For he is like a refiner’s f and like
Mt	3.	11	baptize you with the Holy Spirit and f.
Mk	9.	43	to go to hell, to the unquenchable f.
Ac	2.	3	Divided tongues, as of f, appeared
Heb	12.	29	indeed our God is a consuming f.
Rev	20.	14	the second death, the lake of f;
FIRST → FIRSTBORN

Ge	1.	5	and there was morning, the f day.
Pr	8.	22	the f of his acts of long ago.
Isa	41.	4	I, the LORD, am f,
Mt	6.	33	But strive f for the kingdom of God
Mk	10.	31	But many who are f will be last, and the last will be f.”
1Th	4.	16	the dead in Christ will rise f.
1Jn	4.	19	We love because he f loved us.
Rev	1.	17	I am the f and the last,
 	20.	5	This is the f resurrection.
 	21.	1	the f heaven and the f earth
FIRSTBORN → BEAR, FIRST

Ex	4.	22	‘Thus says the LORD: Israel is my f
Ps	78.	51	He struck all the f in Egypt,
Zec	12.	10	as one weeps over a f.
Lk	2.	7	And she gave birth to her f son and
Col	1.	15	invisible God, the f of all creation;
Rev	1.	5	faithful witness, the f of the dead,
FISH

Jnh	2.	1	his God from the belly of the f,
Jn	6.	9	has five barley loaves and two f.
FLESH

Ge	2.	23	of my bones and f of my f;
 	2.	24	and they become one f.
Eze	36.	26	of stone and give you a heart of f.
Mt	16.	17	For f and blood has not revealed this
 	26.	41	but the f is weak.”
Jn	1.	14	the Word became f and lived among
 	3.	6	What is born of the f is f,
Ro	8.	4	to the f but according to the Spirit.
2Co	12.	7	a thorn was given me in the f,
Gal	5.	19	Now the works of the f are obvious:
1Pe	1.	24	“All f is like grass and all its glory
1Jn	4.	2	that Jesus Christ has come in the f
FLOOD

Ge	7.	7	the ark to escape the waters of the f.
2Pe	2.	5	a f on a world of the ungodly;
FLOWING

Ex	3.	8	a land f with milk and honey,
Jos	5.	6	a land f with milk and honey.
FOLLOW → FOLLOWED

1Ki	18.	21	If the LORD is God, f him;
Lk	9.	23	take up their cross daily and f me.
FOLLOWED → FOLLOW

Mk	1.	18	they left their nets and f him.
Rev	13.	3	the whole earth f the beast.
FOOD

Ge	1.	30	I have given every green plant for f.
Ps	136.	25	who gives f to all flesh,
Jn	6.	55	for my flesh is true f and my blood
1Co	8.	8	“F will not bring us close to God.”
FOOL → FOOLISH, FOOLISHNESS, FOOLS

Pr	15.	5	A f despises a parent’s instruction,
FOOLISH → FOOL

Mt	7.	26	like a f man who built his house
1Co	1.	20	Has not God made f the wisdom of
Tit	3.	3	For we ourselves were once f,
FOOLISHNESS → FOOL

1Co	1.	18	cross is f to those who are perishing,
 	3.	19	wisdom of this world is f with God.
FOOLS → FOOL

Ps	14.	1	F say in their hearts, “There is no God.”
Pr	1.	7	f despise wisdom and instruction.
Ro	1.	22	Claiming to be wise, they became f;
1Co	4.	10	We are f for the sake of Christ,
FOREHEADS

Eze	9.	4	and put a mark on the f of those
Rev	7.	3	of our God with a seal on their f.”
 	20.	4	not received its mark on their f
FOREKNEW → KNOW

Ro	8.	29	whom he f he also predestined to
 	11.	2	not rejected his people whom he f.
FOREVER

Ge	3.	22	the tree of life, and eat, and live f”
 	6.	3	spirit shall not abide in mortals f,
Ex	3.	15	This is my name f, and this my title
Ps	110.	4	“You are a priest f according to the
Ecc	3.	14	that whatever God does endures f;
Isa	40.	8	the word of our God will stand f.
Jn	6.	51	eats of this bread will live f;
 	14.	16	another Advocate, to be with you f.
Heb	13.	8	the same yesterday and today and f.
Rev	11.	15	and he will reign f and ever.”
FORGET

Dt	4.	23	So be careful not to f the covenant
Isa	49.	15	these may f, yet I will not f you.
FORGIVE → FORGAVE, FORGIVEN, FORGIVENESS, FORGIVING

Ne	9.	17	But you are a God ready to f,
Mt	6.	12	And f us our debts, as we
Lk	5.	24	has authority on earth to f sins”—
1Jn	1.	9	is faithful and just will f us our sins
FORGIVEN → FORGIVE

Ps	32.	1	are those whose transgression is f,
Mt	6.	12	as we also have f our debtors.
 	12.	31	against the Spirit will not be f.
Ro	4.	7	are those whose iniquities are f,
Eph	4.	32	as God in Christ has f you.
FORGIVENESS → FORGIVE

Mk	1.	4	a baptism of repentance for the f
Col	1.	14	we have redemption, the f of sins.
FORGIVING → FORGIVE

Ex	34.	7	f iniquity and transgression and sin,
Eph	4.	32	f one another, as God in Christ has
FORMED → FORMLESS

Ge	2.	7	LORD God f man from the dust
Ps	139.	13	you who f my inward parts;
FORMLESS → FORMED

Ge	1.	2	the earth was a f void and darkness
FORSAKE → FORSAKEN

Dt	31.	6	he will not fail you or f you.”
Jos	1.	5	I will not fail you or f you.
Heb	13.	5	“I will never leave you or f you.”
FORSAKEN → FORSAKE

Ps	22.	1	my God, why have you f me?
Mt	27.	46	my God, why have you f me?”
2Co	4.	9	persecuted, but not f;
FORTRESS

2Sa	22.	2	The LORD is my rock, my f,
Ps	71.	3	for you are my rock and my f.
FORTY

Ge	7.	4	rain on the earth for f days and f
Nu	14.	34	f days, for every day a year,
1Ki	19.	8	f days and f nights to Horeb
Jnh	3.	4	And he cried out, “F days more,
Mt	4.	2	He fasted f days and f nights,
Heb	3.	17	with whom was he angry f years?
FOUNDATION → FOUNDATIONS

Isa	28.	16	See, I am laying in Zion a f stone,
1Co	3.	11	that f is Jesus Christ.
Eph	2.	20	built upon the f of the apostles
FOUNDATIONS → FOUNDATION

Heb	11.	10	looked forward to the city that has f,
Rev	21.	14	the wall of the city has twelve f,
FRANKINCENSE → INCENSE

Isa	60.	6	They shall bring gold and f,
Mt	2.	11	gifts of gold, f, and myrrh.
FREE

Jn	8.	32	and the truth will make you f.”
Ro	6.	23	the f gift of God is eternal life
Gal	3.	28	there is no longer slave or f,
FRIEND → FRIENDS

Pr	18.	24	but a true f sticks closer than
Mt	11.	19	a f of tax collectors and sinners!’
Jas	2.	23	and he was called the f of God.
FRIENDS → FRIEND

Jn	15.	13	to lay down one’s life for one’s f.
FRUIT → FRUITFUL, FRUITLESS, FRUITS

Ge	3.	6	she took of its f and ate;
Lk	6.	44	each tree is known by its own f.
Jn	15.	2	branch that bears f he prunes to make it bear more f.
Rev	22.	2	tree of life with its twelve kinds of f,
FRUITFUL → FRUIT

Ge	9.	1	said to them, “Be f and multiply,
FRUITS → FRUIT

Ro	8.	23	who have the first f of the Spirit,
1Co	15.	23	in his own order: Christ the first f,
Rev	14.	4	as first f for God and the Lamb,
FULFILL → FULFILLED, FULFILLING

Mt	5.	17	I have come not to abolish but to f.
FULFILLED → FULFILL

Mk	1.	15	“The time is f, and the kingdom
Lk	24.	44	prophets, and the psalms must be f.”
Ro	8.	4	requirement of the law might be f
FULFILLING → FULFILL

Ro	13.	10	love is the f of the law.
FULL → FILL

Isa	6.	3	the whole earth is f of his glory.”
Jn	1.	14	f of grace and truth.
FULLNESS → FILL

Jn	1.	16	From his f we have all received,
1Co	10.	26	“the earth and its f are the Lord’s.”
Gal	4.	4	But when the f of time had come,
Eph	3.	19	may be filled with all the f of God.
Col	1.	19	in him all the f of God was pleased
FURNACE

Da	3.	6	be thrown into a f of blazing fire.”
FUTURE

Pr	24.	20	for the evil have no f;
Jer	31.	17	hope for your f, says the LORD:
1Co	3.	22	or death or the present or the f—
G

GAIN

Lk	9.	25	if they g the whole world,
Php	1.	21	living is Christ and dying is g.
GALILEE

Isa	9.	1	beyond the Jordan, G of the nations.
Mt	4.	15	across the Jordan, G of the Gentiles
Jn	7.	41	the Messiah does not come from G,
GARDEN

Ge	2.	8	LORD God planted a g in Eden,
Jn	19.	41	and in the g there was a new tomb
GATE → GATES

Mt	7.	13	“Enter through the narrow g;
Jn	10.	7	I am the g for the sheep.
GATES → GATE

Mt	16.	18	and the g of Hades will not prevail
Rev	21.	21	And the twelve g are twelve pearls,
GATHERED

Mt	18.	20	two or three are g in my name,
GENERATION

Ex	20.	6	steadfast love to the thousandth g
Da	4.	34	his kingdom endures from g to g.
Mt	12.	39	evil and adulterous g asks for a sign,
Lk	21.	32	this g will not pass away
GENEROSITY

Gal	5.	22	joy, peace, patience, kindness, g,
GENTILE → GENTILES

Mt	18.	17	as a G and a tax collector.
Gal	2.	14	live like a G and not like a Jew,
GENTILES → GENTILE

Ro	3.	29	Is he not the God of G also?
GENTLENESS

Gal	5.	23	g, and self-control.
Php	4.	5	Let your g be known to everyone.
1Ti	6.	11	godliness, faith, love, endurance, g.
GETHSEMANE

Mk	14.	32	They went to a place called G;
GHOST

Mt	14.	26	were terrified, saying, “It is a g!”
Lk	24.	39	for a g does not have flesh and
GIFT → GIFTS

Ecc	5.	19	this is the g of God.
Jn	4.	10	“If you knew the g of God,
Ac	2.	38	will receive the g of the Holy Spirit.
Ro	6.	23	but the free g of God is eternal life
1Co	7.	7	each has a particular g from God,
Jas	1.	17	with every perfect g, is from above,
Rev	21.	6	the thirsty I will give water as a g
GIFTS → GIFT

Mt	2.	11	offered him g of gold, frankincense,
1Co	12.	1	Now concerning spiritual g,
GIVE → GIVEN, GIVER

Mt	6.	11	G us this day our daily bread.
Mk	10.	45	to g his life a ransom for many.”
Jn	10.	28	I g them eternal life, and they will
Ac	20.	35	more blessed to g than to receive.’ ”
GIVEN → GIVE

Mt	7.	7	“Ask, and it will be g you;
Lk	22.	19	“This is my body, which is g for
Ro	5.	5	Holy Spirit that has been g to us.
GIVER → GIVE

2Co	9.	7	for God loves a cheerful g.
GLADNESS

Ps	100.	2	Worship the LORD with g;
Pr	10.	28	The hope of the righteous ends in g,
Isa	16.	10	Joy and g are taken away from the
Zep	3.	17	he will rejoice over you with g,
Heb	1.	9	has anointed you with the oil of g
GLORIFIED → GLORY

Jn	13.	31	“Now the Son of Man has been g,
Ac	3.	13	has g his servant Jesus,
Ro	8.	30	those whom he justified he also g.
GLORIFY → GLORY

Ps	86.	12	and I will g your name forever.
Jn	17.	1	g your Son so that the Son may g you,
1Co	6.	20	therefore g God in your body.
GLORY → GLORIFIED, GLORIFY

Ex	33.	18	Moses said, “Show me your g,
1Sa	4.	21	“The g has departed from Israel,”
Ps	8.	5	crowned them with g and honor.
Isa	6.	3	the whole earth is full of his g.”
Mt	25.	31	the Son of Man comes in his g,
Lk	2.	14	“G to God in the highest heaven,
Jn	1.	14	and we have seen his g,
Ro	3.	23	sinned and fall short of the g of God;
1Co	10.	31	do everything for the g of God.
2Co	4.	17	for an eternal weight of g beyond
Heb	1.	3	reflection of God’s g and the exact
Rev	4.	11	to receive g and honor and power,
 	21.	23	for the g of God is its light,